,Job Title,Salary Range,Job Description,Rating,Company Name,Location,Headquarters,Size,Founded,Type of ownership,Industry,Sector,Revenue,Competitors
0,Data Scientist,$52k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist *
National healthcare organization offering a work atmosphere committed to statistical and analytical quality while exploring and leveraging leading edge methodologies for product customization and development. We are looking for an individual who enjoys designing and building report deliverables and using data to answer challenging patient care and business questions, all within a dynamic team environment. We are interested in individuals with the ability to learn quickly, solve problems creatively, and that bring strong communication skills and work ethic while delivering innovative, high quality reporting and analyses to our clients.

This role plays a critical part in driving improvements in patient care through use of technical report building skills, combined with data management and statistical skills. Advanced knowledge and experience with “real world” data and an interest in behavioral health/clinical outcomes are required. A successful member of our data science team will have a natural curiosity for research, an aptitude for analytics, a desire for data-driven decision making, and interest in improving mental health treatment and outcomes.
Summary of Major Functions*
Uses descriptive, inferential, prescriptive, and predictive statistical/data science techniques to analyze behavioral health outcomes and clinical data in search of patterns and trends. From those analyses, develops clinically relevant and actionable insights and communicates them to clients and stakeholders through custom, recurring, and web-based automated/business intelligence reporting that uses effective data visualizations. Designs and implements statistical and data science solutions for enhanced products or services, maintaining and promoting data integrity and best practices in statistical techniques and reporting, timely production of deliverables, and documenting deliverables.
Qualifications*
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential core function satisfactorily *_with or without supervisory and/or team guidance_*. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, experience, and ability necessary to perform this job.
Essential Core Functions*
Designs and executes plans to build and maintain statistical and algorithmic models using available tools and programming languages. Monitors and provides feedback on model performance as necessary.
Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and algorithms into automated data systems.
Designs and builds metrics and reports which align with the clinical and business needs of client hospital leadership and executives.
Assess custom data science requests; responsible for all data science aspects of delivering the request including data gathering and cleaning, applying appropriate statistical techniques, and report development inclusive of effective data visualizations.
Determines data sources most appropriate for data science projects, drawing from multiple sources to generate relevant datasets.
Conducts data science projects according to best practices and with the highest level of quality and validation. Contributes to Data Science Team quality by reviewing team work for same.
Evaluates new and existing data sources, processes, and architecture to develop recommendations for preventing system and data integrity issues, and promote efficient availability of data for statistical analysis and reporting.
Monitor data integrity and develop solutions to resolve problems.
Contributes to sharing behavioral health data insights through means such as academic manuscripts, informational short articles, and infographics.
Other Duties as assigned.
Job Specifications: *
_Education, Certification/Licensure, and/or Experience_
1+ years of experience in data science.
Bachelor’s (preferred master’s) in statistics, mathematics, computer science, or related disciplines
Track record of using data to provide actionable recommendations, and effectively communicating recommendations through reporting and data visualizations.
_Knowledge, skills, and abilities required_
Knowledge and ease of handling datasets with millions of records and variables spread across relational databases.
Programming skills in SPSS, SQL, SAS, R, Python and/or similar analytical languages.
Knowledge in developing and applying algorithms and predictive statistical models.
Strong critical thinking and problem solving skills.
To submit your resume please click ""Apply Now"". *
Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
SPSS, SAS, Stata, Python Pandas, or R statistical software: 2 years (Required)
t-tests, Pearson's correlation, chi-square, one way ANOVA: 2 years (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
WILL YOU NOW OR IN THE FUTURE REQUIRE SPONSORSHIP FOR EMPLOYMENT VISA STATUS? (E.G. H-1B VISA STATUS)",3.2,"Horizon Health
3.2","Lewisville, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1981,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
1,Data Scientist,-1,"Responsibilities
A Data Scientist's job is to use data to help businesses make decisions. Here are some common duties and responsibilities of a Data Scientist:
Collecting data through means such as analyzing business results or by setting up and managing new studies
Transferring data into a new format to make it more appropriate for analysis
Creating new, experimental frameworks to collect data
Building tools to automate data collection
Searching through large data sets for usable information
Creating reports and presentations for business uses
Correlating similar data to find actionable results
Qualifications:
Pursued a Bachelor's or Master's degree in Data Science/Computer Science (or related technical field), and/or within 1 year of their post-graduation date
Knowledge on Programming skills with Python or another programming language
Expertise in extracting data from multiple data sources using SQL
Good knowledge of statistics and probability
Excellent communication skills and passionate about learning new tools and developing products
Creative and fearless when tackling difficult problems
Comfortable with ambiguity and can demonstrate flexibilit
Interested candidates email your resume to karunasree@my3tech.com else reach me at 605-220-5981 ext 115

Regards,

Karuna Sree",-1,My3Tech,"Pierre, SD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
2,Data Scientist,$50k-$70k (Glassdoor Est.),"* Elutions will be unable to sponsor or transfer any additional H-1B visas during the next 5 years**
Elutions is a global Enterprise AI & Automation company, empowering clients to drive continuous efficiency, cost and quality improvements. As the top leader in our industry, world-wide, we are constantly on the lookout for go-getters, people who aren't afraid to work hard, but have fun at the same time. Those who join our team aren't just bright, but are willing to develop and hone their skills every day, all while making a significant difference in the world.

Data Scientist Responsibilities:

Perform exploratory data analysis and statistical modelling with high quality data handling techniques
Create meaningful data visualizations to communicate findings using python, PowerBI, etc.
Expand and improve current models and algorithms using research skills and previous experience
Perform feasibility, impact, technical risks and gap analysis.
Apply new mathematical methodologies to achieve specific models or analysis.
Create scalable model applicable to real time problems overcoming data barriers.
Incorporate process of continuous improvements into day-to-day tasks, aiming for quality refinements in statistics and data handling methods.
Troubleshoot problems and quality assurance in the processes with timely quality/ maintenance checks.
Update existing code to support ongoing analytic applications. Update, maintain and document existing work.
Collaborate with Research & Insights, Product Development, IT and other teams to conceptualize and implement analytic software from start to finish.
Design and deploy highly scalable ML architectures as solutions in Oil & Gas, Manufacturing, Retails industries.
Integrate ML software into Maestro, our AI Platform, with a professional software engineering team.
Perform other duties and projects as directed.

Required Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities:

Ability to leverage computing frameworks to mine, process, and present the value from unstructured data.
Previous experience working on Machine Learning projects and problems in the classroom/industry
Solid understanding of data structures, algorithms, computability and complexity, and computer architecture.
Solid understanding of probability, statistics, distributions, and analysis methods.
Knowledge of programming languages such as Python, R, Perl, SQL and Java.
Knowledge of Machine Learning tools, libraries, and APIs such as scikit-learn, Theano, Spark, or TensorFlow and apply them to effectively choose a proper model.
Ability to work with unstructured data.
Ability to model and evaluate data sets to determine useful patterns.
Interface effectively with customers, other departments and managers to resolve industries customer problems and issues.

Educational Requirements:

Minimum of Bachelor’s degree in one of the following disciplines (or similar): Computer Science, Statistics, Data Science, Advanced Mathematics, Machine Learning
Master’s degree preferred
Certifications preferred",4.0,"Elutions
4.0","Delafield, WI",-1,1 to 50 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
3,Data Scientist,-1,"Key Responsibilities:

· Research, prototype and develop innovative algorithms and solutions for real-time object detection, instance segregation and object tracking.

· Work with the team to integrate computer vision into industrial-level software solutions

· Stay up to date with tech, prototype with and learn new technologies, proactive in technology communities

· Learn from peers in data science and engineering community

· Deliver on time with a high bar on quality of research, innovation and engineering

Basic Qualifications:

· Master’s degree in AI/Computer Vision areas

· 4+ years of hands-on experience with OpenCV, SOD or an equivalent computer vision library

· 3+ years of experience in software engineering

· 3+ years of industrial experience with at least one of the following languages: Python, C++, Java

· Familiar with at least one machine learning framework: TensorFlow, Keras, Caffe, etc.

· Strong knowledge of advanced mathematics, image/video processing, computer vision, and AI/machine learning theories

Preferred Qualifications:

· Ph. D. preferred

· 2+ years of experience working in Agile team environment

· Experience with CUDA/TensorRT and modern data compression

· Experience in deep learning

· Published research on computer vision, image processing or machine learning",-1,Employment Placement Agency,"Irving, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
4,Data Scientist,$76k-$124k (Glassdoor Est.),"At CCRi, our clients look to us to solve their hardest problems, and we have a long history of exceeding their expectations. With clients in both the private sector and the US government, we provide a variety of advanced analytical techniques, and we render our solutions in software that our clients can apply immediately.

We are currently not expecting openings until after August 2020.

The Role

You'll help create machine learning analytics that will be integrated into streaming data processing pipelines and appealing user interfaces that provide real-time situational awareness and expose advanced analytics to end users. As a data scientist, your technical responsibilities will include design, research, and development. You will also be expected to contribute to the data science culture and ecosystem at CCRi through opportunities like design reviews and shared learning opportunities.

Who You Are

Curious: You enjoy peeling apart a problem and examining the interrelationships between data and how they can be used to form a solution.
Creative: You try new approaches to solving problems, looking for ways to apply techniques across domains and in new contexts.
Practical: You explore theories with an eye to their real world applications and their potential for improving performance for clients.
Collaborative: You work well on a team and can explain your work to your peers and source ideas and improvements from them.
Determined: You enjoy the challenge of finding solutions to difficult problems, testing them to discover what is successful and what should be optimized further, to develop industry-leading tools. You learn from failure and trying again.
Organized: You know how to keep track of both high-level goals and the tasks required to meet those goals. You take personal ownership of your team’s success.

Our Data Scientists have some combination of the following skills:

Understanding of structure and theory of common machine learning models
Familiarity with common machine learning libraries for implementation (sklearn, weka, tensorflow, torch, …)
Proficiency in one or more of: Python, Scala, Java, R, Julia, Matlab
Ability to understand and implement new models from the literature
Experience with distributed analytics and processing (Spark, Hadoop, …)
Experience with geospatial data and analytics

Requirements

US citizenship required
We DO NOT offer sponsorships or contracting work. This position is for Charlottesville only.
Prior Work experience in a related field and/or a working portfolio that clearly demonstrates your abilities

Benefits

The Company:

CCRi is a small engineering firm located in Charlottesville, Virginia. We develop and deploy novel machine-learning approaches to real problems at massive scale. Since 1992, we’ve been stopping bombs, predicting piracy, and guiding disaster relief.

Intellectually Challenging Work
Health Insurance
Short Term Disability Insurance
Generous Defined Benefit Retirement
Very Flexible Vacation Policy

Want to know more? Check out our recruitment video and blog.

The job description above is not intended to be comprehensive list. Responsibilities, activities, duties, and/or tasks may change or be assigned at any time.

CCRi is committed to a diverse and inclusive workforce because we know that our differences benefit our employees, our customers, and our community. We are proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, status as a an individual with a disability, status as a protected veteran, or any other applicable legally protected characteristics.",4.5,"CCRi
4.5","Charlottesville, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1989,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
5,Data Scientist,$71k-$119k (Glassdoor Est.),"JM&A Group is one of the largest independent providers of finance and insurance (F&I) products in the automotive industry. For nearly 40 years, the company has helped automobile dealers achieve unsurpassed levels of performance. JM&A Group provides more than 3,800 dealerships with a variety of products and services, such as new and used vehicle protection plans, pre-paid maintenance plans and GAP protection programs. Among JM&A Group’s competitive advantages is its robust training and consulting services for F&I professionals, and the company is actively evolving to meet consumer preferences to remain a market leader and a partner of choice.

JM&A, a division of JM Family Enterprises, Inc., is looking for an experienced Data Scientist to join its Customer Services Admin team. The Data Scientist will partner with stakeholders from various business functions to identify data science opportunities, have the knowledge, experience and technical skills to leverage internal and external data, and apply the right machine learning/big data technologies to turn such data into valuable insights and solutions for the company. The candidate will be tasked with gathering and integrating large volumes of data to develop complex predictive / machine learning models to drive actionable results and insights especially in the areas of fraud / anomaly detection, claims automation / self service and general efficiency opportunities. This is a highly visible and impactful role where the Data Scientist will interact with the senior and executive level management and have the opportunity to influence what we do and how we do it through data science.
Responsibilities:
Create a collaborative and effective working relationship with functional leaders to understand business problems, identify opportunities / use cases to improve the performance of our businesses
Lead / Contribute to the development of actionable solutions. This includes all aspects of the solution development including problem and goal definition, defining a plan for:
Sampling of the data and conducting experiments
Data extraction
Ingestion and processing (outlier and missing data handling)
Exploratory data analysis
Feature engineering (weight of evidence, label encoding, label count encoding, target encoding, time-series, polynomial interactions, binning, outlier handling)
Feature selection (forward, backwards, information value)
Hyperparameter optimization of machine learning models
Experiment tracking for A/B testing and reproducibility, model evaluation, model interpretability, results communication and deployment
Contribute to the adoption and better understanding across the company of data science best practices and tools and stay up to date regarding new knowledge and developments in this domain
#LI-JD1

Core skills in Computer Science: Data Structures, Algorithms, Programming Paradigms and Relational Databases
Deep working experience applying statistics and machine learning techniques to real-world problems and data and deploying models to production
Hands-on experience with SQL and tools to access databases
Expertise in Python and R
Expertise with open source data mining/machine learning/big data programming libraries, models and frameworks (e.g. Pandas, Scikit-Learn, H2O, TSFresh, FeatureTools, MLflow, Shap, Microsoft Interpret, Tensorflow, Statsmodels, Pandas-Profiling, Seaborn, Plotly, Spark, Koalas)
Working experience with cloud computing services such as AWS, Microsoft Azure or Google Cloud Platform
Excellent presentation skills to non-technical Associates communicating complex concepts in terms the audience can understand through understandable language, tables and visualizations
When evaluating the candidate, special attention will be paid to the following competencies:
Intellectual Curiosity and Critical Thinking, necessary to analyze a problem from multiple perspectives and examine the interrelationships between data that may appear superficially unrelated
Autonomous, to own projects end-to-end; ability to work on the entire stack without being dependent on other team members
Focus, to design and test a technique over days and weeks, find it doesn’t work, learn from the failure, and try again
Creativity, to invent and try new approaches to solving a problem
Attention to Detail, in order to maintain rigor and to detect and avoid over-reliance on intuition when examining data
Clear and concise written and oral communication, in order to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear and precise manner
Interpersonal skills, necessary to build good working relationships and work as part of a team
PhD or Masters in Computer Science, Statistics, Computer Science, Math or a related discipline or equivalent skill set",4.1,"JM Family
4.1","Deerfield Beach, FL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1968,Company - Private,Vehicle Dealers,Retail,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
6,Data Scientist,-1,"Teledyne Brown Engineering, Inc. is an industry leader in engineered systems and advanced manufacturing. The Company provides full-spectrum systems engineering, integration, manufacturing, and lifecycle sustainment solutions to the marine, aviation, aerospace, and defense, energy and environment markets. Teledyne Brown has expertise in systems integration, technology development, hardware design, prototype development, system test and evaluation, advanced manufacturing, performance-based logistics solutions, and operations and maintenance

Position Background and Scope
In January 2020, the U.S. Navy Surgeon General outlined four key tenets for projecting medical power globally and ensuring the survivability of the force. These ‘4P’ tenets include People, Performance, Platforms, and Power. Together they form a holistic framework for the Navy Medicine community to carry out the Surgeon General’s strategic vision with the following components of performance:
Principles of high reliability
Appreciative inquiry
Artificial intelligence
Partnerships
Data-driven decision making
This position will work as part of a team to help drive the greater Navy Medicine community in a direction of embracing the Surgeon General’s components of performance. Additionally, work conducted under this project will directly support operational decision-making through quantitative analysis while unifying advanced analytics efforts across the Navy Medicine enterprise.
Position Summary and Responsibilities
TBE is seeking an Enterprise Data Architect to support advanced analytics efforts within the U.S. Navy Bureau of Medicine and Surgery (BUMED). The candidate will provide data knowledge leadership, architect relational and non-relational databases and data pipelines, and build foundation for developing analytics applications at-scale. Near term priorities include evaluating existing data architectures across organizations and developing strategies for gaining efficiencies, strategies for migrating data to an integrated cloud environment, and designs for the development of a data architecture to support future analytics initiatives. Present architectures may be stove-piped, independently developed and sustained, and may or may not include existing API’s. This prevents effective integration of data across these systems to support enterprise wide data science and business intelligence applications. The candidate will help BUMED understand current system limitations and capability gaps, existing API’s, shortfalls in relation to the state of the art. The candidate will also advise BUMED leadership on strategic doctrine, policy changes, and technical recommendations that will allow Navy Medicine to develop a pathway for transitioning disparate information systems into an architecture that facilitates actionable analyses.

***This position requires the ability to obtain a DoD Security Clearance to the level of ""Secret""***
Education and/or Experience
Bachelor’s Degree in Software Engineering, Computer Science, or related field
Minimum 8 years of professional experience as a Solutions Architect, Data Architect, or Data Engineer providing leadership on design, architecture and implementation of data solutions (relational, non-relational), data pipelines and flows.
Superb communication skills with the ability to elicit goals, needs, and outcomes with Leaders at all levels across different functions.
Knowledgeable in the design and construction of data architectures that enable well-integrated transactional, collaborative and analytical systems.
Demonstrable experience of crafting architecture designs using a formal architecture framework methodology such as TOGAF, Zachman.
Experience with various Data/Information modeling techniques at the enterprise level (data flow diagrams, entity-relationship diagrams, and create/read/update/delete matrices).
Hands-on experience with data compute, storage, and security components and using Cloud Platform (preferably AWS) provided Big Data technologies.
Extensive experience developing for highly elastic/scalable, highly available systems.
Experience in migrating workloads/data from on-premise to cloud, and cloud to cloud.
In-depth understanding of database structure principles for relational and non-relational databases, business intelligence, and expertise in SQL and Data warehousing concepts
Understanding of differences between relational modeling and object modeling.
Understanding of taxonomies and ontologies.
Understanding of metamodels and semantic layers.
Experience with leading Data Architecture, Master Data Management, and Migration (ETL) tools such as Talend, Informatica.
Highly Desirable Skills and Characteristics

Hands-on experience in Big Data technologies (e.g. Hadoop, Hive, and Spark).
Familiarity with data visualization tools (e.g. Tableau, Kibana).
Experience on working with integration technologies (e.g. MuleSoft).
Working understanding of ML (“Machine Learning”) concepts.
Strong analytical, problem solving and interpersonal skills.
Ability to operate in a self-guided manner in a fast-paced fluid environment.

Due to classified work at the facility and related access restrictions, successful applicants must maintain U.S. Citizenship to allow the person to hold a U.S. Government security clearance.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race,color,religion,religious creed,gender,sexual orientation,gender identity,gender expression,transgender,pregnancy,marital status,national origin,ancestry,citizenship status,age,disability,protected Veteran Status,genetics or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal,state,or local law. If you need assistance or an accommodation while seeking employment,please email teledynerecruitment@teledyne.com or call (855)479-1480. Determinations on requests for reasonable accommodation will be made on a case-by-case basis. Please note that only those inquiries concerning a request for reasonable accommodation will receive a response.",3.2,"Teledyne Technologies
3.2",United States,-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1999,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
7,Data Scientist,-1,"Data Scientist – North America CoE
The Data Scientist is responsible for providing the delivery of Data and Analytics solutions to Techwave clients as part of our Data & Analytics CoE. The role will create solutions to business challenges through the use of advanced statistical analysis, data mining, and data visualization techniques.

Responsibilities:
Identifies the data the business should be collecting, devises methods of instrumenting the business’s system in order to extract this information
Designs, implements, and evaluates advanced statistical models and approaches for application in the business’s most complex issues
Conduct software development, software integration, statistical analysis, modeling, and simulations in a rapid DevOps environment.
Deploy new data science capabilities through existing toolsets.
Cleansing of large unstructured data and enabling analytical capability in order to query the data and address various business needs
Takes initiative to experiment with various technologies and tools with vision of creating innovative data driven insights for the business at the quickest pace possible.
Staying on top of the industry’s trends, in order to provide forward-thinking recommendations
.
Requirements:
Ph.D. or Masters with experience in any mathematical sciences
Strong programming skills and experience working with tools such as R, Python Programming, Open Source, visualizations, and so forth.
Demonstrated skills in SQL server reporting services, analysis services, integration services, Tableau, or other data visualization tools.
Strong skill in statistical techniques inclusive of cluster-analysis test design, regressions, and forecasting methodologies as well as substantial familiarity in big data and standardizing and A/B testing.
Experience cleaning labeled data in preparation for use in machine learning
Ability to create parallel processing operations by managing the number of processors used in an operation given memory limitations
Knowledge of cloud based data platforms such as Snowflake, Redshift, BigQuery etc..",3.8,"Techwave Consulting Inc.
3.8","Houston, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2004,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
8,Principal / Sr Principal Data Scientist (TS/SCI/Poly),$123k-$195k (Glassdoor Est.),"At the heart of Defining Possible is our commitment to missions. In rapidly changing global security environments, Northrop Grumman brings informed insights and software-secure technology to enable strategic planning. We're looking for innovators who can help us keep building on our wide portfolio of secure, affordable, integrated, and multi-domain systems and technologies that fuel those missions. By joining in our shared mission, we'll support yours of expanding your personal network and developing skills, whether you are new to the field or an industry thought-leader. At Northrop Grumman, you'll have the resources, support, and team to do some of the best work of your career.

Are you interested in expanding your career through experience and exposure, all while supporting a mission that seeks to ensure the security of our nation and its allies? If so, then Northrop Grumman is the place for you. As a leading global security company, we provide innovative systems, products and solutions to our customers worldwide. We are comprised of diverse professionals that bring different perspectives and ideas, understanding that the more experiences we bring to our work the more innovative we can be. As we continue to build our workforce, we look for people that exemplify our core values, leadership characteristics, and approach to innovation.

Northrop Grumman Mission Systems has an exciting opportunity for a Principal / Sr Principal Data Scientist who will be a member of a program's Data Science Team. Our ideal candidate will create data exploitation architectures/models/protocols, statistical reporting, and data analysis methodologies to identify trends in large data sets.

This position will be based in Chantilly, VA.

This position may be filled as a level 3 or level 4.

CIMS
NGMSCIMS

Qualifications:

Basic Qualifications:
Principal level 3: Bachelor's Degree and a minimum of 5 years of related experience or a Master's Degree and a minimum of 3 years of related experience. An extra 4 years of experience may be substituted in lieu of a degree.
Senior Principal level 4: Bachelor's Degree and a minimum of 9 years of related experience, a Master's Degree and a minimum of 7 years of related experience, or a PhD and a minimum of 5 years of related experience. An extra 4 years of experience may be substituted in lieu of a degree.
Active TS/SCI with Polygraph Clearance
Demonstrated experience in performing on data science projects in multiple domains, providing new capabilities to the organization and customers
Experience in two or more of the following: Python, Machine Learning, Natural Language Processing, Neural Networks, Apache Spark, Hadoop, R, C++, SQL Database/Coding, or visualization tools such as Tableau.
Experience with AWS or similar cloud provider
Demonstrated experience in solving problems with structured and unstructured data
Experienced in applying statistical and data visualization skills
Ability to perform complex tasks and participate in determining objectives of assignment. This includes planning schedules and working independently to achieve objectives.
Preferred Qualifications:
Proficient in applying technical standards, principles, theories, concepts and techniques of analyses containing many applications.
Experience developing solutions to address a national security issue or provide a competitive advantage for the organization.
Master's degree in mathematics, statistics, data science, data analytics, business analytics or a related field
Additional technical skills developing data science applications using languages/libraries such as TensorFlow, Keras, PyTorch, pandas, NumPy, Matlab, Paradigm or DataRobot desired.
Additional technical skills and/or research in areas like text or video processing, computer vision and/or graph analytics desired
Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www.northropgrumman.com/EEO. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.",3.9,"Northrop Grumman
3.9","Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1939,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
9,Data Scientist,-1,"Role Description:
Cognowiz LLC is seeking a junior data scientist in the Northern Virginia area
The Data Scientist will join a team responsible for developing advanced analytics products; applying data visualization and statistical programming tools to enterprise data to advance and enable the Department’s key mission outcomes. We prefer candidates with strong communication skills, knowledge and experience with fields related to data science, and a desire to learn more about new areas with applications to Data Science.

Responsibility:
· Ideal candidate should have a degree in a quantitative field (e.g., mathematics, computer science, physics, economics, engineering, statistics, operations research, quantitative social science, etc.).
· Experience with data visualization tools, such as Tableau, Qlik, Power BI, d3.js, or equivalent.
· Basic Knowledge on software development principles and architecture.
· Good analytical and problem-solving abilities.
· Ability to break down and understand complex business problems, define a solution and implement it using advanced quantitative methods.
· Familiarity with programming for data analysis; ideally Python, SQL, or R.
· Solid oral and written communication skills, especially around analytical concepts and methods.
· Great work ethic and intellectual curiosity.
· Knowledge of Cloud technologies such as AWS or Google Cloud.
· Knowledge of any relational database such as My SQL.
· Must be a team player with excellent communication and problem-solving skills and have experience working with customers across teams.
Required Skills:
· Bachelors degree
· 2+ relevant experience within data science or analysis
· Experience with programming languages such as Python, R, and VBA; and query languages such as SQL
· Experience with data visualization tools, such as Tableau, Qlik, Power BI, d3.js and other web application technologies, or equivalent
· Experience with SQL and NoSQL database technologies such as SQL Server, Oracle SQL
·Proficiency with data extraction, transformation, and loading to support advanced analytics
· Experience with a wide range of analytics techniques, such as statistics, machine learning, natural language processing, optimization, simulation, or closely related techniques
·Strong strategic communication skills

Job Type: Full-time

Salary: $70,000.00 per year

Work Remotely:
No",4.8,"Cognowiz LLC
4.8","Herndon, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
10,Data Scientist,$56k-$101k (Glassdoor Est.),"Posting Information

Position Type Permanent Staff (EHRA NF)
Department Public Policy-316400
Working Title Data Scientist
Appointment Type EHRA Non-Faculty Research
Position Posting Category Research Professionals
Salary Range Dependent on Qualifications
Full Time/Part Time? Full-Time Permanent
Hours per Week 40
Vacancy ID NF0004613
Position ID 20037222
Posting Open Date 10/28/2020
Application Deadline 11/10/2020
Open Until Filled No
Proposed Start Date 01/01/2021
Position Summary

As a pioneer of data-driven approaches to environmental policy, the Data-Driven EnviroLab (Data-Driven Lab) led by Prof. Angel Hsu (Public Policy and Environment, Energy, and Ecology Program) brings quantitative rigor to pressing global challenges at the intersection of climate change and urbanization. This Data Scientist position will support the lab’s data-driven research projects, including:
The Urban Environment and Social Inclusion Index (www.datadrivenlab.org/urban), the first spatially explicit index measuring cities’ performance on Sustainable Development Goal 11, which charges urban areas to be sustainable and inclusive;
A National Science Foundation (NSF)-supported project investigating the use of distributed ledger technologies for climate action tracking;
The role of cities, regions, and companies in global climate change mitigation and governance, with a particular focus on the Global South;
Vulnerability risk mapping and assessment of the Urban Heat Island effect in Singapore, as part of the Cooling Singapore 2.0 research collaborative.
Emerging AI-driven, digital environmental governance in China

The Data Scientist will be expected to contribute:
Statistical analysis and programming (R or python);
Front-end programming of data visualizations and web-based tools;
Back-end database or website design and management;
Presentation of data and research findings in attractive, web accessible visualizations, and preparing data for front-end web developers.
Geospatial analysis and remote sensing (ArcGIS, QGIS, Google Earth Engine)
Database and application programming interface (API) construction and maintenance.
Educational Requirements

Relevant post-Baccalaureate degree required; for candidates demonstrating comparable independent research productivity, will accept a relevant undergraduate degree and 3 or more years of relevant experience in substitution. May require terminal degree and licensure.
Qualifications and Experience

- Demonstrated ability to program in desired languages (e.g., R, Python, etc.) to build analytic tools and databases to support the group’s quantitative research.
Knowledge of data-gathering techniques, and comfort working with data and statistical systems.
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills. Ability to work collegially and effectively with colleagues with a broad range of professional experience.
Ability to research, write and manage projects with minimal supervision , to work under time constraints and meet deadlines, and to balance competing responsibilities.
Demonstrated ability to think critically and creatively when confronted with new challenges.
Equal Opportunity Employer

The University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, color, disability, gender, gender expression, gender identity, genetic information, national origin, race, religion, sex, sexual orientation, or status as a protected veteran.
Special Instructions
Quick Link http://unc.peopleadmin.com/postings/184787

Department Contact Name and Title Angel Hsu, Research Assistant Professor
Department Contact Telephone or Email ahsu39@email.unc.edu
Office of Human Resources Contact Information

If you experience any problems accessing the system or have questions about the application process, please contact the Office of Human Resources at (919) 843-2300 or send an email to employment@unc.edu
Please note: The Office of Human Resources will not be able to provide specific updates regarding position or application status.

Applicant Documents

Required Documents
Curriculum Vitae / Resume
Cover Letter
List of References
Optional Documents

Supplemental Questions

Required fields are indicated with an asterisk (*).
*
Please select the education / experience that matches your background.
Masters degree or higher
Bachelors degree and 0-2 years of experience
A combination of related education and experience
None of the above",3.8,"UNC Health Care
3.8","Chapel Hill, NC",-1,10000+ Employees,-1,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
11,Data Scientist,$47k-$90k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist - 74763

Data Science - USA Chicago, Illinois

Nielsen Media Data Science is responsible for enhancing Nielsen’s highly successful media measurement products. This position will develop and deploy new methodologies to measure audiences across platforms and integrate new data assets into Nielsen’s existing methodologies.

What will I do?
Support reproducible data science projects end-to-end
Deploy and maintain data pipelines and models in a production environment
Work with cross-functional teams to productionize, validate, and optimize methodologies
Communicate research findings to varying audiences
Is this for me?
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Excellent software engineering fundamentals
Excellent debugging skills
Experience with python, Spark, SQL, Unix, git, and AWS (S3 and EC2)
Excellent machine learning fundamentals
Masters degree in engineering, computer science, statistics, mathematics, social sciences, or biological/physical sciences
Why would I want to work here?

As the arbiter of truth, Nielsen Global Media fuels the media industry with unbiased, reliable data about what people watch and listen to. To discover what’s true, we measure across all channels and platforms⁠—from podcasts to streaming TV to social media. And when companies and advertisers are armed with the truth, they have a deeper understanding of their audiences and can accelerate growth.

Do you want to move the industry forward with Nielsen? Our people are the driving force. Your thoughts, ideas and expertise can propel us forward. Whether you have fresh thinking around maximizing a new technology or you see a gap in the market, we are here to listen and take action. Our team is made strong by a diversity of thoughts, experiences, skills, and backgrounds. You’ll enjoy working with smart, fun, curious colleagues, who are passionate about their work. Come be part of a team that motivates you to do your best work!

#LI-MJ1

ABOUT NIELSEN

As the arbiter of truth, Nielsen Global Media fuels the media industry with unbiased, reliable data about what people watch and listen to. To discover what’s true, we measure across all channels and platforms⁠—from podcasts to streaming TV to social media. And when companies and advertisers are armed with the truth, they have a deeper understanding of their audiences and can accelerate growth.

Do you want to move the industry forward with Nielsen? Our people are the driving force. Your thoughts, ideas and expertise can propel us forward. Whether you have fresh thinking around maximizing a new technology or you see a gap in the market, we are here to listen and take action. Our team is made strong by a diversity of thoughts, experiences, skills, and backgrounds. You’ll enjoy working with smart, fun, curious colleagues, who are passionate about their work. Come be part of a team that motivates you to do your best work!

Nielsen is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action-Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability status, age, marital status, protected veteran status or any other protected class.

Job Type: Regular

Primary Location: Chicago,Illinois

Secondary Locations: Remote, , ,

Travel: No",3.7,"Nielsen
3.7","Chicago, IL",-1,10000+ Employees,1923,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
12,Data Scientist,$74k-$119k (Glassdoor Est.),"Thermo Fisher Scientific Inc. is the world leader in serving science, with annual revenue exceeding $25 billion. Our Mission is to enable our customers to make the world healthier, cleaner and safer. Whether our customers are accelerating life sciences research, solving complex analytical challenges, improving patient diagnostics and therapies or increasing productivity in their laboratories, we are here to support them.

How will you make an impact?
You will be a part of the fast-growing field of Clinical Diagnostics developing algorithms for molecular diagnostics based on real-time PCR technologies. Your interaction and collaboration with a talented team of assay, reagents, software, hardware designers and manufacturing will revolutionize healthcare through high throughput diagnostic systems. Thermo Fisher Scientific Inc. has played a pivotal role in the COVID-19 pandemic with the TaqPath COVID-19 Combo Kit for testing SARS-CoV-2. We continue to innovate and provide new solutions for the pandemic and we need your talent to help save lives.

What will you do?
Organize and data mine clinical data to assess the performance of clinical tests
Work closely with scientists and engineers with data analysis & experimental design
Develop software and analysis pipelines for data mining large datasets and auto generation of reports
Develop classification algorithms and model data
Perform root cause analysis
Collaborate and communicate with various teams and business units
How will you get here?
Education
Bachelor's degree in Molecular Biology, Biology, Chemistry, Applied Mathematics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, Computational Biology, Biostatistics, Bioinformatics, Computer Science or related discipline; postgraduate degree (Master's, PhD) is highly preferred

Experience
3+ years of product development experience (biotechnology industry preferred)
Strong hands on data analysis, modeling, and classifiers experience
Data structures and common methods in data transformation
Pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
Excellent programming skills in C++, Java and Python
Experience utilizing Matlab, JMP, R, or SPSS
Knowledge, Skills, Abilities
Understanding of clinical trial design and evaluation
Knowledge in Molecular Biology and Clinical Diagnostics
Strong understanding of qPCR and amplification curve data
Prior experience with US-FDA 510k product development/submission, 21 CFR Part 11, and ISO 13485 is highly preferred
Ability to present and communicate data analysis results to non-experts
Ability to work independently and in a team environment
Our global team of more than 75,000 colleagues delivers an unrivaled combination of innovative technologies, purchasing convenience and pharmaceutical services through our industry-leading brands, including Thermo Scientific, Applied Biosystems, Invitrogen, Fisher Scientific, Unity Lab Services and Patheon. For more information, please visit www.thermofisher.com.

Apply today! http://jobs.thermofisher.com

Thermo Fisher Scientific is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, disability or any other legally protected status.",3.6,"Thermo Fisher Scientific
3.6","South San Francisco, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1902,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
13,Data Scientist,$63k-$106k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist

Job Description

As a Data Scientist on our analytics and data science team, you will leverage your deep experience in data analysis and data mining to drive significant traffic and user engagement growth for the Apartments.com Network of rental brands including Apartments.com, ApartmentFinder.com, ApartmentHomeLiving.com, Apartamentos.com, WestsideRentals.com, ForRent.com, After55.com, ForRentUniversity.com, CorporateHousing.com and Cozy.co.

We are counting on you to bring a genuine curiosity about how consumers search for information, and pair that with a strong technical aptitude and ability to analyze large datasets, uncover trends and insights, then turn those findings into actionable recommendations.

You’ll be joining a best-in-class team that has relentlessly high standards, is never satisfied with the status quo, and thrives in a fast-paced, dynamic environment. Our industry-leading team is the driving force for our business and has exceeded our performance goals each year.

Responsibilities:
Understanding business objectives and developing analytical solutions that help achieve them, along with metrics to track their progress.
Performing various exploratory data analysis to uncover trends, insights and develop strategies.
Leveraging generative approaches to understand user behavior and metrics of interest.
Designing and analyzing A/B tests and Multivariate tests.
Analyzing data and developing predictive models using machine learning and deep learning.
Collaborate cross-functionally across internal teams (marketing, product, technology, research, etc.) to evaluate opportunities that deliver business goals via data analysis and machine learning.
Develop and promote a data driven approach by proactively identifying new potential analysis projects and highlight key opportunities to drive our organization forward.
Share results and conclusions you draw to derive meaning from the data, and what business actions you think should be taken as a result of the analysis.
Identify learnings from your analysis for how we can improve the collection and upkeep of our datasets.
Enhancing data collection procedures to include information that is relevant for building analytic systems.
Coordinate across departments and with our analytics providers to establish best practices and adhere to common design patterns, and work through your plans with others to troubleshoot potential issues upfront.
Act as a role model throughout our team, but also our organization by maintaining the highest professional standards, promoting data governance, data management, creative thinking and pushing us to always be our best.
Basic Qualifications:
Master's Degree required in Computer Science, Business Analytics, Data Analytics, or Data Science, Machine Learning, or related field. Or Bachelor's Degree with 2+ years of professional work experience in data analysis and machine learning.
Experience with communicating technical findings to relevant stakeholders and providing applicable business insights and recommendations.
Experience in SQL, writing queries, and reporting.
Scripting and programming skills with Python, R, etc. with hands-on experience.
Experience with Python-based common data science toolkits such as Jupyter Notebooks, Numpy, Pandas, Scikit-learn, MatplotLib, Seaborn, NLTK, etc.
Experience writing clean, reproducible, robust, and scalable analysis code.
Experience in applied statistics skills, such as distribution analysis, probability theory, statistical testing, regression, etc.
Expertise in running exploratory data analysis, statistical modeling and data mining.
Experience with designing and analyzing experiments (A/B tests and Multivariate tests).
Understanding of supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques and algorithms, such as Clustering, Topic Modeling, K-Means, Naive Bayes, SVM, Decision Forests, Neural Networks, etc.
Experience with data visualization tools, such as PowerBI and Tableau.
Ability to run automated jobs to manipulate and store data from APIs and various cloud providers.
Hands-on experience working with large data sets.
Preferred Qualifications:
Working experience with a deep learning frameworks such as TensorFlow or Keras.
Understanding of special deep learning networks such as Convolutional Neural Networks, for computer vision.
Experience developing recommendation engines using different techniques like collaborative filtering, content-based filtering, deep learning-based approaches, etc.
Understanding of statistical decision theory.
COSTAR OVERVIEW

Founded in 1987, CoStar Group is the leading provider of commercial real estate information, analytics, and online marketplaces. Our suite of online services enables clients to analyze, interpret and gain unmatched insight on commercial property values, market conditions and current availability. Behind some of the most well-known brands in the industry, CoStar Group includes CoStar, the largest provider of CRE research and real-time data; LoopNet, the most heavily trafficked mobile and online real estate marketplace; Apartments.com, the premier rental home resource for renters, property managers and owners; STR, the leading provider of performance benchmarking and comparative analytics to the hotel industry; BizBuySell, the largest online marketplace for businesses-for-sales; and Lands of America, the leading operator of online marketplaces for rural real estate.

Headquartered in Washington, DC, CoStar Group maintains offices throughout the U.S. and in Europe, Canada, and Asia with a staff of over 4,300 worldwide.

WHATS IN IT FOR YOU

Working at CoStar Group means you'll enjoy a culture of collaboration and innovation that attracts the best and brightest across a broad range of disciplines. In addition to generous compensation and performance-based incentives, you'll be supported in both your professional and academic growth with internal training, tuition reimbursement, and an inter-office exchange program.

Our benefits package includes (but is not limited to):
Comprehensive healthcare coverage: Medical / Vision / Dental / Prescription Drug
Life, legal, and supplementary insurance
Commuter and parking benefits
401(K) retirement plan with matching contributions
Employee stock purchase plan
Paid time off
Tuition reimbursement
On-site fitness center and/or reimbursed fitness center membership costs (location dependent), with yoga studio, Pelotons, personal training, group exercise classes, as well as Segways and bikes available for use during the day
Complimentary gourmet coffee, tea, hot chocolate, prepared foods, fresh fruit, and other healthy snacks
Be part of a team of professionals enjoying the opportunity to learn, do, and grow in a rewarding atmosphere. But don't just take our word for it -- see why our team chose to work at and stay at CoStar Group: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=CVbJRnJ2sX0

We welcome all qualified candidates who are currently eligible to work full-time in the United States to apply. However, please note that CoStar is not able to provide visa sponsorship for this position.

CoStar Group is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer; we maintain a drug-free workplace and perform pre-employment substance abuse testing",3.0,"CoStar Group
3.0","Atlanta, GA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1987,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
14,Data Scientist,-1,"Data Scientist

Job Details
Level
Experienced
Job Location
National Capitol Region - NCR, VA
Position Type
Full Time
Education Level
High School Diploma/ GED
Salary Range
Undisclosed
Travel Percentage
Negligible
Job Shift
Undisclosed
Job Category
Undisclosed
Vickers and Nolan Enterprises (VNE) is an engineering company that provides Government projects and programs with experienced and dedicated system architects, engineers, subject matter experts (in tactical intelligence), and program managers. VNE also develops training courses and tools to prepare warfighters to effectively employ tactical intelligence systems and provide management guidance to the Government organizations that develop these systems.

VNE has earned a reputation for exceptional performance, innovation, agility, and responsiveness in the Intelligence Community (IC). We attack our mission with a comprehensive understanding of the data available and required; skilled research, design, development, integration, and testing of systems and software solutions; expertise in cybersecurity/information assurance and technology; programmatic, acquisition, and logistics support know-how; and our own unique training curricula that enables students to excel at intelligence operations across all levels of the community.

VNE is devoted to improving tactical operations at home and abroad by enabling the seamless transition of data across the intelligence community and developing/integrating solutions to unify operations and intelligence.

VNE is a Service Disabled Veteran Owned Small Business (SDVOSB) founded in 2004 in Stafford, VA.
VNE, LLC is looking for a TS/SCI Cleared Data Scientist

Minimum Qualifications:
2+ years of experience with high-level languages, including Java and Python
1+ years of experience with distributed scalable Big Data storage, including Accumulo, Cloudbase, HBase, or Bigtable
Experience with containerized software development and deployment, including Docker
Experience with Apache Hadoop and the Hadoop Distributed File System (HDFS) and processing large data stores
Experience with streaming data frameworks, including Apache Kafka and Spark
Experience with using Agile software development methods in a DevOps environment
Experience with developing solutions and integrating and extending free and Open-source software (FOSS) or COTS products
Ability to exhibit flexibility, initiative, and innovation when dealing with ambiguous and fast-paced situations
TS/SCI clearance
HS diploma or GED

Job Description:

The Data Scientist is expected to:

We have an opportunity for you to use your skills to deliver critical data insights to the warfighter to support countering threat networks. You’ll work closely with your customer to understand their questions and needs, and then build capabilities to unlock answers from a data-rich environment to help put together the pieces of their information puzzle. You’ll construct robust data pipelines through the development and application of supervised and unsupervised machine learning approaches, help develop neural networks, identify and apply the latest industry-leading approaches to tough data challenges, and use the right combination of tools and frameworks to turn that set of disparate data points into objective answers to help DoD elements at the tactical edge make informed decisions. You’ll provide your customer with a deep understanding of their data, what it all means, and how they can use it. Join us as we use data science for good in countering threat networks.

Additional Experience Desired:
Experience with various intelligence disciplines, including GEOINT, HUMINT, MASINT, OSINT, and SIGINT and the data and tools associated with these disciplines
Experience with deploying applications in a Cloud environment
Experience with designing and developing automated analytic software, techniques, and algorithms
BA or BS degree
DoD 8570 Compliance Certification, including Security+ or CISSP
Essential Duties of the Job:
Ability to communicate task requirement information to client in a clear and concise manner.
Must be able to sit and stand for prolonged periods of time, as well as lead and participate in meetings and working groups.
Requires visual acuity to use a keyboard.
Must be able to attend work each day, during scheduled hours, unless on travel or approved time off.
Ability to work on computer for long periods, and communicate with individuals by telephone, email and face-to-face
Physical Demands and Work Environment:
While performing duties of job, employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; sit; use hand to finger, handle or feel objects, tools, or controls; reach with hands and arms; talk and hear.
Employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds.
Specific vision abilities required by the job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust focus.
May be exposed to chemicals related to office equipment.
The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate (i.e. general office environment).
Benefits:
401 (K) w/ up to 3.5% Company Match
Health, Dental & Vision Insurance
Basic & Supplemental Life Insurance
Short & Long Term Disability Insurance
Flexible Spending Account
10 Paid Holidays
Paid Time Off (PTO)
Gym Membership (varies by location)
Corporate-Sponsored Events",3.1,"Vickers and Nolan Enterprises
3.1","Richmond, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Unknown,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
15,Data Scientist/Engineer,-1,"Columbus, Ohio Engineering - Full-Time

Seamless.AI delivers the world's best sales leads. Maximize revenue, increase sales and acquire your total addressable market instantly using artificial intelligence. Join us on our rocket ship to impact 1 billion people and add to our 20,000 companies and users who are generating hundreds of millions in sales for free at Seamless.AI . Request a demo here

The Data Scientist will be the 'go to person' on our rapidly expanding engineering team solving all our data science challenges for billions of data points related to the world's business contacts and company profiles. The primary role of the data scientist is to improve the accuracy of our data recommendations that predicts every professional's emails, phone numbers and websites with the highest level and degree of accuracy possible. This person will have an opportunity to solve significant data problems that are positively impacting millions of business professionals and helping the world connect to opportunity and each other faster than ever before.

Responsibilities

Develop the strategy and execution roadmap to improve our company records data set and make recommendations to improve our company profile data accuracy
Develop the strategy and execution roadmap to improve our contact records data set and make recommendations to improve our contact profile data accuracy
Build and release models that elevate our data quality and accuracy
Work with enormous data sets to find correlations and signals amongst all the noise to improve our contact profile and company profile prediction accuracy. Our database has billions of records extracted from the web.
Ensure data quality throughout all stages of acquisition and processing, including such areas as data sourcing/collection, ground truth generation, normalization, transformation, etc.
Collaborate with colleagues with engineering, QA and business backgrounds
Build, measure, analyze and optimize machine learning and statistical models that will have a direct impact on the Seamless.AI contact and company profiles.
Identify and communicate opportunities to apply data science and machine learning to product design and processes.
Identify, communicate, and create innovative solutions for product design, processes, and business problems by using advanced machine learning, statistical modeling and optimization techniques.
Test and evaluate the quality of algorithms using statistical methods.
Experiment, review, and improve the existing analytics and machine learning models as Seamless evolves.
Lead internal tactical and strategic projects and reports project progress for quality, deliverables and cost to VP of Operations.
Work together with engineers, technical project managers, and subject matter experts, to gather requirements and improve our customer experience using machine learning and data science.
Mentor and guide other team members and colleagues in the domain area as owner of data science projects end-to-end.

Minimum Qualifications:

3 - 5+ years of professional (not academic) experience in data science and/or big data.
Expert knowledge of data science, predictive modeling, statistics and machine learning in general.
Deep experience with algorithms, statistics, and data analytics.
A Data Geek - we're looking for people who love data, and who are comfortable working with numbers and patterns. If you like to solve puzzles in your free time, this is the right opportunity for you!
Experience/knowledge in our more major technical & programming languages and cloud computing ( Node.JS , PostgreSQL, AWS)
Strategic thinker and problem solver to develop data science strategies as a principal data scientist.
Background in making impactful data decisions with hundreds of millions of data points quickly and efficiently.
Analytical and detail oriented with the ability to prioritize, execute and deliver projects accurately and on time.
Committed leader and team player who can work autonomously in data science responsibilities, be proactive, take ownership over the success of their projects, and work hard to support those around them.
Drive and leadership skills to help build and manage team of data analysts.
Must be comfortable with unstructured, fast moving and constantly evolving high growth environment.
Solid communication and writing skills to effectively communicate with business and data science leaders on project status, timeline, strategy, ideas and technical results.
Self-motivated and able to work efficiently with both on-location and remote teams.
M.S. focused on Data Science or related field

Desired but not required:

Knowledge and experience in marketing channel optimization, customer behavior/journey modeling and prediction, product recommendation systems, online testing and etc. is highly desired.
Background in handling multi-terabyte size datasets in the cloud.
Proficient in computer software development, web development and engineering.
Experience working with distributed systems and grid computing.
Data security knowledge, risk, compliance (ie. GDPR, etc...).
Experience working in online products or SaaS based products.
Prior work at a fast paced early stage start up.

Disclaimer: This is a full-time position that ideally be located in our Columbus, Ohio office. We are open to assisting with relocation and willing to discuss US remote for the right candidate. Visa Sponsorship is not included in our hiring package. Applicants will need to be authorized to work in the US.

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.

No Recruiters. This is an internal position our internal team is hiring for.

Pay, Perks & Such:

At Seamless, we love to celebrate our diverse group of hardworking employees and it shows. We're proud to say Seamless.AI was recognized as a one of the Top Most Promising and Fastest Growing Start up by VentureOhio. Our CEO, Brandon Bornancin, was also named 2018 Sales Development Thought Leader of the Year. We pride ourselves on our collaborative culture that pervasive throughout every step of a Seamless employee's journey. Starting with our interviews and continuing through Daily Standup sessions, collaboration is at the heart of working at Seamless.

We offer a full slate of benefits including competitive salaries, world-class health benefits, flexible vacation time, paid time off, remote flexibility and numerous other benefits to improve company culture/morale. And... we offer some not-so-standard, extra-fun benefits, including learning & development programs to improve your skills, an office ping-pong table, pool table, arcade basketball, DJ booth, and of course, fully stocked fridges and free coffee. :)

Take the chance to contribute to an upbeat, fully engaged culture that's addicted to winning. We value diversity and believe forming teams in which everyone can be their authentic self is key to our success. We encourage people from underrepresented backgrounds and different industries to apply. Come join us, and find out what the best work of your career could look like here at Seamless.

Disclaimer: This is a full-time position that ideally would be located in our Columbus, Ohio office but for the right candidate we would be open to full US remote. We are open to assisting with relocation and willing to discuss for some positions. Visa Sponsorship is not included in our hiring package. Applicants will need to be authorized to work in the US.

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.

No Recruiters. This is an internal position our internal team is hiring for.

PI124278182",4.9,"Seamless AI
4.9","Columbus, OH",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
16,Data Scientist in Artificial Intelligence - Intermediate,$49k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"Organization and Job ID

Job ID: 311093

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Computing and Analytics

Group: Data Sciences and Analytics

Job Description

Do you want to create a legacy of meaningful research for the greater good? Do you want to lead and contribute to work in support of an organization that addresses some of today’s most challenging problems that face our Nation? Do you want to work with engaging and collaborative teams? Then join us in the Data Sciences and Analytics Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL)!

For more than 50 years, PNNL has advanced the frontiers of science and engineering in the service of our nation and the world in the areas of energy, the environment and national security. PNNL is committed to advancing the state-of-the-art in artificial intelligence through applied machine learning and deep learning to support scientific discovery and our sponsors’ missions. Help us advance this frontier and protect our nation!

Data science at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) addresses critical national and global issues by applying scientific and mathematical techniques to multiple data sources and communicating the finding to our sponsors and the academic community. This position requires thought leadership and technical depth to support the sponsors of PNNL’s National Security Directorate in the development and advancement of data science and deep learning research. Research of interest includes the development, implementation, and resulting analyses of national security capabilities related to geo-spatial analytics, AI assurance, adversarial machine learning, human language technologies, computer vision, disaster response and recovery, health security, and other related fields.

The data scientist in artificial intelligence should have the following attributes:

Familiar with existing deep learning libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, Caffe2) and machine learning packages (i.e. sklearn)

Experience applying machine learning and artificial intelligence to domain specific applications, such as geospatial intelligence, natural language processing, few-shot learning, adversarial machine learning, social computing, computer vision, etc.

Ability to contribute that knowledge to the academic and research strength of PNNL and have experience writing scientific publications demonstrating their insight and discovery.

Publication record in scientific conferences such as NIPS, ICML, ICLR, KDD, CVPR, ICCV, ECCV, ACL, ICWSM, EMNLP, NAACL, EACL, COLING, and SIGIR is preferred

This position will require interactions with Government, military, and industry officials nationwide for a variety of programs, projects, and tasks, including technical and programmatic concept development, planning, coordination, integration, and execution that can be supported by data science and deep learning techniques.

Minimum Qualifications

Bachelor's degree with 2 years of experience, a Master’s degree with 0-2 years of experience, or a PhD with 0 years of experience is required.

Preferred Qualifications

Active Federal Q Clearance and ability to maintain such clearance.

Equal Employment Opportunity

Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.

Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment.

Other Information

This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:

U.S. Citizenship

Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.

Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).

Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

Directorate: National Security

Job Category: Computation and Information Sciences

Group: Data Sciences & Analytics

Opening Date: 2020-08-23

Closing Date: 2020-11-21",4.1,"Pacific Northwest National Laboratory
4.1","Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1965,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
17,Data Scientist - TS/SCI w/ Poly Required,$63k-$105k (Glassdoor Est.),"Type of Requisition:

Regular

Clearance Level Must Currently Possess:

Top Secret SCI + Polygraph

Clearance Level Must Be Able to Obtain:

Top Secret SCI + Polygraph

Suitability:

Polygraph

Public Trust/Other Required:

Job Family:

Software Engineering

Job Description:

The Data Scientist will develop algorithms, write scripts, build predictive analytics, use automation, apply machine learning and use the right combination of tools and frameworks to turn a set of data points into objective answers to help senior leadership make informed decisions. The Data Scientist will apply data mining techniques perform statistical analysis, and build high-quality prediction models. The Data Scientists ability to obtain data through advanced computerized models and extrapolation of data patterns through advanced algorithms to explain how the information will influence the specific project will be an essential function to providing customers a better comprehension of the data.

REQUIRED KNOWLEDGE/SKILLS

BS/BA in Software Engineering, Science, Mathematics, or similar OR equivalent combination of education and experience

Experience with search architecture tools (ex - Solr, ElasticSearch)

Big Data Frameworks such as Spark or Hadoop

Data Science frameworks such as Keras, Tensorflow, or Theano

Experience with building querying ontologies such as Zeno, OWL, RDF, SparQL

Experience with GPU processing

Experience with word2vec or doc2vec algorithms

Proficient in Java and Python

Must know to use an IDE to code (ex - IntelliJ, Eclipse, NetBeans)

Experience with interacting in a Linux environment (ex - Bash scripting, VI)

Intrapersonal communication skills

Ability to work well in a constantly evolving work environment

DESIRED KNOWLEDGE/SKILLS

Familiarity with Source code management and integration (ex - GitHub/GitLab, Jenkins)

Hands on experience with cloud technology (AWS / C2S)

Experience in an Agile environment

Experience with testing frameworks (ex - Junit, Mockito, Swagger, Postman)

Experience with relational databases (ex - Oracle / MySql)

Experience with JavaScript / Typescript

Experience with front end development (ex - Angular 2+, React, HTML, CSS, JQuery)

Scheduled Weekly Hours:

40

Travel Required:

None

Telecommuting Options:

Telecommuting Not Allowed

Work Location:

USA VA McLean

Additional Work Locations:

We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",3.6,"General Dynamics Information Technology
3.6","McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
18,Data Scientist,-1,"Job Summary

The Organization requires a team to support a C2S/AWS cloud server that will support Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML) data science operations with a user interface. The organization requires technical support services for a mission-impact focused office.

**Please note: This job requires an existing Top Secret Clearance and Polygraph**

Responsibilities and Duties

The team shall support the Sponsor in advancing data science and AI/ML innovations from lab to enterprise. The team shall provide AI/ML Data Science and Technical Services. The team shall communicate with stakeholders to support data science and AI/ML, projects and partnerships. The team shall collect, synthesize and assess data science trends and methods creating meeting summaries.

The team shall draft technical reports, graphics, and summary documents to foster a collaborative data-science culture. The team shall develop programs and systems for data aggregation, data analytics, data summarization, and data visualization on structured and unstructured datasets. The team shall work closely with the Sponsor on all activities and efforts.

The team shall build, develop, and maintain a C2S/AWS automated workflow management system. The team shall ensure the Sponsors data is discoverable and available. The team shall provide data science and technical services across the entire AI/ML pipeline. The team shall discover, ingest, prepare, label, and manage Sponsor data. The team shall develop, test, validate, manage, and deploy AI/ML models. The team shall provide services to label data using methods such as taggers and tagging tools. The team shall launch and maintain state-of-the-art repositories to house AI/ML materials such as open source data, models, algorithms, and academic literature.

The team shall conduct requirements capture sessions with multiple Sponsor stakeholders. The team shall draft technical reports to capture Sponsor interactions with SMEs, stakeholders, and partners. The shall proactively offer solutions and recommendations on current and emerging technologies and design approaches. The team shall identify technology gaps in current capabilities and processes. The team shall create original concepts and theories for various projects. The team shall communicate complex technical issues into understandable concepts for mission partner audiences.

Experience Needed
Must Be a US Citizen
Clearance Required: Active TS/SCI and Poly
Demonstrated experience developing using Python data analytics packages such as pandas, numpy, scipy, gensim, and scikit-learn
Demonstrated experience working with databases such as ElasticSearch and SQL databases
Demonstrated experience using data pipelines and workflow technologies, such as Apache NiFi
Demonstrated experience using task tracking and version control tools, such as GitHub and JIRA
Demonstrated experience using AI/ML tools, such as TensorFlow, PyTorch, and scikit-learn
Demonstrated experience developing machine learning models on text data and structured datasets
Demonstrated experience using visualization tools, such as Kibana, Bokeh, or Leaflet/Folium
Demonstrated development experience in a cloud environment such as C2S/AWS
Demonstrated experience using analytic methods and methodologies such as probability and statistics, formal modeling, and machine learning on bulk data
Demonstrated experience with computational social sciences
Demonstrated experience creating AI/ML models and natural language processing (NLP) models
Company Overview

At Dezign Concepts, we are building a collaboration of professionals to help supply commercial, government and the intelligence communities with the services they need to excel in current and future endeavors. We are a growing company where providing outstanding solutions and delivering impeccable service is our highest priority. We believe that great people make great companies and every day we strive to provide the type of environment that encourages creativity, growth and satisfaction.

Dezign Concepts provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws.

This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.

Powered by JazzHR",-1,Dezign Concepts LLC,"McLean, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
19,Data Scientist,-1,"Do you want to build your personal brand with an industry-leading innovator that is always thinking outside the box? Does the box bore you? Do you want to leverage your analytic skills to tackle and solve difficult, seemingly impossible problems in a dynamic and growing industry? FourthWall Media is seeking junior to mid-level data analysts to expand its data analytics products and services.

This vital role works closely with data scientists and developers to discover insights within massive demographic, TV viewing, and advertising datasets and translate those insights into analytics products and business intelligence for FourthWall’s clients.

This non-traditional data analyst role requires inquisitiveness bound by pragmatism and cross-disciplinary skills to translate mathematical and statistical exploration into hands-on interaction with existing data systems. Perfectionism and attention to detail are required. Communication with co-workers, both to understand and to explain, is paramount.

Primary Goals

Exploration, analysis, modeling, mining, profiling and cleansing of large and interesting datasets

Searching for key insights, trends, flaws, and value in the data

Working with the data flow team to enhance quality and coverage

Working with R&D to develop new analytics processes and prototypes

Education and Experience

Excellent written and verbal communication skills are required

Self-motivating inquisitiveness, the ability to focus on complexity, and the tenacity to tackle seemingly impossible problems are required

Bachelor’s degree (B.S.) from four-year college or university with a preference in computer science, mathematics or statistics

Experience with Python is required

Experience with Hadoop, Hive, SQL, Theano, Tensorflow, Keras, Pandas, Scikit-Learn, R and Mathematica are preferred

Experience with television and/or advertising data ecosystems (DMPs, DSPs, media buying platforms, analytics platforms) is a plus

A minimum of 1 years experience in a professional, technical workplace",4.2,"FourthWall Media
4.2","Sterling, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
20,Data Scientist,-1,"M.S in Computer Science (preferred).
Building and owning large scale machine learning models
Processing large datasets (predominantly text, but also images) and working with big data technologies, languages, and frameworks: SCOPE, Spark, SQL, Pytorch, Tensorflow, Python, C#, Java
Designing experiments, setting up evaluations, and producing trustworthy conclusions.
3+ years of experience in one or more of ML / Deep Learning, NLP, IR, databases, and graph algorithms.
1+ years of experience in parallel or distributed CPU/GPU processing, high performance computing, or stream computing.
Experience in deploying Machine Learning/ Deep Learning models in Azure/AWS/GCP.
Experience with Web applications and service architecture; Web information extraction is a plus.
Strong desire to keep up to date with research and potential applications. Vision for how to advance the state of the art.
Successful candidates care about good software engineering practices, including version control, modular design, code quality, testing, and documentation.",4.0,"Horizontal
4.0","Plano, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
21,Data Scientist,$63k-$107k (Glassdoor Est.),"Secure our Nation, Ignite your Future

.

Become an integral part of a diverse team while working at an Industry Leading Organization, where our employees come first. At ManTech International Corporation, you’ll help protect our national security while working on innovative projects that offer opportunities for advancement.

Currently, ManTech is seeking a motivated, career and customer-oriented Data Scientist to join our team in the Springfield, VA area.

Responsibilities include, but are not limited to:

Designs and develops methods, processes, and systems to consolidate and analyze data, both structured and unstructured, and its sources, including big data.
Develops and uses advanced software programs, algorithms, querying and automated processes to cleanse, integrate and evaluate datasets.
Hands on experience working with data science methods such as: statistical modeling, information retrieval, graph analysis, data mining, machine learning
Models complex business problems and is familiar with natural language processing, machine learning, predictive modeling, statistical analysis and hypothesis testing.
May develop information tools, algorithms, dashboards, and queries to monitor and improve business performance. Maintains awareness of emerging analytics and big-data technologies.
Hands-on experience working with data science methods such as statistical modeling, information retrieval, graph analysis, data minding, machine learning and data visualization.
Years of Experience using Python, R, or other languages to build statistical models or analyze data. Experience with Python, SQL, Bash, Scala, Java, Hadoop, Apache, spark, Kafka or Hive.
Years of Experience in creating complex SQL queries and functions, data structures and strong analytical problem-solving skills.
Works with cross-discipline teams to ensure connectivity between various databases and systems. Experience working with various self-service business intelligence and data visualization tools such as Tableau, Power BI, Business Objects, etc.
Capable of presenting data to vendor, customer or company to audiences of different technical levels.
Supports defining specific process improvement projects, identifies meaningful insights, interprets and communicates findings and makes recommendations including process improvement opportunities. Continual process improvement activities include data, processes, interfaces, tools and technology insertion.
Experience working in an Agile based environment.

Basic Qualifications:

Requires BS and 4 - 8 years of prior relevant experience or Masters with 2 - 6 years of prior relevant experience.
Bachelor’s degree or master’s degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Information Technology or STEM related discipline

Preferred Qualifications:

none

Security Clearance Requirements:

TS/SCI with polygraph (FSP) - MUST have clearance prior to application

Physical Requirements:

Must be able to remain in a stationary position 50%.
Needs to occasionally move about inside the office to access file cabinets, office machinery, etc.
Constantly operates a computer and other office productivity machinery, such as a calculator, copy machine and computer printer.
Frequently communicates with co-workers, management and customers, which may involve delivering presentations. Must be able to exchange accurate information in these situations.

ManTech International Corporation, as well as its subsidiaries proactively fulfills its role as an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, national origin, marital status, physical or mental disability, status as a Disabled Veteran, Recently Separated Veteran, Active Duty Wartime or Campaign Badge Veteran, Armed Forces Services Medal, or any other characteristic protected by law.

If you require a reasonable accommodation to apply for a position with ManTech through its online applicant system, please contact ManTech's Corporate EEO Department at (703) 218-6000. ManTech is an affirmative action/equal opportunity employer - minorities, females, disabled and protected veterans are urged to apply. ManTech's utilization of any external recruitment or job placement agency is predicated upon its full compliance with our equal opportunity/affirmative action policies. ManTech does not accept resumes from unsolicited recruiting firms. We pay no fees for unsolicited services.

If you are a qualified individual with a disability or a disabled veteran, you have the right to request an accommodation if you are unable or limited in your ability to use or access http://www.mantech.com/careers/Pages/careers.aspx as a result of your disability. To request an accommodation please click careers@mantech.com and provide your name and contact information.",4.2,"ManTech International Corporation
4.2","Springfield, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1968,Company - Public,Research & Development,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
22,Data Scientist,-1,"ID Job Title Job Description
5866562 Data Scientist

Data Scientist –Minimum 10 years of experience in IT Industry.

Predictive analysis with Azure machine learning. Good data management practices to perform data cleansing activities.

This candidate primarily needs to be experienced with using Microsoft Azure to develop experiments and delivering machine learning. This candidate should also be experienced with developing and supporting Azure Pipelines in the Azure Data Factory. The candidate should be prepared to coach other staff members on Azure machine learning, and demonstrate Data Management best practices.

Required Skills:

Azure Machine Learning, Azure Data Catalog, Azure Data Factory, R, Python, SQL, Azure SQL

Please e-mail your profile / referrals to resumes@yakshna.com",-1,Yakshna Solutions,Virginia,-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Chemical Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
23,Data Scientist,$70k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist
Arlington, VA 20301

Security Clearance Requirement: Current Secret (at a minimum)

Commuting Note: Parking reimbursement at the work site is offered

Culmen International, LLC is hiring a Data Scientist to support assessment and analysis for military readiness. Qualified candidates will have experience with data analytics including advanced skills in Microsoft Excel, PowerPoint, and other data analysis and visualization programs (R, Python, Tableau). Prior experience conducting operations research on military readiness, experience working in the Office of the Secretary of Defense or with the military in general is desired. All work will be performed on-site at the Pentagon.

Duties and responsibilities include:
Demonstrates a broad knowledge of the technical discipline and applies extensive expertise to perform research and analysis to aid understanding and decision support.
Applies and/or develops advanced technologies, scientific principles, theories, and concepts in related technical disciplines or in a specialty.
Applies state-of-the-art data mining techniques, doing statistical analysis, and building high quality prediction systems integrated with our products.
Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis. Doing ad-hoc analysis and presenting results in a clear manner.
Requirements include:
US Citizenship.
Current Secret security clearance.
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Math, or other relevant field with a minimum of 5 years of related experience (Master's degree equates to an additional 2 years of relevant work experience).
Strong written and verbal communication skills.
Hands-on programming experience with a focus on statistical model building using an open source language such as: R, Python, Java, Scala. Preference is experience in more than one with excellence in at least one is highly desirable.
Data engineering experience with SQL programming, NoSQL (Neo4J).
Hands-on experience with data cleansing, data munging, metric development, and descriptive analytics.
Hands on modeling experience preferred, for example: mathematics, hyperparameter tuning, statistics, economics, predictive modeling, and prescriptive modeling.
Experience in data visualization and hands-on experience with a dashboarding software: Tableau, Qlik, RShiny, Python Bokeh, PowerBI, low coding platforms (Mendix, Appian, PowerApps), descriptive analytics preferred.
Experience ushering a project from inception to completion.
Job Type: Full Time
Benefits: Health, Vision, Dental, 401k, Life and Disability Insurance Programs

#623",3.9,"Culmen International, LLC
3.9","Arlington, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
24,Remote Data Scientist,-1,"Primary Function:
Our Sr. Data Scientists are key contributors to the development
of our core customer, product, eCommerce, and pricing plans. The
Data Science team covers a broad scope of projects including
customer segmentation, A/B testing, marketing investment
optimization, predictive modeling, promotion forecasting, and
pricing analysis. We are closely integrated with our business
leaders and support their ability to make critical decisions. At
VIEWS, you will be challenged by new questions every day.

Duties and Responsibilities:* Lead data science projects from
beginning to end: develop and refine the idea, create a project
plan and methodology, collaborate with business partners,
execute, and provide recommendations for the company
Collaborate with other data scientists to develop and implement
algorithms, write code, evaluate relevant academic research, and
deliver outputs
Advise the company about tools, data sources, and best
practices to facilitate digital marketing, pricing, and web
analytics
Build predictive and inference models using Python and R to
support business initiatives in the areas of customer
acquisition, activation, engagement, retention, or channel
investment optimization
Document code and data science processes that are critical to
the company, and develop strategies to ensure those processes are
robust and fault-tolerant
Communicate findings to business leaders and colleagues using
data visualizations, presentations, and written means

Qualifications:* Experience leading data science projects that
have a direct impact on company objectives
Demonstrated ability to assist business decision-making through
data mining and machine learning
Strong communication skills to collaborate effectively with
business stakeholders. Must be able to interact
cross-functionally and drive both business and technical
discussions
5+ years progressive business experience in areas including
marketing analytics, database marketing, data mining, or
statistical modeling. Experience using data science or advanced
analytics in an Internet retailer or a top-tier consumer-focused
company is required
Ability to translate complex business problems into project
plans and solve them by analyzing large amounts of data
Familiarity with Python or R for statistical modeling,
clustering, classification, machine learning, and data mining
Demonstrated proficiency in SQL and cloud-hosted data platforms
(Google Cloud Platform, AWS, etc)
Familiarity with BI tools such as Tableau or Looker, and
ability to communicate results to business partners
Masters degree preferred in quantitative fields such as
Statistics, Engineering, Operational Research, or Economics
Knowledge of web tracking technology and web analytics tools
(Google Analytics, Adobe Analytics, etc.) a definite plus",3.0,"VIEWS
3.0","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
25,Data Scientist,$62k-$106k (Glassdoor Est.),"Logistics done differently.

At XPO Logistics, we invest over $450 million in technology every year so that we can continue to develop state-of-the-art solutions for our customers. As the Data Scientist, you will be responsible for developing analytical experiments in a methodical manner and regularly evaluating alternate models to support strategic initiatives and ongoing business processes. You will work with leads, analysts and data producers/consumers to understand requirements, develop technical solutions and ensure the reliability and performance of the data solutions. Become a part of our growing, dynamic team and we'll help you build a career you can be proud of.

Pay, benefits and more.

We are eager to attract the best, so we offer competitive compensation and a generous benefits package, including full health insurance (medical, dental and vision), 401(k), life insurance, disability and more.

What you’ll do on a typical day:

Develop solutions focused on data science and engineering using machine learning, deep learning algorithms, statistical concepts, data modeling, software development and visualizations
Troubleshoot technical issues in existing processes and current development work; solicit assistance from other roles and groups, and drive resolution to ensure the integrity of platform quality and project timelines
Understand and improve shared standard patterns, templates and artifacts for architecture, data science development approaches, data models and new technology adoption and rollout
Generalize and share technical approaches and best practices among other developers, and simplify and communicate completed work to broader audiences across the company
Help support data consumers to ensure they have reliable access to trusted data

What you need to succeed at XPO:

At a minimum, you’ll need:

Master's degree in Computer Science, MIS, Engineering, Business or related field; or recent college graduates with hands-on, moderately complex internship projects of greater than 6 months
1 year of hands-on experience in delivering solutions in at least two of the following: data science, data analysis, geo spatial, finance, econometrics, cloud computing, big data and database management
Experience with statistical modeling, data analytics and visualization using R and Python (Numpy, Pandas, Scipy, Plotly and Matplotlib)
Significant experience applying one or more of the following analytical methods: regression (preferably mixed models), data classification and reduction (cluster, factor, principle components, decision trees), Bayesian inference or other advanced machine learning techniques
Deep understanding of statistical modeling, machine learning, deep learning or data mining concepts, and a track record of solving problems with these methods
Proven technical database knowledge (Oracle, NoSQL, data modeling) and experience optimizing SQL queries on large data
Ability to write SQL fluently, recognize and correct inefficient or error-prone SQL, and perform test-driven validation of SQL queries and their results
Proficiency in Microsoft Office and Windows applications;
Availability to work periodic 24/7 on-call support as required by the team’s rotation schedule

It’d be great if you also have:

Data science specialization from Coursera, Udacity, Data Camp, etc.
10 years of hands-on experience in delivering solutions in at least two of the following: data science, data modeling, data integration and business intelligence
5 years of hands-on experience in delivering solutions in at least two of the following: data science, data analysis, geo spatial, finance, econometrics, cloud computing, big data and database management
Ability to quickly learn and achieve proficiency in new software applications

Be part of something big.

XPO is a leading provider of cutting-edge supply chain solutions to the most successful companies in the world. We help our customers manage their goods most efficiently using our technology and services. Our greatest strength is our global team – energetic, innovative people of all experience levels and talents who make XPO a great place to work.

We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, disability, veteran or other protected status.

The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this classification. They are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required of personnel so classified. All employees may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed.",3.7,"XPO Logistics
3.7","High Point, NC",-1,10000+ Employees,2011,Company - Public,Transportation Management,Transportation & Logistics,$10+ billion (USD),-1
26,Energy Data Scientist,$61k-$104k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Number: R0092732

Energy Data Scientist

The Challenge:

Are you excited at the prospect of unlocking the secrets held by data and enabling the visualization of new insights? Are you fascinated by the possibilities presented by the IoT, machine learning, and artificial intelligence advances? Do you have an interest or background in developing cutting-edge energy, resilience and critical infrastructure solutions? In an increasingly connected world, massive amounts of structured and unstructured data open up new opportunities.

As a data scientist, you can turn these complex data sets into useful information to solve global challenges related to power, fuels, water and critical infrastructure. We have an opportunity for you to use your analytical skills to improve our business. You’ll work closely with your customer to understand their questions and needs, and then dig into their data-rich environment to find the pieces of their information puzzle. You’ll apply analytical skills and use the right combination of tools and frameworks to turn that set of disparate data points into objective answers to help clients make informed decisions. You’ll provide your customer with a deep understanding of their data, what it all means, and how they can use it. Join us as we use data science for good in consulting.

Empower change with us.

Basic Qualifications:
Experience with machine learning, data mining, statistics, or graph algorithms
Experience with data analysis and data visualization
Knowledge of an object-oriented language, including Python, Java, C++, or R
Ability to obtain a security clearance
BA or BS degree
Additional Qualifications:
Experience with extract, transform, and load (ETL) in parallel processing and distributed compute environments
Experience with designing novel machine learning methods and workflows, including full data pipelines from raw data through predictions
Experience with using R, Perl, Python, SAS, or SPSS for data analysis
Possession of excellent oral and written communication skills
Possession of excellent interpersonal skills
Clearance:

Applicants selected will be subject to a security investigation and may need to meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.

Build Your Career:

At Booz Allen, we know the power of analytics and we’re dedicated to helping you grow as a data analysis professional. When you join Booz Allen, you’ll have the chance to:
access online and onsite training in data analysis and presentation methodologies, and tools like Hortonworks, Docker, Tableau, and Splunk
change the world with the Data Science Bowl—the world’s premier data science for social good competition
participate in partnerships with data science leaders, like our partnership with NVIDIA to deliver Deep Learning Institute (DLI) training to the federal government
You’ll have access to a wealth of training resources through our Analytics University, an online learning portal specifically geared towards data science and analytics skills, where you can access more than 5000 functional and technical courses, certifications, and books. Build your technical skills through hands-on training on the latest tools and state-of-the-art tech from our in-house experts. Pursuing certifications that directly impact your role? You may be able to take advantage of our tuition assistance, on-site bootcamps, certification training, academic programs, vendor relationships, and a network of professionals who can give you helpful tips. We’ll help you develop the career you want as you chart your own course for success.

We’re an EOE that empowers our people—no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other protected characteristic—to fearlessly drive change.",4.0,"Booz Allen Hamilton Inc.
4.0","Arlington, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1914,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
27,Data Scientist,-1,"Kernel is building state-of-the-art hardware for acquiring high-quality brain signal data. Our world-class team of neuroscientists, engineers, and physicists have developed hardware that can successfully acquire data non-invasively at a much lower cost and in a much more open environment compared to what is currently available. By overcoming these two major limitations that are currently holding back the progress of understanding the brain, we are able to enable Neuroscience as a Service (NaaS)--neuroscience studies at the touch of a button.

We are looking for an experienced Data Scientist to support the algorithmic development, processing, analysis, visualization, and interpretation of the neural data from our new technologies. The ideal candidate has an intuitive grasp of a rich portfolio of filtering, pre-processing, dimensionality reduction, analysis, and machine learning techniques for various modalities of high-dimensional data. As the data opportunities we face are vast and complex, collaborating effectively with a team on larger projects, as well as digging deep individually, will both be key.

Neuroscience is the new rocket science.
ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:
Rapidly research, implement, validate, and extend processing and analysis algorithms and techniques from the relevant literature
Generate robust, well-documented, scalable tooling and scaffolding in the process
Perform data cleaning and assemble usable databases from unstructured data sources and multiple modalities. Bridge across data capture, storage, and processing.
Implement quality checks and perform targeted analysis on processed data to optimally expose information content
Build predictive and discriminative machine learning models on large, multi-modal data sets
Communicate progress, challenges, and results effectively to team members
BASIC QUALIFICATIONS:
Master’s degree in a quantitative field and strong mathematics and statistics background
3+ years of industry experience performing advanced signal processing, data analysis, and visualization
Industry-grade coding and software engineering skills. The candidate should be able to write clean, efficient, and well-documented code in python; deeply understand decomposition, modularity, abstraction, and object-oriented programming; as well as be comfortable with numerical python (numpy, scipy, matplotlib)
Familiarity with large collaborative software projects, version control, and code review
PREFERRED SKILLS:
PhD in physics, mathematics, neuroscience, engineering or related quantitative field
Experience working with time dependent neuroimaging data in particular (EEG, ECoG, MEG, NIRS, fMRI)
Experience designing and training supervised machine learning models, using both classical ML and contemporary deep learning approaches, on complex, multimodal data
Understanding of unsupervised learning and reinforcement learning
Familiarity with industry-grade data science and infrastructure tools
This position will require access to information protected under U.S. export control laws and regulations, including the International Traffic in Arms Regulations (ITAR) and/or the Export Administration Regulations (EAR). Please note that any offer for employment will be conditioned on authorization to receive software or technology controlled under these U.S. export control laws and regulations without sponsorship for an export license.",4.6,"Kernel
4.6","Culver City, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
28,Data Scientist,-1,"Title: Data Scientist

Location: Springfield, VA - perhaps other locations as well
**Active TS/SCI Security Clearance Required***
Summary

Royce Geospatial Consultants is looking for an energetic and experienced data scientist and or modeling expert with experience working within a Multi-Int environment.

Responsibilities

Works with large structured / unstructured data sets, various rest/wms data services, multiple database programs and collection systems, in a modeling and analytical environment, solving hard intelligence problems and issues.
Uses exploratory data analysis techniques to identify meaningful relationships, patterns, or trends from complex data
Combines applied mathematics, programming skills, analytical techniques, and data to provide impactful insights for decision makers
Researches and implement optimization models, strategies, and methods to inform data management activities and analyses
Applies big data analytics tools to large, diverse sets of collection data to assess risk of adverse threat activities

Qualifications

10 years of experience as an intelligence analyst (single-INT or all-source) utilizing data from multiple intelligence disciplines (HUMINT, SIGINT, GEOINT, OSINT, MASINT) required
Experience using spatial and statistical analysis techniques for performing problem solving against disparate datasets required
Scripting knowledge (JS, Python) is a huge plus and any experience using model based analytics programs like JEMA, NODE RED, etc. and software packages like SAS is beneficial
Active TS/SCI Clearance REQUIRED

Desired Experience

Keyhole Markup Language (KML) and GIS software such as Google Earth, ArcGIS
Experience using Joint Enterprise Modeling and Analytics software (JEMA), FADE/ MIST
Database administration and query languages (predominantly SQL Select statements),
Python expressions or other related scripting languages
HTTP, HTML, CSS and programming languages such as Java, JavaScript, Python and various web service frameworks

Who we are..... ROYCE GEO

We're not your typical government contracting company, nor do we want to be. At Royce GEO, we live for building durable and long-lasting relationships with our clients, providing exceptional service with a CAN'T QUIT / WON'T QUIT attitude. We are creating a culture of winning, optimism, FUN and caring for the ""guy or gal"" next to you. If you want to work in a real team environment and share the wealth and satisfaction of providing real value to your customer, then this company may be just for you. Visit our site: www.RoyceGeo.com

Full Medical | 401K match | Competitive Salary | Robust Training Offering | Generous Paid Time Off

Equal Opportunity Employer

Powered by JazzHR

loA3dkKEBy",5.0,"Royce Geospatial
5.0","Springfield, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
29,Data Scientist- Analytics,$113k-$186k (Glassdoor Est.),"OkCupid is looking for an analyst to contribute to our data-driven organization. We enjoy working on a product that helps millions of people find love and get a great sense of satisfaction in seeing our hard work make a difference. If that’s the kind of thing that appeals to you, you’re probably a good fit for OkCupid

About the Team:
OkCupid’s Analytics function is a close knit team of 4, we sit embedded in various business functions, and we each bring our diverse and unique experience to the team. Our team handles all aspects of the analytics life cycle, including data modelling and warehousing, reporting, traditional analytics, and statistical modeling.

In this role, you will:
-Partner with Product Managers and Senior leadership to recommend appropriate actions
-Utilize statistical modelling techniques where appropriate to drive business decisions
-Own experimentation for your product team by designing and implementing AB tests and network effect tests
-Analyze company performance across Product, Marketing, Finance, and more as needed
-Prepare trend analysis and investigative reporting for product teams and senior management

We’re looking for:
-3+ YOE with at least one statistical programming language: Python, R, SAS, Julia (Python Preferred)
-3+ YOE using SQL with any database
-Strong analytical skills and the ability to turn unstructured problems into easily digestible analyses and conclusions
-Previous experience analyzing behavior at an internet company, preferably in a B2C environment
-Ability to operate independently and proactively, we don’t just want you generating reports, we want you helping drive the business forwards

Extra points for:
-Bachelor’s degree in Economics, Computer Science, Mathematics, or other related fields a plus
-Experience with at least one BI tool (Tableau, Looker, Periscope, etc)
-Basic familiarity with Machine Learning concepts
-Advanced statistical knowledge



What’s in it for you?
- Competitive salary and full benefits, including Medical, Dental, Vision, and 401k
- Workstation and tools of your choice
- Paid attendance to conferences
- Daily complimentary catered lunch from some of NYC’s top restaurants, and an endless supply of snacks & drinks
- Company funded happy hours/events
- Discounted membership to some amazing NYC facilities including Chelsea Piers Gym
- Generous maternity and/or paternity leave and contributions towards fertility preservation
- A sunny office full of incredibly curious and friendly people

OkCupid is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are deeply committed to fostering an inclusive environment for all employees.",4.2,"OkCupid
4.2","New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2003,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
30,"Assistant Research Scientist, Hydrologist",$44k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"Thank you for your interest in employment with the Desert Research Institute. We want your application process to go smoothly and quickly. We ask that you keep in mind the following when completing your application:
Once you start the application process you cannot save your work. Please ensure you have all required attachment(s) available to complete your application before you begin the process.
Required attachments are listed below on the posting. Your application will not be considered without the required attachments.
Please see the application instructions under each posting for information on submittal deadlines.
If you need assistance or have questions regarding the application process, contact Human Resources Hotline at (775) 673-7431 or recruit@dri.edu.

Job Description

The position of rank II, Assistant Research Scientist, Hydrologist will be primarily responsible for analyzing remote sensing and climate data sets for estimating evapotranspiration, vegetation status, and trends in agriculture and groundwater dependent ecosystems across the southwestern U.S. The position requires strong background in remote sensing, statistical methods, environmental modeling, and excellent data management and computer programming skills. The ability to engage with federal, state, and local management agencies and other stakeholders to communicate research results and identify new collaborative research needs is also preferred. Responsibilities include working with numerous DRI researchers to support projects at the interface of climate, hydrology, ecology, agriculture, and remote sensing.

Required Qualifications
U.S Citizenship - due to funding specifications of the position;
Master of Science degree with a focus on hydrology from an accredited institution, with a strong interdisciplinary background across fields remote sensing, agriculture, ecology, or climatology;
Experience using satellite remote sensing and spatial climate data together to solve problems;
Strong evidence of data management and analysis of large spatiotemporal datasets;
Expertise in one or more computer programming languages (e.g. Python, R, JavaScript);
Advanced skills using ArcGIS, QGIS, and the Google Earth Engine cloud computing platform;
Experience with application of technical skills in agriculture and/or groundwater dependent ecosystem problems in the western U.S.;
Experience conducting field work, such as weather station installation and maintenance, conducting vegetation surveys, conducting crop and pumpage inventories, etc.;
Effective verbal, written, and interpersonal skills.
Preferred Qualifications
Possess a Remote Pilot Certificate from the FAA;
Ability to work independently to fulfill project goals and meet project deadlines;
Ability to effectively analyze and report research findings to sponsors, at conferences, and during professional meetings;
Ability to work collaboratively with a diverse range of management partners and stakeholders, and to co-develop applied research initiatives;
Ability to coordinate collaborative research and work collegially in a group setting.
Conditions of Employment
Due to funding specifications of this position, ALL applicants MUST be citizens of the United States;
Employment is contingent upon the successful completion of a background check.
Organization Summary

Since 1959, DRI has stood at the forefront of understanding Earth's complex environmental systems, promoting preservation of diverse ecosystems, advancing responsible natural resource management, and improving human health and welfare throughout Nevada and around the world. Research at DRI calls on the expertise and methods of multiple scientific disciplines. More than 500 highly-skilled scientists, engineers, technicians and students are collaboratively focused on understanding and answering critical questions about global climate change, water quality and availability, air quality, sustainability of desert lands, life in extreme environments, and more.

Salary/Benefits

DRI’s starting salary is competitive and commensurate with education, experience, and aligns with similar public academic research institutions. DRI provides excellent benefits that include:
Health insurance options including medical, dental, vision, life, and long-term disability;
15.25% tax-deferred retirement contribution with matching by DRI;
Thirty (30) days of sick leave provided upon start date and two (2) days of sick leave accrued per full month after the first year of service, two (2) days of annual leave accrued each full month, 11 paid holidays;
Tuition reduction at NSHE institutions for employee and dependents;
No state income tax and no Social Security deduction;
Relocation assistance.
Exempt

Yes

Full-Time Equivalent

100.0%

Required Attachment(s)

Qualified individuals interested in this position must apply online at https://nshe.wd1.myworkdayjobs.com/DRI-External. To ensure full consideration, your application must include:
A cover letter detailing how your experience and professional qualifications prepare you to succeed in this role;
A current resume or CV;
Contact information for three professional references, to be contacted at the appropriate phase of the recruitment process based on applicant permission.
Qualified individuals who meet all qualifications and requirements are encouraged to apply immediately and provide all required attachments to receive full consideration. Recruitment will be open for a minimum of 15 days and close without notice after that period when a sufficient number of applications are received or a hiring decision has been made.

For more detailed information about DRI, faculty, research projects, and publications, please visit us at www.dri.edu. For questions regarding this position or assistance with your application, please call the recruiting office at (775) 673-7319.

Posting Close Date

11/10/2020

Note to Applicant

Applicants should fully describe their qualifications and experience with specific reference to each of the minimum and preferred qualifications. The search committee will use this information during the initial review of application materials.

References will be contacted at the appropriate phase of the recruitment process based on applicant notification and permission.

Newly hired faculty and postdoctoral fellows must assure that their official transcript is submitted to the Human Resources Office within 30 calendar days from the effective date of employment. Academic degrees must have been awarded by regionally accredited institutions.

This position may require a criminal background check to be conducted on the candidate(s) selected for hire.

As part of the hiring process, applicants for positions in the Nevada System of Higher Education may be required to demonstrate the ability to perform job-related tasks.

DRI employs only U.S. citizens and aliens authorized to work in the U.S. DRI only sponsors aliens applying for research faculty or postdoctoral fellow positions (J-1 or H-1B Visas).

All applicants hired by the Desert Research Institute are subject to E-Verify.",3.7,"Desert Research Institute
3.7","Reno, NV",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1959,Nonprofit Organization,Colleges & Universities,Education,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
31,Data Scientist,-1,"Position Overview:

Deep Labs is seeking an experienced, enthusiastic Data Scientist to join our growing Deep Labs AI team that is designing & building solutions for some of our client's most challenging problems. The ideal candidate will have a strong background working with data, experience applying machine learning and deep learning techniques to real-world problems, and a natural curiosity and desire to experiment, evaluate and solve problems as part of a fast-paced and growing, product-driven technology team. The role reports to the VP, Data Science & Engineering.

Responsibilities:
Build regression, classification and clustering models using Machine Learning and/or Deep Learning algorithms and techniques (e.g. CNN, LSTM, GAN, transfer learning, reinforcement learning, graph learning)
Identify opportunities to enrich and integrate data from multiple, diverse sources
Build, train and evaluate prototype models, using a tool or framework of choice
Work closely with engineering/infrastructure teams to help transition models from development to production
Follow a methodical, analytical approach and have a natural curiosity to understand and get the best from data
Collaboration across teams: communicate effectively across a variety of technical and non-technical audiences
Experience:
Minimum of 3 years of experience in a dedicated Data Scientist role required; modeling fraud/risk, in one or more of the following industries: finance, payments, banking, risk, fraud, identity or behavioral analytics preferred
Knowledge and experience of Python (preferred) or R, and associated data manipulation/analysis libraries
Working knowledge of open-source machine/deep learning tools and frameworks (e.g. Tensorflow, pytorch, h2o.ai, Databricks, scikit-learn)
Experience using data mining & descriptive analytics to explore and profile new datasets, perform feature selection and extraction, and develop ethical and interpretable models
Knowledge and/or work experience of public cloud environments (e.g. Google GCP or Amazon AWS)
Education: Masters or PhD level qualification in computer science, mathematics, or related discipline

Specific Skills:
Knowledge and experience of good software engineering practices
Keen interest and desire to stay abreast of the latest developments in AI research and industry
Demonstrated ability to take initiative and interact within a global team environment
Strong analytical and quantitative skills; strong attention to detail
Why Deep Labs?

At Deep Labs there is tremendous potential to learn and grow, while also contributing to policies, decisions, and the direction of the company. We offer competitive compensation and benefits, and provide a highly open, honest, and fun work environment.

Our company is committed to equal employment opportunity. We will not discriminate against employees or applicants for employment on any legally-recognized basis [""protected class""] including, but not limited to: age, race, gender, pregnancy, religion or creed, color, national origin, sexual orientation, disability, genetic characteristics, military or veteran status, uniform service member status or any other protected class under federal, state or local law.

We are interested in every qualified candidate who is eligible to work in the United States. However, we are not able to sponsor visas.",3.8,"Deep Labs
3.8","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
32,Data Scientist,$82k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Bristol Myers Squibb, we are inspired by a single vision – transforming patients’ lives through science. In oncology, hematology, immunology and cardiovascular disease – and one of the most diverse and promising pipelines in the industry – each of our passionate colleagues contribute to innovations that drive meaningful change. We bring a human touch to every treatment we pioneer. Join us and make a difference.

Data Scientists will work with senior DS leaders to extract insight from complex clinical, translational and real-world data. They will have the opportunity to work on complex data science problems including modeling techniques to interpret, infer and recommend based on insights from data.

Roles and Responsibilities:
Formulates, implements, tests, and validates predictive models and implements efficient automated processes for producing modeling results at scale.
Creates robust models based on statistical and data mining techniques to provide insights and recommendations based on large complex data sets.
Presents stories told by data in a visually appealing and easy to understand manner.
Responsible for collaborating with cross functional teams, including but not limited to, clinicians, data scientist, translational medicine scientist, statisticians, and IT professionals.
Proactively builds partnerships with specialist functions and global counterparts to maximize knowledge and available resources.
Requirements:
Ph.D. in quantitative sciences (computer science, math, statistics and engineering)
+2 years experience in healthcare or pharmaceutical is preferred but not required
Strong knowledge of programing languages, with a focus on machine learning (R, Python, Sagemaker, Tensorflow).
Ability to summarize technically/analytically complex information for a non-technical audience
Demonstrated ability to work in a team environment with good interpersonal, communication, writing and organizational skills.
Outstanding technical and analytic skills, proficient at understanding and conceptualizing business problems and implementing analytic or decision support solutions
Around the world, we are passionate about making an impact on the lives of patients with serious diseases. Empowered to apply our individual talents and diverse perspectives in an inclusive culture, our shared values of passion, innovation, urgency, accountability, inclusion and integrity bring out the highest potential of each of our colleagues.

Bristol Myers Squibb recognizes the importance of balance and flexibility in our work environment. We offer a wide variety of competitive benefits, services and programs that provide our employees with the resources to pursue their goals, both at work and in their personal lives.",4.1,"Bristol-Myers Squibb
4.1","Princeton, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,1858,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
33,"Manager, IT Security Data Engineer",$105k-$193k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description Summary:
The Manager, IT Security Data Engineer is responsible for maintaining the confidentiality, integrity, and availability of data and systems within PTC

The Manager, IT Security Data Engineer partners with the Business, IT, Data Privacy, Legal, and Compliance to ensure implementation and compliance of Data Security procedures, in alignment with the IT Security governance policy and procedures

The Manager, IT Security Data Engineer assists in the implementation of security controls, creation of security policies, vendor risk management, cyber security awareness, monitoring and responding to security events, data security, data classification, and compliance.

He/she will also leverage his/her knowledge of Networking, Identity and Access Management (IAM), Lightweight Directory Access Protocol (LDAP) servers, Data Lost Prevention(DLP), Microsoft Azure, Amazon Web Services (AWS) and Databases to develop solutions and mentor other staff and teams.

The incumbent works cross-functionally with internal departments and external resources on security and system architecture-related issues.

The Manager, IT Security Data Engineer ensures adherence to relevant regulatory requirements and company Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs) as appropriate
Job Description:


ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS
Maintain records of all data assets, technical data classification standards and maintain a data security incident management plan to ensure timely remediation of incidents.
Enforce data security requirements across all data classifications
Manage data governance for cloud migration
Ensure Access Management for on-prem and cloud data
Manage ongoing changes/enhancements to IT data governance policies and procedures to ensure they are fit for purpose
Facilitate best practice sharing across organization
Analyze data to enable a better understanding of each data source
Make recommendations for enhancing data systems security
Research attempted breaches of data security and rectifying security weaknesses
Develops, tracks and delivers privacy awareness training to various business functions
Safeguard systems by monitoring Intrusion Detection, firewalls, anti-virus systems and other security components to detect breaches and other cybersecurity incidents
Review, analyze, respond to, and report on violations/alerts
Plan, implement, and upgrade security measures and controls
Assists in the development and implementation of security policies and procedures
Provides direct support to the business and IT staff for security related issues.
Enforce security policies and procedures by administering and monitoring security profiles, reviews security violation reports and investigates possible security exceptions, updates, and maintains and documents security controls.
Keeps abreast of application security trends and the emerging threat landscape and actively engages with vendors, understanding architecture roadmaps, technology direction, and investment to improve security capabilities and deliver cost effective solutions.
Reviews current system security measures and recommends and implements enhancements
Ensures all personnel have access to the IT system limited by need and role
Develops and produces high quality documentation for strategic security architecture vision, including blueprints, standards and frameworks that are aligned with overall business strategy.
Strategy, planning, and operational excellence through continuous improvement and automation.
Manages service levels, control effectiveness, control failure remediation, operational automation and oversight of information security team.
Performs initial and periodic information security risk assessment/analysis, mitigation and remediation.
Assists in the development and knowledge transfer to IT team members, as well as other enterprise groups.
Performs other tasks and assignments as needed and specified by management.
KNOWLEDGE/SKILLS/ABILITIES REQUIRED

* Minimum level of education and years of relevant work experience.
A Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Information Systems or other related field and a minimum of 6 years of progressively responsible leadership experience, preferably in a pharmaceutical, biotechnology or other regulated environment OR equivalent experience and/or education.
* Special knowledge or skills needed and/or licenses or certificates required.
6+ years of experience in a hands-on Privacy, Data Protection or Data Security role
Strong knowledge of global data privacy regulations and guidelines (GDPR, CCPA, PIPEDA, etc.)
Data Loss Prevention Tools (including network, endpoint, and cloud based DLP tools)
Relevant experience designing, implementing, and supporting large scale solutions.
Experience with drafting of standard, reference architecture, policies, procedures and implementation guidelines.
Demonstrable, impeccable writing skills for technical, management, and executive audiences.
Demonstrable communication capabilities including oral presentation and ability to present in front of executive leadership.
Demonstrable experience coordinating multiple concurrent issues, in highpressure situations.
High degree of understanding with Cryptographic Services.
Experience with cloud solution environments such as Azure and Amazon Web Service.
One or more of the following certifications a plus: CISSP, CISM, CISA, GIAC, GPEN, PMP.
Proficiency with Microsoft Office.
Excellent verbal and written communication and skills.
Ability to work independently and collaboratively, as required, in a fast-paced, matrixed, team environment consisting of internal and external team members.
Analytical thinker with excellent problem-solving skills and the ability to adapt to changing priorities and deadlines.
Excellent planning, organization and time management skills including the ability to support and prioritize multiple projects.
* Travel requirements
Up to 10% travel
EEO Statement:

PTC Therapeutics is an equal opportunity employer. We welcome applications from all individuals, regardless of race, color, national origin, gender, age, physical characteristics, social origin, disability, religion, family status, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, disability, veteran status or any unlawful criterion under applicable law. We are committed to treating all applicants fairly and avoiding discrimination.

Click here to return to the careers page",3.0,"PTC Therapeutics, Inc.
3.0","South Plainfield, NJ",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1998,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
34,Sr Data Scientist,$80k-$129k (Glassdoor Est.),"This role will use AI and machine learning technique to drive the main purpose of increasing HouseCalls program member engagement and penetration through leveraging internal enterprise data sources including member medical history and behavior information and external information.

As HouseCalls enabling operation continues to grow, there are specific skills sets that are needed to help us achieve the financial goal and member experience satisfaction. Strategic solution team is seeking a director role of outreach strategy with advanced technical expertise, marketing background and great healthcare industry experience. We are looking for an innovative individual who is not only able to strategize via data, but also able to implement the strategy through the end.

You’ll enjoy the flexibility to telecommute* from anywhere within the U.S. as you take on some tough challenges.

Primary Responsibilities:

The Sr. Data Scientist will play an analytical role researching, designing, implementing and deploying full-stack scalable machine learning solutions to support house call member engagements
Develop intelligent solutions to drive increase in HouseCalls penetration rate by using unstructured data like voice and text
Consolidate internal and external data to establish member journey line across different programs
Establish analytic machine learning models to increase member outbound reach experience and NPS scores, implement the solutions into applications or operation
Drive inbound scheduling through text mining in scripting and NLP

You’ll be rewarded and recognized for your performance in an environment that will challenge you and give you clear direction on what it takes to succeed in your role as well as provide development for other roles you may be interested in.

Required Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Sciences, Information Management, Actuarial Science or a related technical field; MS or PhD strongly preferred
Minimum 5 years’ experience in data analytics and machine learning modeling
Minimum 5 years’ experience working with large databases to create meaningful, usable data structures to extract information out of application transactional data
Minimum 5 years’ experience leading technical and non-technical resources in the area of Information Management, Data Strategy, Business Intelligence development, data mining and predictive analytics with machine learning/statistical modeling techniques
Minimum 3 years' experience in Python
Strong ability to communicate highly technical issues/results to a diverse audience both verbally and in written
Experience working for a large enterprise with fragmented data sources, lack of documentation, unstructured requirements and ambiguity
Experience working with business stakeholders and senior leaders in understanding data analytics and information needs, and executing on transformation of high-level, abstract data needs into meaningful data management solutions, information and analysis
Experience understanding and managing business data and information, and the ability to correlate business processes to data
Experience converting raw data into processed, actionable, insightful information is required
Strong execution mentality
Preferred Qualifications:
MS in Applied Mathematics, Physics, Computer Sciences, Information Management, Statistics, Actuarial Science or a related technical field
Minimum 3 years of Speech Recognition modeling and/or NLP preferred
Minimum 5 years’ experience in correlating business processes and front-end applications to back-end databases and systems

Careers with Optum. Here's the idea. We built an entire organization around one giant objective; make health care work better for everyone. So when it comes to how we use the world's large accumulation of health-related information, or guide health and lifestyle choices or manage pharmacy benefits for millions, our first goal is to leap beyond the status quo and uncover new ways to serve. Optum, part of the UnitedHealth Group family of businesses, brings together some of the greatest minds and most advanced ideas on where health care has to go in order to reach its fullest potential. For you, that means working on high performance teams against sophisticated challenges that matter. Optum, incredible ideas in one incredible company and a singular opportunity to do your life's best work.(sm)

OptumCare is committed to creating an environment where physicians focus on what they do best: care for their patients. To do so, OptumCare provides administrative and business support services to both owned and affiliated medical practices which are part of OptumCare. Each medical practice part and their physician employees have complete authority with regards to all medical decision-making and patient care. OptumCare’s support services do not interfere with or control the practice of medicine by the medical practices or any of their physicians.
All Telecommuters will be required to adhere to UnitedHealth Group’s Telecommuter Policy.
Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: OptumCare is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action employers and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.

OptumCare is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment.",3.4,"UnitedHealth Group
3.4","Eden Prairie, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,1977,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10+ billion (USD),-1
35,"Data Science Instructor, Part-Time - REMOTE",$98k-$156k (Glassdoor Est.),"Part-Time Data Science Instructor - Remote*
Galvanize is a dynamic learning community for technology. Our community is where people and companies with the guts and smarts to create real-world change congregate and inspire each other. Our goal is to make opportunities in technology available to all those with the aptitude, determination, and drive. Across our beautifully designed urban campuses nationwide, we offer a unique combination of education, workspace, and networking.

The part-time data science instructor will host and teach technical workshops to inexperienced coders in order to help them learn foundational skills in data science and to solve data-science problems utilizing innovative educational techniques. We are looking for passionate educators and practical problem solvers with demonstrated flexibility and curiosity. Join us in building the world's hub for education in data science and data engineering.
As a Data Science instructor at Galvanize, you will: *
Deliver lectures and tutorials on scientific Python, SQL, probability, statistics (Bayesian and frequentist), machine learning, and data engineering.
Lead “sprints,” maintaining a strong presence in the virtual classroom
Clearly communicate well-crafted lesson plans
Deftly and patiently field student questions
Provide attendees of your workshops information about our full-time immersive programs and our prep programs
Build and refine data-science workshops
Utilize student feedback and experimentation to continuously improve teaching and assessment methods.
Evaluate new tools, packages, and tutorials for use in the curriculum.
Contribute to local evangelism, admissions, and nurture activities, such as attendance at meetups, speaking at conferences, leading workshops (evening), etc.
Promote a positive, fast-paced learning environment, and keep students moving forward in course content.
You should be available and flexible to teach evening workshops at least two days a week Monday through Thursday
Expected Experience: *
Experience in the industry in a data scientist or software engineer role
Strong understanding of the topics we teach: scientific Python, software engineering, probability, statistics, SQL, machine learning, data engineering, data visualization, data at scale
Outstanding communication skills
Experience teaching a quantitative subject preferred
This job description may not be inclusive of all assigned duties, responsibilities, or aspects of the job described, and may be amended at anytime at the sole discretion of the employer.

Galvanize provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender perception or identity, national origin, age, marital status, protected veteran status, or disability status

Job Type: Part-time",4.3,"Galvanize
4.3","Denver, CO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Education Training Services,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
36,Data Scientist,$89k-$150k (Glassdoor Est.),"Lead, collaborate and join integrated teams that apply advanced methods, theories, and research techniques in the investigation and solution development of complex data analysis problems. As a data scientist, you will help teams’ advance complex analysis, design, development, and testing of scalable end-to-end data pipelines from prototype to production, that include data analysis, visualization, and machine learning. At Fortego, you will embark on a journey of exciting, impactful & highly technical work with good people that treat you like family.

If that sounds like you, and you’ve got the skills and qualifications listed below with a TS/SCI with a Polygraph, we encourage you to apply.
We are looking for junior, mid-level or senior-level data scientists with the following:
Demonstrated software development experience with Python in a Unix environment.
Practical knowledge in Python Machine Learning and Data Visualization
Practical knowledge in Data ETL such as working with: Data loading from SQL, CSV, JSON, Excel, etc., Web scraping (Beautiful Soup, Scrapy, etc.) and Data Wrangling/Cleaning
Experience using the Unix command line.
Proficiency in statistical packages using any of the following: Python, R, STATA, SPSS, etc.
Candidate may have some practical knowledge in these skill sets (not required, but helpful):
Using the Atlassian Tool Suite.
Continuous integration /continuous delivery (CI/CD)
Working knowledge with other object-oriented programming languages such as Java or C++
Working knowledge with Front-end data visualization libraries (i.e., D3.js; Raphael.js, etc.)
Experience with development of any of the following; Hadoop, Pig, MapReduce, or HDFS
Requirements:
TS/SCI with a Polygraph
Looking for junior, mid and senior-level data scientists
The benefits:
Rewarding your hard work: Referrals, sign on, profit sharing, quarterly awards… need we go on?
Generous training budget: Designed by you.
PTO that has your back: For the families and the unbounded adventures, from furloughs to inclement weather, we are there.
Top notch health care and 401k package: If these drive you, this is your stop.
Something always going on: Team lunches, happy hours, fantasy leagues, game nights, homebrew competitions and monthly family events.
We support innovation: Got an idea? Want to learn something new? Whatever it is we will help see it through.
About Fortego
Fortego helps solve some of the most difficult cyber issues the world faces today. Our employees spend their working hours deep in the trenches handling the most critical and exciting challenges on the national security front. As for the other hours of the day, you will find Fortego employees kicking back and enjoying benefits that span from family activities to sporting events, supporting veterans in the community, and exploring new tech.

Fortego is an Equal Opportunity Employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",5.0,"Fortego
5.0","Columbia, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
37,Cleared Data Scientist,$85k-$137k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

As an experienced Data Scientist, you might be wondering what makes MITRE different than other government contractors and consulting firms. Many of our recent hires answered YES to at least one of the questions below:
Do you want to partner with Defense Intelligence professionals to solve problems?
Are you interested in developing, automating and improving capabilities to address technical issues of national importance and making a direct mission impact?
Are you interested in contributing to technical projects that you can feel passionate about?
Are you interested in working for a company where a 40-hour week is the norm and not the exception?
Do you want exceptional benefits, including tuition reimbursement for coursework towards an advance degree in a technical discipline?
In the Defense Intelligence Department, you can apply and expand software development and data skills to recommend solutions to large-scale data challenges. Join our team to develop automated methods to ingest and analyze large datasets; conduct data analysis and data modeling; and develop prototype capabilities. The candidate will be expected to work independently, with Analysts, and with Data Scientists to develop new workflows and approaches to answer questions of national significance. Our department works to identify and bring solutions to the Defense Intelligence Community and work in the public interest. We also actively conduct independent research in areas that further the knowledge of our government partners.

To be successful you will:
Be passionate about applying data analytics to real world problems.
Have an innate curiosity and interest in developing research questions and testing hypotheses with open ended tasking.
Work with Defense Intelligence government sponsors to gain understanding of their challenges, evaluate possible solutions and conduct insightful, actionable analyses.
Support the development and application of a variety of analytical models to sponsor challenges, with a willingness to adapt and learn.
Present results in an intuitive, actionable manner that can be understood by all sponsor audiences, regardless of technical expertise.
Provide relevant day-to-day tasking for one or more junior staff.
Lead projects throughout their life cycle, including conceptualization, requirements definition, data procurement, development, integration, and socialization
Minimum Qualifications :
BS and 8 years related experience
Applicants selected for this position will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information or applicants who are eligible for security clearances.
Required Qualifications:
Prior experience working with the Department of Defense and/or Intelligence Community.
Significant academic background in a quantitative field such as Computer Science, Engineering, Operations Research, Mathematics, or Statistics.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Demonstrated ability to manipulate large datasets and perform calculations with at least two modern programming language like Python (scikit-learn, pandas, tensorflow), C++, R, or Java or a business intelligence platform like Tableau.
Ability to apply, modify and formulate algorithms and processes to solve challenging problems.
Familiarity with AWS tools.
Demonstrated experience leading customer facing engagements emphasizing data analytics.
Possess and maintain an Active TS/SCI level security clearance with the ability to successfully obtain a CI Poly level clearance.


Preferred Qualifications:
Prior experience working with databases (e.g., PostgreSQL, Oracle, MySQL, MongoDB, Neo4j).Experience visualizing multi-dimensional data using tools like Tableau, ggplot2, Plotly, matplotlib, seaborn, or D3.js.
Experience leading or conducting research.
Experience designing data science tasking and/or leading a team of data scientists.
Experience applying various machine learning approaches (e.g., random forest, neural networks, support vector machines).
Experience using version control (e.g., Git, Mercurial, SVN) to support collaborative development.
Prior experience developing interactive data visualizations using open source web technologies (Angular, Vue, React, D3.js) or other frameworks (Shiny, Jupyter Notebooks).
Prior experience developing data-intensive full stack web applications using Node.js, Flask, Django, or other technologies.
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
38,Data Scientist,$48k-$83k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Infinitive:

At Infinitive, we do mission-critical work for great companies. We specialize in digital marketing and digital advertising solutions, customer data & analytics, digital & business transformation, and Technology solutions. Our Technology solutions focus on Managed Cloud Services, Cloud Enablement, Digital Operations, Application Development, DevOps, Product Development, Cloud Security, Data Science and Analytics, AI/ML, IoT, and everything in between.

Our experts are results-obsessed, focused and flexible, highly engaged and hugely experienced having sat in our clients seats. Those qualities are what make us different than old-school consulting shops. And surely, they are why clients and partners describe us as the gold standard in client experience.

Infinitive has been named a Best Small Firms to Work For by Consulting Magazine seven times, a Washington Post Top Workplace three times, a Washington Business Journal Best Places to Work twice, and is a seven time winner of Virginia Business Best Places to Work.

About this Role:

Infinitive is growing its team in the Northern Virginia area and is currently seeking a Data Scientist to join our growing Technology practice. This person will utilize their experience in analytics, IoT, machine learning, and artificial intelligence advances to create value from structured and unstructured data. The ideal candidate has experience designing novel data analytic methods and workflows, including full data pipelines from raw data through analysis results. They must also have exposure to a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms, and creating/running simulations.

We are looking for candidates who are accountable, passionate, assertive, proactive, open & honest, results oriented, and adaptable. Each project engagement represents a new challenge that will give you exposure to new clients, business issues, technologies, and people and will involve a range of responsibilities to include:
Developing in Java, Python, R, or other high-level languages.
Managing disparate data sources with varying data structures of content and preparing these for data science and machine learning applications.
Working with distributed scalable Big Data storage, processing, and computation, including AWS EMR, Spark, etc.
Implementation knowledge of, or desire to learn AWS / Azure data science capabilities.
Developing solutions and integrating and extending free and Open-source software (FOSS) or COTS products.
Conduct MapReduce programming with Apache Hadoop, the Hadoop Distributed File System (HDFS), and processing large data stores.
Knowledge of SQL and query languages.
Utilize real-time, large-scale data processing engine, including Apache Spark.
Lead and create Data Science and Analytics methodologies and frameworks for implementation.
Ability to build and develop Data Science demonstrations for clients
Qualifications:
3+ years of development experience (Java, Python, R)
2+ years of experience with distributed scalable Big Data storage, including AWS EMR, Spark, etc.
Desire to become AWS / Azure Certified architect / engineer.
Interest in being involved internally and growing a small business (entrepreneurial spirit)
Ability to travel (up to 20%) and to work independently
Ability to commute to client site
Experience using Agile software development methods in a DevOps environment.
Excellent leadership, peer management, and communication skills
Management consulting experience (preferred)
Bachelor's degree
Applicants for employment in the U.S. must possess work authorization which does not require sponsorship by the employer for a visa.

Infinitive is an Equal Opportunity Employer.

Powered by JazzHR",3.3,"Infinitive Inc
3.3","McLean, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
39,Data Sciences & AI Graduate Programme - US,$79k-$131k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Science & Artificial Intelligence (AI) Graduate Programme - US

Location: Gaithersburg or Boston, (US)

Salary: Competitive, with excellent benefits package

If you have a bachelor’s or master’s degree and a desire to explore and develop your skills in data science and artificial intelligence within a global biopharmaceutical organisation, our Data Science & AI Graduate Programme could be the perfect start to your career. You’ll gain invaluable insight, exposure and opportunities across our diverse, Research and Development organisation. We’ll accelerate your learning and help you achieve your potential.

What does the programme involve?

Starting in September 2021, the programme lasts two years, consisting of three individual eight month placements. Each placement will provide you with fantastic insights and experience in our use of machine learning, AI and data science to advance drug discovery and development.

The programme’s variety and flexibility provides you with opportunities to apply machine learning, AI, and data science techniques to help push our scientists push the boundaries of science to develop life changing medicines for patients worldwide. You could be contributing to detecting safety risks, designing novel molecules, optimising clinical trial design and processes, or developing new models for use in high profile drug discovery and development projects. As well as helping you broaden your industry and technical knowledge, we’ll help you develop ‘soft’ skills required to fulfil your career potential.

You will gain an invaluable blend of on-the-job experience and coaching. You’ll enjoy guidance and advice from a huge support network, including a mentor and dedicated programme manager. We’ll also encourage you to identify and build collaborative relationships with specialists and leaders across our organisation, and our external networks including leading academic and biotech research institutions. Together, we’ll help accelerate your development and knowledge!

Essential requirements

A bachelor’s or master’s degree in a quantitative science focussed subject including Maths, Physics, Statistics, computer science and software engineering awarded in 2020, or due to be awarded in 2021.
Experience of applying data science, artificial intelligence, machine learning, statistics, computational biology, computational chemistry, bioinformatics or cheminformatics techniques.
Knowledge of the design and application of machine learning or statistical models.
Experience in using multiple data-centric programming languages to enable big data analysis (e.g. Python).
Enthusiastic and passionate advocate for the potential of data science and AI to make an impact.
Proactive problem solving and critical thinking skills.
Planning, organisational and time management skills.
Collaborative, with a partnership approach to achieving success.

Together, we push the boundaries of science to deliver life-changing medicines to patients around the world!

Our virtual assessment events will be held on weeks commencing 1st & 8th March 2021.

Applications open: 21st September 2020

Applications close: 14th January 2021",4.1,"AstraZeneca
4.1","Waltham, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1913,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
40,Data Scientist,-1,"Noah is a modern finance company that helps homeowners tap into their home equity without selling or adding additional debt (and the burden of monthly payments). Noah is focused on making home-ownership more affordable and accessible for millions of Americans, and is partnering with homeowners to help them maximize the value of what is likely their most valuable asset. Founded in 2016, with backing from Union Square Ventures and Tribe Capital, Noah has offices in San Francisco and New York.

The Role

Noah is seeking a data scientist to join our Data Science & Analytics team. Candidates should be comfortable owning a broad range of data science-related responsibilities, including the ideation and development of Noah's business and portfolio analysis tools, as well our risk and pricing models. Candidates will be expected to operate both at an execution and strategic level. This position offers high exposure to Noah's executive team, and will be reporting directly to the CIO.

Day-to-day responsibilities will include:
Translating business priorities and requirements to data science deliverables
Working with data scientists, data engineers, and software engineers to develop and support the internal tools used for pricing, underwriting, marketing, product & operations support.
Design, develop and maintain business dashboards to track KPIs across marketing, operations and product linked activities.
Develop and maintain a suite of portfolio analytics and metrics utilized for reporting to internal and external stakeholders
Developing methods to analyze risk of the US housing market in a systematic and objective manner
Identifying, sourcing and managing the data required to build Noah's risk and pricing models
Contributing to developing the core algorithms and analytical models for Noah's products
Creating frameworks for back-testing Noah's proprietary models
Requirements:
Degree in Computer Science, Math, Physics, Engineering, Statistics, Economics or other technical field
3 years of data science/analytics experience
Experience with analytic and visualization tools such as Mode Analytics, Looker etc.
Experience with: data collection, filtering, and cleaning techniques, statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, hypothesis testing), and SQL and relational databases like Postgres
Development experience, preferably in Python
Ability to organize and present complex data to technical and non-technical audiences
Team player with high integrity
Nice to have:
Experience working at an early stage startup
Open to feedback with an ongoing desire to improve
Understanding of financial concepts such as risk, volatility, IRR
A high degree of self awareness
Exposure to: A/B testing, statistical models and their interpretability, mortgage and home price models
Working knowledge of backend software development, including RESTful APIs and database
A collaborative mindset, and eagerness to partner with engineering, product, and business development teams
Benefits include:
Competitive salary, 401k, and equity in a company that is growing rapidly
Comprehensive health, vision, and dental insurance, FSA
Paid time off
Ongoing training and development",3.6,"Noah
3.6","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
41,Data Scientist,$58k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Data Scientist supports the development of statistical models that will enable future growth and profitability for our book of business through appropriate pricing, underwriting and risk segmentation. He/she will report to the Manager of Data Science and will be involved in research, development and implementation of analytical solutions based on statistical models.
Essential Functions and Responsibilities
Performs data mining and data cleansing tasks.
Prepare datasets for modeling through balancing and validation.
Produces predictive models which enable the creation of rating plans and evaluation of risk.
Assists decision makers with studies that evaluate new business models to evaluate customers’ profitability including customers and/or risk segmentation, retention and lifetime value modeling.
Communicates to diverse audiences, including technical and non-technical.
Manages projects of moderate complexity.
Supports modeling requests made by other departments.
Works closely with others to gain strong understanding of insurance concepts and processes.
Perform other job-related duties as assigned.
Qualifications and Education
Broad thinker with the ability to synthesize information from various sources and apply that information to concrete business problems. Strong decision-making skills.
Solid skills and training in predictive modeling, data mining and other quantitative and research analytics (, Multivariate Analysis, Bayesian Methods, Generalized Linear Models, Non-Linear Models, Decision Trees, Non- Parametric estimation etc.).
Strong programming ability in SAS, SQL, R or other programming languages and proficiency in scripting languages and ability to build code and algorithms to tackle statistical problems.
Excellent written and oral communication and presentation skills.
Self-starter and strong individual contributor.
Solid understanding of database principles and experience working with large databases.
Knowledge of auto insurance will be a plus.
1 or more years of experience developing and implementing multivariate predictive models using GLM and other statistical methods.
Masters in economics, statistics, or related field required, PhD preferred.
About the Company
The Plymouth Rock Company and its affiliated group of companies write and manage over $1.4 billion in personal and commercial auto and homeowner’s insurance throughout the Northeast and mid-Atlantic, where we have built an unparalleled reputation for service. We continuously invest in technology, our employees thrive in our empowering environment, and our customers are among the most loyal in the industry. The Plymouth Rock group of companies employs more than 1,800 people and is headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts. Plymouth Rock Assurance Corporation holds an A.M. Best rating of “A-/Excellent”.",3.6,"Plymouth Rock Assurance
3.6","Woodbridge, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
42,Data Scientist,$77k-$131k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Details Job Location Airspace Technologies - Carlsbad, CA Position Type Full Time Who Are We? At Airspace Technologies, we live and breathe our core values: One Team, Customer Obsessed, Trust through Communication, Impactful Everyday, Passionate about our Mission, and Innovative Mindset. Our Vision is ""Create the most trusted delivery network the world has ever seen"", and our Mission is ""Make shipping faster, safer, and more transparent than it's ever been through people, service, and technology."" By applying these to our daily tasks and interactions, we have created a company culture that is unrivaled in our industry. What We Do: Airspace Technologies is a critical logistics startup. We’re what happens when next-day shipping isn’t fast enough! From Airplane parts to movie reels and even human organs, our software is revolutionizing the industry by giving shippers a view of their packages in every stage of its transportation. We calculate optimal routes, track airplanes in flight, and automatically dispatch drivers using our native mobile app. We have the obligatory pantry full of snacks, fun company activities, unlimited PTO, 401k contribution matching, and a growing list of benefits that keep employees happy. Description: As a data scientist, you will be a part of the team that provides intelligent solutions to complex problems. The Data Science team designs, develops, and implements algorithms anytime there is a business need for smart automated solutions. As a logistics company, Airspace has a lot of moving parts, many of which could be enhanced with machine learning, optimization or statistical modeling. The ideal candidate would be a data scientist with savvy programming skills. In this role, you will work closely with the analytics, backend engineering teams, and product teams. Responsibilities: Support and enhance existing optimization and machine learning services Design, train and deploy production models Develop probabilistic models Work closely with the analytics team, data engineers and backend engineers Qualifications: Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Math, Statistics or a related discipline 2+ years of data science experience Proficiency in Python Strong applied statistics skills Understanding of various machine learning algorithms Experience in optimization Excellent communication skills Good to have: Experience with AWS Experience with deep learning Experience with Java, Go, C/C++ We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status. We will ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request accommodation.",4.3,"Airspace Technologies
4.3","Carlsbad, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Logistics & Supply Chain,Transportation & Logistics,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
43,Data Scientist,$87k-$141k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who we are


Virgin Galactic www.VirginGalactic.com is on track to become the world’s first public commercial space line. It is dedicated to becoming a world leader in sub-orbital commercial space tourism with a longer term vision to develop other space technologies that have the potential to open space to significantly more people and users. If you are looking for a challenging opportunity that will ignite your passion for designing cool and innovative products, are exceptionally creative, are a great problem solver and can make things happen - apply today!

Who you areVirgin Galactic (VG) www.VirginGalactic.com is seeking a Data Scientist who will help shape the future of the Virgin Galactic workforce. The Data Scientist will lead the business intelligence effort, fostering data collection and management as a daily practice across the organization and harnessing that data to create predictive models that increase employee efficiency, empowerment, and satisfaction at every level. The ideal candidate for this position has a practical background in analytics, with experience in natural language processing, information retrieval, knowledge extraction, and machine learning.

Your Mission
Work with stakeholders across the organization to identify opportunities for leveraging company data to drive business solutions
Mine and analyze data from internal and external data sources to develop analytical models that drive optimization of organizational structure, compensation, candidate evaluation, employee feedback, recruiting, and other initiatives
Implement statistical models and computational algorithms to inform the organization’s investments in personnel and process
Identify trends, patterns, and discrepancies in company data sources and synthesize into large datasets to support company and project goals
Lead the continuous improvement of data science and analytics by developing tools and processes to monitor ongoing model performance and analyze data accuracy
Coordinate with different functional teams and vendors to implement models and assess outcomes
Communicate insights to team leaders and business partners with crisp, accessible reports and visualizations that inform concrete business actions
* The Employer retains the right to change or assign other duties to this position.

What you bring


Minimum
Bachelor’s degree with STEM focus
2+ years related experience in technologies and practice related to analytics/insights
2+ years experience using Python and/or R to implement decision problem solutions
1+ years experience building and maintaining predictive and prescriptive models
Experience working with cross-functional teams and communicating across organizations at all levels
Proven ability to translate advanced analytical output to actionable insights for business partners and decision makers
Strong written and oral communication skills
Meet ITAR requirements as required for employment with Virgin Galactic
Preferred
Master’s degree in Data Science or Computer Science
Experience using leading data visualization tools to develop interactive graphics and dashboards for end-users (e.g. Tableau, Microsoft Power BI)
Experience building descriptive and inferential survey analytics solutions
Fluency in additional programming/ scripting languages (e.g. JavaScript)
ITAR Requirements

To conform to U.S. Government space technology export regulations, applicant must be a U.S. citizen., lawful permanent resident of the U.S., protected individual as defined by ITAR (22 CFR §120.15) or eligible to obtain the required authorizations from the U.S. Department of State.

Virgin Galactic is an Equal Opportunity Employer; employment with Virgin Galactic is governed on the basis of merit, competence and qualifications and will not be influenced in any manner by race, color, religion, gender, national origin/ethnicity, veteran status, disability status, age, sexual orientation, marital status, mental or physical disability or any other legally protected status",3.9,"Virgin Galactic
3.9","Los Angeles, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
44,Data Scientist,$100k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job TITLE: Data Scientist

Location: Santa Clara, CA

Term: Full Time

Skill: We are looking for a Data Scientist who has passion for data and can help us make smarter decisions to deliver even better products by discovering hidden information in vast amount of data. Primary focus will be on improving customer business outcomes through optimization and applying data-mining techniques, doing statistical analysis and building high quality prediction systems. Strong verbal and written communication, thoroughness and self-check personality are critical for success in this role.

• Build statistical & predictive analytics models that can be translated into various product strategy and marketing decisions
• Deep dive into data, understand hidden patterns and trends, build prediction models.
• Perform data analysis, gap analysis and drive to enhance data collection procedures by coordinating with the product team
• Coordinate with the infrastructure team for prediction model integration and to establish feedback loops thru machine learning and recalibration.
• Perform various analyses: sentimental analysis, market bucket analysis, cohort analysis, churns analysis.
• Build & monitor visually appealing real-time dashboards, as well as, develop Splunk queries & Splunk custom inputs.
• Drive for success across teams and customers
• Maintain and manage SLA
• Analyze individual issues in the context of overall platform to proactively identify larger problems
• Documentation of issues, resolutions and processes
• Contribute in data engineering efforts
• Coordinate and collaborate with development team to remain current on code and technology

Experience: • 4+ years of strong experience in Predictive Analysis, Machine Learning & Statistical Modeling using languages like Python, R, Ruby
• 5+ years of strong SQL and RDBMS experience
• 2+ years of strong experience of programming in languages like Python, C++, Java, Ruby
• 2+ years of experience working with AWS including services like RDS, Redshift, DynamoDB, Postgress, data pipeline
• 2+ years of experience in data visualization such as D3.js etc.
• 1+ years of experience working with cloud and web technologies including XML, JSON, HTML5, Web frameworks (Django, Flask), Elastic Search
• Experience with Splunk
• Experience with data analysis
• Desire and ability to learn new technologies
• Good applied statistics skills, such as distributions, statistical testing, regression, etc.
• Strong written and verbal communications skills
• Experience working with off-shore teams
• Passion of data and data driven decisions

Education: BIG PLUS:

• Experience with map-reduce paradigm with hadoop-hive environment
• Experience with NoSQL databases, MongoDB, Cassandra, HBase, Redis, Unstructured data
• Any type of contribution to open source community
• Experience with reporting tools Tableau, Pentaho BI
• Experience with ETL and Data-Warehouse",4.2,"Flexton
4.2","Santa Clara, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2007,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
45,Data Scientist,-1,"Life at aptihealth

The aptihealth team are health care, technology, research and user experience experts passionate about transforming behavioral healthcare. Everything we do at aptihealth is centered around our mission to revolutionize behavioral healthcare and to ensure that the millions of people who need and deserve it have access to it. As a curious and collaborative teammate, someone excited about tackling the hard problems in healthcare and technology, you will play a key role in making that mission a reality. Together, we’ll create and innovate transformative behavioral healthcare – for millions of people.

Role

As a Data Scientist, you will apply operations research and statistical methods to solve challenges related to overall healthcare and behavioral healthcare specifically for aptihealth and its customers. You will think critically and strategically about aptihealth’s platform as a technology, business and operation. This role requires strong problem-solving, analytical and communication skills. You will analyze large and complex data sets both to support product improvements and business decisions, as well as prepare for more efficient analysis. You will work on a range of projects, developing statistical analyses to study and understand the effect of aptihealth’s platform and protocols. You will develop machine learning models to suggest timely and appropriate behavioral health care protocols for members. You will develop methodologies to measure the outcomes and impact of protocols and make an impact on new member growth, quality and retention.

We are in a period of remarkable change and opportunity, where the convergence of technology and data is transforming healthcare. We are looking for self-motivated and driven candidates that are passionate about working on cutting edge technologies and that thrive in a highly collaborative environment.

*Candidates located near Boston, MA or Troy, NY will be considered

Responsibilities
Undertake preprocessing of structured and unstructured data
Analyze large amounts of information to discover trends and patterns
Build predictive models and machine-learning algorithms
Collaborate with engineering and product development teams
Analyze large amounts of data to gain insights on how to deliver superior care by improving our product
Lead projects with hands-on analysis and modeling, drawing from multiple analytical methods to choose the right tool and right level of complexity appropriate for the business challenge
Engage with the organization to identify, prioritize, frame, and structure complex challenges, where advanced analytics projects can have the biggest impact and optimize our product
Identify and communicate the challenges and opportunities for team focus
Help define the analytical direction and influence the direction of the associated healthcare and technology work
Articulate business questions and use mathematical techniques to arrive at an answer using data
Set up business intelligence tools to help translate analysis results into business recommendations
Become a trusted partner to the product team by proactively identifying opportunities to improve engagement, clinical adherence and patient experience.
Develop dashboards and relevant reporting to support business decisions
Drives a data-informed process for experimenting with new products to improve patient outcomes and operational efficiency
Performing ML research, exploratory data analysis, and computer-vision modeling; developing model evaluation and online maintenance methodologies, including confidence estimation, calibration, and concept drift
Develop general-purpose frameworks to support machine learning applications in production
Work with technology team to establish rules to ensure clean data for reporting
Requirements
Bachelor’s degree in Operations Research, Industrial Engineering, Statistics, related field, or equivalent
4+ years relevant work experience (as a data analyst/scientist) or equivalent across product data analytics or consulting
Experience in healthcare and/or a startup technology company preferred
Proven experience as a Data Scientist or Data Analyst
Ability to work on projects from initial to final phase – from problem definition to implementation plan to execution
Experience designing and building statistical forecasting models
Experience designing and building machine learning models
Excellent problem-framing, problem-solving and project management skills
Experience in data mining
Understanding of machine-learning and operations research
Analytical mind and business acumen
Passionate about being a trusted partner to transform behavioral healthcare
Results driven -- documented success in exceeding goals and objectives
Ability to thrive in a fast paced, constantly changing environment
Excellent customer service and team collaboration skills
Demonstrated commitment to the core values of the company
Benefits
The opportunity to make life better for millions of people
An environment of positive and super smart colleagues
Turning innovative ideas into real-world results
Encouraging curiosity and collaboration
Priding ourselves in being diverse and inclusive
Fostering a company of trust & accountability
Competitive pay and benefits
Investment in our team with continuous learning opportunities
Balancing extraordinary work with your personal life
Flexible working hours and lots of freedom in your work habits
Embracing social responsibility with time off for community service projects
About aptihealth

aptihealth, inc. is a behavioral health engagement company that seamlessly integrates physical and behavioral healthcare. Our platform connects medical providers, behavioral health specialists and patients with our proprietary assessment and treatment management protocols to get and keep patients healthier faster. aptihealth’s structured therapy programs are centered on its proprietary 15 Life Domain Clinical Framework© that efficiently provides collaborative care teams with the most thorough understanding of a patient’s behavioral health needs. The aptihealth platform connects patients and their care teams with licensed behavioral health specialists who provide 90-day and extended care therapy by phone or video supported by an easy-to-use consumer friendly digital experience. The aptihealth program is evidenced to get individuals into therapy faster and clinically proven to improve both behavioral and medical outcomes while lowering overall cost. aptihealth’s investors include Hudson River Capital Holdings, KASA Investments and Timber IV.

At aptihealth, we don’t just accept difference—we celebrate it, we support it, and we thrive on it for the benefit of our team, products and community. aptihealth is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know by contacting us.",-1,aptihealth,"Boston, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
46,Data Scientist,$106k-$172k (Glassdoor Est.),"This is an exciting time to join Portland General Electric. As Oregon’s largest electric utility, Portland General Electric is leading an energy transformation that will harness the power of clean and renewable resources. Our vision for a clean energy future relies on three interrelated and overarching strategies: de-carbonize through investing in clean and reliable energy; modernize through a smarter more resilient grid; and empower our customers in their energy technology choices.

We’re searching for innovative, customer and results-obsessed leaders to help power our mission and lead the way in championing the world’s clean energy future!

Data Scientist

The Data Strategy & Management Team (DSM) bears critical responsibility on behalf of Portland General Electric (PGE) to create value for customers, regulators, and business operations through the collection, organization and interpretation of data from PGE’s expansive data portfolio. The mission of our team is to enable data driven decisions across the company and external stakeholders by ensuring secure, reliable and cataloged data access from our datalake and delivering insights utilizing advanced AI/ML approaches to support achieving PGE’s goal to provide energy that is safe, clean, reliable, affordable and secure.

We are looking for a Data Scientist to join our team and drive our mission together. This individual will collaborate with the business partners to answer their business questions by using advanced data analysis techniques, including pattern detection, graph analysis or statistical analysis. He/she will work closely with the Information Architect, Data Architect, Data Engineer, and Business SME’s to design and develop ML solutions utilizing various data sources, modern architecture, and state-of-the-art machine learning techniques to cater business value, quality and end-user experience. Through their work, He/she will lay foundation of best practices and framework that other scientists can follow.

The ideal candidate is proficient at manipulating and analyzing large datasets over multiple domains and skilled at using various machine learning and statistical techniques to create solutions realizing clear business values. They must be comfortable at designing programmatic solutions from ambiguity, and able to convey their idea clearly to stakeholders. They must also be experienced at productionizing ML solutions. They should be great communicators and presenters even to high-level executives. Last but not the least, they should share the same passion to make the world a great place to live by providing clean and reliable energy to people.

Key Responsibilities:
Data Collection - Participates/assists in identifying what data is available and relevant, including internal and external data sources; supports data collection, integration and retention requirements based on the input received; ensures information used follows PGE compliance, access management and control policies and meets PGE qualification and assurance requirements.
Collaborate with Stakeholders - Works with business stakeholders to identify the business requirements and expected outcomes. With business stakeholder support, models and frames meaningful and impactful business scenarios for critical business processes and/or decisions.
Analyze Data - Develops data and analytics products to improve how business is conducted and increases throughput through operational efficiencies. Employs appropriate algorithms to discover patterns; uses statistical and data mining packages and dedicated frameworks. Shares data quality findings with data stewards and partners with data stewards on data quality definition and standards; includes experimental design approaches to validate findings by comparing appropriate samples. Develops approaches for validation.
Educate - Educates the Data Strategy & Operations Management organization on new approaches, such as testing hypotheses and statistical validation of results. Follows best practices and guidelines for data science initiatives. Tracks metrics for measuring the value of data science initiatives.
Education &Experience
Requires a bachelor’s degree in computer science, electrical engineering, economics or other related field or equivalent experience. MSc or PhD in mathematics, statistics or computer science or related field, such as physics, economics or operations research preferred.
Typically, five or more years in data science or related field; prototyping and implementation experience preferred. Utility background is desired.
Intermediate programming skills, including experience with Hadoop MapReduce or other big data frameworks, Java, Python, statistical modeling, SQL and text mining or machine learning.
3 years of experience in data or statistical analysis, with mathematical and causal modeling skills.
5+ years using R or Python to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
Knowledge, Skills & Abilities:
Strong communication and interpersonal skills. The ability to communicate with the business to understand requirements and present back findings and recommendations by demonstrating the potential value to the organization.
Self-starter. The ability to come up with solutions to loosely defined business problems by leveraging pattern detection over potentially large datasets. He/she is expected to define the problem space based on industry or technological threats.
Extensive background in data mining and statistical analysis.
Excellent pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills.
Demonstrated implementation experience in different areas of machine learning: Supervised machine learning, Unsupervised machine learning, Time series forecast, Geo-spatial deep learning, Image recognition, Natural language processing, Outlier detection, Recommendation engines, Survival analysis, and Reinforcement learning.
Demonstrated experience in working with structured, unstructured, streaming data.
Demonstrated experience in setting up ML solutions in API’s.
Familiar with Git, Docker, and container management technologies; Familiar with Apache Spark to create and maintain distributed data processing pipelines
Demonstrated implementation experience in one of the following visualization tools: R-Shiny, Dash, Tableau, PowerBI, AWS QuickSight
Advanced business acumen and interpersonal skills; able to work across business lines at senior levels to influence and effect change to achieve common goals. Knowledge of Transmission and Distribution OR Customer OR Power Supply is required.
Substantial data literacy — the ability to describe data sources and management concepts, and analytical approaches/options. The ability to translate among the languages used by executive, business, IT and quant stakeholders.
Mastery in oral and written communication skills, including the ability to explain data concepts and technologies to business leaders, as well as business concepts to technologists.
Proven record of effective leadership, including the ability to balance team and individual responsibilities; building consensus; getting things done through others not directly under his/her supervision; working ethically and with integrity.
Join us today and power your potential!

To be considered for this position, please complete the following employment application by the posting close date. A cover letter may be needed with your application to be considered for this position.

PGE believes in rewarding strong performance. We provide a total compensation package that is designed to reward your contributions to the company, and, at the same time, support your well-being and professional development, both now and into the future.

PGE is committed to diversity and inclusion in the workplace and is an equal opportunity employer. PGE will not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment based on race, color, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, religion, disability, protected veteran status, or other characteristics protected by law.

Assisting with storms or other Company emergencies is a part of all positions at Portland General Electric.
Talent Acquisition Contact:
Staffing@pgn.com

This job posting will close at 12:01 am Pacific Time on the closing date listed below:",3.7,"Portland General Electric
3.7","Portland, OR",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1889,Company - Public,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
47,Lead Data Scientist / Engineer,-1,"Lead Data Scientist / Engineer - Aliso Viejo, CA*
AWM Smart Shelf is reinventing retail and looking for smart, talented people to help build on our current and future data and analytics platforms, pipelines, and machine learning models. Our solutions encompass a wide range of data such as:
Real-time computer vision and deep learning that enables an understanding of what shoppers and workers are doing (e.g. movement, actions, product selection, etc.)
AWM Frictionless™ Shopping (cashierless checkout)
Demographic data captured via anonymous facial analysis
Ads/video playback and effectiveness
Product placement and pricing
The ideal candidate will have the ability to use modern techniques to: *
Understand and interpret data, reaching meaningful conclusions based on solid premises
Predict optimizations both in real time and via big data processing
Handle large and rapidly growing data sets
Job Duties: *
Contributing to the development and maintenance of data pipelines as well as creation of new ones based on AI/computer vision and other data sources
Validation of AI models and big data analysis
Performing ad-hoc analysis on proprietary datasets for internal and external stakeholders
Annotating proprietary datasets and giving direction to data labelers
Performing exploratory analysis on data to find trends
Training and evaluating various machine learning models
Required Skills: *
SQL
Strong problem-solving / analytical skills
Undergraduate or higher degree in data science, statistics, computer science, or other relevant areas
Practical big data experience
Machine learning
Solid understanding of statistics
Dataset cleaning
Python
Git, or other version control framework
Skills Which Are A Plus But Not Required: *
Azure tools such as Data Factory, Databricks, and Synapse Analytics
Understanding of time series/sequence analysis
Power BI (preferred), Tableau, or other dashboarding software
Understanding of, or experience with, retail data and environments
Experience distilling and communicating insights to people that aren’t data scientists in a way that can be readily understood
Understanding of agile development processes
What We Offer: *
Paid vacation and sick time
Health benefits
A dynamic and engaging environment where you can make an impact using the latest technologies
Opportunity for growth
401k plan
Potential for employee stock option plan participation
About Adroit Worldwide Media, Inc. (AWM Smart Shelf): *
AWM Smart Shelf is an exciting tech company located in Orange County, CA and serving the retail industry globally. Our flagship offering is a cashierless checkout solution called AWM Frictionless™ which uses A.I. and computer vision to understand which products shoppers have taken from the shelf and eliminates the need to wait in a check out line or to scan products. The solution also enables a wide range of advanced data and reporting surrounding shopper activity.

Another of our key offerings is an in-store digital retail platform which utilizes unique edge-to-edge LED shelf displays paired with advanced software to replicate many benefits of the online shopping experience in-store. The platform is able to perform shopper proximity and 3D path analysis with content triggering, anonymous demographics, inventory measurement, and more. Our clients include a number of Fortune 500 companies, and we have deployments in North America, Europe, Asia, and the Middle East.
Please visit www.smartshelf.com to learn more and watch videos of our solutions.*
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $130,000.00 - $160,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Most employees are remote at the present time due to COVID and limited time in the office will be required, but eventually this position will be full time in the office.

Experience:
solid data science / engineering: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Aliso Viejo, CA 92656 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
Do you require visa sponsorship?
Additional Compensation:
Other forms
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.smartshelf.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,"AWM Smart Shelf (Adroit Worldwide Media, Inc.)","Aliso Viejo, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
48,Scientist II DP Development,$69k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"Akebia is seeking a motivated and talented scientist to join the Drug Product Development team of the Pharmaceutical Development – CMC department. The Scientist II role will support drug product formulation and manufacturing process development for projects ranging from pre-clinical to late stage clinical development. The qualified candidate must have experience and/or knowledge in oral solid dose preformulation, formulation development and/or process development.

Required Skills
Support formulation and process development activities at external laboratories
Manage GMP production campaigns at contract development and manufacturing organizations
Assist with the design and execution of pre-clinical and clinical formulation development studies for solid/liquid oral dosage products
Author, review and data verify drug product technical development reports, manufacturing/packaging batch records and other development-related documents
Participate in drug product-related regulatory filings and investigations
Collaborate with CMC and partner function lines, including discovery, drug substance development, analytical development, technical operations, supply chain, project/program management, quality and regulatory to achieve project deliverables and timelines
Travel and visit external sites to monitor and contribute to development activities
Required Experience
BS 6+ years of experience, MS 3+ years of experience or PhD 1+ years of experience in pharmaceutical dosage form development
Experience in phase-appropriate oral solid dose formulation development and manufacturing process development
Experience in conducting and managing drug product activities at CDMOs
Strong organizational, interpersonal, written and verbal communication skills
Solid fundamental understanding of biopharmaceutical and physicochemical properties relevant to formulation design and development
Candidate should be self-motivated, eager to contribute and willing to work collaboratively with team
Domestic and international travel (20-30%) is required for this position

Akebia Therapeutics, Inc. is a fully integrated biopharmaceutical company focused on the development and commercialization of therapeutics for people with kidney disease. The company was founded in 2007 and is headquartered in Cambridge, Massachusetts. For more information, please visit our website at www.akebia.com.

Akebia Therapeutics is an equal opportunity employer and welcomes all job applicants. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, disability, or any other factors prohibited by law.

Agency and Third Party Recruiter Notice:

Agencies that submit a resume to Akebia for any position posted on our career page must have a current Akebia agency agreement executed by a member of the Human Resource Department. In addition, agencies may only submit candidates to positions for which they have been invited to do so by an Akebia Recruiter. All resumes submitted outside of these terms will not be considered.

Job Location
Cambridge, US-MA",4.4,"Akebia Therapeutics
4.4","Cambridge, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2007,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
49,Data Scientist,-1,"The Data Scientist will participate in the development and deployment of PeopleReadys machine learning solutions. She/he will develop machine learning solutions as part of a collaborative agile team, contributing not only quality code, pipeline architecture, and ideas, but also helping grow the PeopleReady Technology culture: a group of people who deliver top-notch software solutions and enjoy working together to solve exciting problems. The role will require excellent data science, machine learning engineering, and AWS architecture skills, as well as a high level of verbal and written communication.

Duties & Responsibilities:
Self-driven member of the data science team using the Agile Scrum process to successfully deliver machine learning solutions which will delight PeopleReadys associates, customers, and/or internal stakeholders.
Write high quality code in Python to deliver critical data science functionality.
Work collaboratively with PeopleReady machine learning engineers, data engineers, DBAs, and business stakeholders.
Passionately engage in an automation culture throughout delivery: testing, deployment, configuration.
Participate in user story estimation and grooming sessions, driving to delivery predictability and reliability.
Cooperate with data scientists and the lead machine learning engineer to ensure that your work follows PeopleReady Technology standards.
Participate in regular peer code reviews with other team members as well as full-team development showcases.
Requirements:
Experience with Python, object-oriented programming, and test-driven development
Experience using Jupyter notebooks and common data science libraries, such as NumPy, Pandas, and Matplotlib
Experience using TensorFlow, PyTorch, and/or MXNet
Experience using Amazon SageMaker
Experience developing end-to-end machine learning workflows and implementing machine learning engineering best practices
Experience identifying Data science use cases based on domain knowledge of the business operations/processes
Experience with feature selection and dataset scoping for individual data science use cases by using SQL to query large relational databases, such as SQL Server, PostgreSQL, or AWS Aurora
Experience with data preprocessing and feature engineering of structured datasets
Experience using Amazon SageMakers built-in algorithms for a variety of use cases, such as linear regression, logistic regression, dimensionality reduction, anomaly detection, clustering, forecasting, and natural language processing
Strong understanding how learning rate, batch size, L1/L2 regularization, network size, and other hyperparameters affect loss functions and model performance
Experience defining, selecting and optimizing proper model accuracy metrics, such as precision, recall, F1 score, and AUC
Experience with software engineering best practices, such as modularization, optimization, unit testing, proper documentation, logging, code commits/reviews, and clean code best practices
Experience with Agile Scrum methodology
Experience using Docker and ECR to containerize machine learning models as SageMaker estimators
Experience deploying machine learning and data science models to production as serverless microservices using AWS API Gateway and AWS Lambda
Experience with real-time/batch inference and online/offline inference
Experience with SOA design patterns, microservices architectures, and REST web services
Demonstrate a portfolio of end-to-end data science based solutions
Desire to participate in building a DevOps/MLOps culture with commitment and ownership
Excellent written, verbal and interpersonal communication skills
Other Desirable Skills/Experience (Bonus):
Experience with AWS cloud-based infrastructure and services
Experience building serverless architectures using AWS Lambda
Experience with AWS AI/ML services, such as Rekognition, Transcribe, Polly, Lex, Translate, and/or Comprehend
Experience with PySpark/EMR and distributed data preprocessing
Experience with AWS Glue for serverless ETL
Experience with Amazon Kinesis Firehose
Experience with machine learning container orchestration, such as TFX/Kubeflow or ECS/EKS with Fargate
Self-sufficient and highly motivated, self-directed and possess high energy
Experience working in a virtual delivery environment
We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or any other characteristic protected by law.

#PIQJAB

Jbergman@PeopleReady.com

Internal ID: 103710",3.4,"PeopleReady
3.4",North Carolina,-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1989,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
50,Principal Data Engineer,$96k-$166k (Glassdoor Est.),"Locations: TX - Plano, United States of America, Plano, Texas

Principal Data Engineer

Do you love building and pioneering in the technology space? Do you enjoy solving complex business problems in a fast-paced, collaborative,inclusive, and iterative delivery environment? At Capital One, you'll be part of a big group of makers, breakers, doers and disruptors, who love to solve real problems and meet real customer needs.

We are seeking Data Engineers who will be a part of a team that’s building new analytical and machine learning tools and frameworks to exploit advantages in the latest developments in cloud computing. As aCapital One Data Engineer, you’ll have the opportunity to be on the forefront of driving a major transformation within Capital One. Learn more about#lifeatcapitalone and our commitment todiversity & inclusion by jumping toslides 25-40 on our Corporate Social Responsibility Report.

What You’ll Do:

Collaborate with and across Agile teams to design, develop, test, implement, and support technical solutions in full-stack development tools and technologies

Work with a team of developers with deep experience in machine learning, distributed microservices, and full stack systems

Utilize programming languages like Java, Scala, Python and Open Source RDBMS and NoSQL databases and Cloud based data warehousing services such as Snowflake

Share your passion for staying on top of tech trends, experimenting with and learning new technologies, participating in internal & external technology communities, and mentoring other members of the engineering community

Collaborate with digital product managers, and deliver robust cloud-based solutions that drive powerful experiences to help millions of Americans achieve financial empowerment

Perform unit tests and conducting reviews with other team members to make sure your code is rigorously designed, elegantly coded, and effectively tuned for performance

Basic Qualifications:

Bachelor’s Degree

At least 4 years of enterprise software engineering experience with Python

At least 2 years of enterprise experience with Big Data Technologies (Spark, Hadoop, Hive, Cassandra, Accumulo, HBaseHDFS, AVRO, MongoDB, or Zookeeper)

At least 2 years of enterprise experience with SQL

At least 2 years of enterprise experience in a public cloud environment

Preferred Qualifications:

Master's Degree

6+ years of enterprise software engineering experience with Python

4+ years of enterprise experience with Big Data Technologies (Spark, Hadoop, Hive, Cassandra, Accumulo, HBaseHDFS, AVRO, MongoDB, or Zookeeper)

4+ years of enterprise experience with SQL

2+ years of enterprise experience with Amazon Web Services (AWS)

2+ years of enterprise experience with streaming data applications (Spark Streaming, Kafka, Kinesis, or Flink)

2+ years of enterprise experience with the Hadoop stack (MapReduce, Pig, Hive and Hbase)

2+ years of enterprise experience with NoSQL implementation (Mongo and Cassandra)

2+ years of enterprise software engineering experience with Java

2+ years of enterprise experience with scripting languages (Python, Perl, JavaScript or Shell)

AWS Certification

At this time, Capital One will not sponsor a new applicant for employment authorization for this position.",4.0,"Capital One
4.0","Plano, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
51,Data Engineer I,$61k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"_Start your career in Information Technology today!_*
Getting your ﬁrst job can be difﬁcult when employers want experience, but to gain that experience, you need your ﬁrst job. This disparity is where we help. We bridge the gap between your education and professional career by helping you gain the experience and training within the Information Technology space that you need.

Specifically, Optimum Healthcare IT is leveraging University partnerships to launch an IT apprenticeship program called *Last Mile Training*. New and recent graduates will be considered for the apprenticeship program. Accepted applicants will be hired by Optimum and paid as apprentices from the start of the 12-week training program. After successful completion of the training program, apprentices will be eligible for placement on an Optimum project team or for direct placement with an Optimum client.

We are currently accepting inquiries for the following opportunity located in Jacksonville, FL:
DATA ENGINEER*
The Data Engineer will support the design and development of data workflows, ETL-like processes, SQL queries, and visualizations of various databases. They will work closely with Software Engineers and Data Scientists by providing data mapping and data sets needed for analysis and data discovery
ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS *(Other duties may be assigned).
• Develop data set processes for data modeling, data mining and production

• Employ variety of languages / tools (e.g. scripting languages) to merge data for data discovery

• Recommend ways to improve data reliability, efficiency and quality

• Aggregate and analyze various data sets to provide actionable insight, including complex SQL queries

• Develop reports, dashboards, and tools for business-users, ex. SSRS, SQL

• EDUCATION/EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS

• Bachelors Degree required

• Education or experience with quantitative work (statistics, computer science, etc.)

• 0.5-3 years of work experience (including internships)

• ""Light"" programming experience such as Python preferred

• SQL query, SSRS, Tableau experience preferred

• Understanding of how data works / looks coming from diff formats. Not only Oracle, but some variance

• Excellent communication skills (verbal and written);

• Ability to exercise tact and good interpersonal skills;

• Analytical and Time management skills;

• Self-starter, self-motivated, high level of initiative

• Result focused, ability to solve complex problems and resolve conflicts in a timely manner

• Ability to travel up to 50%

Please visit www.optimumhit.com/services/last-mile-training to learn more and submit your application for consideration.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Location:
Jacksonville, FL (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Visa Sponsorship Potentially Available:
No: Not providing sponsorship for this job
Company's website:
www.Optimumhit.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.3,"Optimum Healthcare IT
3.3","Jacksonville, FL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
52,Data Scientist,$82k-$131k (Glassdoor Est.),"Sartorius Stedim Data Analytics, a market leader in advanced analytics and provider of Umetrics Suite of Data Analytics Solutions, is on a strong growth path driving new innovative solutions in the field. It currently has an outstanding opportunity for a Data Scientist to drive customer applications, support the Sartorius sales teams and feedback customer needs into the development of new solutions. The incumbent for this key role will have a strong customer focus to help secure innovation and growth from both new and existing customers.

What you can look forward to
Assisting customers in solving business related problems using advanced data analysis and data driven technologies
Supporting implementation of advanced analytics in industry
Analyzing large amounts of data and building data driven models
Initiating, leading and driving customer projects
Training customers on the use of our software
Supporting sales (pre/post)
Supporting marketing & development
Performing regular follow up with customers to track satisfaction, secure project momentum and discover additional opportunities
Creating technical documents
Attending and presenting at conferences, seminars and forums
Developing & cultivating strong relationships with external and internal stakeholders
Being part of a team of data scientists
Skills and experience
Minimum of a bachelor's degree (master’s degree preferred) in a relevant field (engineering, life sciences, informatics, automation/control, etc.)
Minimum two years’ work experience within Biopharma or Pharma
Minimum two years’ working knowledge of applied statistics including MVDA, DOE, MSPC, PAT, QbD, Model Predictive Control (MPC), MMPC, AI/Machine learning
Strong bioprocess knowledge preferred
Familiarity with Umetrics Suite of Data Analytics Solutions preferred (MODDE, SIMCA, SIMCA-online, Control Advisor, Active Dashboard)
Working knowledge of prescriptive analytics a plus
Working knowledge of Python scripting preferred
Working knowledge of MATLAB, data historians and control strategies a plus
Teaching, consulting and project management experience a plus
Excellent communications skills, strong presentation skills
Comfortable working independently
Comfortable working from home office, willingness to travel (~25%)
Strong identification with Sartorius core values: sustainability, openness, enjoyment
Driving our future growth requires talented people. Sartorius is a dynamic organization suited to people who want to showcase skills, be recognized for expertise and thrive in a vibrant and innovative environment.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex or national origin. We are also an equal opportunity employer of individuals with disabilities and protected veterans.

Please view equal employment opportunity posters provided by OFCCP here

E-Verify Participation Info

E-Verify Workers Rights

Interested? Driving our future growth requires talented people. Sartorius is a dynamic organisation suited to people who want to showcase skills, be recognised for expertise and thrive in a vibrant and innovative environment.

To find out more about Sartorius as an employer visit us on Sartorius Careers

Become part of our global team.",3.7,"Sartorius
3.7","Fremont, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1870,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
53,Data Scientist,$95k-$151k (Glassdoor Est.),"Requisition ID: 256384
Work Area: Software-Research
Expected Travel: 0 - 10%
Career Status: Professional
Employment Type: Regular Full Time
Career Level: T2
Posting Date : 6/16/2020

COMPANY DESCRIPTION

SAP started in 1972 as a team of five colleagues with a desire to do something new. Together, they changed enterprise software and reinvented how business was done. Today, as a market leader in enterprise application software, we remain true to our roots. That’s why we engineer solutions to fuel innovation, foster equality and spread opportunity for our employees and customers across borders and cultures.
SAP values the entrepreneurial spirit, fostering creativity and building lasting relationships with our employees. We know that a diverse and inclusive workforce keeps us competitive and provides opportunities for all. We believe that together we can transform industries, grow economics, lift up societies and sustain our environment. Because it’s the best-run businesses that make the world run better and improve people’s lives.

Purpose and Objective:

SAP Labs, LLC seeks a Data Scientist at our Palo Alto, CA location to analyze customer’s business problems, use cases and forms the requirements into feasible product feature.

Expectations and Tasks:

Explore data sources, implements data exploration, pre-processing and data cleansing on the historical data. Understand data and evaluate data quality from both data science and business value perspectives. Prepare the data for future models. Develop statistical / machine learning models based on the pre-processed data as a proof-of-concept. Assess and optimize the model quality based on technical level by tuning hyper-parameters, settings or even changing the models. Integrate the statistical / machine learning models into product. Work with application developers, machine learning engineers closely to ensure the model is ported into the product based on the prototyping. Work with product managers and designers to ensure all the features are delivered. Evaluate and improve the model performance under business context. Refine the model by tuning hyper-parameter, adjusting data sources or model approaches to resolve the business problem of customer. 10% travel required.

Education and Qualifications/Skills and Competencies:

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics or a related field of study and 5 years of experience required. The company will also accept a Master's degree and 2 years of experience.

Work Experience:

Experience must involve 2 years in the following: ML and data science knowledge to define the next key features for the solution; build features architected for speed and distributed computing; Research, prototyping and development in the big data, machine learning and data science domain and machine learning frameworks. 10% travel required.

Travel:10% travel required.

Internal use only: reference code lhrs4262

EX:OUT

SAP'S DIVERSITY COMMITMENT

To harness the power of innovation, SAP invests in the development of its diverse employees. We aspire to leverage the qualities and appreciate the unique competencies that each person brings to the company.

SAP is committed to the principles of Equal Employment Opportunity and to providing reasonable accommodations to applicants with physical and/or mental disabilities. If you are interested in applying for employment with SAP and are in need of accommodation or special assistance to navigate our website or to complete your application, please send an e-mail with your request to Recruiting Operations Team (Americas: Careers.NorthAmerica@sap.com or Careers.LatinAmerica@sap.com, APJ: Careers.APJ@sap.com, EMEA: Careers@sap.com). Requests for reasonable accommodation will be considered on a case-by-case basis.

EOE AA M/F/Vet/Disability:

Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their age, race, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status or disability.

Additional Locations :",4.6,"SAP
4.6","Palo Alto, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1972,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
54,Data Scientist,$73k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Hello,
Â
Position:ÂData Scientist
Location:ÂNew Brunswick, NJ
Duration:Â6+ monthsÂ
Â
Job Responsibilities:

Â
Analyze source data and data flows, work with structured and unstructured data
Assess and analyze the data, apply AI/Machine Learning techniques and build high quality prediction model
Enhance data collection procedures to include information that is relevant for building analytic systems
Analyze and visualize diverse sources of data, interpret results in the business context and report results clearly and concisely
Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis
Manipulate high-volume, high-dimensionality data from varying sources to highlight patterns, anomalies, relationships and trends
Develop process or tool to monitor and optimize the model performance and accuracy
Communicate and present models to business customers and executive
Work collaboratively with partners across different technology and business groups
Skills and Experience Required:

Â
Experience developing sophisticated data processing workflows and analytic dashboards
Experience with Alteryx, Informatica IDQ, EDC, HomeCloud, or other data insight driven tools
Experience conducting internal customer research to understand business needs and developing descriptive briefs for new analytics/data tools products and design
Exploratory data analysis skills
Strong oral, written, and presentation skills â able to present to a variety of forums and audiences
Education:
ÂBachelor's degree in Computer Science or Engineering or equivalent work experience required",4.6,"Conch Technologies, Inc
4.6","New Brunswick, NJ",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
55,Data Scientist,$90k-$115k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Smule mission is to connect people all over the world through the joy of making music at massive social scale. Music is much more than just listening… it's about creating, sharing, discovering, participating, and connecting with people. It is a social network with the power to break down barriers, touch souls and bring people together from all over the world.

At Smule, your work will directly impact the product experience of millions of users. You will work collaboratively alongside a team of talented data scientists on cutting-edge projects that have high visibility. You will leverage our datasets that contain demographic, transactional, behavioral, social, text, and audio and video data. We offer a stable, collaborative, and a supportive work environment with a constant stream of new things to learn.

If you have a passion for quality data science and software engineering practices, and enjoy working in a fast-paced, iterative, and a highly rewarding development environment, then Smule is the place for you!

Responsibilities:
Build, validate, and deploy machine learning models and recommender systems in batch and real time pipeline
Have a customer first approach with a focus on improving user experience by optimizing functional and non-functional parameters such as performance, accessibility, and security.
Write technical specifications, document design approach and all findings, and share with the team
Show thought leadership and effectively incorporate machine learning into product features
Be a high-performing team player who enjoys collaborating with, learning from, and mentoring other team members to create a positive work environment.
Automate data cleaning, transformations, feature engineering, governance, and analysis.
Communicate findings clearly and succinctly to technical and non-technical audience.
Requirements
4+ years experience in a data scientist role with a proven track record of deploying machine learning models to production
Strong programming skills in Python and Scala and distributed technologies such as Spark, Kafka, and Hadoop
Ability to use machine learning frameworks such as scikit-learn, SparkML, or Tensorflow, and tools such as notebooks (Jupyter, Zepellin).
Experience with NoSQL and SQL databases, such as Cassandra and Snowflake, respectively.
Experience in building and deploying machine learning recommender systems a plus
MS/PhD in computer science, mathematics, statistics, or related fields, or equivalent industry experience.
There's one more, very important thing. We are an equal opportunity employer. We search for amazing people of diverse backgrounds, experiences, abilities, and perspectives. We take care of each other to create an inclusive work environment where we love to come to work every day.",4.0,"Smule
4.0","San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
56,"Scientist, Research",$61k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description

JDRF is the leading global organization focused on type 1 diabetes (T1D) research. Through research, advocacy, partnerships and outreach, JDRF is racing to find cures for tomorrow while striving to improve the lives of those with T1D today. JDRF positions its scientific resources, policy influence and strategic working plan to bring life-changing breakthroughs from therapeutic concepts to the community. As the largest charitable supporter of T1D research, JDRF has invested nearly $2B in research and is funding scientific research and clinical trials in 17 countries worldwide. For more information, please visit http://www.jdrf.org.

Job Description

JDRF will be hiring multiple scientists to manage diverse aspects of our research portfolio. You will be part of a highly interconnected and fast-moving team that is responsible for setting and driving the global research agenda for type 1 diabetes.

These research scientists will be responsible for building and actively managing a research portfolio of grants. The candidates will serve as internal experts in their specialty areas and function as a knowledge resource internally and externally. Due diligence and landscape analyses activities are a requisite part of this active portfolio management. Our mission is highly translationally focused on type 1 diabetes so the candidate should have a strong interest in public health and understand the basic concepts of product development and translational research.

The candidates will be expected to have excellent interpersonal and communication skills to interact effectively with all stakeholders – internal and external scientists, board members, senior management, JDRF supporters, etc. The qualified individual will directly contribute to the implementation, oversight, and advancement of research projects and activities in several programs.

These scientist positions will report to Associate Directors and above, and will participate in all aspects of the JDRF research program including providing scientific input to accelerate the progress of therapeutic areas, contributing to future research strategies aligned with JDRF’s mission, and leveraging opportunities and optimizing relationships within the US and international diabetes research communities.

SPECIFIC RESPONSIBILITIES:

· Strategy and Planning

o Contribute to the regular assessment, review, and presentation of the status of the research portfolio to the Board of Directors and external scientific advisors.

o Work closely with the program administrators to plan, track, and execute on the research budget.

o Contribute expertise to strategic planning efforts across multiple project areas.

o Perform ongoing landscape analyses in areas of relevance to the research department’s therapeutic goals both inside and outside of your area of expertise.

· Review and Oversight

o Development of new research opportunities with internal and external stakeholders (academic scientists, industry partners, etc.)

o Management of external peer review of funding opportunities.

o Active management of ongoing funding opportunities towards early go/no go decisions.

o Opportunity to participate in scouting, securing, and managing research partnerships with companies, other non-profits, governmental agencies, etc.

· Communication

o Generation and presentation of summary documents to lay and/or expert stakeholders.

o Generation of content for public media outlets in collaboration with internal Marketing and Communications team.

o Presentation of JDRF Research and priorities and special topics to both lay and expert audiences.

Qualifications
Ph.D. in biomedical sciences - pharmacology, physiology, cell biology, nutrition/metabolism, public health, biochemistry - or similar field required.
Post-doctoral experience (1-2 years) in disease focused or product development areas desired but not required
Working expertise in one of the following areas is highly desirable:
Experience in the mechanisms of human disease, especially autoimmune disease
Medicinal chemistry, pharmacology, early stage product development
Knowledge of T1D clinical trials and T1D outcomes
Data science/analytics, big data warehousing
Public Health, epidemiology
Psychosocial and quality-of-life aspects of disease, including behavioral health interventions, mental health, patient reported outcomes
· Ability to create, operate and innovate within highly connected team environments with high level of independence

· Ability to handle multiple tasks and meet deadlines demonstrated by strong organizational skills and a detail-oriented nature. Establish priorities in fast-paced environment. Must be a fast learner.

· Exceptional collaboration and relationship-building skills. Ability to interface with stakeholders of highly diverse backgrounds such as all staff and volunteers. Must develop, maintain, and cultivate relationships.
Demonstrate creativity and ability to think strategically regarding scientific and technical opportunities or roadblocks and to conceive and execute on projects
Ability for and interest in developing expertise in new scientific areas
Excellent written and oral communication skills.
Additional Information

All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.

#LI remote",3.0,"JDRF International
3.0","New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1970,Nonprofit Organization,Health Fundraising Organizations,Non-Profit,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
57,Data Scientist,$86k-$107k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Brief

The ideal candidate will have previous Data Modeling experience. Strong preference will be given to candidates with an actuarial background in the property and casualty insurance space.

Overview

IFG Companies is in search of a Data Scientist to join its growing Predictive Modeling team.

The ideal candidate will have previous Data Modeling experience. Strong preference will be given to candidates with an actuarial background in the property and casualty insurance space.

Responsibilities
Build predictive and/or Machine Learning models in SAS
Research new statistical and mathematical techniques that are suitable and helpful for solving business related problems
Prepare data for modelling and make best/creative use of applicable and available internal or external data
Identifying and integrating new datasets that can be leveraged for modeling efforts
Support related processes around effectively deploying model to business
Effectively communicate results in written, oral and presentation formats to technical and non-technical audiences
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in statistics, applied mathematics, or related discipline
3+ years of Data Modeling or similar experience.
Experience with predictive modeling (classification, regression, parameter tuning, optimization criteria, feature selection), preferably with multiple techniques
Experience in model validation techniques, model testing and continuous monitoring of model performance
Experience in Property & Casualty Insurance is strongly preferred.
Demonstrated experience working with large relational data sets.
Working knowledge in SAS, R, Python or another platform to develop and implement predictive models.
Ability and willingness to quickly gain knowledge of SAS enterprise guide and enterprise miner.
Ability to communicate complex technical information in common language to foster teaching and analytics guidance to internal customers.
Advanced experience in analytics, data cleaning, and predictive modeling.
Ability to write queries in SQL.
Detail-oriented and ability to work collaboratively
Physical Demands
Physical demands are considered to be that of an office environment, climate controlled, with minimal physical exertion. This position requires prolonged sitting, ability to utilize a computer and interactions with others in meetings or via phone.
Benefits
We offer a competitive compensation and benefits package including medical, dental, vision, 401(k), flexible spending, short-term and long-term disability insurance, life insurance, long-term care, education assistance and paid time off.
IFG Companies is an equal opportunity employer committed to a diverse workforce. M/F/D/V",2.7,"IFG Companies
2.7","Hartford, CT",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1985,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
58,Data Scientist II (Remote Work Location Available),$68k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"Purpose of Job
We are currently seeking a talented Data Scientist II for San Antonio Home Office II/III or Remote Work Location Available.

This role is designated for a Data Scientist who has proficient knowledge with applying modern advanced analytics methods (predictive modeling, Machine Learning, and optimization), as well as a solid grasp of the mathematics used for each method and strong Python coding skills to develop numerical models. The Data Scientist is expected to demonstrate the ability to effectively communicate (written and oral) complex analytical and technical concepts to both technical and non-technical employees. The Data Scientist for this role is expected to have experience working with time series/forecasting models.

Within defined guidelines and framework, uses techniques that integrate traditional and non-traditional datasets and method to enable analytical solutions. Applies predictive analytics, machine learning, simulation, and optimization techniques to generate management insights and enable customer-facing applications; participates in building analytical solutions leveraging internal and external applications to deliver value and create competitive advantage. Translates complex analytical and technical concepts to non-technical employees.
Job Requirements
Identifies and manages existing and emerging risks that stem from business activities and the job role.
Ensures risks associated with business activities are effectively identified, measured, monitored, and controlled.
Follows written risk and compliance policies and procedures for business activities.
In partnership with SMEs, learns to define the business problem and works with experienced data scientists to select the appropriate model.
Extracts features from structured and unstructured data (internal and external).
With guidance, conducts advanced analytics: predictive modeling, Machine Learning, and optimization.
Works with Data Engineering/IT partners to develop architectures for new products, services and features.
Explains complex models and outcomes to colleagues who are not data scientists.
Minimum Education:
Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Quantitative Economics, Statistics, or related field or 4 additional years of related experience beyond the minimum required may be substituted in lieu of a degree.
Minimum Experience:
2 years of related experience and accountability for complex tasks and/or projects.
Proficient knowledge of the function/discipline and demonstrated application of knowledge, skills and abilities towards work products.
Proficient level of business acumen in the areas of the business operations, industry practices and emerging trends.
Strong coding skills in the dominant scripting language (such as Python).
Deep academic understanding of model assumptions. Solid grasp of statistics and mathematics.
Proficient knowledge of Data Science principals and experience with data science methodologies.
*Qualifications may warrant placement in a different job level*

When you apply for this position, you will be required to answer some initial questions. This will take approximately 5 minutes. Once you begin the questions you will not be able to finish them at a later time and you will not able to change your responses.

Preferred Experience:
Proficient knowledge with applying modern advanced analytics methods (predictive modeling, Machine Learning, and optimization).
Experience with Time Series/Forecasting Modeling.
Solid grasp of mathematics, with a strong foundation in calculus, linear algebra, probability, and statistics.
Strong Python coding skills to develop numerical models.
Demonstrated ability to effectively communicate (written and oral) complex analytical and technical concepts to both technical and non-technical employees.
The above description reflects the details considered necessary to describe the principal functions of the job and should not be construed as a detailed description of all the work requirements that may be performed in the job.

At USAA our employees enjoy one of the best benefits package in the business, including a flexible business casual or casual dress environment, comprehensive medical, dental and vision plans, along with wellness and wealth building programs. Additionally, our career path planning and continuing education will assist you with your professional goals.

USAA also offers a variety of on-site services and conveniences to help you manage your work and personal life, including seven cafeterias, two company stores and three fitness centers.

Relocation assistance is not available for this position.

For Internal Candidates:

Must complete 12 months in current position (from date of hire or date of placement), or must have managers approval prior to posting.

Last day for internal candidates to apply to the opening is 11/03/20 by 11:59 pm CST time.",3.7,"USAA
3.7","San Antonio, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1922,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
59,Data Scientist Intern (Summer 2021),$112k-$178k (Glassdoor Est.),"C3.ai is a leading enterprise AI software provider for accelerating digital transformation. The comprehensive and proven C3 AI Suite uses a model-driven abstraction layer to enable organizations to develop, deploy, and operate enterprise scale AI applications 40x to 100x faster than alternative approaches. www.c3.ai

We are looking for Data Science interns to join us during our Summer 2021 Internship Program. As a Data Science Intern, you will participate in the definition of new analytics capabilities able to provide our customers with the information they need to make proper decisions to support our customers in operating the internet of things (IoT). In addition, you will help find the appropriate machine learning / data mining algorithms to answer these questions. Finally, you will be responsible for implementing this into the product and making it available to our customers.

Qualified candidates will have an in-depth knowledge of most common machine learning techniques and their application. You will also understand the limitations of these algorithms and how to tweak them or derive from them to achieve similar results at large-scale.

Your Responsibilities:
Driving adoption of Deep Learning models into next-generation of C3.ai products.
Designing and deploying Machine Learning algorithms for industrial applications such as fraud detection and predictive maintenance.
Collaborating with data and subject matter experts from C3.ai and its customer teams to seek, understand, validate, interpret, and correctly use new data elements.
Requirements:
Pursuing a MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, or equivalent fields.
Applied Machine Learning experience (regression and classification, supervised and unsupervised learning).
Strong mathematical background (linear algebra, calculus, probability and statistics).
Experience with scalable ML (MapReduce, streaming).
Ability to drive a project and work both independently and in a team.
Smart, motivated, can do attitude, and seeks to make a difference.
Excellent verbal and written communication.
Preferred
Experience with JavaScript and prototyping languages such as Python and R. Experience with Java and Scala is a plus.
A portfolio of projects (GitHub, papers, etc.) is a plus.
C3.ai provides interns a competitive compensation package. At the office, we offer a fully stocked kitchen with catered breakfast and lunch, table tennis and pool table, free membership at our on-site gym, Friday evening social hours with food, drink and music and a fun team of great people.

C3.ai is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of any legally protected characteristics, including disabled and veteran status.",4.5,"C3.ai
4.5","Redwood City, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
60,Data Scientist,-1,"About Nautilus.

Nautilus is building artificial intelligence to advance the efficiency of ocean commerce. We deliver technology to help shipping companies minimize fuel consumption, maximize operational efficiency, and optimize fleet performance. By arming ship owners and operators with real-time predictive decision support, Nautilus is reducing greenhouse gas emissions and making global trade sustainable.

Ocean shipping consumes over $100 billion dollars of fuel every year, and up to 30% of it can be saved. For owner-operators, reliance on manually collected and analyzed data makes it difficult to optimize fleet performance in real-time. By providing a unified data platform that leverages machine learning, Nautilus helps its clients make better decisions to maximize the return on each ship and every voyage. For our clients, this means they drive closer collaboration, greater transparency, and stronger accountability across their global teams every day.

About you.

Nautilus Labs is looking for a data scientist to join our team. You are inquisitive and enjoy exploring new research questions, and are capable of working largely independently. You have a background in data science, physics, naval architecture, mechanical engineering, or other related quantitative field. You have experience conducting technical investigations with real-world data, and are able to collaborate with and communicate findings clearly with colleagues across the organization. Experience with outlier detection, regression modeling, and optimization methods is preferred. Interest in and knowledge of Bayesian methods for data analysis and modeling is a plus, as is familiarity with maritime, oceanographic, and meteorological data.

Outcomes for this role.

In this role, you will be responsible for conducting analysis of maritime ship and weather data to detect trends and develop predictive models. You will work closely with other data scientists, data analysts, and software engineers to build, test, and deploy robust ship performance models. You will partner with our product team to help conceptualize, design, and implement new machine learning-based products. While we are a collaborative team, you will also be expected to take independent ownership of specific research projects. Your research and data analysis will help drive decision-making and product development throughout the Nautilus team.

Proficiencies.
3-5 years of professional experience with a background in data science, physics, naval architecture, mechanical engineering, or other related quantitative field.
Strong analytical skills and knowledge of the technical and statistical underpinning of typical data science methods.
Working knowledge of the Python data science stack is required; SQL, R or other data analysis languages are also valuable.
Experience conducting technical investigations with real-world data.
Collaborative with strong communication skills.
Experience with outlier detection, regression modeling, and optimization methods is preferred.
Interest in and knowledge of Bayesian methods for data analysis and modeling is a plus, as is familiarity with maritime, oceanographic, and meteorological data.

Our core values.

Get ready to join a group of diverse, smart, talented, and driven individuals. We are looking for people who are motivated by environmentalism and a future where shipping is sustainable and safe. A team member joining Nautilus is...

We’re THOUGHTFUL, with a bias towards action.
We’re an INCLUSIVE crew, and we are not passengers along for the ride.
We’re DIRECT and we ask the tough questions.
We EMPATHIZE with humanity.

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",3.5,"Nautilus Labs
3.5","New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Shipping,Transportation & Logistics,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
61,Data Scientist,$92k-$148k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job: Engineering
Primary Location: United States-Georgia-Norcross-US-GA-Norcross
Schedule: Full-time
Requisition ID: 202095

Description

Joining Intuitive Surgical means joining a team dedicated to using technology to benefit patients by improving surgical efficacy and
decreasing surgical invasiveness, with patient safety as our highest priority.

Company Description:

Intuitive Surgical designs and manufactures state-of-the-art robot-assisted systems for use in minimally-invasive surgery. Joining Intuitive Surgical means joining a team dedicated to using technology to benefit patients by improving surgical efficacy and decreasing surgical invasiveness, with patient safety as our highest priority.

Primary Function of Position:

Contribute broadly to the Advanced Product Development team, responsible for machine learning, advanced analytics, and new technology development focused on surgical workflow and performance for next generation robotic surgery platforms.

The successful candidate must excel in a high-energy, focused, small-team environment, be able to initiate and drive new research and development directions. A strong sense of shared responsibility and shared reward is required.

As part of the Advanced Product Development team, immediate responsibilities include:
Exploration and development of advanced models for spatiotemporal analysis, including multiclass classification, clustering, and sequence labeling.
Development of new technologies and digital products to improve surgeon and team performance and efficiency on robotic surgery platforms.
Support clinical and academic collaborations in related fields.
Additional responsibilities include:
Contributing to multiple areas of research, including but not limited to the following:
Characterizing surgeon and team behavior and workflow to optimize new technologies
Fully integrating advanced analytics into core digital products and intelligent systems
Conducting user studies to evaluate digital product concepts
Establishing strong academic collaborations across research disciplines
Presenting research at international conferences and publishing research in top academic journals

Qualifications

Skill/Job Requirements:

Competency Requirements: (Competency is based on: education, training, skills and experience).
In order to adequately perform the responsibilities of this position the individual must have:
Doctoral degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, or Neuroscience, or Master's degree with minimum (5) years industry experience developing machine learning applications
Demonstrate excellent communication skills both written and verbal
Interested in early research and development through to product roll-out
Solid understanding of statistics and machine learning algorithms and techniques is required
Experience with signal processing, time series analysis, and domain-specific feature engineering using real-world data is required
Experience with Python and/or R is required
Hands-on experience with data science and machine learning frameworks such as scikit-learn is required
Hands-on experience with SVMs, CRFs, HMMs, decision trees, dynamic time warping, and CNNs is required
Experience with cloud compute environments such as AWS is ideal
Experience with SQL is ideal
Experience with C/C++ is ideal
Experience with clinical studies is a plus
Ability to travel domestically and internationally (10%)

We are an AA/EEO/Veterans/Disabled employer.
We will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records in accordance with fair chance laws.",4.6,"Intuitive Surgical
4.6","Norcross, GA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1995,Company - Public,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
62,Data Scientist,$88k-$146k (Glassdoor Est.),"In today’s rapidly evolving technology landscape, an organization’s data has never been a more important aspect in achieving mission and business goals. Our data exploitation experts work with our clients to support their mission and business goals by creating and executing a comprehensive data strategy using the best technology and techniques given the challenge.
At Steampunk, our goal is to build and execute a data strategy for our clients to coordinate data collection and generation, to align the organization and its data assets in support of the mission, and ultimately to realize mission goals with the strongest effectiveness possible.
For our clients, data is a strategic asset. For the our client, they are looking to become a facts-based, data-driven, customer-focused organization. To help realize this goal, they are leveraging visual analytics platforms to analyze, visualize, and share information. At steampunk you will design and develop on a next-generation Visual Analytics and Collaboration suite.

We are looking for seasoned Data Scientist to work with our existing team of Data Architects and Developers to develop Strategies and then deliver results. We are looking for a more than just a ""Data Scientist"", but a technologist with excellent communication and customer service skills and a passion for data.
• Experience modeling on structured and unstructured data sets
• Experience with exploratory data analysis
• Experience in feature engineering
• Experience in data visualization
• Experience with Deep Learning approaches
• Knowledge of DevSecOps as it applies to data science
• Knowledge of data collection methods, capabilities, and tasking process
• Ability to leverage multiple data management tools to organize relevant information and make decisions
• Support an Agile software development lifecycle

Requirements:
• US Citizen Only
• Ability to hold a position of public trust with the US government.
• Strong programming skills in SQL, Python, R, or Java
• Experience with TensorFlow, Keras, or other Deep Learning tools
• Experience in big data systems including Hadoop, Spark, Scala
• Data visualization skills in Tableau, Power BI, D3, ArcGIS
• Experience with Git, Bash, Unix commands
• Experience in Cloud analytics (AWS or Azure) with tools such as AWS SageMaker, Azure HDInsight, etc.
• Experience using Python to manipulate large data sets
• Knowledge of data governance tools such as Talend

Steampunk is a Change Agent in the Federal contracting industry, bringing new thinking to clients in the Homeland, Federal Civilian, Health and DoD sectors. Through our Human-Centered delivery methodology, we are fundamentally changing the expectations our Federal clients have for true shared accountability in solving their toughest mission challenges. As an employee owned company, we focus on investing in our employees to enable them to do the greatest work of their careers – and rewarding them for outstanding contributions to our growth. If you want to learn more about our story, visit http://www.steampunk.com.
We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Steampunk participates in the E-Verify program.",4.3,"steampunk
4.3","McLean, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2003,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
63,Application Scientist -- Formulas,$50k-$82k (Glassdoor Est.),"Role Summary:

As an Application Scientist, you will be responsible for developing and validating new product testing procedures and processes for the Cleaning Formulas Division, refining or modifying existing testing and understanding and establishing industry standards to support new formula development and performance. This team member will also provide technical support to increase the sales of the existing and new product lines through delivering current and compelling technical information to increase the relevancy of these products in the market place.

Essential Responsibilities:
Serve as an application expert working collaboratively to drive the product line development strategy, based on market needs and technical capabilities
Planning and generation of applications data and protocols to support current products and new product development including analysis of competitive products
Design and execute experiments aimed at developing applications for specific end user needs
Coordinate chemical and physical property studies at external labs to generate data needed for global products and registrations
Engage in continuous learning and skill development, including both scientific and laboratory technology education
Serves as a resource and develop technical information for product development on product concepts, labeling claims and other work streams that will ensure a successful launch of the product
Prepare technical reports and other promotional materials to highlight the benefits of cleaning formulas and functional chemicals
Interface with other departments such as Engineering, Manufacturing, Supply Chain, Sales, Marketing and Sourcing
Communicate effectively within a multi-functional team and build strong partnerships both internally and externally
Guide and mentor junior team member's activities as assigned
Qualifications/Requirements:
2-5 years' of professional experience (or advanced degree)
Preferred area of study: Chemistry
Related industry experience preferably in Formulations / Cleaning Industry
Experience with product development from bench to commercialization
Exceptional in independent analytical assessment, problem solving and decision making
Experience with procedures, concepts and principles within product development, formulations, cleaning chemistry, and design of experiments
Good business judgment and ability to align scientific goals with business objectives
Must be adaptable with ability and willingness to independently manage multiple priorities and business demands that continuously shift in a dynamic, fast-paced environment.
Must be hands on with continuous drive for development, improvement and success, in both the product category and personal growth
Strong interpersonal skills with relationship building acumen. Able to work effectively in a highly cross-functional team and with internal and external resources
Strong written and verbal communication skills including effective presentation skills, one-on-one communication, and report writing
Ability and willingness to travel domestically and internationally
Disclaimer

The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work performed by employees assigned to this position. This document is subject to change at any time and is not intended to be exhaustive of all duties, responsibilities, and skills required by employees with this position title. The physical requirements described on the supplemental Occupational Worksheet are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of the job. Reasonable accommodations may be made upon request.

#LI-CC1

Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",3.3,"TTI Floor Care North America Inc.
3.3","Charlotte, NC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2007,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
64,Data Scientist,$88k-$119k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Jabil, we empower the brands who empower the world – it’s our reason for being and the guiding force that’s driving us to become the most technologically advanced manufacturing solutions provider on the planet. Whether we’re serving one of the world’s biggest and best known brands or the coolest tech startups, our resolve never wavers. We share common desires with these brands: to make the world a better, safer and cleaner place.

JOB QUALIFICATIONS
KNOWLEDGE REQUIREMENTS

● Advanced Statistics, operations research/ management, mathematics or business analytics with experience, courses, or project work in an analytic methods such as linear, mixed linear, constraint programming, modeling, simulation, time series analysis, pattern recognition, queuing theory, multivariate analysis, and other various predictive analytics techniques

● Strong written and verbal communication skills and the ability to work effectively in teams and under pressure. Multi-lingual capability is a plus.

● Ability to draw conclusions from data and prescribe actionable and measurable activities.

● Highly motivated and creative, thinking “out of the box”.

● Familiarity with non-relational data frameworks (aka NoSQL, eg. Hive).

● Experience with Apache Pig, Spark systems.

● Strong team mentality, interpersonal and communications skills

● Preferred working directly with management and executives

Jabil, including its subsidiaries, is an equal opportunity employer and considers qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identify, age, disability, genetic information, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",3.7,"Jabil
3.7","San Jose, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1966,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
65,Data Scientist,$112k-$133k (Glassdoor Est.),"Entefy’s Senior Data Scientist is a highly visible position both internally and externally. Join the intelligence revolution, where we can push the state-of-the-art boundaries of data science. This is where deep experience and multi-dimensional insights intersect with an amazing opportunity to shape the future of productivity for people everywhere.

Skills and Experience:

We’re not looking for “good.” Entefy is on a mission to find exceptional talent. The success of our mission depends on our team’s ability to be creatively analytical, insatiably curious, and absolutely fearless in tackling big challenges.
Requirements
Master's degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, or a compatible field. PhD is preferred.
3+ years of applicable work experience.
Demonstrable proficiency in Python, Scala, SQL, or R.
Strong data visualization and reporting skills.
Proven track record delivering high-value, advanced analytics.
Experience leading the work of other data scientists or analysts is preferred.
World-class ability to extract and communicate insights from real-world datasets.
Startup agility and versatility.
Visit www.entefy.com and www.blog.entefy.com.",4.3,"Entefy
4.3","Palo Alto, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
66,Data Scientist,-1,"We make small businesses more successful through better banking.

Our company is looking for a Data Scientist to join our growing team as we enter a new phase of expansion We are San Francisco and Toronto-based, venture-backed startup at the heart of the FinTech movement that is shaping the way financial services are delivered.

Our product

NorthOne is a mobile, tech-powered bank account built for startups, freelancers, and small/medium-sized businesses (SMBs). Poor financial literacy has an outsized impact on the costs and failure rates amongst SMBs, and we are on a mission to eliminate these problems. We are more than a banking platform, we are the world-class Finance Department that SMBs could never afford.

Our team

We data. As a Data Scientist you'll work with our world-class Data, Engineer, Growth and Product teams. Our COO has helped build digital products used by companies like Frank And Oak, Supercell, MachineZone, BMO, and Trivago. Oh, and our CEO? 6 years at McKinsey working on digital customer experience in financial services. We're building a product that solves real pain, vs the imagined kind. Feeling it?

REQUIREMENTS

The skills required for this role:
You love using SQL and Python to answer business questions and analyze data
You live and breath report automation
World class data science experience that you can apply to product, operations, and growth marketing
You're delighted by the idea building the foundational elements of a growing data science practice
You're a strong, clear communicator who knows keep the whole team on the same page
BONUS points:
Hands on experience working with tools like Looker and Mixpanel
Financial services experience or good understanding of banking
Experience working in a startup environment or for a SaaS company
Background in management consulting
PhD or Masters degree
BENEFITS

Our mission is big and audacious, but we're assembling a team to take the challenge head-on.

As a Data Scientist you'll be joining a team that prioritizes:
People: Our company is more than just a business. We're a band of brothers and sisters supporting each other on our mission to rebuild business banking. We're really serious about mission, fit, and the people we work with. You'll be part of a rapidly scaling team that reflects these values and keeps this place special.
Diversity: You'll find yourself in an environment that values diversity and inclusivity. Excellence doesn't come in one flavor and neither should we.
Leadership: You're right in the thick of it, making critical decisions that will clear our path forward.
We offer full health/dental benefits, competitive compensation/equity, and one hell of an adventure.

If you recognize yourself in this job description, let's talk.",4.3,"NorthOne
4.3","San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
67,Data Scientist,-1,"Get in on the ground floor at one of Boston's top startups and help us solve a huge challenge for developers and product teams: understanding the customer experience. LogRocket is the first system that gives these teams complete visibility into their customer's experience through pixel-perfect replays of user sessions and clear insight into logs, errors, and network activity. We've already attracted an elite roster of customers such as Reddit, Bloomberg, and NBC and recently raised a $15M Series B to continue building a world-class product and team.

If you’d like to join in on our mission of making every experience on the web as perfect as possible — all while taking ownership over your work and helping scale LogRocket to be a pillar in the Boston tech community — we’d love to speak with you!

About the role

We’re looking to bring aboard our first Data Scientist to develop next-generation features in the LogRocket platform. LogRocket tracks millions of events across our customers’ web applications to help product teams quickly identify and squash any bugs or errors that arise. We want to leverage that data to uncover new aspects of the user experience and provide proactive, actionable insights to help our partners build the best experience possible for their users. You will have millions of data points to explore and play around with on a daily basis while you build the foundation for LogRocket’s Data Science team and function for years to come.
You will...
Own the analysis, modeling, system design, and development of LogRocket’s initial data science products
Build the data science elements of LogRocket’s products that will help improve the user experience for thousands of web applications
Initiate the design, development, and implementation of scientific analysis projects or deliverables
Work directly with product and engineering leadership to help drive the design and architecture of the product
Help promote broader analytics initiatives across the organization
Brainstorm and test new data product ideas with the product organization
Work with fellow engineers to build out other parts of the infrastructure, effectively communicating your needs and understanding theirs
Meet with external customers to gain an understanding of their business and how LogRocket can provide data-driven solutions to their challenges
Build intelligence into our services to make them smarter
Qualifications
5+ years of practical experience with a BS, MS or PhD in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management, or Statistics
Experience designing and implementing machine learning pipelines in production environments
Experience with one or more general-purpose programming languages, including but not limited to: Java, Scala, and Python
Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms such as logistic regression, linear regression, k-NN, naive Bayes, SVM, random forest, etc.
Proven ability to perform statistical analysis and experience with tools such as SAS, R, and equivalent
Experience with cloud computing services such as AWS
Ability to collaborate effectively and work as part of a team
Experience presenting insights to executives and nontechnical audiences about product analytics data
Ability to keep up to date with cutting-edge machine learning/big data methods and techniques
Ability to thrive in team environments using agile methodology and interacting with product leaders, scientists, and engineers to solve technology’s greatest challenges
Ability to learn and adapt quickly in a fast-paced, dynamic startup environment
Benefits and perks
Catered lunch throughout the week and a fully stocked kitchen with all your favorite snacks (healthy AND nonhealthy)
Open vacation policy — we all work hard and take time for ourselves when we need it, no strings attached
Extensive health, dental, and vision benefits, along with 401k and commuter benefits
Generous stock options (we all get to own a piece of what we’re building)
Regular team outings and activities (craft nights, boat cruises, excursions out of the city, and many more)
Flexible working hours and location
Ample opportunities to learn and take on new responsibilities in a fast-paced, growth-mode startup
About LogRocket

LogRocket was founded in 2016 by Matthew Arbesfeld and Ben Edelstein, a computer science duo who have been building products together since the third grade. Frustrated by how difficult it was to understand their customers' experiences, Arbesfeld and Edelstein set out toward an audacious goal: to make every experience on the web as perfect as possible.

Our team is a diverse group that brings an eclectic set of experiences from Google, Meteor, Drift, HubSpot, MIT, and Columbia. We enjoy eating lunch together every day in our airy downtown Boston office, learning more about each other at our show-and-tell sessions, and hosting our friends during #logrocketeer events. We focus on building our software with care and craftsmanship — our engineering blog posts offer a taste of that — and we welcome talented people from all backgrounds. Many of us have important spaces in our lives, whether it be family, social organizations, schools, or former companies, and we're doing all we can to make LogRocket another one.

LogRocket is an equal-opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees.",4.8,"LogRocket
4.8","Boston, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
68,Data Scientist - Pricing,$122k-$195k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Opendoor:
Are you intrigued by the thought of disrupting a trillion dollar industry through technology? At Opendoor, we’re on a mission to make it simple to buy and sell homes. The traditional process is broken, with an average home taking over 90 days to sell and costing thousands of dollars. We empower everyone with the freedom to move by making buying and selling a home stress-free and instant. We’ve built an exceptional team, seen strong growth, served over 80,000 customers (with an annual run rate of $5 billion), and raised $1.3 billion in funding. With Covid-19, the world is changing, and real estate is no exception. The coming years present a tremendous opportunity for innovation as we explore new frontiers and scale nationwide.

As a data scientist on the acquisition pricing team, you will build critical models and analyses that determine which homes we acquire, how much we should pay for them, and how these decisions impact Seller satisfaction as well as our portfolio margin and growth targets. You will rapidly iterate on new approaches to solve pricing problems all the way from idea to execution to evolution. Getting these decisions right is essential to our success as we innovate in new areas of real estate.
As a Data Scientist you will:
Build and evolve our acquisition pricing models at each stage from idea to production
Create feedback loops and other processes to monitor and track our performance versus expectations
Partner with Product, Engineering, Finance and Operations to implement data science in production
Identify innovative approaches to learn in areas of low N and multiple potential confounders
Become a domain expert in real estate and market behavior
We are looking for teammates who have:
2+ years of experience
Proficiency writing SQL queries
Proficiency with Python and its data science libraries
Strong business judgment and orientation toward impact
Knowledge of statistics
Bonus Points if:
Knowledge of causal inference and Bayesian statistics
Experience productionizing data science models and data pipelines
You love delighting customers with simple and low-cost products
You are committed to iteratively driving results and becoming better every day
More About Us
Want to learn more about us and how we are revolutionizing the home buying and selling process? Learn more about us on our website, check out our profile on The Muse to learn more about our culture from our team members, or read our blog posts to hear about the work we are doing.

We Offer the Following Benefits and Perks:
- Full medical, dental, and vision with optional 70% coverage for dependents
- Flexible vacation policy
- Commuter Benefit stipend
- Generous parental leave
- Paid time off to volunteer
Please note that these benefits and perks are available only to Full Time team members and do not apply to contract roles.

Opendoor values Openness
Our team celebrates our diverse backgrounds. We believe that being open about who we are and what we do allows us to be better. Individuals seeking employment at Opendoor are considered without regards to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or other protected status under all applicable laws, regulations, and ordinances.",3.8,"Opendoor
3.8","San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Real Estate,Real Estate,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
69,Data Scientist,-1,"Are you looking for an opportunity to leverage your analytical
experience and work with open-source software and Big Data tools?
We are looking to add a Junior Data Scientist to our team
providing mission-critical analysis to a federal client. This
opportunity is a great match for a data-driven problem solver who
is ready for the next step in his/her career.

Responsibilities:
Collects large sets of structured and unstructured data from
disparate sources.
Cleans and validates data to ensure accuracy, completeness, and
uniformity.
Analyzes data to identify patterns and trends.
Devises and applies models and algorithms to mine the stores of
big data. Interprets data to discover solutions and
opportunities.
Required Qualifications:
Secret clearance
BS degree in Physics, Computer Science, Mathematics, or another
quantitative discipline
1-3 years' experience
Strong client engagement skills
Experience with languages such as Python, R, SAS, and SQL
Familiarity with version control software including Github or
Subversion
Experience with designing, developing, and deploying analytic
software and algorithms
Desired Qualifications:
Experience with open source Big Data tools including Apache
Spark or Apache NiFi
Experience with developing solutions and integrating,
extending, and contributing to Open Source software
Experience with entity resolution
Experience with Natural Langue Processing using modern deep
learning techniques
Mount indie is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We celebrate
diversity, respect and seek to empower each individual and
support the diverse cultures, perspectives, skills and
experiences within our company. Mount Indie's commitment is to
create an inclusive environment for all employees",5.0,"Mount Indie
5.0","Vienna, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
70,Data Scientist,-1,"Data Scientist (Artificial Intelligence - A.I.)
Bethesda, Maryland
Benefits Offered: Vision, Medical, Dental, 401K
Employment Offered: Full Time

Job Description:
Looking for a Data Scientist to help develop an acquisition system that takes full advantage of Artificial Intelligence to enhance its capabilities. The program goal is to Enhance and Streamline the end to end process by utilizing new and emerging technologies such As Block-chain, Artificial intelligence (AI) and Robotic Process Automation.

Numerous Roles available in:
A.I. Model creation and ability to write APIs access be reporting and front end. Ability to assist and develop development models in code and Mongo database

EDUCATION/EXPERIENCE
Bachelor’s degree
1-3 years’ Total experience
1 years Exp. in expertise

About Swain Techs:
Make a difference with Swain Techs. As you consider a career at Swain Techs, you will find countless opportunities to contribute to solutions that are changing the world in real and measurable ways in our technical, engineering, and enterprise IT core business areas.

Why Swain Techs?
Swain Techs is an award winning 8(a) certified small business with over a decade of exceptional performance.
Headquartered in Horsham, PA with offices in Washington, DC., Virginia, and Delaware, Swain Techs has been awarded several prime contracts with U.S. Navy, the Department of Health and Human Services (HHS), the Defense Logistics Agency (DLA), the Department of Commerce-US Patent and Trade Office (USPTO) and the U.S. Customs and Border Patrol (CBP). We are among the fastest 5000 growing companies in the US for 2014 and 2015 according to Inc. Magazine. We are CMMi ML3 appraised for Development & Services plus Service System Development and ISO 9001:2015 certified.

We know that our continued success begins with you. Swain Techs is always looking for bright, energetic, entrepreneurial-driven people to join our team. If you are looking for an exciting environment, where your opinion is highly valued, and you are fanatical about customer service, we would love to talk with you.
Come and discover what makes Swain Techs a great place to work.

Visit our website http://swain",3.8,"Swain Techs
3.8","Bethesda, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
71,Data Scientist,$98k-$157k (Glassdoor Est.),"Goodway Group is a fully remote, digital marketing, and advertising firm. We sit at the intersection of top talent, amazing technical partnerships, and game-changing analytics within the ad technology and marketing technology space. We're well-established with the pace of a start-up. This position is work from home (or anywhere else you have reliable internet) and can be located anywhere within the United States.

Who We Are

Doing This Involves

Goodway Group aims to be the beacon of honesty and intelligence in the programmatic marketplace. We deliver authentic results for our clients by running smart advertising campaigns.Data Science & Analytics at Goodway Group develops data products that ensure the company's media campaigns are running efficiently.
showing feasibility through data analysis,
designing and producing prototypes
deploying models to production.
Who You Are

A Data Scientist is a key member of the Data Science and Analytics team at Goodway. This team utilizes advanced tools and innovative techniques to maximize advertising results for our clients, as well as demonstrates thought leadership within the digital advertising industry.

You will be at the center of data analysis, modeling, machine learning, and data engineering and on the bleeding-edge in the ad-tech space.

The ideal candidate will have hands-on experience working on a wide range of optimization and analytics problems in ad-tech including fraud detection/mitigation, price prediction, conversion attribution, and modeling, as well as experience with the tools of the trade including SQL, Python, Hive, R, Athena, and others.

What You Will Do
Design, build and deploy algorithms to optimize the performance of advertising campaigns.
Define data requirements and gather/validate information, applying judgment and statistical tests.
Apply various models and methods to test, learn, and improve the manner in which data is being evaluated and algorithms are being built.
Construct data narratives to convey complex ideas to non-technical stakeholders.
Be constantly learning the latest technologies and trends.
Work with analysts and stakeholders to gather, understand, and develop business initiatives and specifications.
Provide expertise and leadership on making technical decisions, thus delivering a platform that provides business value and meets end-user goals.
What We Offer

Goodway Group is a wholly remote organization, so no commute to consider! We offer unlimited PTO (MyTime) because we know you're at your best when your life has balance. We have the usual steak and potatoes array of benefits, as well as some great wellness programs that are available to both you and your family. While we work remotely, we foster an environment that promotes connectedness and community.

For a lot more detail, make sure to check us out on Glassdoor!

Youll Be Successful Because You Are
Knowledgeable: B.S., M.S. or Ph.D. in computer science, math, statistics or a strong quantitative educational background
Adept with Python and exposure to modern software development practices including GitHub
Excellent at communicating complex ideas and are able to convey ideas accurately and concisely to both technical and non-technical stakeholders
Results-Oriented: we call this grit. You can be counted on to exceed goals, and youre known to push yourself and others across the finish line
Able to learn new paradigms, tools, and processes quickly and thrive in a fast-paced, rapidly changing, exciting work environment
Work from Home: we all work from our home offices throughout the United States
Things You Should Know

Twice per year, we gather together to work and play for a week. Both retreats are cant miss events (like seriouslythey are mandatory). There may also be other opportunities to travel depending on your specific role and business needs.

Goodway embraces a culture of equality and wants applications from everyone, regardless of race, creed, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, marital status, citizen status, age, disability, military or protected veteran status, genetic predisposition or carrier status or any other legally protected status.",4.1,"Goodway Group
4.1","Denver, CO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1929,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
72,Data Scientist,-1,"Koverse helps our customers use data intelligence to solve significant challenges. Our technology powers game-changing solutions with unprecedented scale, security, and performance. Our team has contributed to some of the biggest, most strategic data initiatives sponsored by government organizations and global industry leaders.

Everyone is a key contributor at Koverse. Our culture is focused on promoting a respectful, fun, and productive work environment. We support transparency, accountability, meritocracy, and candid discussion whether working remotely or in the office.

We’re looking for problem-solvers who enjoy tackling complex issues. Team players with proven expertise and enthusiasm for innovation. Go-getters who strive to exceed expectations and delight our customers. Join us!

Data Scientist

Koverse is looking for a Data Scientist to join our fun, entrepreneurial, innovative and collaborative team. This position can be located in any of the Koverse hubs: Seattle, Denver, Portland, Eugene, or Washington-Baltimore metro areas. Flexibility to travel occasionally (but not too frequently) to customer sites or Koverse locations, both domestically and internationally, is required.

As a Data Scientist you will:

Work directly with customers in a technical role to help ensure smooth adoption of Koverse software and develop cutting-edge solutions using Koverse software
Listen to customers and act as a consultative partner to help them uncover actionable insights from their data
Spec, build, test and deploy customized machine learning and/or other mission-focused data science applications based on customer requirements
Produce customer documentation and reports to communicate results
Contribute technical content and tutorials to custom application documentation

We are looking for the following technical experience:

Practical experience with state-of-the-art data mining, statistical modeling, data science, and machine learning techniques and libraries
Use of Python or Scala for data science applications
Notebook environments such as Jupyter and Zeppelin
Experience with Apache Spark (e.g., PySpark, MLlib, and/or Spark with Scala)
Using well-know data science libraries to create visualizations and communicate results
Experience cleaning messy, incomplete, or imperfect data
Experience with feature extraction and feature engineering techniques

In addition, you should have the following:

3+ years professional experience as a data scientist
Excellent written communication skills, including technical documentation
Proven exceptional oral communication skills
Ability to build strong, lasting relationships with customers
Self-starter who can work as part of a virtual team and remain motivated in a dynamic environment
BA or BS in a technical field of study, though an additional 4 years of experience may be substituted for a degree

If this sounds like you, please send your resume along with a brief paragraph highlighting why you would make a great addition to the team. Please include the job title in the subject line and email careers@koverse.com.

Our Benefits

Aside from our supportive culture, Koverse employees enjoy some of the best benefits in tech:

Remote work-from-home + in-office options
Team lunch during on-site days
Flexible schedule to support work-life balance
Occasional travel for company-wide meetings and social events
Medical, dental and vision insurance: Low employee premiums with multiple levels of coverage available
Company-paid life insurance
Flexible Spending Account (FSA)
401(k) retirement plan
Stock options (Pre-IPO)
Unlimited personal time off

About Koverse

Koverse enables organizations to create and use data intelligence. Our technology is trusted by global industry leaders in biopharma, finance, government, professional services, and high tech. Our founders are former NSA data architects who created Apache Accumulo, the fast and scalable data store with cell-level security. Accumulo is the foundation for the Koverse Intelligent Solutions Platform (KISP) which powers PwC’s Know Your Vendor and other intelligent solutions. Koverse is an employee-directed profitable company with hubs in Seattle, Denver, and the Washington-Baltimore metro areas.",4.6,"Koverse
4.6","Seattle, WA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
73,Staff Data Scientist,$142k-$225k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


Intuit is looking for innovative and hands-on Staff Data scientist to join the Intuit AI team.This team embeds artificial intelligence and machine learning into our product portfolio and business to create smarter products, improve anti-fraud and security, and enhance customer care. We aim to save our customers time (""Never enter data""), increase their prosperity by making actionable financial recommendations, and enable them to have complete confidence in our products
What you'll bring
4+ years of industry experience with data science
BS, MS or PhD in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Economics, Operations Research, or equivalent
4+ years of hands-on expertise with data mining and statistical modeling techniques such as clustering, classification, regression, tree-based methods, neural nets, support vector machines, anomaly detection, and natural language processing
Expertise in modern advanced analytical tools and programming languages such as Python, Scala, Java and/or R.
Efficient in SQL, Hive, SparkSQL, etc.
Comfortable working in a Linux environment
Experience with building end-to-end reusable pipelines from data acquisition to model output delivery
Quick learner, adaptable, with the ability to work independently in a fast-paced environment
Strong oral and written communication skills. Ability to conduct meetings and make professional presentations, and to explain complex concepts and technical material to non-technical users
community

How you will lead
Excellent leadership and communication skills to influence teams and to evangelize data science across the organization
Perform hands-on data analysis and modeling with huge data sets
Apply data mining, NLP, and machine learning (both supervised and unsupervised) to improve relevance and personalization algorithms
Work side-by-side with product managers, software engineers, and designers in designing experiments and minimum viable products
Discover data sources, get access to them, import them, clean them up, and make them model-ready. You need to be willing and able to do your own ETL
Create and refine features from the underlying data. Youll enjoy developing just enough subject matter expertise to have an intuition about what features might make your model perform better, and then youll lather, rinse and repeat
Run regular A/B tests, gather data, perform statistical analysis, draw conclusions on the impact of your optimizations and communicate results to peers and leaders
Explore new design or technology shifts in order to determine how they might connect with the customer benefits we wish to deliver
Communicate key analytic findings within the business and to senior stakeholders
Research, explore, and enable new quantitative techniques and technologies in data science",4.3,"Intuit - Data
4.3","Mountain View, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1983,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
74,Data Scientist,-1,"About Wavicle

Wavicle Data Solutions, a data analytics consulting firm, is recognized on the Inc 500 as one of the fastest growing IT service companies in the US. Our growth comes from service excellence and creating a great employee community. Wavicle is built upon the principle that modern organizations rely on data to drive their businesses, yet not every company has the time, staff, or knowledge to leverage this valuable resource. Wavicle’s driving purpose is to help these organizations craft custom data solutions focused on Big Data, Cloud and Analytics.

Requirements
Bachelor's degree or equivalent experience in quantitative fields (Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering, etc.)
4+ years of professional experience as data scientist, or machine learning engineer
Deep understanding of predictive modeling, machine-learning, clustering and classification techniques, and algorithms
At least 3 - 5 years of experience in quantitative analytics or data Data Science
Python, Pandas, Numpy, Matplotib Scikit coding skills
Fluency in a programming language (Python, C,C++,R Spark, SQL)
Familiarity with Big Data frameworks and visualization tools
Good understanding of the Cloud (AWS/GCP/Azure) environments
Effective at telling stories with data.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Creative drive to try data tools, and explore and discover insights from data",4.1,"Wavicle Data Solutions
4.1","Chicago, IL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2014,Private Practice / Firm,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
75,Data Engineer,$73k-$132k (Glassdoor Est.),"Locations: VA - McLean, United States of America, McLean, Virginia

Data Engineer

Do you love building and pioneering in the technology space? Do you enjoy solving complex business problems in a fast-paced, collaborative,inclusive, and iterative delivery environment? At Capital One, you'll be part of a big group of makers, breakers, doers and disruptors, who love to solve real problems and meet real customer needs.

We are seeking Data Engineers who will be a part of a team that’s building new analytical and machine learning tools and frameworks to exploit advantages in the latest developments in cloud computing. As aCapital One Data Engineer, you’ll have the opportunity to be on the forefront of driving a major transformation within Capital One. Learn more about#lifeatcapitalone and our commitment todiversity & inclusion by jumping to slides 76-91 on our Corporate Social Responsibility Report.

What You’ll Do:

Collaborate with and across Agile teams to design, develop, test, implement, and support technical solutions in full-stack development tools and technologies

Work with a team of developers with deep experience in machine learning, distributed microservices, and full stack systems

Utilize programming languages like Java, Scala, Python and Open Source RDBMS and NoSQL databases and Cloud based data warehousing services such as Snowflake

Share your passion for staying on top of tech trends, experimenting with and learning new technologies, participating in internal & external technology communities, and mentoring other members of the engineering community

Collaborate with digital product managers, and deliver robust cloud-based solutions that drive powerful experiences to help millions of Americans achieve financial empowerment

Perform unit tests and conducting reviews with other team members to make sure your code is rigorously designed, elegantly coded, and effectively tuned for performance

Basic Qualifications:

Bachelor’s Degree

At least 2 years of experience in application development

At least 1 years of experience in big data technologies (Cassandra, Accumulo, HBase, Spark, Hadoop, HDFS, AVRO, MongoDB, or Zookeeper)

Preferred Qualifications:

Master's Degree

3+ years of experience in application development

1+ year experience working on streaming data applications (Spark Streaming, Kafka, Kinesis, and Flink

1+ years of experience with Amazon Web Services (AWS), Microsoft Azure or another public cloud service

1+ years of experience with Ansible / Terraform

2+ years of experience with Agile engineering practices

2+ years in-depth experience with the Hadoop stack (MapReduce, Pig, Hive, Hbase)

2+ years of experience with NoSQL implementation (Mongo, Cassandra)

2+ years of experience developing Java based software solutions

2+ years of experience in at least one scripting language (Python, Perl, JavaScript, Shell)

2+ years of experience developing software solutions to solve complex business problems

2+ years of experience with UNIX/Linux including basic commands and shell scripting

At this time, Capital One will not sponsor a new applicant for employment authorization for this position.",4.0,"Capital One
4.0","Richmond, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
76,Data Scientist,$107k-$170k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Title:
Data Scientist

Location:
US, California, San Jose
Role Overview:


Looking to have an impact? Come be a part of the change as we move into a new era at McAfee. Mission driven, both at the company and functional level, we share a passion for customers at the core. Critical, highly visible role reporting into Director of Analytics, Sr Experimentation Analyst/ Data Analyst will and will own all aspects of the product experimentation program with the goal of driving data based decisions



Company Overview


From device to cloud, McAfee provides market-leading cybersecurity solutions for both business and consumers. We help businesses orchestrate cyber environments that are truly integrated, where protection, detection, and correction of security threats happen simultaneously. For consumers, McAfee secures your devices against viruses, malware, and other threats, both at home and away. We want to continue to shape the future of cybersecurity by working together to build best in class products and solutions.

About the role:
Partner with product, marketing and technology organizations to develop and deliver data basedbusiness insights and solutions
Use your expert knowledge of data in our data lake and reporting databases to evaluate business opportunities, size projects, conduct analysisand prototype data solutions
Own end to end processof defining and publishing KPIs and metrics including getting agreement from stakeholders, validation, documentation, standardization across organization and driving automation
Help Increase the adoption of data solutions by educating users anddeveloping user friendly documentation
Conduct exploratory data analysis and hypothesis driven deep dives into consumer behavior and subscription data to uncover opportunities through unique insights to improve consumer experience and monetization
Conduct analysis onA/B testing data to help find winners, drive new ideas for testing and promote the use of A/B testing as a tool for decision making.
Combine your business and technical knowledge to drive value from data utilizing a variety of methodologies like descriptive and predictive analytics, statistics ,experimentation, and business intelligence
Act as a subject matter expert for business and engineering teams on data in our data lake and various operational databases
About you:
7+ years of experience in Business or Data Analytics
3+ experience running, analyzing and managing A/B tests
Experience in developing reports and dashboards utilizing industry standard BI tools ( Microstrategy or Tableau preferred)
Expertise in presenting data and analysis at all levels in the organization
Expert level SQL knowledge required
Knowledge of python data analysis frameworks like pandas preferred
Knowledge of statistical package like R preferred
Experience with online consumer data required
Demonstrated strong collaboration skills and ability to work cross functionally
Demonstrated ability to effectively communicate with both technical and non-technical audience
Master's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering or Business
Company Benefits and Perks:


We work hard to embrace diversity and inclusion and encourage everyone at McAfee to bring their authentic selves to work every day. We offer a variety of social programs, flexible work hours and family-friendly benefits to all of our employees.
Pension and Retirement Plans
Medical, Dental and Vision Coverage
Paid Time Off
Paid Parental Leave
Support for Community Involvement
We're serious about our commitment to diversity which is why McAfee prohibits discrimination based on race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital status, pregnancy, gender expression or identity, sexual orientation or any other legally protected status.

Job Type:


Experienced Hire

Primary Location:
US, California, San Jose

Additional Locations:",3.6,"McAfee
3.6","San Jose, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1987,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
77,Data Scientist,$95k-$148k (Glassdoor Est.),"Microsoft Advertising (MSA) is a worldwide organization on the cutting edge of the digital advertising industry. We are the engine that powers the buying and selling of digital advertising across all aspects of our digital portfolio including our high-growth search engine, Bing, and consumer services like MSN, Microsoft News, Xbox, and Outlook.

Advertiser Market Sciences Team in MSA is hiring talented, highly motivated and productive individuals with expertise in the areas of: Computer Science, Machine Learning, Econometrics, Statistics, Modeling, Simulation and Data Mining. The team develops and applies advanced techniques to turn our petabytes of data into insights; and to drive actions based on those insights. The team works closely with partners across MSA to enable rigorous, effective, and data-driven decision making. Some example of the challenges we face:
Modeling the dynamics of the paid search market
Understanding Advertiser value, lifecycle, opportunity and marketing objectives
Designing and analyzing the results of large-scale online experiments
Prototyping algorithms fundamental to managing and optimizing demand generation activities to support our marketplace.
At Microsoft Advertising, we offer a strong team environment, exciting, applied research challenges, and a fun place to work. The work environment empowers you to have a real impact on Microsoft’s business, our advertiser partners, and millions of end users. This role is a unique opportunity to work with a world-class, interdisciplinary group of data scientists, analysts, sales and product managers.

Responsibilities


Develop and manage analyses and algorithms that generate actionable insights and programs to improve Microsoft Ads demand generation activities including increasing both long-term revenue and relevance. Research and develop solutions for improving profits for Microsoft and returning value to the audience, advertisers and publishers (e.g. Ecosystem health, marketplace performance measurement, advertiser health, outlier detection, etc.). Specific responsibilities include the following:
Work with key business stakeholders to understand the underlying business needs and formulate the needs into discrete, manageable problems with well-defined measurable objectives and outcomes.
Identify and apply the appropriate methods/tools to efficiently collect, clean, and prepare massive volumes of data for analysis
Transform formulated problems into implementations plans for experiments by defining success metrics, applying/creating the appropriate methods, algorithms, and tools, as well as delivering statistically valid and reliable results
Develop new predictive and prescriptive models using advanced statistical and machine learning techniques with a goal of productionizing solutions
Influence stakeholders to make product/service improvements that yield customer/business value by effectively making compelling cases through storytelling, visualizations, and other influencing tools
Identify and analyze the applicability and scalability of innovative data science methods, algorithms, and tools from within Microsoft and from the scientific literature to create/test solutions that deliver value to customer and business
Qualifications
A Master’s degree or equivalent experience in Data Science, Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Mathematics, Machine Learning/AI or related fields.
Demonstrated experience in all phases of managing data science projects including: problem definition, solution formulation, model building, productionizing and delivering measurable impact.
Experience with online data; experience with online-advertising data strongly preferred.
Knowledge and experience in at least three of the following areas: machine learning, data mining, user modeling, information retrieval (interrogation of log files and very large databases), economic modeling, econometrics, game theory, statistics, data analysis, e-metrics/measurement. 2+ years practical experience, 4+ years are preferred.
Experience with data analysis and statistical tools (e.g. Python, R, SAS, Matlab or SPSS).
Solid communications skills, both verbal and written.
Hands-on approach to data analysis and a strong focus on quality.
Ability to work independently and collaboratively in an interdisciplinary team environment.
#MicrosoftAdvertising",4.3,"Microsoft
4.3","Bellevue, WA",-1,10000+ Employees,1975,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
78,Data Scientist,-1,"Company: Kharon is a leading source for analysis on the intersection of international security and the global economy. The world's largest financial institutions and multinationals rely on Kharon's technology platform to identify threats and opportunities in markets impacted by today's most pressing security issues, including WMD proliferation, terror finance, corruption, environmental degradation, forced labor, and political interference. We are hiring data scientists to expand and enhance our research and analysis platform, which leverages open-source intelligence, data mining, network analysis, and machine learning to generate unparalleled insights on networks engaged in illicit financial activity, enabling customers to make informed decisions on complex security, policy, and regulatory issues. This position is located in Los Angeles, CA. About You: The successful candidate will excel in designing, evaluating, and executing on solutions to open-ended problems through superior analytical skills, resourcefulness, and tenacity. They will be innately curious and have demonstrated an entrepreneurial spirit through academic, professional, or extracurricular experiences. They will have demonstrated their ability to quickly learn new skills and familiarize themselves with new subjects. Role & Responsibilities: • Coordinate with product and engineering teams to design, develop, and deploy tools for identifying and monitoring networks exposed to illicit financial activity. • Work closely with researchers, product, and business development to identify, analyze, and operationalize novel datasets. • Build models to derive insights from disparate data sources, accelerate analyst workflows, and enrich Kharon’s proprietary knowledge graph. • Communicate potential value of insights derived from new and existing data sources through visual, data-driven storytelling. • Research and learn new frameworks, languages, and technologies as needed. Key Qualifications : • Bachelor’s degree in computer science, statistics, engineering, physics, or other analytical discipline, plus one year of relevant professional experience • Strong proficiency in Python • Experience with designing, evaluating, and optimizing machine learning models • Familiarity with NLP • Familiarity with web crawling and scraping • Familiarity with data wrangling, cleaning, and transformations • Experience interacting with SQL and NoSQL databases Bonus : • M.S. or PhD in computer science, statistics, engineering, physics, or related quantitative field • Experience with Java, C++, R, or Scala • Experience with NLP • Demonstrated understanding of key international security and business issues through professional or academic experience • Proficiency in a foreign language — especially Russian, Chinese (Mandarin), Korean, Turkish, Farsi/Persian, Arabic, Spanish, French, Ukrainian, or Japanese Kharon values candidates with unique perspectives and experiences. If you think you're a good fit, please apply - we're excited to hear from you!",5.0,"Kharon
5.0","Los Angeles, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2017,Company - Public,-1,-1,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
79,Data Scientist,$65k-$111k (Glassdoor Est.),"Analytica is seeking a Data Scientist with an emphasis on statistical analytics within a newly deployed cloud-based platform to support a complex set of Federal Financial Compliance and Enforcement challenges. The position will apply statistical programming, statistical visualization techniques, modeling, and forecasting skills to analyze Federal Financial use cases. The ideal candidate will enjoy engaging with stakeholders, learning their business problems, providing technical guidance, evangelizing the teams data science capabilities. This position will sit in Washington, DC.

Requirements:
Feature Engineering and Attribute Evaluation - Candidate must demonstrate experience with identifying the key determinants for modeling that exist in the business process and within existing data sets as well as selecting evaluation protocols (model techniques).
Pre-processing - Demonstrate the skills and experience to collect, clean, and prepare data sets for input into a computational model using technologies such as Python, SAS, or R. Strong candidates will explain various methods you have applied using common pre-processing functions.
Modeling - Candidates will have practiced skills and experience selecting modeling techniques to fit the business problem. Examples will include techniques such as machine learning (ML) supervised and unsupervised learning, regression, neural networks and deep learning, natural language processing, etc.
Validation - Strong candidates will describe their experience with investigating, reporting, and justifying model results.
Visualization- Experience in presenting the results of their modeling activities, depicting the insights realized, and explaining the relevance of their results to the organizations business challenges.
Qualifications:
Master's degree required, and PhD preferred in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, or familiar
Five (5)+ years in data science, data engineering, as a statistician, or a related quantitative field
High degree of experience utilizing SAS, R, or Python to support the development of complex statistical use cases
Strong problem-solving skills, leverage domain knowledge, information technology, and data science techniques
Experience implementing unsupervised (e.g., clustering), semi-supervised (e.g., label propagation) and supervised learning (e.g., ensemble classifiers) algorithms, and when it is appropriate to use each
Experience with a distributed enterprise Business Intelligence platform such a SAS, Tableau, or Qlik.
Experience with development of predictive analytics models
Experience working in an Agile project management environment
Must be a US citizen and must be able to maintain a Public trust security clearance
About ANALYTICA: Analytica is a leading consulting and information technology solutions provider to public sector organizations supporting health, civilian, and national security missions. Founded in 2009 and headquartered in Bethesda, MD, the company is an established SBA certified HUBZone and 8(a) small business that has been recognized by Inc. Magazine each of the past three years as one of the 250 fastest-growing companies in the U.S. Analytica specializes in providing software and systems engineering, information management, analytics & visualization, agile project management, and management consulting services. The company is appraised by the Software Engineering Institute (SEI) at CMMI® Maturity Level 3 and is an ISO 9001:2008 certified provider.",3.7,"Analytica
3.7","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2009,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
80,Data Scientist,-1,"We are a seed-stage startup founded by an ex-Intuit Product Manager, an ex-IRS Agent, and a Stanford ML Ph.D.

We are well-funded (just closed a seed round with prominent VCs / angels) and have traction (we’ve generated $250k+ revenue in <2 months with our MVP).

Small businesses are the lifeblood of the economy, and tax is one of the most difficult and stressful parts of running a small business. We’re building a world-class team to upend (we hate the word “disrupt”) the ancient, archaic, and recession-proof industry of business taxes.

The opportunity for impact is very significant: make a very painful problem that millions of small businesses experience disappear. Likely a better usage of ML than making newsfeeds even more addicting.

Automating taxes is a difficult but solvable problem: (1) large set of constraints; (2) well-defined data model; (3) clear objective function that must be optimized; and a (4) finite search space of possible solutions.

We are looking for a data scientist to power our automated tax solution for small businesses! You will be required to collect, analyze, and interpret data for tax automation. To do this job successfully, you need exceptional skills in statistics and programming.

Responsibilities

Mine and analyze data from company databases to drive optimization and improvement of product development, marketing techniques, and business strategies.

Identify strengths and weaknesses in the collected data.

Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques.

Develop custom data models and algorithms to apply to data sets.

Research and implement appropriate data science algorithms and tools

Developing metrics to capture data and label quality

Select appropriate datasets and data representation methods

Perform statistical analysis and fine-tuning using test results

Develop A/B testing frameworks to evaluate model quality

Keep abreast of the latest research in the field

Requirements

Proven experience as a Data Scientist or similar role

Deep knowledge of math, probability, statistics, and algorithms

Familiarity with data science fundamentals (e.g., regressions, properties of distributions, proper applications of statistical tests and methods)

Familiarity with machine learning models (e.g., supervised vs. unsupervised learning, clustering, decision trees, neural networks)

Familiarity with ML training concepts, such as Active Learning bagging, bootstrapping, and online learning

Strong software engineering skills in Python (including Pandas and Numpy), SQL, and/or R, including

Understanding of data structures, data modeling, and software architecture

Excellent communication skills

Ability to work in a team

Outstanding analytical and problem-solving skills

Attention to detail

BSc in Computer Science, Mathematics or similar field; Master’s or Ph.D. is a plus",-1,Hired Recruiters,"San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2015,Contract,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
81,Analytical Chemist/Scientist for Biologics Group,$36k-$55k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the Opportunity
Are you looking for a fast paced position in a rapidly growing company? We are seeking an Analytical Chemist/Scientist for our Biologics Group in Ann Arbor, Michigan. We are searching for talented and motivated individuals that would enjoy working in a team oriented, entrepreneurial company.
Job Description and Responsibilities
Learn techniques spanning across the entire spectrum of analytical chemistry from wet chemistry to HPLC, NMR, Mass Spectrometry, FTIR, GC and GC-MS
Perform testing using a variety of technologies including HPLC, LC-MS, GC, GC/MS, Microscopy, FTIR and UV
Execute projects in support of client needs including product deformulation and product development, failure analysis and problem solving, impurity identification, extractable and leachable studies, and structural characterization
Follow all safety requirements including wearing appropriate personal protective equipment
Generate supporting laboratory documentation
Ensure compliance with government rules and regulations (FDA, cGMP, DEA, ICH, OSHA, etc.)
Implement new equipment and processes independently, capable of conducting appropriate qualification and validation activities
Execute projects with minimal supervision
Have the ability to analyze data from the qualitative to the rigorously statistical and defend conclusions based on data
Have the ability to demonstrate strong problem-solving and analytical abilities
Requirements
Experience with analytical method development
Experience with protein mass spectrometry, proteomics (LC-MS/MS or LC-QTOF)
Experience with mammalian cell culture
Experience working with proteins and nucleic acids
Experience with HPLC or FPLC
Effective scientific writer (experience with report writing)
Effective oral presenter (experience with scientific presentations)
Effective time management
Must be a flexible, adaptable, self-driven team player with a positive attitude
Preferred
Hands-on experience with AAV or lentivirus
Hands-on experience with viral transduction assays
Experience with capillary electrophoresis
Experience with GC-MS
Experience with method validation
Experience with MALDI or TOF
Experience with QC method development/validation
Bachelor's degree (preferred)
3-7 years’ experience
Why Work for Us?
Avomeen is a full-service laboratory with unique analytical, product testing and formulation development expertise. Each member of the Avomeen team plays a critical and visible role in delivering high-quality scientific solutions, providing them with an opportunity to directly impact Avomeen’s success and advance their career. We make every effort to reward outstanding performance and provide interesting and scientifically challenging work. In order to ensure the success, development, and growth of our employees, we are committed to offering a variety of training opportunities.
Become Part of our Community
We recognize that our single greatest resource is our people, and our team members choose Avomeen not only to join our scientific knowledge-based community, but also to become part of a collaborative team committed to exemplary science and service to our clients. Successful Avomeen employees have a positive, client-centric outlook, and embody principles of integrity and leadership, as well as creativity, flexibility, and perseverance.",3.8,"Avomeen
3.8","Ann Arbor, MI",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
82,Environmental Scientist,-1,"Spangler Environmental, Inc. is a consulting firm serving land developers, engineers, architects, attorneys and governmental agencies across the Southeast U.S. We are looking for a qualified candidate to join our team as an Environmental Scientist.

The primary responsibilities of the Environmental Scientist:
Perform site evaluations and write reports for Phase 1 Environmental Site Assessments per ASTM E1527-13.
Perform Property Condition Assessments. May perform ACM inspections if properly accredited.
Perform GPS field data collection for sketch map preparation. Experience with Trimble hand-held GPS data collectors is preferred.
Identify, evaluate and recommend risk and remediation strategies to ensure compliance with federal, state and local regulations.
Environmental due diligence, Phase II site assessments, regulatory compliance services, and permitting
Utilize professional and field experience to prepare well-written technical reports, letters, memoranda, email communications, plans, specifications, and proposals.
Data analysis, including preparing maps, tables, and figures; and
Gather, organize and evaluate field data for use in written reports.
Operate and maintain field monitoring equipment
Prepare material samples or documents for lab testing and analysis.
Requirements/Qualifications*
Minimum 3 years’ experience in private sector environmental consulting on land development projects.
Bachelor’s degree in an environmental or related field of study required
Full-time position based in Raleigh, NC. Travel to project sites in the Southeastern US, occasionally overnight, is required
Must be able to work independently outdoors in variable weather and site conditions.
Proficient in soil and groundwater sample collection
Knowledge and experience in basic computing skills including Microsoft Office and ArcGIS.
Must possess valid driver’s license with a clean driving record.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
environmental consulting: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
License:
Driver's License (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.spanglerenvironmental.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,"Spangler Environmental, Inc.","Raleigh, NC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
83,Data Scientist,-1,"The Data Scientist responsibilities include managing the supporting Virtual Health (VH) data analytics team, supporting the Navy Virtual Health (VH) Office and building analytics models in support of the BUMED VH Office goals and projects. The Data Scientist is responsible for modeling complex Institute problems, discovering Institute insights and identifying opportunities to advance Navy VH through the use of statistical, algorithmic, mining and visualization techniques. In addition to advanced analytic skills, this role is also proficient at integrating and preparing large, varied datasets, architecting specialized database and computing environments, and clearly communicating results. The Data Scientist works closely with clients, data stewards, project/program managers, and other stakeholders within the Navy VH Office to turn data into critical information and knowledge that can be used to make sound organizational decisions.

The Data Scientist will provide strategic direction to the analytics team based on an understanding of BUMED organizational structure, Navy telehealth goals and DHA data sources (i.e., M2, MDR, TRAC2ES, etc.). The role requires a combination of business focus, strong analytical and problem-solving skills, and programming knowledge to be able to quickly cycle hypothesis through the discovery phase of the project. They need to be creative thinkers and propose innovative ways to look at problems by using data mining approaches based on the data and information available. They will need to validate their findings using an experimental and iterative approach, with a clear focus on providing analysis to support data-driven decision-making for the Navy VH Office. The Data Scientist must have excellent written and communications skills to report back findings in a clear, structured manner.

Responsibilities:
Leverage available data sources to perform complex analytics in support of Navy VH Office goals, projects, and initiatives
Deep knowledge and experience with programming statistical software such as: SaS, R, Python, Tableau, etc.
Support the objectives and tasks of team of data analysts, including coaching on complex analytics, modeling, and visualization
Manage the development and maintenance of the Navy VH Office Tableau dashboard including measurement definition and analysis and identifying opportunities to advance Navy VH
Lead in the design, development, testing, implementation, and report creation in support of Navy telehealth office measurement strategies
Identify opportunities to advance Navy VH through statistical, algorithmic, mining and visualization techniques
Prepare and clearly communicate analysis results to various Navy VH stakeholders such that information can be leveraged for data-driven decision-making
Maintain knowledge and understanding of BUMED and Defense Health Agency (DHA) databases to leverage all available sources
Synthesize large, varied datasets to perform complex analysis and modeling
Ability to remotely coordinate with BUMED and DHA stakeholders to seek access and understanding of disparate data sources
Participate in the development of measurement methodologies in conjunction with Navy VH Office portfolio initiatives in order to define, analyze and report on project goals
Develop and maintain virtual health technical knowledgebase on approved platform (e.g., milSuite, SharePoint)
Requirements

Basic Requirements
At least 2-5 years of Health Care Analytic work, specifically Military Health System experience including M2 and MDR
At least 2 years of experience with SaS
At least 2-5 years of experience in complex statistical, algorithmic, mining and visualization of data
Excellent written and communications skills
Experience leading strategic analytic efforts and supporting team of data analysts
Ability to creatively problem solve and propose innovative ways to analyze and report findings
Meets or exceeds DOD 8570 requirements for IAM-I (i.e. Security + CE)
A strong understanding and demonstrated use of statistical software (e.g., R, Python, Tableau, STATA)
Strong background in a regulatory compliance framework- HIPAA, PII
Experience working with local and headquarters’ leadership to identify and implement Virtual Health priorities
Knowledge of SharePoint for presenting metrics and dashboard reporting
Strong critical thinking. Can distill customer needs through applicable BUMED and DHA databases
Ability to work with minimum of supervision and tracking. Works well both as team member and independently
Operates in matrix environment on multiple complex projects simultaneously
Education:
Bachelor’s degree and 5-12 years of experience in a related field
Travel and Worksite:
Must be capable to telework on Government furnished equipment to DHA/Navy standards with appropriate approvals.
Must be capable to support 100% telework in special situations.


Clearance:
Must be US Citizen with the ability to obtain an active security clearance (and/or) has held an active security clearance in the past
Benefits
Long Term Disability
Basic Life Insurance
Basic Accidental Death & Dismemberment Insurance
Direct Payroll Deposit
Leave Accrual
Holidays


Optional Benefits
Short Term Disability
Additional (Voluntary) Life Insurance
Additional (Voluntary) AD&D Insurance
401(k)
Medical Coverage
Dental Coverage
Vision Care Plan
Flexible Spending Account Plan
Online Training
AFLAC Supplementary Insurances
AAP/EEO Statement


Spinvi is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Spinvi does not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, non-disqualifying physical or mental disability, national origin, veteran status or any other basis covered by appropriate law. All employment is decided on the basis of qualifications, merit, and business need.

Spinvi provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, Spinvi complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.

Spinvi expressly prohibits any form of workplace harassment based on race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, or veteran status. Improper interference with the ability of Spinvi’s employees to perform their job duties may result in discipline up to and including discharge.",4.9,"Spinvi
4.9","Falls Church, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
84,Data Scientist,-1,"Located in Northern California, the Joby Aviation team has been steadily working toward our goal of providing safe, affordable, fully electric air transportation that is accessible to everyone. Imagine an air taxi that takes off vertically, then quietly and quickly carries you over the congestion below, giving you back that time you’d otherwise spend sitting in traffic. Technology has advanced to the point where designing and operating an all-electric aircraft is completely viable. Our team has been discreetly designing and flight testing this vehicle and is looking for talented individuals to see it through certification and high rate production.
Working as a Data Scientist in the Data Analytics core team you will be responsible for developing analytical tools and reporting results from numerous tests and flight operations. You should be able to work cohesively with subject matter experts, understand both data systems and physical systems, and have an eye for anomalies in physical test data. A good dose of ingenuity is required when approaching a new dataset. You will also need to work closely with your colleagues across a broad set of highly technical disciplines who depend on data. The ideal candidate is energetic, has a positive attitude, is flexible and excited about learning and using new technologies.

Wrangle data from a multitude of formats and systems (TDMS, AVRO, PostgreSQL, AWS, etc.)
Make sense of and groom data from a number of physical tests (the aircraft, simulators, reliability test equipment, subsystem tests, etc.)
Work closely with engineers to understand the test and clearly present the results
Work with the data engineering team to develop and maintain efficient data pipelines
Develop tools to make processing and reporting on data as consistent and easy as possible
Leverage statistics, numerical fitting methods, and visualization tools to draw conclusions
Develop algorithms to predict failures or the occurrence of certain events from the data

University degree in computer science, engineering, math, physics, or similar field
Expert knowledge of Python, numerical and data libraries (pandas, scipy, numpy, etc.)
Experience with data system architectures in relation to how to store, fetch, and manipulate data (SQL, custom APIs, etc.)
Familiar with Git
Experience with data visualization tools (matplotlib, seaborn, bokeh, plotly, tableau, looker, etc.)
Understanding of physical systems and an intuition on how data relates to physical phenomena
Excellent communication and presentation skills
Ability to support and work closely with a myriad of colleagues who are experts in aircraft design, systems engineering, test engineering, flight test operations, and machine learning
Comfortable navigating a quickly changing environment and willing to learn on-the-fly to obtain and define requirements

3+ years of work experience in similar roles
Experience with Apache Spark or other big data tools
Proficiency in statistical methods, A/B testing, hypothesis testing, etc.
Experience with anomaly/outlier detection in time series data
Experience with streaming architectures (Kafka, Kinesis, etc.)
Experience with Machine Learning and Deep Learning techniques and associated libraries (TensorFlow, Keras, Sklearn, PyTorch, etc.)
Experience building Python-based web applications (dash, flask, etc.)
Proficiency in other programming languages (Scala, R, SQL, Java, C, C++, etc.)
Prior participation in data science competitions (Kaggle, etc.)",4.1,"Joby Aviation
4.1","Santa Cruz, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
85,"Scientist/Senior Scientist, Cell Culture Process Development",-1,"The Company*
Cue Biopharma, Inc., a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company, is engineering a novel class of injectable biologics to selectively engage and modulate targeted T cells within the body to transform the treatment of cancer and autoimmune diseases. Cue Biopharma is a high growth company and is listed on NASDAQ (CUE). Cue Biopharma is located in Cambridge, Massachusetts in the heart of the life sciences corridor.

Cue Biopharma is building a world-class team of highly motivated, dedicated scientists to help us advance our research and development programs. The Cue Biopharma culture is fast-paced and committed to scientific excellence, innovation, and teamwork.
Candidate Profile*
The successful candidate will have a strong scientific background with hands-on experience developing and troubleshooting cell culture processes for protein-based biologic products. The candidate also must have experience in scaling up/down, tech transfer and in-depth understanding of cGMP in order to develop scalable, robust and effective processes.
Key Responsibilities*
Serve as the USP development subject matter expert in the PD team. Develop processes and generate documents including batch records, summary, and technical reports.
Design and execute experiments as well as collect and analyze data. Present process analysis, trending and summary to the group in a timely manner.
Generate, enhance, and enrich process understanding knowledge. Initiate novel process / technology when applicable.
Assist with protein purification work when needed.
Make strong technical contributions to cross functional development project teams to ensure efficient and timely execution of deliverable.
Collaborate with other teams and CDMO partners in designing manufacturing processes and assist with tech transfer activities.
Contribute to relevant sections of IND filings and other documentation.
Requirements*
BS in an applicable field of study with at least 8 years of industry experience, or MS in an applicable field of study with at least 6 years of industry experience, or PhD in an applicable field of study with at least 2 years of industry experience.
Significant experience developing and troubleshooting cell culture processes is required. The successful candidate will be proficient in all unit operations and related software of USP including aseptic operations, CO2 shakers, bioreactors, and filtration apparatus. USP related process analytics experience in cell growth and metabolites analysis required. Experience with Ambr system and or DasGip preferred. Experience with Fc fusion proteins strongly preferred, experience with monoclonal antibodies preferred.
Experience in DOE strongly preferred. Experience with statistical software such as JMP or Minitab preferred. Understanding of QbD is a plus.
DSP experience or knowledge is a plus.
cGMP collaboration experience preferred. Experience in technical reviewing preferred.
Desire and curiosity to develop a novel class of therapeutic proteins are highly preferred.
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
industry: 8 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Required travel:
25% (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://www.cuebiopharma.com/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",5.0,"Cue Biopharma
5.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
86,Data Scientist,$66k-$116k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientists produce innovative solutions driven by exploratory data analysis from complex and high-dimensional datasets. They apply knowledge of statistics, data modeling, and advanced mathematics to recognize patterns, identify opportunities, pose business questions, and make valuable discoveries. Data Scientists use a flexible, analytical approach to design, develop, and evaluate predictive models, and generate and test hypotheses.

Communication & Project Ownership
Support large projects, and manage smaller projects in their entirety
Partner with senior team members to assess customer needs and define business questions. Emerging ability to influence customers to take action on analytical insights.
Communicate results and insights, both verbally and written (including visual graphics), in a clear and concise manner to a non-technical audience.
Work on multiple concurrent projects and accommodate frequent interruptions and changing priorities
Effectively participate in meetings with customers and emerging ability to guide discussion and decision making.
Contribute to technical reports, white papers, and publications.
Data Analysis
Acquire and bring structure to data so that it can be used in existing and new data systems.
Build tools that help you and the other Data Scientists translate insights into action at scale.
Identify, define and translate business needs/problems into analytical questions.
Design and execute experiments, models, algorithms, and visualizations
Understand data sources and limitations, warehousing system and the impact of the data on business decisions.
Identify, retrieve, and manipulate data from internal and external datasets.
Apply statistical and computational methodologies to provide actionable insights and identify opportunities that optimize quality, consumer experience, and healthcare costs.
Develop scalable, efficient, and automated processes for large scale data analyses and model development, validation, and implementation
Preferred Qualifications
Master’s degree Applied Mathematics, Computer science (e.g. specialization: Machine learning/Artificial Intelligence /Visualization, databases, and Big Data), Statistics, Epidemiology, Health Services Research, or closely related field with Data Science specialization
Experience in Big Data - e.g. Hadoop
Business Intelligence tool development
Other programming experience - Java, Perl, Python, UNIX/Linux scripting
Healthcare, medical, or pharmaceutical work experience
Experience with analysis around quality, consumer experience, and healthcare costs
Required Qualifications
2+ years related work experience or equivalent combination of transferable experience and education Advanced analytics or similar role
Bachelor’s degree or additional related equivalent work experience Data Science, Applied Mathematics, Computer science (e.g. specialization: Machine learning/Artificial Intelligence /Visualization, databases, and Big Data), Statistics, Epidemiology, Health Services Research, or closely related field with Data Science specialization
1yr experience with programming such as Python or Java
3 years experience with statistical packages such as SAS, SAS EG, and SAS EM, 1 yr of R or Python
Expert proficiency in SQL
Applied experience with advanced analytics e.g. predictive analytics models
Ability to communicate results and insights, both verbally and written (including visual graphics), in a clear and concise manner to a non-technical audience.
We are interested in every qualified applicant who is eligible to work in the United States. However, we are not able to sponsor VISAs at this time.

We are an Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veteran/Disabled.",3.6,"Florida Blue
3.6","Jacksonville, FL",-1,10000+ Employees,1944,Nonprofit Organization,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
87,Data Scientist,-1,"This role can be based out of Mountain View, CA or San Francisco, CA Who is Mindstrong? Mindstrong is a research-driven, consumer-focused mental healthcare company working to unlock a new virtual care model for delivering healthcare to people living with a serious mental illness (SMI) through innovations in measurement science, and care delivery. Our services are offered to people with an SMI through active partnerships with several nationwide health insurance payers. As a Series C company, we have a blend of science, technology, and healthcare talent to help us unlock this paradigm-shifting approach, including the likes of National Institute for Mental Health, Stanford Center for Neurobiological Imaging, Uber, Facebook, Google, Apple, Oscar Health, and CMS. We'd love to talk more! What is the Data Scientist role? We're looking for Data Scientists to join our growing team of people passionate about changing mental healthcare. In this role, you will work cross functionally and partner with engineers, product managers, data analysts, and the clinicians who directly deliver care to our Mindstrong members. You will lead projects that derive value from our extensive amount of data and will work on problems related to predicting and measuring mental health outcomes, optimizing our growth funnel, matching clinicians with patients, increasing the efficiency of clinical services, and making recommendations for impactful interventions. Our team works across the company to help influence decision-making, and your work will have a direct impact on our patient population. What you'll be doing: Become an expert in building healthcare critical deep-learning applications that re-map brain circuits from human-computer interaction patterns Create highly scalable and adaptive online/streaming learning algorithms that impact the lives of millions of people daily Work with a high-performance engineering team to deploy these applications in a highly scalable and distributed infrastructure Who you are: You feel good about your work knowing that what you do will affect the lives of millions of people around the world Entrepreneurial and eager to thrive in a startup environment Strong communicator (oral and written) Your background and skills: An amazing developer; technical challenges of all types excite you Interested in contributing your opinions and perspective to help the team solve the challenges that our users face Possess extensive end-to-end project experience using machine learning or deep learning to solve complex real-world problems. This includes feature selection, dimensionality reduction, algorithm development, cross-validation Have a proven track record of delivering concrete implementations on tight schedules Have extensive experience using Python/R, TensorFlow & Keras/Torch, Spark and the AWS stack (S3, SQL, Mongo, Redshift) PhD (preferred) or MS in statistics, computer science or related mathematical disciplines with an emphasis on both theoretical analysis and algorithmic implementation, OR equivalent experience Minimum 5 years of experience developing both statistical and machine learning models with at least 3 years in the industry, i.e. shipping product! Competitive Benefits: Medical, Dental, and Vision coverage 401k 10 paid holidays Unlimited PTO Fully stocked kitchen and catered lunches Casual dress code Telecommuting benefits Join us in our journey to transform the future of brain health! Mindstrong is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity employer that celebrates diversity. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants. All individuals seeking employment at Mindstrong are considered without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, gender identity, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local laws. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment. Mindstrong also strives for a safe and robust workplace and prohibits harassment of any kind. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation for interviewing, please let us know by emailing contact-recruiting@mindstronghealth.com",3.5,"Mindstrong
3.5",California,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2014,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
88,Data Scientist,$88k-$147k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you believe that creators should have the ability to get paid for the value they give to their fans?

We do, which is why we're building Patreon, a platform that powers membership services for creators with established followings. Patreon strives to provide creators with insight, education, and tools that make it possible to retain creative control while running their creative business, so creators can focus on creating and energizing their fanbases.

Our creator base has doubled in the last year alone, and we have paid over a billion dollars directly to creators on our platform. To support this growth, Patreon is looking for a Data Scientist.

The Patreon Data Science team makes it easy to make Patreon better. We work fast and emphasize impact. We inform product, team, and company strategy with data-driven research and analytics. Our work culture is highly autonomous. We believe that hiring smart, ambitious people and giving them strong ownership of their work leads to the best results. Your work will ensure that teams at Patreon have the data they need to make great decisions about what to build next.

What you will do:
Shape Patreon product strategy within internationalization, payments and tax by analyzing product performance, counseling our product teams on defining success criteria, designing experiments, and measuring product efficacy
Partner with teams across Patreon to inform strategy and evaluate success
Build a culture of data-driven decision making at Patreon
Dive into data to illuminate trends and answer key questions about our users
Constantly improve our team practices and efficiency
Work with people from all walks of life
Skills and experience you possess:
You have 3+ years experience helping product teams make great decisions with data
You have solid analytical thinking -- you ask the right questions and can frame data correctly
You are an expert querying large datasets
You are fluent in Python and relevant data libraries (pandas, numpy), and know how to manipulate data in Excel
You have a strong understanding of experimentation and statistical analysis
You can crisply communicate complicated information in charts and dashboards
You are an expert communicator with a love for clarity
Projects you may work on:
International: Working with our International team to evaluate currency success and language success of new markets through analysis, experimentation, and modeling. Partnering with the go-to-market team to evaluate product marketing opportunities
Tax: Working with our payments team to understand the product impacts of VAT & VAT collection
Payments: Working with our payments team on implementing, measuring and iterating on a simplified billing cycle
What you will have the chance to learn:
Payments data science and partnering with payments product teams best practices
What it looks like to internationalize a product used by millions of people around the world
Advanced technical skills in SQL and Python, data visualization, and data infrastructure
Learn from an energetic Data Science team full of passion for our product, and teams of Product Managers, Designers and Engineers who are building the product
*Our data team works with a mix of Redshift, MySQL, Python, R, Excel, Tableau, and Amplitude.

Who you'll work with:

At Patreon, you'll join a high-performing and highly-empathetic team of people who proudly work on fulfilling our mission of funding the creative class. Our culture of creator-first, thoughtful teammates keeps work creative, stretching, and rewarding.

Our Core Behaviors:
Put Creators First. Patreon is nothing without our creators.
Achieve Ambitious Outcomes. Set, measure, and accomplish goals that deliver massive value to our creators and patrons.
Cultivate Inclusion. We want an environment that retains and engages the diverse teams we build.
Bias Towards Action. When in doubt, we take the next best step, then course correct when needed. We go out of our way to fix problems when we see them. We take ownership seriously.
Be Candid and Kind. Be extremely caring and extremely direct in all you do at Patreon, especially when it comes to giving positive and constructive feedback.
Be Curious. You don't know it all, and that's the fun part. Everything gets better when you're curious. Things get more interesting, more clear, and more approachable. When you bring curiosity into the workplace, you're growing yourself, your teammates, and Patreon as a whole.
Want to learn more about Patreon?
Check out our reviews on Glassdoor
Check to see if you know a Patreon teammate on LinkedIn",3.2,"Patreon
3.2","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Publishing,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
89,Data Engineer - AWS,$93k-$165k (Glassdoor Est.),"sdg is a high performance software community. sdg consultants build and deliver custom software for some of the largest and most recognizable local and national brands. In this role you will be asked to leverage your current skills and learn new ones. Working in over 400 different technologies and continually learning together, you can expect a one-of-a-kind and award winning work experience.

If you have proven experience working with AWS in a handful of the following, we want to hear from you.

•Design and development of relational and non-relational databases, data warehouses and data lakes
oRDS
oAWS DynamoDB, AWS SimpleDB
oAmazon Redshift
oAWS DB Migration Service
•Development, monitoring and maintenance of data integration and processing tools and pipelines
oAWS Glue, AWS Data Pipeline
oAWS Data Pipeline, AWS Glue
•Design and testing of machine learning and data science tools, including the building and deployment of data models
oAmazon EMR
•Implementation of high-capacity, real-time data streaming technologies
o AWS Kinesis Analytics, AWS Lambda
•Data analysis and visualization tools
oAWS QuickSight
oAmazon Athena
•Leveraging non-database data storage alternatives to maximize performance, costs and data quality
oAWS S3
oAWS ElastiCache
oAWS CloudSearch
•Familiarity with security and security policies within AWS

bonus experience

Bachelor's Degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes

what's in it for you?

Full-time salaried position with sdg, a 10-time Best Place to Work
Engaged teammates who care about quality solutions
Challenging and rewarding work with great customers
Abundant opportunities to give back to the community
A company proven to make decisions based on its core values
A true stake in success as sdg is an ESOP, 100% employee owned
Year-round technology and social events to stay sharp and have fun
Membership in the best technology community in the Twin Cities",4.9,"Solution Design Group
4.9","Golden Valley, MN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
90,Data Scientist,$80k-$130k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


JM&A Group is one of the largest independent providers of finance and insurance (F&I) products in the automotive industry. For nearly 40 years, the company has helped automobile dealers achieve unsurpassed levels of performance. JM&A Group provides more than 3,800 dealerships with a variety of products and services, such as new and used vehicle protection plans, pre-paid maintenance plans and GAP protection programs. Among JM&A Group’s competitive advantages is its robust training and consulting services for F&I professionals, and the company is actively evolving to meet consumer preferences to remain a market leader and a partner of choice.

Job Description


JM&A, a division of JM Family Enterprises, Inc., is looking for an experienced Data Scientist to join its Customer Services Admin team. The Data Scientist will partner with stakeholders from various business functions to identify data science opportunities, have the knowledge, experience and technical skills to leverage internal and external data, and apply the right machine learning/big data technologies to turn such data into valuable insights and solutions for the company. The candidate will be tasked with gathering and integrating large volumes of data to develop complex predictive / machine learning models to drive actionable results and insights especially in the areas of fraud / anomaly detection, claims automation / self service and general efficiency opportunities. This is a highly visible and impactful role where the Data Scientist will interact with the senior and executive level management and have the opportunity to influence what we do and how we do it through data science.

Responsibilities:
Create a collaborative and effective working relationship with functional leaders to understand business problems, identify opportunities / use cases to improve the performance of our businesses
Lead / Contribute to the development of actionable solutions. This includes all aspects of the solution development including problem and goal definition, defining a plan for:
Sampling of the data and conducting experiments
Data extraction
Ingestion and processing (outlier and missing data handling)
Exploratory data analysis
Feature engineering (weight of evidence, label encoding, label count encoding, target encoding, time-series, polynomial interactions, binning, outlier handling)
Feature selection (forward, backwards, information value)
Hyperparameter optimization of machine learning models
Experiment tracking for A/B testing and reproducibility, model evaluation, model interpretability, results communication and deployment
Contribute to the adoption and better understanding across the company of data science best practices and tools and stay up to date regarding new knowledge and developments in this domain
#LI-JD1

Job Requirements
Core skills in Computer Science: Data Structures, Algorithms, Programming Paradigms and Relational Databases
Deep working experience applying statistics and machine learning techniques to real-world problems and data and deploying models to production
Hands-on experience with SQL and tools to access databases
Expertise in Python and R
Expertise with open source data mining/machine learning/big data programming libraries, models and frameworks (e.g. Pandas, Scikit-Learn, H2O, TSFresh, FeatureTools, MLflow, Shap, Microsoft Interpret, Tensorflow, Statsmodels, Pandas-Profiling, Seaborn, Plotly, Spark, Koalas)
Working experience with cloud computing services such as AWS, Microsoft Azure or Google Cloud Platform
Excellent presentation skills to non-technical Associates communicating complex concepts in terms the audience can understand through understandable language, tables and visualizations
When evaluating the candidate, special attention will be paid to the following competencies:
Intellectual Curiosity and Critical Thinking, necessary to analyze a problem from multiple perspectives and examine the interrelationships between data that may appear superficially unrelated
Autonomous, to own projects end-to-end; ability to work on the entire stack without being dependent on other team members
Focus, to design and test a technique over days and weeks, find it doesn’t work, learn from the failure, and try again
Creativity, to invent and try new approaches to solving a problem
Attention to Detail, in order to maintain rigor and to detect and avoid over-reliance on intuition when examining data
Clear and concise written and oral communication, in order to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear and precise manner
Interpersonal skills, necessary to build good working relationships and work as part of a team
PhD or Masters in Computer Science, Statistics, Computer Science, Math or a related discipline or equivalent skill set",3.8,"JM&A Group
3.8","Deerfield Beach, FL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1978,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
91,Data Scientist,$107k-$175k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description:

Hyundai Motor Groupis at the forefront of creating emerging mobility solutions that will foster
the development of human-centered cities. The Group’s Urban Air Mobility
Division is designing a completely new electric vertical take-off and landing
(eVTOL) aircraft tailored to the mobility needs of future cities, allowing
passengers a seamless intermodal journey that safely transports them to their
final destination. We fuse research in autonomy, robotics, aviation and
services to define a new category of mobility for the world’s communities. We
believe in creative thinking and collaboration to help build a better mobility
experience for everyone, improving people’s ability to move – whether for work
or play.

Role Overview:

The Hyundai Urban Air Mobility Division is looking for our very first Data Scientist. This position requires a seasoned professional with experience in delivering a comprehensive data science solution including algorithm development as well as the data management / pipeline of a very complex systems all the way to enterprise. The ideal candidate exhibits a can-do attitude and approaches their work with vigor and determination.

Responsibilities:
Develop of AI algorithms, data management, and data pipeline
Develop and execute data platform strategy for Urban Air Mobility system
Work closely with key stakeholders including engineering team, program management, strategy, finance, business operations, and external partners
Provide guidance to executive leadership team on critical technology decisions
Define and maintain progress metrics to keep team and management up-to-date on status, KPIs, risk, and mitigation plans
Work with Systems Architecture, Design, and Engineering teams to define technology roadmap and scope development efforts
Identify, evaluate, qualify, select, and manage third-party development firms to augment and scale the core team
Lead team to efficiently deliver high quality code and features on-time and on-budget
Required Experience:
Master of Science in Mathematics, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, or other related field; PhD preferred
Experience designing a measurement strategy to evaluate the performance of complex systems against challenging requirements
Experience developing data science platforms, tool-chains, and workflows in Python, R, or equivalent general programming languages
Demonstrated ability to distill data-driven insights through informative visualizations & executive level communications
Experience with experimental design loops for integrated SW/HW systems
Experience with statistics of rare events, rare event modeling, and long tail distributions
Deep understanding of statistics and/or applied math as basis for choosing techniques & experiments
Experience working in an Agile software development process
Demonstrated experience developing and implementing product delivery best practices
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience with electric batteries, avionics systems, and other aircraft systems
Experience working with regulatory agencies
Candidates
applying for positions with the UAM division must be legally authorized to work
in the United States. Verification of employment eligibility will be required
at the time of hire. Hyundai America Technical Center, Inc. (HATCI) is an Equal
Opportunity Employer included Disabled and Veteran. VEVRAA Federal contractor.

This position includes access to technology
and/or software source code that is subject to U.S. export controls. We will not consider applicants for this
position for whom an export license will be required.

Keyword: Data Scientist
From: Hyundai Kia America Technical Center, Inc. (HATCI)
Apply now",2.8,"Hyundai America Technical Center
2.8","Mountain View, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1986,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
92,Data Scientist,$96k-$161k (Glassdoor Est.),"SummaryProvide data management and statistical analysis in Big Data environment. Assist in development of tools and processes to manage, integrate and synthesize large data sets and deliver business rules and recommendations to functional business units and product managers

Responsibilities and Duties

Perform analyses, development and provide data mining in a large data warehouse environment which includes data design, database architecture, Meta data and repository creation.

Extensive use data mining and data analysis tools.

Review and validate data loaded into the data warehouse for accuracy

Provide technical consulting to users of data warehouses and advises users on conflicts and inappropriate data usage

Gather and assess business information needs and prepare system requirements

Interact with user community to develop and produce reporting requirements

Responsible for prototyping solutions, preparing test scripts, and conducting tests and for data replication, extraction, loading, cleansing, and data modeling for data warehouses

Maintain knowledge of software tools, languages, scripts, and shells that effectively support the data warehouse environment in different operating system environments

Make recommendations towards the development of new code or reuse of existing code.

Responsibilities may also include participation in component and data architecture design, performance monitoring, product evaluation and buy versus build recommendations

#LI-JS1

Requirements

7+ years of programming/systems analysis experience

5+ years of experience with business intelligence and stat tools and systems

Strong experience in Relational Database Management Systems (RDBMS) and data warehouse front-end tools

Extensive knowledge of data warehouse and data mart concepts

Experience in systems analysis and design

Solid understanding of development, quality assurance and integration methodologies

BS in Computer Science, IS, or other related field. Or equivalent work experience

Technical Skills Required

Stat & Data Tools "" Python, Machine Learning, SQL, Spark, Data Visualization
Data & Cloud Tools "" Hadoop, AWS Big Data Stack (S3, Spark, Lambda, Presto, Athena, Kinesis, Redshift)
Scripting Tools "" Linux/Unix, Shell Scripts",3.2,"Numeric, LLC
3.2","Philadelphia, PA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
93,Data Scientist,$120k-$138k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist


at Brightidea
San Francisco

The Role

We are seeking machine learning developers with natural language processing experience.

In general, we are looking for people who are self-motivated and passionate about the field of machine learning and the vast applications of it. These folks will have the ability to work with / understand / and build on top of an existing code base using their deep knowledge of various machine learning algorithms (e.g. neural networks, bayesian methods, etc).

Key responsibilities include, but not limited to:
Build on top of an existing text processing/classification system
Write, maintain, and develop python machine learning modules & repos
Run hyperparameter optimizations + collect, analyze, visualize, and present results
What You Need to Succeed
BS or MS in computer science, mathematics, physics or other hard science/engineering discipline
Programming in Python ~ 2+ years
Numpy, scipy, pandas, Jupyter, and scikit-learn background
Data visualization (e.g. matplotlib, seaborn, bokeh, mpld3, etc)
Ability to implement machine learning algorithms from scratch
Experience with full machine learning pipeline: from data preprocessing, to building/training various models, to hyperparameter optimization, testing, and visualization of results.
Background in deep learning preferred but not required
In Your Application Please Include
A past machine learning project you worked on in which highlights your skills, including: What tools/models did you use? What were some problems you encountered along the way, and how did you solve them?
What Brightidea Offers
Market competitive salary and significant equity in a well-funded, growing company
A chance to impact human creativity
Generous vacation and holidays
Top-notch benefits (healthcare, vision, dental, maternity, paternity, retirement)
A unique opportunity to use your leadership skills, experience, and contacts to build a team and shape the culture of the company.
An incredible team of fun, humble but brilliant co-workers
Background

Helping large companies innovate isn’t easy, but it is vital. Vital to creating new jobs, vital to igniting growth, vital to ensuring a safe, healthy and prosperous future for billions around the globe.

But, innovation at large companies is a mess. Employees often have lots of ideas to improve the business, but, with no formal process, their ideas go unheard, and they eventually give up trying to make a difference. Corporate innovation teams are expected to support a growing list of activities but have historically lacked strong tools designed for the job. Executives, despite having millions to invest, live in fear of disruption, and still have no idea where their “next big idea” will come from, or if it will come at all.

At Brightidea, we’ve built a software platform that’s solving these problems. We’ve been helping organizations be more efficient with the 1.5 trillion dollars invested in R&D annually.

Our Company & Culture

We are a tight-knit, entrepreneurial minded team of self-starters who show up every day with a singular mission: to create a world where the best ideas win. Our primary focus this year is to continue to add exceptionally talented and motivated individuals to the Brightidea team. We are ambitious, bold, highly-collaborative, focused, and we aim to win. We take a humble approach to changing the way corporate R&D teams run innovation challenges.

Anyone joining our company will have the opportunity to shape the culture and be an integral part of setting it up for long term success. If you identify with being humble, T-shaped, and relentlessly resourceful then this could be the perfect team for you to shine in.

Brightidea believes that everyone has the ability to make a difference and that a diverse team generates more innovation and bigger ideas. Just as our product invites organizations to crowd source innovation across their workforce, Brightidea is inclusive and does not discriminate. We accept everybody.",4.3,"Brightidea
4.3","San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
94,Data Scientist,-1,"Corvus is reimagining commercial insurance with data science and machine learning playing a critical role. Data Scientists at Corvus are a key component of our mission to find and use alternative sources of data that can help our clients mitigate risk and make the world a safer place.

We're looking for a full-stack data scientist who isn't intimidated by the prospect of working with large, messy data sets. You'll play a critical role in defining how data science can solve business problems, and will be responsible for the full data science life cycle, including defining the problem, prototyping data pipelines and building and implementing data science and machine learning products into client facing systems. Reporting to the Director of Data Science, this is a new and highly visible role in which you'll work closely with Product Managers, Software Engineers, and Underwriters to expand the reach and impact of our data products.

Responsibilities
Apply quantitative methods to solve complex data problems involving cyber risk modeling, natural language processing for industry classification, litigation risk measurement, etc
Translate product ideas into data science problems, and solve them
Prototype tools and data pipelines to extract meaningful insight from innovative sources of data
Clearly communicate analysis and train stakeholders to use our data products
Work close with engineers to deploy and monitor Data Science Products
Teach and mentor other Corvids to further our data driven culture
Qualifications
6+ years of experience as a Data Scientist
A background working in cyber security or insurance is required
Deep expertise in machine learning and statistical modeling
Proven track record of rapid prototyping and development leveraging open source frameworks
Experience with Python, R or other similar scripting languages",4.8,"Corvus Insurance
4.8",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2017,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
95,Data Scientist,-1,"Minimum Qualifications
Master's degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g., Statistics, Operations Research, Bioinformatics, Economics, Computational Biology, Computer Science, Mathematics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, Industrial Engineering) or equivalent practical experience.
Having 2 years of work experience in a data analysis related field.
Experience with statistical software (e.g., R, Python, MATLAB, pandas) and database languages (e.g., SQL)
Preferred Qualifications
Having a Ph.D. degree in a quantitative discipline.
4 years of relevant work experience, including expertise with statistical data analysis such as linear models, multivariate analysis, stochastic models, sampling methods.
Having applied experience with machine learning on large datasets.
Experience articulating and translating business questions and using statistical techniques to arrive at an answer using available data.
Demonstrated leadership and self-direction. Willingness to both teach others and learn new techniques.
Demonstrated skills in selecting the right statistical tools given a data analysis problem. Effective written and verbal communication skills.
About The Job

As a Data Scientist, you will evaluate and improve LogicPlum's products. You will collaborate with a multi-disciplinary team of scientists and analysts on a wide range of problems. This position will bring scientific rigor and statistical methods to the challenges of product creation, development, and improvement with an appreciation for the behaviors of the end-user.

LogicPlum is and always will be an artificial intelligence company. We hire people with a broad set of technical skills who are ready to take on some of technology's most significant challenges and make a substantial impact on the businesses it supports. At LogicPlum, data scientists not only revolutionize practicality of solutions, they routinely work on the scalability of solutions, a variety of data problems, and entirely new methods of solving problems with our platforms. From tabular data to image data, text data to clustering, anomaly detection to time-series, LogicPlum Data Scientists are changing the world one technological achievement after another.

Responsibilities
Work with large, complex data sets. Solve difficult, non-routine analysis problems, applying advanced analytical methods as needed. Conduct analysis that includes data gathering and requirements specification, processing, analysis, ongoing deliverables, and presentations.
Build and prototype analysis pipelines iteratively to provide insights at scale. Develop comprehensive knowledge of LogicPlum data structures and metrics, advocating for changes where needed for product development.
Interact cross-functionally, making business recommendations (e.g., cost-benefit, forecasting, experiment analysis) with effective presentations of findings at multiple levels of stakeholders through visual displays of quantitative information.
Research and develop analysis, forecasting, and optimization methods to improve the quality of LogicPlum's user-facing products.",-1,Logic Plum,"Franklin, TN",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
96,Data Scientist,-1,"About Us:


We make software that anyone can mold and shape to take on every challenge from taking personal notes to running large companies. We've been building together since 2016 and are trusted by customers including Nike, Airbnb, Slack, Samsung, and more. We're excited to be growing a team as diverse and creative as the millions of people we reach worldwide, and a company where everyone can thrive.

About The Role:


Do you want to help define what data means at Notion? As one of our first Data Scientists, you'll be instrumental in setting what our data strategy looks like as we grow the business, and then doing the hands on work to execute against it. There will be significant variation from one day to the next, but whether you're exploring what a successful Notion account looks like, building out a core activity data set, or creating a model to deliver leads to the sales team, you'll absolutely be having impact on the direction of the business.

What You'll Do:
You'll set the foundation for what data means at Notion, determining how we balance product intuition with analytical rigor.
You'll build data pipelines that transform messy raw data into tables that are reliable, broadly useful, and clear. (We currently use DBT, Snowflake, Mode Analytics, Fivetran, Census, Amplitude, Segment, and more).
You'll collaborate with team leads across the business to understand and support their data needs.
You'll design and enact the process for using statistical inference to evaluate the success of changes, from product launches to marketing campaigns.
You'll build models to understand and predict things like user growth, product engagement, conversion, churn, and more.
You'll build and maintain KPI dashboards that teams rely on for making key decisions.
You'll communicate your findings with the rest of the company, and drive and verify change in our product and business (Insights are useful. Impact is even better!)
What We're Looking For:


You've spent meaningful time as a data scientist.
You are a SQL expert. You have no problem regularly leveraging window functions, UDFs, self-joins, and other complex SQL functions to accomplish your data analysis goals.
You have expertise in at least one scripting language (ideally Python or R).
You know how to use statistical inference to drive product and business recommendations.
You have experience building predictive models, and you know how to evaluate their effectiveness.
You have a bias for using the right tools to get a job done with maximum efficiency. You have experience making tradeoffs between speed and accuracy.
You have strong product sense and user intuition which inform the questions you ask of the data you are analyzing.
Bonus Points:


You have led or managed a Data Science team.
You have led initiatives across multiple product areas and communicated findings with leadership and product teams.
You have worked at a fast-growing start-up.
You have experience building out data infrastructure that facilitates speed, reliability, and scalability.
You have prior experience with data-distributed tools (Scalding, Hadoop, Pig, etc) and statistical libraries.",5.0,"Notion
5.0","San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
97,Data Scientist,$59k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Summary:

Domo is changing the way Executives manage their business. Pivotal within the most innovative business management platform. As a Data Scientist at Domo, you will help implement the applicable big data systems and help create and implement algorithms in relevant statistical inference.

Team Culture:

Work – Are you someone who has ideas and will stop at nothing until those ideas are made a reality?

Fight – Domo looks for individuals who can drive their own ideas forward and who can also support the initiatives within their team.

Innovate – Are you someone that can’t stand the status-quo? Do you improve upon the ideas of others?

Create – Like to build? Do you have a creative drive? Domo has a culture that embraces creativity.

Serve – We’re all about the customer. We expect you to be relentless in your defense of the customer experience. We’ll do the same.

Key Responsibilities:

Understand existing business flow and website features, dive into the underlying data, apply relevant Data Mining techniques and/or Machine Learning algorithms and propose data analytic product to improve the website intelligence
Implement the applicable Machine Learning or statistics-based algorithm for prediction and optimization and deliver the trained model to production
Create and implement algorithms in relevant statistical inference, graph, and network analysis, natural language processing with open source tools and libraries.
Design, build and support algorithms of data transformation, conversion, computation on Hadoop, Spark and other distributed Big Data Systems
Design and support efficient storage and retrieval of Big Data

Job Requirements:

Bachelor’s Degree. (Preferred Masters Degree or above in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, Math, or similar quantitative field) or equivalent work experience
5+ years of professional experience with machine learning, statistical analysis, predictive modeling, and time series analysis.
Strong data discovery, visualization, and analysis skills.
Experience with big data using technologies like Spark, Hadoop, Pig, and Hive.
Previous hands-on exposure to statistical software packages like R, SciPy, Matlab, SPSS, SAS).
Experience with a variety of relevant data manipulation languages (Python, Java, SQL)
Comfort with working in a Linux environment.
A genuine desire to organize data and make it accessible with the technical skills to bring your ideas to reality
An enjoyment in working with teammates to produce quality outcomes.",4.4,"Domo, Inc.
4.4","American Fork, UT",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2010,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
98,Data Scientist,$100k-$160k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you love developing creative solutions to challenging problems?

Are you passionate about providing real impact to the countrys toughest national security problems?

Are you searching for engaging work with an employer that prioritizes continual innovation?

If so, we are looking for someone like you to join our team at APL.

The Large-Scale Analytics Group (QAS) develops software systems that incorporate artificial intelligence (AI) and machine learning (ML) algorithms on big data platforms and graph databases as well as visual analytics to find details hidden deep within large and complex data sets. We support multiple agencies within the US Government by applying innovative analytics to uncover activities such as epidemic hotspots, illegal activities, international trade fraud, illicit manufacturing of weapons of mass destruction, and cyber-crime. You will implement and apply computationally tractable solutions and corresponding data architectures to address the needs of our sponsors. We are seeking a confident leader, creative thinker, motivated problem solver, standout colleague, and life-long learner that wants to strengthen the safety and security of our country. You will join a hardworking team in an inclusive environment that cultivates intellectual curiosity, innovation and creativity.

As a Data Scientist you will...
Primarily design creative AI and ML algorithms as well as analytic pipelines for analyzing large-scale and complex data.
Develop data architectures using technologies like Hadoop, Spark, and distributed graphs to support analytic algorithms.
Build software applications and perform analytics on complex data.
Clearly present results to both JHU/APL and Sponsor leadership.
Potentially travel locally to sponsor sites on an occasional basis.
You meet our minimum qualifications for this position if you
Possess a B.S. in Computer Science, Information Science, Mathematics, Physics, Operations Research, or a related discipline. 1-5 years of experience.
Have experience with statistics, machine learning algorithms, or general algorithm development.
Have a knowledge of modern large-scale data systems and architectures.
Possess solid software development skills.
Exhibit excellent social skills, the ability to work independently, excellent written and oral communications skills, and good organizational skills.
Are able to obtain a Secret level clearance. If selected, you will be subject to a government security clearance investigation and meet the requirements for access to classified information. Eligibility requirements include U.S. citizenship.
Youll go above and beyond our minimum requirements if you
Have a M.S. or Ph.D. in the disciplines listed above, and have working knowledge of state-of-the-art large-scale data approaches and architectures. e.g. experience with quantum algorithms.
Are experienced with software engineering processes and techniques.
Why Work at APL?

The Johns Hopkins University Applied Physics Laboratory (APL) brings world-class expertise to our nations most critical defense, security, space and science challenges. While we are dedicated to solving complex challenges and pioneering new technologies, what makes us truly outstanding is our culture. We offer a vibrant, welcoming atmosphere where you can bring your authentic self to work, continue to grow, and build strong connections with inspiring teammates.

At APL, we celebrate our differences and encourage creativity and bold, new ideas. Our employees enjoy generous benefits, including a robust education assistance program, unparalleled retirement contributions, and a healthy work/life balance. APLs campus is located in the Baltimore-Washington metro area. Learn more about our career opportunities at www.jhuapl.edu/careers.",4.6,"Johns Hopkins University Applied Physics Laboratory
4.6","Laurel, MD",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1942,Nonprofit Organization,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
99,Data Scientist,$93k-$149k (Glassdoor Est.),"The emerging next-generation pharmaceutical supply chain is characterized by the orchestration of collaborating, networked stakeholders working to the common goal of delivering pharmaceutical products to patients on-time and in-full. TraceLink is leading that transformation by leveraging the benefits of big data and cloud technologies realized through advanced algorithms, data science, and analytics. We are extending our core data science team that is responsible for delivering innovative data science solutions to our customers. The ideal candidate is an experienced data science innovator capable of methodically producing performant solutions subject to business constraints. Experience that extends back into data engineering and data collection and forward into product realization within a cloud environment is highly desirable.

Collaboratively identify data science opportunities that support business and product goals
Propose, develop, evaluate, and perfect specific data science solutions
Modify solutions to address application constraints
Integrate modified solutions into cloud-based product offerings
Communicate results and ideas to business leaders

Analytical, data-driven, inquisitive mindset with a bias toward precision
Superb written and oral technical communication skills
Learn quickly especially within computer technologies and mathematical concepts
Proficiency in mathematics, statistical analysis, and software development
Proficiency in data science environments, tools, and technologies
Broad knowledge of data science techniques
Ability to distinguish applicability of alternatives
Understanding of the relative performance of competing techniques
Develop, evaluate, perfect, and implement data science solutions
Clean, enhance, profile, and mine structured and unstructured data
Identify and integrate data repositories from internal and external sources
Optimize and test estimators
Perform experimental analysis and validate results
Communicate trustworthy and objective results
Implement analytical models into production by collaborating with software developers and machine learning engineers.
Valuable Additional Skills and Experience
Formal training in data science or related disciplines such as mathematics, engineering, or computer science
Experience with big data cloud technologies especially Amazon offerings
Experience with software engineering tools and processes (agile software development)
Proficiency with MSOffice and Google G Suite tools
Experience with Java, Scala, javascript, SQL, Python, R, XML, yaml, JSON, shell scripting
Proficiency with applied mathematics such as probability and statistics, stochastic systems, queueing theory, optimization, control theory, and adaptive systems.",3.9,"TraceLink,Inc.
3.9","North Reading, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
100,Data Scientist,$86k-$140k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Details
Level
Experienced
Job Location
Irving, TX - , TX
Position Type
Full Time
Education Level
Graduate Degree
Salary Range
Undisclosed
Travel Percentage
Negligible
Job Shift
Undisclosed
Job Category
Science
Description

Title: Data Scientist

Position Summary:

Caris Life Sciences is looking for a sharp, driven and goal-oriented Data Scientist to provide data mining and analysis support for novel discovery in digital imaging, machine learning/artificial intelligent, NGS datamining. The candidate will be responsible for developing algorithm for image analysis, pattern finding, prediction as well as developing and maintaining pipelines for streamline processing. The successful candidate will possess proficient analytical capability, solid scientific background in mathematics, and strong communication skills. We are looking for team oriented, hands on experts with a passion for personalized medicine and innovation in statistical and mathematical analyses.

Job Responsibilities:

Developing and validating tools for digital image processing and analysis.
Tasked with developing, implementing, refining, and testing algorithms and workflows to achieve the specific goal in the project.
Statistical support for design and development of quality control process for diagnostic assays and products.
Manipulate and process large multisource data sets.
Respond to and manage ad hoc requests to ensure accurate, in-depth results/data are delivered in a timely manner.
Review clinical study reports for statistical content.
Provide general informatics support for laboratory research, technology development and clinical studies.
Adhere to coding and documentation standards and manage deliverables for area of responsibility.

Requirements:

Ph.D. in Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering or a related field with exposure to cancer biology.
Familiar with deep learning methods and algorithms, imaging processing or language processing.
Ability to understand biological/pathological questions and formulate statistical and data analysis methods to provide solution to novel problems.
Ability to query complex data from database.
Experience in developing database and data-driven applications.
Proficient verbal and written communication skills to explain complex technical details in clear language.
Proficiency in R, Python, Mongo, SQL and Linux.
Commitment to the successful achievement of team and organizational goals through a desire to participate with and help other members of the team.
Demonstrate a focus on listening to and understanding user needs and then delighting the customer by exceeding service and quality expectations.
Interested parties should use the link to apply and email their resume to Dana Gingerich at dgingerich@carisls.com. #LI-DG1",3.0,"Caris Life Sciences
3.0","Irving, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
101,Data Scientist,$81k-$132k (Glassdoor Est.),"CGG is a fully integrated Geoscience company providing leading geological, geophysical and reservoir capabilities.

Job Description

CGG is currently looking for a creative and results-focused individual who enjoys working on open-ended problems. Your customers are world-class seismic imagers who strive to image the subsurface with a high degree of accuracy and resolution. Your challenge is to analyze the computational activities and demands of seismic imaging and, with your insights, propose solutions and applications for realms widely ranging from resource scheduling and allocations to automation of imaging-related computations in our HPC environment. In a nutshell, we expect you to propose solutions to known problems and also identify new areas where you can add value with your expertise.

We want people who can work with a team to decide what to look for, and who also have the technical ability to go get it. Interest in data mining and machine learning is key, since these are the two areas where you may specialize. You will participate as an engineer on a development team, writing, testing, and deploying code to achieve your goals. We want you if you are an independent thinker and capable of analyzing requirements, extracting data for analysis, and developing algorithms and tools. We process seismic data at the petascale and warehouse information at the terascale. The stakes are high, but your impact can be higher.

Must have current U.S. work authorization or qualify for sponsorship

Qualifications

Ph.D.in Computer Science, Math, Statistics, Physics or a closely related field but an equivalent combination of educationand experience will be considered
Proven Machine Learning experience
Professional experience with Deep Learning Neural Network building
Demonstrated experience with Deep Learning Framework such as Tensorflow and Keras
Experience and/or education in at least one of the fields of Big Data, Data Mining, Predictive/Prescriptive Analytics, Optimization, Exploratory Analysis & Visualization
Knowledge of relational databases, data modeling, and schema normalization techniques
Familiar with SQL
Passion for solving complex data engineering and modeling tasks
Ability to perform testing based on different hypotheses to determine the impact on key performance indicators
Excellent analytical skills and the ability to work in a collaborative team environment

Preferred:

Experience in programming (high performance computing is a plus) and developing databases
Knowledge and experience with UNIX (Linux), Java, and XML
Knowledge of Perl, R, and Spark
Expertise in designing and implementing efficient algorithms

We wish to thank all applicants for their interest; however, only those candidates selected for an interview will be contacted. EOE

Our focus on performance and passion for innovation are powered by people

Our greatest resource is you

Additional Information

All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.

I'm interested",3.4,"CGG
3.4","Houston, TX",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1931,Company - Private,Oil & Gas Services,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
102,Data Scientist,$92k-$150k (Glassdoor Est.),"Come Join Analog Devices – a place where Innovation meets Impact. For the past 50 years, Analog Devices has been inventing innovative technologies that transform lives. Get hands-on experience working with the brightest minds to solve complex problems that matter: from autonomous vehicles, drones and factories to augmented reality to remote healthcare. Enjoy a culture that values aligned goals, balanced work-life priorities, continuous learning throughout your career and shared rewards. At ADI, we invest in you and succeed together because we believe that happy, healthy, intellectually-challenged people drive our growth and market leadership.

ADI at a Glance

ADI helps customers bridge the physical and digital worlds with unmatched technologies that solve real-life problems and make the world smarter, healthier, greener and safer. With over $5 billion in revenue, ADI specializes in high-performance analog, mixed-signal, power, and digital signal processing (DSP) integrated circuits that sense, measure, interpret, connect, power, secure and transform how the world experiences the world around them.

Analog Devices Global Operations & Technology, Software Systems organization is looking for a college hire in a new and evolving data analytics group.

Responsibilities:

Statistical and Quantitative Analysis of information within the Semiconductor Manufacturing and Engineering problem domains.
Data visualization especially for data discovery and exploration.
Software design and development, including Data Structure and Database implementation.
Create and maintain data sets for machine learning training/verification/testing
Create and maintain productionized machine learning models

Qualifications:

BS Degree in Computer Science (or whatever you would require)
Familiarity with R, Python, SQL
Experience with data cleansing/transformation, feature engineering, statistical analysis, data visualization, and data mining.
Experience creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms and statistics: logistic regression, classification, clustering, and anomaly detection. Experience with neural networks a plus.
Experience creating models in AWS SageMaker (or other equivalent Cloud offering) a plus.
Good communication skills. Able to work with key stakeholders in understanding and identifying the business requirements and needs and then explaining analytical results in a way that is relevant for business partners.

For positions requiring access to technical data, Analog Devices, Inc. may have to obtain export licensing approval from the U.S. Department of Commerce - Bureau of Industry and Security and/or the U.S. Department of State - Directorate of Defense Trade Controls. As such, applicants for this position – except US Citizens, US Permanent Residents, and protected individuals as defined by 8 U.S.C. 1324b(a)(3) – may have to go through an export licensing review process.

Analog Devices, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Females/Vet/Disability

EEO is the Law: Notice of Applicant Rights Under the Law

Education Level: Bachelor's Degree
Travel Required: No",3.9,"Analog Devices
3.9","Wilmington, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1965,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
103,Data Scientist,$80k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist | Acorns

At Acorns, we're building a financial wellness system that enables everyday Americans to save and invest every day. We are transforming the category and recruiting a team that is relentless at fulfilling our mission. The Acorns team comes together every day to deliver a revolutionary product to its customers, the up-and-coming. If you thrive in an environment where you can push yourself beyond all previous thresholds of possibility, come join us at Acorns.

Acorns is actively seeking a motivated, detail-oriented, and solution-focused Data Scientist. This position will reside in the Data Science group, which serves as the central data science team for the company. The team is responsible for developing and using mathematical modeling, data mining, and machine learning techniques to be agents for good by helping look after the financial best interests of the up-and-coming.

The Acorns Data Science group is focused on solving problems that directly affect customers, including recommendation engines, fraud prevention, and customer intention inference. But these aren’t Kaggle-type problems; we operate with urgency and often with imperfect data. We know that solving problems with data is an art and a science. Data Scientists at Acorns are as good at communicating and collaborating as they are at building models and writing code.

At Acorns, Data Scientists have broad latitude around data and you will collaborate with groups including: Analytics, Engineering, Product Management, Marketing, Operations, Risk, and Business Development.

This role has the option to be remote or based in our Irvine or New York offices.

Within 1 month, you will:
Learn Acorns products, data warehouse, and how data fits into the products.
Discover new opportunities to apply data science concepts to the portfolio of products.
Present findings to the Data Science team members.
Interact with multiple teams.
Within 3 months, you will:
Have established architecture and implementation for an intelligence-driven product feature in a data-rich environment.
Made production quality code commits into the team’s repository.
Contributed to the broader team’s success by offering ideas and constructive feedback to other team member’s projects.
Proposed novel ML research directions that will eventually power new products.
Within 6 months, you will:
Collaborated with the Product Management team to plan projects and recommend areas for the next generation of Acorns products.
Partnered with Engineering teams to deliver data science solutions into the product with proper API design.
Be able to responsibly represent the Data Science team with other departments.
What you will bring to Acorns:
Empathy for our customers’ financial situations and the desire to help our customers in need of personalized products and services.
The ability to uphold the values of transparency, honesty, and support for the team.
An ability to explain complex problems in a simple way.
Capability to build algorithms that touch statistics and machine learning.
Knowledge of scalable and efficient methods for large scale data analysis and model development.
Pride in your work
Requirements:
BS in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Economics, Physics, Engineering or a related field, or equivalent experience.
3-4+ years experience in working with noisy real world structured and semi-structured data.
Python or Scala, with related statistical and machine learning packages.
Background in data mining, machine learning, statistical analysis, or mathematical modeling, with experience deploying models in a production environment.
Experience with A/B testing methodologies and experiments.
Hunger for impact, drive, and creativity
Strong SQL abilities and experience with massive relational database systems.
Able to take a complex, ambiguous topic and turn it into a defined problem that answers the business question we are trying to solve.
Excellent communication skills
You are not expected to have experience with all listed requirements. If you feel passionately about Acorns' mission, vision and values, please apply.
Bonus
MS or PhD in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Economics, Physics, Engineering or other quantitative field.
Experience writing production quality, version controlled code.
Knowledge of basic macroeconomic concepts.
A belief that your work is tied to your life's mission.
Optimistic about the potential of societal change.
What we offer:
Competitive salary and stock options.
A comprehensive benefits package to meet the needs of you and your family.
Flexible paid time off.
Numerous career possibilities that allow you to grow with Acorns.
Talented and motivated team members who care deeply about one another, our mission and our customers.
The rare opportunity to create a new world. We inspire one another every day to do meaningful work that solves big societal challenges.
About Acorns:

Acorns is the leading micro-investing app in the U.S. It allows users to round up their daily purchases and automatically Invest the Change® into a low-cost, diversified portfolio of exchange-traded funds offered by some of the world's top asset managers (including Vanguard and BlackRock). Founded in Newport Beach, Calif., by father and son team Walter and Jeff Cruttenden, Acorns provides a simple entry-point using the Acorns app on iPhone or Android. Customers accumulate fractional shares in one of five portfolios constructed by world-renowned Nobel Laureate economist Dr. Harry Markowitz. Acorns' smart portfolio algorithms automatically work in the background of life, helping users build wealth naturally, pennies at a time. From Acorns mighty oaks do grow.

Mission:

With benevolence and courage, we look after the financial best interests of the up-and-coming; beginning with the empowering step of micro-investing.

Commitment to Diversity, Equity & Inclusion:

Acorns believes diversity, equity and inclusion are fundamental obligations that strengthen our team. We need a diverse, multi-disciplinary team to build a meaningful company and culture.

Values:
Lead with heart
Make bold decisions
Always build trust
Never stop growing
Find a way",3.1,"Acorns
3.1","Irvine, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Brokerage Services,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
104,"Director, Data Analytics",$81k-$162k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Overview

Outset is a medical technology company pioneering a first-of-its-kind technology to reduce the cost and complexity of dialysis. The Tablo Hemodialysis System, FDA cleared for use from the hospital to the home, represents a significant technological advancement that transforms the dialysis experience for patients and operationally simplifies it for providers. Tablo serves as a single enterprise solution that can be utilized across the continuum of care, allowing dialysis to be delivered anytime, anywhere and by anyone. The integration of water purification and on-demand dialysate production enables Tablo to serve as a dialysis clinic on wheels, with 2-way wireless data transmission and a proprietary data analytics platform powering a new holistic approach to dialysis care.

Position Overview

Outset is looking for a hands-on Director to lead the development of data analytics services across the company. The Director will manage software developers, business analysts, and a tester to develop data analytics services. This person will be responsible for the business analytics, data analytics, data science and the machine learning platform. The Director will collaborate with business leaders, data science teams, product management, program management, and other members across the organization and leadership team of the company to build effective data analytics for Outset.

In this role, you should be passionate about working with massive datasets and be someone who loves to bring useful quality data together to answer business questions. You should have deep expertise in the creation and management of datasets and the proven ability to select the right technologies for the platform to create meaningful insights. The ideal candidate will bring deep expertise in machine learning and data management while enabling organization growth with effective and accurate data. You will need to have in-depth experience with data visualization and expert in presenting insights to engineers to executives in the company.

Ideal candidates must have excellent problem-solving skills, a high degree of attention to detail, strong organizational skills, and a proven track record developing enterprise-grade data analytics. This leadership position is an excellent opportunity to work for a growing medical device startup.

Responsibilities/Functions
Engage with business and customers to understand customer requirements, timeline, resource availability
Technical expert for big data analytics, machine learning
Lead, manage, and execute a company-wide data analytic vision to consistently leverage data, tools, and data quality best practices for optimal business processing, adoption of data, and critical decision making within the Outset.
Team building, stakeholder management, and player/coach skills are essential to delivering business results.
Anticipate new trends and customer needs and find new and innovative ways to solve complex challenges as the team implements its internal and external data initiatives.
Implement end-to-end data solutions, support, and the senior leadership teams in their day to day testing and business needs.
Lead cross-functional teams on projects and partner with business owners in identifying data sources and quality issues and develop a data quality framework
Develop a data platform to support broader business initiatives
Collaborate closely with the analysts and scientists across the organization
Maintain a strong personal base of knowledge of data platform technology, medical industry practices, trends and issues
Play a major role in the direction and strategy of the Outset data engineering roadmap adding critical value to the organization
Lead and mentor team of software developers
Ensure proper policies and procedures are in place
Provide technical direction to the team
Influence technology decisions as a member of our engineering leadership team
Participate in Scrum ceremonies and keep task notes and daily update progress in our ticketing system.
Requirements/Qualifications
BS Degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or related field
Minimum of 12+ years of data analytics platform development
Experience with machine learning and big data technologies
Experience with business intelligence and visualization technology, including Tableau and D3.js
Experience leading diverse cross-functional teams, mentoring and managing stakeholders across business units and technology
Experience leading company-wide data programs, business acumen, and technical expertise in data space, self-service analytics, and data governance processes
Passionate about data quality and love working with business intelligence tools, can partner with business owners to answer critical questions
Analytical, innovative, creative, and disruptive.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative and productive working relationships with people at all levels of Outset; build morale and team spirit among team members
Communicate clearly and effectively both orally and in writing with persons having diverse backgrounds of knowledge and experience; conduct meetings and make professional presentations; teach complex concepts and explain technical material to non-technical users
Conceive and initiate projects; improvise and invent solutions in new, non-standard and unstructured situations
Works well through ambiguity; confidence in making tough calls and leading through adversity with a sharp focus on the eventual right outcomes
Medical device experience is a plus
Must have a proven portfolio of successful projects in areas mentioned above",4.5,"Outset Medical
4.5","San Jose, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
105,Data Scientist,$79k-$129k (Glassdoor Est.),"Nintendo of America Inc.

The worldwide pioneer in the creation of interactive entertainment, Nintendo Co., Ltd., of Kyoto, Japan, manufactures and markets hardware and software for its Nintendo Switch™ system and the Nintendo 3DS™ family of portable systems. Since 1983, when it launched the Nintendo Entertainment System™, Nintendo has sold more than 4.7 billion video games and more than 740 million hardware units globally, including Nintendo Switch and the Nintendo 3DS family of systems, as well as the Game Boy™, Game Boy Advance, Nintendo DS™ family of systems, Super NES™, Nintendo 64™, Nintendo GameCube™, Wii™ and Wii U™ systems. It has also created industry icons that have become well-known, household names, such as Mario, Donkey Kong, Metroid, Zelda and Pokémon. A wholly owned subsidiary, Nintendo of America Inc., based in Redmond, Wash., serves as headquarters for Nintendo’s operations in the Americas. For more information about Nintendo, please visit the company’s website at http://www.nintendo.com.

DESCRIPTION OF DUTIES
Develop and refine
models to predict consumer behavior and help prescribe actions to improve
forecasting, personalization, customer engagement, and monetization
Continuously
identify new data sources; explore, consolidate unstructured and diverse data,
and incorporate into analyses and models. Work with engineering colleagues to
onboard data as needed
Transition
proof of concept models into scalable productionalized solutions for consumer
facing experiences
Gain
deep insight into player behavior and business impact; present findings to
internal stakeholders
Support
exploration of new technologies and analysis methods to identify growth /
efficiency opportunities
Interacts
with product, marketing, and service teams to identify questions and issues for
data analysis and experiments.
Help
educate, influence, and inspire adoption of data science best practices

SUMMARY OF REQUIREMENTS
2 - 4 years of
experience working in an industry setting in a data-driven centric role
1+ year hands-on
experience building predictive models on real-world data
Solid understanding in
statistical modeling (regression, sampling, MLE, etc.)
Proficient with
utilizing statistical learning algorithms from open source software (e.g.
R, Python, etc.); should be able to write own code as needed to customize
solutions
Comfortable getting
and preparing data; this includes using SQL as well as dealing with
unstructured data that might require calling APIs, or writing custom
scripts
Take ownership of work
and operate under minimal supervision
Experience working in
digital marketing, CRM, or related domain is highly desirable
Passion and depth of
knowledge for video games, technology, and entertainment market
Experience utilizing
cloud computing platforms to handle Big Data preferred
Expertise in causal inference preferred
Ability to speak and write fluent Japanese a strong plus, but not
required
Graduate degree (or equivalent knowledge) in a quantitative field
required
Masters or PhD preferred

We are an equal opportunity employer of individuals with disabilities and protected veterans....valuing diversity…celebrating strengths.",3.4,"Nintendo of America
3.4","Redmond, WA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1980,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
106,Data Scientist,-1,"Greetings from Trovetechs!!!

Â

We have an immediate need for Data Scientist Role @ San Francisco, CA. Please find the below Job Description for your kind reference.

Â

Duration: Long term Contract

Experience: 8+ Years

Rate: DOE$/hr.

Â

Job Description:

1. Apply a deep understanding of technology innovation to solve complex. ambiguous, and novel problems.

2. Contribute to evolving multiple research pipelines

3. Implement new algorithms to enhance simulations and inference pipelines.

4. Enhance code efficiency through design, testing, and documentation,

5. Collaborate with other data science teams: Signal processing, deep learning and bioinformatics

6. Support the Statistical Modeling team discussions by demonstrating technology with compelling and clear communications
Experience with TensorFlow-Probability, or another probabilistic framework is a big plus.

8. Experience in genomics

9. Experience with cloud computing

10. Experience building robust, scalable software products.

11. Fluency with modern software engineering practices: version control, code reviews, automated testing, etc.

Â

If you are interested, please send us your updated resume along with best Time & Number to reach you ASAP.

Â

Thanks and look forward to working with you,",-1,Trovetechs Inc,"San Francisco, CA",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
107,Jr. Data Scientist,-1,"GENERAL DUTIES*
Applying complex analysis of data in support of mission problems, with expertise in problem solving, scripting in multiple languages, as well as the creation and/or implementation of tools and processes that aid in advanced analytics, testing and quality assurance, and DevOps.
Using and developing statistical analysis, modeling, simulation, and machine learning methods. Comfort with complex mathematical concepts and models.
Scripting, data collection and data management services; performing enterprise-wide data collection, storage, and manipulation; and, developed and implemented automated testing frameworks.
REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS
BS degree in a related scientific or engineering discipline from an accredited college or university and 2+ years of progressive experience, or an MS degree in a related scientific or engineering discipline
Experience with the following tools/languages: JavaScript, Python, R, algorithm development
Experience with Agile Methodology/Scrum Development
Experience working with multiple stakeholders, gathering requirements, analysis and integration resulting in informed decision making, explaining highly technical concepts to a non-technical audience
CLEARANCE
Active Top Secret
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $100,000.00 - $110,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Ability to Commute/Relocate:
Washington, DC (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Experience:
Data Scientist: 1 year (Required)
Python/Javascript/R: 1 year (Required)
Security Clearance:
Secret (Required)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.9,"Super Systems Inc
3.9","Washington, DC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
108,Data Scientist,-1,"At Koneksa Health, we are focused on using new technologies to improve clinical research and drug development. We help leading life sciences companies and research hospitals remotely capture real-world data from patients. Our projects deploy digital health technologies such as FDA approved activity trackers, wearable vital sign monitors, and other emerging monitoring devices that capture data outside the clinical and laboratory setting. We are developing digital biomarkers that help our customers make faster decisions, often using smaller studies, with technologies that enhance the experience of the patients who participate. We're on a constant quest to improve the tools and endpoints that are used to get the right new therapies to patients who need them.

As a Data Scientist at Koneksa, you will be a part of the Data Science team that delivers real-world data from patients to our customers and develops digital biomarkers that enable faster decisions and improve patient experience. You will communicate and collaborate closely within and across internal departments (data science, client ops, business development, sales, operations and technology), as well as with external stakeholders. So its essential to have excellent written and verbal communication skills. Aside from technical competencies, the role also requires a persistent attention to detail, initiative, and curiosity which together drive a willingness to find solutions instead of problems.

Responsibilities
Write prototype and production code to extract, process, QC (quality control) large datasets (in house and cloud) of various frequencies and sample rates
Produce clinical datasets in timely manner to transfer to clients and support analysis
Effectively and proactively communicate and collaborate with external and internal teams to gather information and contribute to data transfer specification contracts
Troubleshoot, resolve data quality issues, and own resolution of open items
Tabulate, visualize and analyze data, and produce and present reports to the clients
Meticulously document project progress, data quality control, analysis findings
Requirements
MS in scientific discipline
5+ years experience in an industry role focused on data science or data manipulation
Expert in Python (pandas, numpy, pymongo, etc.)
Experience in extracting data from databases using programs such as MongoDB and platforms like Amazon S3
Experience in using version control and code repositories tools such as Git and GitHub
Commercial experience in generating and working with SDTM and ADaM format data
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Highly organized with a keen attention to detail
Ability to work independently and collaboratively
Ability to work on multiple projects and manage competing deadlines
Critical thinking and problem solving
Benefits
Competitive salary
Bonus scheme (subject to company and individual performance)
Stock option scheme eligibility
100% covered employee healthcare
50% dependent covered healthcare
Employer 401(k) matching
Choice of computer equipment
Weekly team lunches
Healthy office snacks
Koneksa Health, Inc. provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, Koneksa Health Inc. complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, and training.

Learn more about us by visiting www.koneksahealth.com and https://www.linkedin.com/company/koneksa-health/.

Powered by JazzHR",-1,Koneksa Health,"New York, NY",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
109,Data Engineer,$87k-$104k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Engineer
10513
Scottsdale, AZ
1/27/2020 2:26:00 PM

Data Science
Contractor - W2

Job Description
looking for a savvy Data Engineer to join our growing team of analytics experts. The hire will be responsible for expanding and optimizing our data and data pipeline architecture, as well as optimizing data flow and collection for cross functional teams. The ideal candidate is an experienced data pipeline builder and data wrangler who enjoys optimizing data systems and building them from the ground up. The Data Engineer will support our software developers, database architects, data analysts and data scientists on data initiatives and will ensure optimal data delivery architecture is consistent throughout ongoing projects. They must be self-directed and comfortable supporting the data needs of multiple teams, systems and products. The right candidate will be excited by the prospect of optimizing or even re-designing our company’s data architecture to support our next generation of products and data initiatives.

PRINCIPLE RESPONSIBILITIES:

• Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture,
• Assemble large, complex data sets that meet functional / non-functional business requirements.
• Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements: automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability, etc.
• Build the infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources using SQL and AWS ‘big data’ technologies.
• Build analytics tools that utilize the data pipeline to provide actionable insights into customer acquisition, operational efficiency and other key business performance metrics.
• Work with stakeholders including the Executive, Product, Data and Design teams to assist with data-related technical issues and support their data infrastructure needs.
• Keep our data separated and secure across national boundaries through multiple data centers and AWS regions.
• Create data tools for analytics and data scientist team members that assist them in building and optimizing our product into an innovative industry leader.
• Work with data and analytics experts to strive for greater functionality in our data systems.
• Troubleshoots issues with minimal guidance, identifies bottlenecks in existing data workflows and provides solutions for a scalable, defect-free application
• Works with onshore/offshore team to analyze, develop and improve pipeline run times as well as produce accurate defect free code
• Complies with Company policy and practices relating to the System Development Life Cycle.
• Provides Tier 3 support and resolution of IT issues escalated by IT Customer Support.
• Support audit and compliance reporting requests.
• Support the operation of MarkLogic and Snowflake products on a 24/7 basis as needed.
• Supports production environment in the event of emergency
• Participate in on-call support 24x7 weekly rotation of the operation of Informatica.
• Performs other job-related duties as assigned or apparent.

QUALIFICATIONS:

• 2+ years’ experience working with data warehousing, ETL development and ETL architecture.
• 2+ years’ experience combined experience with any of the following database technologies (RDBMS: MSSQL, MySQL Oracle; NoSQL: MarkLogic, Snowflake, DynamoDB, Redis).
• 2 years’ experience working on large data initiatives (?5 terabytes).
• 1 years’ experience as a JavaScript
• Advanced working SQL knowledge and experience working with relational databases, query authoring (SQL) as well as working familiarity with a variety of databases.
• Experience building and optimizing ‘big data’ data pipelines, architectures and data sets.
• Experience performing root cause analysis on internal and external data and processes to answer specific business questions and identify opportunities for improvement.
• Build processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management.
• Good knowledge and experience of working with OO Javascript, XHTML, CSS, XML, Ajax and one or more JavaScript libraries (e.g. Prototype, JQuery)
• Experience with web services (e.g. RESTful services), including the ability to programmatically interact with data formats that may include XML, JSON and RDF
• Experience with writing software for complex web-based business applications which makes use of client-side data capture, validation and presentation
• Working knowledge of version control systems (e.g. SVN, Git)

MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:
• 2+ years of experience in a Data Engineer role, who has attained a bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Informatics, Information Systems or another quantitative field.
• AWS: 1 year experience
• DevOps Practices: 1 year experience
• 2+ years’ experience working with data warehousing, ETL development and ETL architecture.
• 2+ years’ experience combined experience with any of the following database technologies (RDBMS: MSSQL, MySQL Oracle; NoSQL: MarkLogic, Snowflake, DynamoDB, Redis).
• 2 years’ experience working on large data initiatives (?5 terabytes).
• 1 years’ experience as a JavaScript

Job Requirements",3.8,"IntraEdge
3.8","Scottsdale, AZ",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
110,Data Scientist,$84k-$129k (Glassdoor Est.),"Use statistical analysis, machine learning, pattern recognition, and data visualization along with domain knowledge and subject-specific models to solve science, engineering, and commercial problems
Solve challenging data science problems by developing novel and/or adapting existing computational methods
Debugging and performance tweaking in Python
Taking ownership over parts of an application and collaborating on global issues Understand and enjoy working in a micro services based architecture
Hands-on experience in PostgreSQL, SQL Server, Oracle, RESTFul,GIT, API, JSON, Statistical Analysis, Machine Learning, Pattern Recognition,
Knowledge in Data Visualization, Numpy, Pandas, Scipy, Matplotlib, Soup, Scrapy, Teradata,NoSQL, Redis, Elastic Search, Mongo, Django, Flask, Pyramid, SVN, Mercurial,Linear Algebra and Optimization
Knowledge in Hypothesis Testing, Monte Carlo Simulation, Clustering",4.2,"Lorven Technologies Inc
4.2","New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Accounting,Accounting & Legal,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
111,Data Scientist,$91k-$145k (Glassdoor Est.),"Vectra Networks delivers a new class of advanced threat defense that delivers real-time detection and analysis of active network intrusions. Vectra technology picks up where perimeter security leaves off by providing deep, continuous analysis of both internal and Internet-facing network traffic to automatically detect all phases of a breach as attackers attempt to spy, spread, and steal within your network.

Vectra directly analyzes network traffic in real time using a patent-pending combination of data science, machine learning, and behavioral analysis to detect attacker behaviors and user anomalies in the network. All detections are correlated and prioritized to show an attack in context, and Vectra Networks' machine learning adapts as attacks evolve.

Position Overview

Be on the leading edge of applying machine learning and data modeling to the world of advanced cyber security – as part of the data science engineering team, you will directly impact the product by developing core algorithms to model complex problems. Specific responsibilities include:

Prototyping, development and testing of complex mathematical models in order to facilitate the detection of anomalous behavior with a very high degree of accuracy
Development and testing of methods to combine models in order to improve accuracy, as well as automatically training and retraining these models
Innovating around new models to solve new problems
Required Experience
Strong math/statistics/machine learning background
Successfully applied machine learning, statistical methods, data mining to academic/work projects
Parallel programming experience
C++ coding experience
Python or Scala experience
Linux experience
Team player
Qualifications
MS/PhD in Computer Science, Mathematics, Physics or related discipline (or equivalent experience)
Experience designing and implementing new algorithms
Statistical package experience: R, Python/Pandas or MATLAB/Octave
Familiarity with systems that make use of multiple machine learning and statistical methods at the same time, ensemble learning
Hadoop ecosystem experience
Database hands-on experience (SQL or noSQL)
Experience working in a software development team",2.8,"Vectra
2.8","Boston, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Accounting,Accounting & Legal,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
112,Data Scientist,$81k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"LexisNexis Risk Solutions

We develop industry-leading compliance solutions to help customers fight financial crimes and stay abreast of anti-money laundering, anti-bribery and corruption, and countering financing of terrorism legislations. LexisNexis Risk Solutions cares about our world and we would love for you to join our team if you want to help solve meaningful problems too.

Data Scientist - Associate
Opportunity to join a vibrant, collaborative team as an entry level statistical modeler conducting statistical analysis and building predictive models for a variety of uses and markets, including credit, fraud, telecommunication, retail, government and business. You would be expected to have a firm understanding of data mining, statistical methods and multiple modeling techniques. As part of the team you would be tasked with finding innovative ways to produce solutions to serve our customers and continually expand your expertise.
Responsibilities:
Assemble, merge and parse large amounts of data to detect meaningful trends and patterns
Explore opportunities to enhance existing data with new features or evaluate new data sources to improve product solutions
Develop analytic models, create and provide analysis code, and work with internal or external stakeholders to validate accuracy of production code.
Consult with internal and external clients regarding analytic solution implementation, score calculations, analytic output, and statistical techniques
Interpret, document and successfully communicate analytic work, requirements, and/or results to stakeholders, including those in non-analytic roles
Conduct analysis and produce reports in support of both existing and new product development and/or customer sales
Understand and execute analytic plans with the appropriate statistical or modeling technique
Proactively identify and communicate data quality issues and successfully work with other teams to implement solutions

Required Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in statistics, data science, mathematics or quantitative methods (or equivalent years’ experience)
1-2 years’ experience building predictive models or conducting data analysis using R, SAS or similar software package.
Knowledge of statistical analysis methodologies and in particular machine learning.
Experience with R, Python or similar software packages
Experience with data manipulation techniques
High degree of creative, analytical and problem-solving skills
Ability to learn quickly and communicate effectively
Ability to work effectively both independently and collaboratively
Willingness to adapt to new techniques and an innovative attitude towards finding solutions
Fluency with presentation and document programs such as PowerPoint, Word, Excel

Preferred Qualifications:
Experience with multi-node computing platforms like Hadoop
Experience with version control through Git
Master’s degree in statistics, data science, mathematics or quantitative methods
Proficient in using R Markdown, or Shiny.
Experience developing tools to aid in data science endeavors

Our team members are dedicated individuals striving to provide our clients with innovative solutions to their very real problems. If you are looking to be a member of a team providing world-class analytics and data-driven solutions for our partners and customers, we welcome you to apply!

We are an equal opportunity employer: qualified applicants are considered for and treated during employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, sex, national origin, citizenship status, disability status, protected veteran status, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law. If a qualified individual with a disability or disabled veteran needs a reasonable accommodation to use or access our online system, that individual should please contact 1.877.734.1938 or accommodations@relx.com.

Please read our Candidate Privacy Policy",3.6,"LexisNexis Risk Solutions
3.6","San Diego, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2000,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
113,Data Scientist,-1,"CarbonPlan is a non-profit working on the data and science of carbon removal and climate solutions.

We aim to ensure the quality, scientific integrity, and transparency of climate solutions, and we work across a range of approaches — forests, soil, air capture, mineralization, energy, and more. We analyze solutions based on the best available science and data and build open source tools and data products. We work directly with decision makers across the public and private sector to help them achieve ambitious climate goals. You can read more about our work on our website.

As a Data Scientist on our Technology team, you will contribute to CarbonPlan’s scientific and technical activities, filling a dynamic role that includes data science, machine learning, data visualization, and open source software development. Our core science products and software tools are open source, and we build visualizations for broad audiences. If you’re excited about applying cutting edge data science tools to tackle big climate problems, please apply!

You will:
Design and build open source data analysis tools, models, data products, and rich interactive visualizations on carbon removal and other climate solutions,
Contribute to new and existing community developed open source software libraries,
Participate in and help guide engagements with external collaborators and partners, and
Document, write about, and present our work.
You should have:
Passion for our mission,
3-5+ years experience with data science and machine learning,
3-5+ years experience with scientific Python,
1-3+ years experience contributing to open source scientific software projects, and
A portfolio of your work (e.g. open source code, websites, papers, etc.).
You’ll be an especially good fit if you have:
Data science work experience outside academic settings,
Geospatial data analysis and visualization experience,
Data analytics experience in Python with Pandas, Xarray, and/or Dask,
Data visualization experience in Python (Matplotlib and/or Altair) and/or Javascript (Vega, D3 and/or WebGL),
Machine Learning experience using frameworks such as Scikit-Learn, Pytorch, and/or TensorFlow,
Experience in image processing or remote sensing, and
Software development experience using version control, continuous integration, etc.
You should include in your application:
A link to your portfolio (GitHub, website, etc.),
Your CV or a link to your LinkedIn profile, and
A paragraph on why you are excited about CarbonPlan.
CarbonPlan is an equal opportunity employer, and we are committed to building an inclusive and diverse workplace. Addressing climate change requires confronting systems that create inequity and injustice, and doing so will require a team with culturally diverse perspectives. All qualified applications — regardless of race, color, gender, religion, age, sexual orientation, sexual identity, national or ethnic origin, disability, marital status, veteran status, and any other occupationally irrelevant criteria — will receive full consideration. We especially encourage applications from individuals from underrepresented groups in science, technology, and environmental organizations.

We are committed to providing competitive compensation and comprehensive benefits to our employees. We offer fixed salary levels based on experience and role to minimize biases in compensation and to ensure team members are paid the same for doing the same work. We expect this position to be at an annual salary of $105,000 USD based on the experience required for the role. As we are still developing our team, we may also consider a more junior or senior position in a related role, so please still consider applying if this description is not an exact fit.

We are not currently able to sponsor a visa for this position, and therefore can only consider applications from people who are already authorized to work in the United States. We are based primarily in San Francisco, but currently work remotely. The hiring manager for this role is in Seattle. Remote work from any location on Pacific or Mountain Time works for us!",3.0,"CarbonPlan
3.0",United States,-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
114,Senior Staff Big Data Engineer,$115k-$198k (Glassdoor Est.),"Integral Ad Science (IAS) is a global technology and data company that builds verification, optimization, and analytics solutions for the advertising industry. Our technology handles hundreds of thousands of transactions per second; collects tens of billions of events each day; and evaluates thousands of data-points in real-time all while responding in just a few milliseconds. If this sounds exciting then IAS is the place for you!

As a Senior Staff Big Data Engineer you will lead, design, implement, and maintain big data pipelines responsible for aggregating tens of billions of daily transactions. You will lead the entire software lifecycle including hands-on development, code reviews, testing, and deployment for streaming, batch ETL and RESTful APIs. You will be using cutting edge Big Data technologies on cloud platforms. As a senior contributor, you will help guide, mentor, and provide technical leadership to junior team members.

You should apply if you have most of this:
5+ years experience in designing and building data-intensive applications
5+ years experience developing with object oriented languages (Java, Scala, Python)
Experience with Big Data technologies - Hadoop MapReduce, Spark, Pig, Hive, etc.
Experience building, deploying, and supporting production level SaaS solutions
Regular use of collections, multi-threading, JVM memory model, etc.
In-depth understanding of algorithms, performance, scalability, and reliability in a Big Data setting
Solid understanding of OLTP and OLAP systems, database fundamentals and good knowledge of SQL
Experience adding observability / monitoring capabilities to data pipelines using tools like Elastic and Grafana
Experience building CI/CD pipelines using Jenkins
Experience in full software development life cycle and agile development
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills
What puts you over the top:
Experience building production level systems in a cloud environment (AWS, Azure or GCP)
Building event-driven microservices applications using spring boot or gRPC
Orchestrating data pipelines using tools such as Airflow
Familiarity with messaging frameworks like Kafka or RabbitMQ
Experience with Spark streaming or Flink
About Integral Ad Science

Integral Ad Science (IAS) is the global market leader in digital ad verification, offering technologies that drive high-quality advertising media. IAS equips advertisers and publishers with both the insight and technology to protect their advertising investments from fraud and unsafe environments as well as to capture consumer attention, and drive business outcomes. Founded in 2009, IAS is headquartered in New York with global operations in 18 offices across 13 countries. IAS is part of the Vista Equity Partners portfolio of software companies. For more on how IAS is powering great impressions for top publishers and advertisers around the world, visit integralads.com.

Equal Opportunity Employer:

IAS is an equal opportunity employer, committed to our diversity and inclusiveness. We will consider all qualified applicants without regard to race, color, nationality, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, religion, disability or age. We strongly encourage women, people of color, members of the LGBTQIA community, people with disabilities and veterans to apply.

California Applicant Pre-Collection Notice:

We collect personal information (PI) from you in connection with your application for employment or engagement with IAS, including the following categories of PI: identifiers, personal records, commercial information, professional or employment or engagement information, non-public education records, and inferences drawn from your PI. We collect your PI for our purposes, including performing services and operations related to your potential employment or engagement. For additional details or if you have questions, contact us at compliance@integralads.com.

To learn more about us, please visit http://integralads.com/ and https://muse.cm/2t8eGlN

Attention agency/3rd party recruiters: IAS does not accept any unsolicited resumes or candidate profiles. If you are interested in becoming an IAS recruiting partner, please send an email introducing your company to recruitingagencies@integralads.com. We will get back to you if there's interest in a partnership.",3.5,"Integral Ad Science
3.5","Austin, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
115,Data Scientist,$75k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist, Chicago, IL

Smarter Thinking. Real Results. Technology consulting has been our story for over 14 years. Companies from all industries partner with us for our innovative mindset to help them digitally transform to create market advantages, become resilient, and prepare for whats next. With us, the possible becomes actual.

We provide strategic and innovative consulting services focused on digital experiences, engineering, automation, data and analytics, and salesforce solutions. Saggezza consultants work as part of a global team, and throughout their tenure, have the opportunity to work on a variety of different projects across various clients and industries. We are chartered to do one thing, and one thing only to bring enabling technology to our clients that allow them to move their business forward.

We are currently looking to hire a Data Scientist to join our team.

What Youll Definitely Need
BA degree in a closely related field with data analysis orientation. Analytical background with a creative approach to problem solving
4+ years experience with Python worked in building analytical solutions using Statistical, Machine Learning, Deep Learning etc. Proficiency with 3rd-party data visualization tools (Tableau, Power BI, etc.)
Good working experience in Data Analysis, Data Wrangling, Data Cleaning and Data Transformation.
Excellent working experience of machine learning on technology stacks such as Python, NumPy, SciPy, Scikit-Learn, Apache Spark and R using libraries such as e1071 and Caret
Excellent fluency in data manipulation tasks using frameworks. such as pandas, plyr, Spark
Good understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms, such as k-NN, Naive Bayes, SVM, Decision Forests, Random Forest etc.
Knowledge of some common data science toolkits, such as Weka, NumPy, MATLAB, etc.
Broad business perspective with the ability to articulate meaningful ROI and financial impacts.
Worked on projects in the Retail, Banking & Finance and Insurance Industries.
Working from Chicago office and requires visits to customer location if needed.
From a cultural perspective, we look for individuals who possess the following qualities that will contribute to our success and the success of our clients:
Entrepreneurial spirit: We seek individuals who enjoy contributing to the growth of an organization and who show commitment to the success of their team.
Problem-solving skills: Individuals at our company have well-honed analytical skills coupled with business acumen to structure problems, deliver solutions, and communicate insights.
Drive: Our team sets ambitious goals and seeks energetic professionals, enjoy a fast pace environment, and thrive in taking on responsibility.
What We Would Love to See
Consultative application of analytic solutions to solve business issues
Able to engage in a consultative manner across multiple levels (c-suite to end user) with a strong executive presence, demonstrating strong
Demonstrated leadership, communication and interpersonal skills: the ability to manage and mentor functional experts and lead cross- functional teams
Dont tick all the boxes? Dont worry about it: we still want to hear from you if you think

youre the right person for the job.

Why Join Our Team?
Diverse culture, experiences, and skills.
Our nurturing and supportive environment fosters collaboration across the entire organization.
We are not hierarchical but operate as a flat surface where every opinion matters, ideas are cultivated and innovation is encouraged.
At Saggezza, we are fortunate to have a strong mentorship program that provides every one of our employees the ability to thrive professionally and personally.
We are only as good as our people. Saggezza, Italian for wisdom, is rooted from the perspective that knowledge is power. We create thought-leaders who are constantly exposed and trained in different technologies in the ever-evolving world of software development.
We welcome innovators with entrepreneurial spirits to grow with our team.
Consulting Magazine - Fastest Growing Firms 2019
Built-In Top Places to Work in Chicago 2020
Best and Brightest Companies in the Nation 2019 and 2020, Best and Brightest Companies in Milwaukee 2020 and Best and Brightest Companies in Chicago 2020
Saggezza is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer: We believe in treating each employee and applicant for employment fairly and with dignity. We base our employment decisions on merit, experience, and potential, without regard to race, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, age, religion, disability, veteran status, or any other characteristic prohibited by federal, state or local law.

Powered by JazzHR",4.2,"Saggezza
4.2","Chicago, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2006,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
116,Data Scientist,$79k-$126k (Glassdoor Est.),"Headquartered in Lynchburg, Va., BWX Technologies, Inc. (NYSE:BWXT) is a leading supplier of nuclear components and fuel to the U.S. government; provides technical and management services to support the U.S. government in the operation of complex facilities and environmental remediation activities; and supplies precision manufactured components, services and fuel for the commercial nuclear power industry. With approximately 6,100 employees, BWXT has nine major operating sites in the U.S. and Canada. In addition, BWXT joint ventures provide management and operations at a dozen U.S. Department of Energy and two NASA facilities. Follow us on Twitter @BWXTech and learn more at www.bwxt.com.

BWXT is currently seeking a, multi-talented Engineering Data Scientist to serve as a lead researcher for nuclear product development for its location in Oak Ridge TN or Lynchburg, VA.

Job Description/Duties:

Combines engineering experience with data science for nuclear product research & development
Deploys a range of statistical techniques for causation analyses
Machine and deep learning systems for predictive quality
Visualization products including analytics, 3D simulation, and data models
Develops sensor platforms and imagery processing on development or production processes
Satisfies research and development objectives to warrant continued investment toward product realization

Job Qualifications/Requirements:

A minimum of a Bachelor’s Degree in a technical or computational field of study (e.g., nuclear engineering or design, statistics, mechanical or electrical engineering preferred)
Engineering Degree must be from an ABET-accredited university.
Expertise in nuclear or mechanical engineering, statistical analysis, signal processing and/or computer vision strongly desired.
The candidate must possess strong coding skills in C++, Python, and/or R.
Experience in simulation or design tools a big plus (e.g. neutronics, thermal hydraulics or stress)
A minimum of 10 years of experience is required, however, an advanced degree may substitute for some years of experience.
Image processing using OpenCV, Tensorflow and similar packages is a plus.
Must be a US Citizen with no dual citizenship

BWX Technologies, Inc. (BWXT) embraces diversity of thought, values individuality, encourages new perspectives and provides equal opportunity in employment for all qualified employees and applicants without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, age, national origin, disability, veteran status, genetic information, or any other category protected by federal, state, and/or local law.

https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf

https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/OFCCP_EEO_Supplement_Final_JRF_QA_508c.pdf",3.5,"BWX Technologies
3.5","Oak Ridge, TN",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1850,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
117,Data Scientist,$79k-$129k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you passionate about innovative technologies like speech? Interested in Amazon Alexa, the brain behind Amazon Echo? The Amazon Alexa team is continuously working towards improving our customer experience to discover, personalize, and monetize Alexa Skills for devices such as Amazon Echo, Amazon Show, Amazon Spot and more. If youre not familiar with Alexa and Skills you can learn more here: https://amazon.com/alexaskills. As part of the Alexa Experience Content and Commerce data analytics team, out team helps build analytical solutions that deepen our collective understanding of Alexa customers, influence innovation, and deliver actionable insights. Our team is looking for a passionate, solution-oriented Data Scientist to help statistically analyze data to help our business grow.

As a Data Scientist, your main focus will be to perform analysis, build metrics, synthesize information, identify business opportunities, provide project direction, and communicate business and technical requirements within the team and across stakeholder groups. You are indispensable and own the quantification of business opportunities and identification of project direction prioritizing projects based on greatest return on investment. You consider the needs of day-to-day operations and insist on the standards required to build the network of tomorrow. Your job will straddle day-to-day decisions and strategic vision, you will assist in defining trade-offs and quantifying opportunities for a variety of projects. You will learn current processes, build metrics, educate diverse stakeholder groups, assist science groups in initial solution design, and audit all model implementation. A successful candidate in this position will have a background in communicating across significant differences, prioritizing competing requests, and quantifying decisions made.

This is an individual contributor role who will work closely with internal teams, and partners across the Alexa business line and other partner teams in these areas to provide decision support in this rapidly evolving space. This position requires superior analytic thinkers, who are able to quickly approach large ambiguous problems and apply their technical and statistical knowledge to identify opportunities for further research. The ideal candidate will demonstrate a deep understanding of identifying meaningful key performance indicators and building actionable metrics. This candidate is passionate about providing insights that drive larger initiatives and sees the undeniable value of a good metric. You should be able to independently mine and analyze data, and be able to use any necessary programming and statistical analysis software to do so. Successful candidates must thrive in fast-paced environments which encourage collaborative and creative problem solving and be able to measure and estimate risks.

BASIC QUALIFICATIONS
· Masters in Statistics, Mathematics, Business Analytics, or related quantitative discipline.
· Deep understanding of regression modeling, forecasting techniques, time series analysis, machine-learning concepts such as supervised and unsupervised learning, classification, random forest, etc.
· Experience in developing machine-learning algorithms, statistical and mathematical optimization models, and simulation and visualization tools
· Familiarity with managing disparate data sets; including, building and maintaining data flows and pipelines
· Experience with SQL and at least one scripting language (preferable Python)
· Exposure to big data: extraction, processing, filtering, and presenting large data quantities (100K to Millions of rows) via AWS technologies, SQL, and data pipelines
· Industry experience in defining and building metrics, performing business analysis, and quantifying decisions through the utilization of data
· Ability to communicate technical concepts and solutions at a level appropriate for technical and non-technical audiences
· Advanced ability to draw insights from data and clearly communicate them to the stakeholders and senior management as required.

Basic Qualifications

· Bachelor's Degree
· 3+ years of experience with data scripting languages (e.g SQL, Python, R etc.) or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R, SAS, or Matlab)
· 2 years working as a Data Scientist


Preferred Qualifications

· PhD in Statistics, Mathematics, Business Analytics, or related quantitative discipline.
· Experience applying forecasting and data mining techniques in an industrial setting.
· Experience with processing, analyzing, and modeling with large amount of data
· Fluency in a scripting or computing language (e.g. Python, R, Java, C++, etc.)
· Experience with agile/scrum methodologies and its benefits of keeping scientists on track and iteratively delivering results.

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us//.",3.9,"Amazon
3.9","Irvine, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
118,Data Scientist,$83k-$138k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who You Are


You are a full-stack data scientist, an experienced quantitative thinker who wants to develop further as both a data scientist and an engineer. You are skilled at finding the precise mathematical kernels of real-world business challenges faced by leading international financial institutions. You want to apply your expertise in statistics and computer science using Quantifind's state-of-the-art infrastructure to solve problems in Natural Language Processing such as Entity Linking, Text Classification, and Topic Modeling. You are excited to work at a fast growing company where you will have the chance to expand your scientific and engineering skills in new areas. You share Quantifind's commitment to winning together, and are eager to see your coworkers build on the technical foundations you will be creating. You are passionate about maintaining the high scientific and engineering standards required to enable your peers. Above all, you are a curious and independent problem solver who is motivated to find a place where your skills can have real impact.

Who We Are


Quantifind helps some of the world's biggest banks catch money laundering and fraud. Quantifind also works with government agencies to use the same platform to uncover criminal networks and combat election tampering. Unlike other players in this space, Quantifind delivers results as software-as-a-service (SaaS) with consumer-grade user experiences.

Quantifind is a data science technology company whose AI platform uncovers signals of risk across disparate and unstructured text sources. In financial crimes risk management, Quantifind's solution uniquely combines internal financial institution data with public domain data to assess risk in the context of Know Your Customer (KYC), Customer Due Diligence (CDD), Fraud Risk Management, and Anti-Money Laundering (AML) processes. Today these compliance processes are burdened by ever-increasing regulatory responsibilities and an expectation of frictionless transactions. Legacy technologies demand increasingly more human resources as the operations expand; Quantifind's solution offers a way to cut through the inefficiency and enhance effectiveness simultaneously.

To help you succeed, we provide a supportive environment that fosters collaboration between teams and team members, where learning and professional growth are considered a key part of your success, and of ours. We offer a flexible work environment with a family friendly work-life balance.

What A Great Candidate Looks Like:
MS or higher in the following areas: Statistics and Mathematics
At least 3-5 years of professional industry experience, in addition to your academic experience
Strong programming experience in two or more of the following: Scala / Java, R, Python
Outstanding quantitative analytical ability
Able to take less than precise business requirements and translate them into statistical problems which you enjoy solving
Can develop methods and algorithms from first principles where necessary as opposed to relying fully on packaged third party solutions
Excellent written and verbal communication skills, with prior experience explaining assumptions, conclusions and methodology to both internal and external customers
In-depth knowledge of Statistics / Probability / Machine Learning including core Statistical concepts such as hypothesis testing, estimation, and inference, and Machine Learning foundations such as bias/variance trade-off, regularization, dimension reduction, and model interpretation
Supervised and unsupervised statistical techniques such as regression (linear / logistic / tree based ensembles), clustering
Experience with unstructured text data using NLP methods such as Named Entity Recognition, Topic Modeling, Large Scale Document Classification, Word Embeddings, and Text Similarity
Basic knowledge of data structures and algorithms with a focus on complexity and performance implications
Experience with SQL
The Opportunity We Offer


Quantifind is seeking to fill a Full-Stack Data Scientist position in Washington, DC on our Data Science team. We work closely with the Product Management team and Platform engineers to anticipate company needs and quickly put state-of-the-art mathematical tools into the hands of end users. Members of the Data Science team translate real world problems into quantitative language, find or create algorithms to solve those problems, and implement them in code. Our team values a creative and empathetic approach to problem solving and strives to maintain rigorous scientific and engineering standards. We will give you the opportunity to work on the full data science pipeline, bringing solutions from basic research all the way to production.

We are an equal opportunity employer. We pride ourselves on living our values. We are curious. We respect each other. We are proactively transparent. We relentlessly solve problems. We win together.

Will you join us? Apply now!",4.4,"Quantifind
4.4","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
119,Lead Data Scientist – Healthcare,$116k-$181k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE's Health Systems Analytics and Visualization Group is seeking a motivated, creative Lead Data Scientist to apply cutting edge tools and techniques to challenging problems facing the US government. This position offers the opportunity to interact directly with government leaders in a fast-paced and dynamic atmosphere with the ability to make a difference and impact outcomes with solid analysis. Our team members are expected to work on multiple projects, cross-pollinate good ideas across the government and continuously learn. We are an interdisciplinary department that thrives on having a large toolbox to support data- and model-driven decision making. We value people who can bring diverse perspectives. Our department works to solve problems in the public interest, in partnership with the government. MITRE also actively conducts independent research in areas of interest to our government partners, and once established with a proven track record of quality delivery and consistent performance, members of our department have latitude to select projects.

This is an outstanding opportunity to have substantial impact on national and international health, fostering research, improving care and public health outcomes, and lowering burden and costs.

To be successful you will:
Be passionate about applying data analytics to real world healthcare problems.
Have an innate curiosity and interest in developing research questions and testing hypotheses with open ended tasking.
Responsibilities include:
Work with a spectrum of government sponsors to gain understanding of their challenges, evaluate possible solutions and conduct insightful, actionable analyses.
Support the development and application of a variety of analytical models to sponsor challenges, with a willingness to adapt and learn.
Present results in an intuitive, actionable manner that can be understood by all sponsor audiences, regardless of technical expertise.
Lead projects throughout their life cycle, including conceptualization, requirements definition, data procurement, development, integration, and socialization.
Provide relevant day-to-day tasking for one or more junior staff.
Required Qualifications
Master’s Degree in science, engineering, or a health-related field, with 10+ years of relevant work experience. A Bachelor’s degree coupled with substantial experience would be acceptable
Demonstrated ability to manipulate large datasets and perform calculations with at least one modern programming language or business intelligence platform like Python (scikit-learn, pandas, tensorflow), R, SAS, or MATLAB
Ability to apply, modify and formulate algorithms and processes to solve challenging problems.
Demonstrated experience leading customer facing engagements emphasizing data analytics.
Experience visualizing multi-dimensional data using tools like Tableau, ggplot2, matplotlib, seaborn, or D3.js
Strong written and oral communication skills.
Exceptional organizational skills and meticulous attention to detail
A track record of successfully delivering on deadlines
Preferred Qualifications:
7 or more years applied experience working at a local, state, tribal, territorial, or federal
public health agency
Applied expertise working with public health data sets conducting data analyses and quality
assurance practices, and storing data efficiently
Applied expertise working with public health information systems, open data sources, and
data standards
Experience applying various machine learning approaches (e.g., random forest, neural networks, support vector machines)
Exceptional experience in complex analysis and strategic operational support
Prior experience working with databases (e.g., PostgreSQL, Oracle, MySQL, MongoDB, Neo4j).
Experience using version control (e.g., Git, Mercurial, SVN) to support collaborative development.
Prior experience developing interactive data visualizations using open source web technologies (Angular, Vue, React, D3) or other frameworks (Shiny, Jupyter Notebooks)
Research experience.
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","New Windsor, MD",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
120,Data Scientist,-1,"Excel Impact, named one of the nation’s fastest growing companies 3-years running, has a brand new full-time, in-house, direct-hire Data Scientist opening in North Miami Beach!

You can be a part of our industry-leading team, who are working to simplify and transform how people navigate the insurance buying process.

You will bring your data science knowledge and expertise to help shape the company's success. You will help us identify opportunities to improve the quality of our data by creating and implementing algorithms and ML models to do predictive analytics in real time.

We place a high value on creating a talented team, and because of that, we make sure to offer competitive compensation, flexible work hours, generous time-off policy, and an environment of results-oriented self-sufficiency.

Mission:

Excel Impact was founded to solve two key issues:

Purchasing insurance is too confusing for the average person to easily navigate and understand
The insurance companies can’t efficiently connect with a person searching for a product or solution they offer

The solution? A best-in-class, award-winning marketplace that connects the companies and the solutions they offer with people who are searching for a better insurance experience. Our proprietary ImpactNavigation® platform technology utilizes machine learning, data science, and intelligent-marketing to guide & match interested customers with their best-match insurance solutions.

What will you do?

Participate in defining and implementing technical direction for the development of the company's technology
Be THE key data science advisor for the company, collaborating with leadership and our marketing and engineering teams to identify opportunities to apply algorithms and machine-learning in our platform to gain the greatest benefit possible
Drive business success by translating business requirements into ML algorithms and models to meet product functional objectives and key results
Help architect and plan for changes and enhancements to the product in a proactive fashion
Work with a data-centric platform in capturing, transforming, and ingesting large volumes of data from multiple sources to feed into your data algorithms
Harvest multiple years worth of historical data to train your models across thousands of possible user-behavior scenarios
Work with our cloud-based platform in AWS, manipulating data through multiple AWS-provided services, such as Kinesis, Redshift, RDS, SQS, SNS, etc
Work with our data analytics team to implement the needed ETL/ELT transformations required to implement our predictive models.

What Do We Look For?

Experience applying data science in a lead generation environment is REQUIRED

Strong inclination for creativity and building innovative technology

Strong desire to fearlessly explore, but strong focus for targeted implementation

BS. or MS in Data Science, or equivalent experience

Minimum of 6 years of data science / machine learning experience is required.

Minimum of 3 year of data analytics experience

Strong knowledge of a wide variety of data algorithms and approaches (supervised, unsupervised, reinforcement, linear regression, logistic regression, Naive Bayes, K-Means, Random Forest, greedy algorithms, etc)
Strong knowledge of multiple database engines (MySQL/MariaDB, Redshift, DynamoDB, Redis, etc)
Experience with PHI, PII, and SOC compliance guidelines and controls
Experience with back-testing, A/B testing, regression testing, model testing, etc

What do we offer you?

Competitive base salary
Health care, dental & vision benefits
Sizable yearly bonus structure
Over 1-month cumulative time-off with vacation and personal days
Work-from-home and flex-schedule options to aid in work/life balance
A form of equity that can provide substantial monetary payouts based on future events
Incredible growth and upward mobility opportunities
The opportunity to apply state-of-the-art technologies to solve interesting and challenging problems
Family-friendly work environment - the work stays in the office. Work/Life balance is taken seriously.
Work directly with multiple areas of the company to innovate, create, and make an impact in what you do.
Laid-back, results-driven environment.
You are the ‘CEO’ of your own position – you are encouraged and trusted to make decisions in your area of expertise.

About us:

Excel Impact was founded on 2013 by three partners looking to change the world of insurance for the better. Through hard-work, an incredible team, and smart execution, we’ve experienced consistent 3-year growth rates between 450% - 11,369%, and have been recognized multiple times one of the fastest growing companies in the United States by INC 500, Deloitte Fast 500, Ernst & Young, among other organizations. We have over 1 million active users on our sites per month, and we are committed to delivering excellent software solutions for our internal team as well as top converting leads to our business partners.

Next Steps:

If you are interested in this opportunity, have a desire to be a part of something BIG while sharpening your skills with the latest and greatest tech, and you’re ready to join one of the fastest-growing companies in the United States – then we look forward to hearing from YOU!

We cannot offer visa sponsorship at this time.

Powered by JazzHR

V1kkb70vcs",5.0,"Excel Impact
5.0","North Miami, FL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
121,Scientist / Senior Scientist - In Vivo Pharmacology,-1,"The Company*
Cue Biopharma, Inc., a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company, is engineering a novel class of injectable biologics to selectively engage and modulate targeted T cells within the body to transform the treatment of cancer and autoimmune diseases. Cue Biopharma is a high growth company and is listed on NASDAQ (CUE). The company is located in Cambridge, Massachusetts in the heart of the life sciences corridor.

Cue Biopharma is building a world-class team of highly motivated, dedicated scientists to help us advance our research and development programs. The company culture is fast-paced and committed to scientific excellence, innovation, and teamwork.
Candidate Profile *
The successful applicant will have a strong scientific background and laboratory skills in oncology, immuno-oncology, and/or autoimmunity, with broad experience developing therapeutic approaches using in vivo models. Preferred experience assessing immunologic endpoints and readouts. This is an attractive opportunity with significant growth potential as a part of the core team that is responsible for supporting and driving drug discovery programs in immuno-oncology and autoimmunity.
Key Responsibilities: *
Design and execution of _in vivo_ pharmacology studies aimed at building pharmacologic relationships between drug exposure, target engagement, pharmacodynamic biomarkers, and activity of Cue molecules
Successful candidate will work collaboratively with the _in vitro_ pharmacology group to develop _ex vivo_ assays to monitor T cell responses and assess T cell functionality
Conduct data analyses and effectively document and communicate within the organization and externally
Collaborate with CROs and academic partners to generate data supporting preclinical development of Cue molecules
Review and ensure the quality of scientific data to meet regulatory expectations
Contribute to writing of technical and regulatory documents
Facilitate biomarker and immune assay development as needed, including study design, vendor selection, study execution, interpretation and report writing
Contribute knowledge and technical expertise in immunology and/or cancer biology to the generation of novel therapeutic strategies and therapeutic hypotheses for clinical development
Qualifications: *
Ph.D. in Biological Science with 2+ years industry research experience and a track record of delivery within in vivo pharmacology
Knowledge of mouse models of cancer, inflammation, and/or autoimmunity, animal care and use procedures, and hands on experience in small animal care with proficiency in oral, intravenous, and intraperitoneal dosing
Experience with tissue processing, and FACS-based phenotyping and functional analysis of immune cells using multicolor flow cytometry
Experience working with CROs to carry out pharmacology, safety, and PK/PD studies
Demonstrated experience leading and managing direct or matrixed reports
Self-motivated, team- and goal-oriented scientist with excellent oral and written communication skills
Enjoys working in a fast-paced, small-company environment
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Parental Leave
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus Pay
Experience:
industry: 2 years (Preferred)
Education:
Doctorate (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://www.cuebiopharma.com/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",5.0,"Cue Biopharma
5.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
122,Data Scientist,-1,"EnergyHub is seeking a Data Scientist for our Advanced Grid Services and Analytics team: someone who can build and maintain large-scale statistical models that turn billions of data points into insights, forecasts, and optimal device control. Your work will reach thermostats, EV chargers, solar panels, and other smart energy devices in homes and businesses across the country, aggregating them into grid-aware virtual power plants that stabilize the electric grid and enable its continued decarbonization.

As a Data Scientist you will:
Extend our industry-leading analytics platform for distributed energy resources (DERs), including
Digital twin models of air conditioners, grid-interactive water heaters, EV chargers, batteries, smart inverters, and other DERs
Load, generation, and capacity forecasting models to provide utilities and our own control algorithms unparalleled visibility into the grid edge
Advanced grid services, including battery and water heater load shift services, solar curtailment, and EV managed charging
Our real-time control platform, which turns grid service objectives, real-time data, and forecasts into optimal, multiscale DER control
Write, test, and maintain high-performance python code that runs in our mission-critical production system
Architect, implement, and provide real-time operational support for our suite of advanced grid services
Use physical and statistical modeling techniques to enhance the quality of our device and meter data
Design in-depth analyses of device, customer, and grid service performance data in partnership with our client success and market services teams
Collaborate with our engineering team to design API integrations with our DER partners, based on electrical engineering principles and grid service needs
Qualifications:


Advanced degree in a quantitative field (PhD preferred)
Strong fundamentals in one or more of the related areas: machine learning, statistics, optimization. Experience using those skills to design and implement novel solutions to real-world problems.
Experience using the Python scientific stack (numpy, pandas, scikit-learn, scipy, statsmodels) to clean, filter, aggregate, transform, visualize and then model data
Significant team project work in either production-facing commercial application development (preferred), open source contributions or large academic projects
Strong oral and written communication skills in English, particularly around technical subject matter
Nice to haves:


Experience with our tech stack: MongoDB, RabbitMQ, Docker, AWS (EC2, S3, Cloudwatch), and Travis CI
Knowledge of electric power systems, including utility systems and equipment, power engineering, DERs, and energy markets
Background in electrical engineering or control theory.
Experience maintaining and troubleshooting real-time, customer-facing software applications
A passion for clean energy!
Company Information


EnergyHub is a growing enterprise software company that works with the most forward-thinking companies in smart energy. Our platform lets consumers turn their smart thermostats, electric cars, water heaters, and other products into virtual power plants that keep the grid stable and enable higher penetration of solar and wind power. We work on technology that already provides energy and cost savings to millions of people through partnerships with the leading companies in the Internet of Things.

Company Benefits


EnergyHub offers a generous benefits package including 100% paid medical for employees and a 401(k) with employer match. We offer a casual environment, the flexibility to set your own schedule, a fully stocked fridge and pantry, free Citi Bike membership, secure bike rack, gym subsidy, paid parental leave, and an education assistance program.

EnergyHub is an Equal Opportunity Employer

In connection with your application, we collect information that identifies, reasonably relates to or describes you (""Personal Information""). The categories of Personal Information that we may collect include your name, government-issued identification number(s), email address, mailing address, other contact information, emergency contact information, employment history, educational history, and demographic information.We collect and use those categories of Personal Information about you for human resources and other business management purposes, including identifying and evaluating you as a candidate for potential or future employment or future positions, recordkeeping in relation to recruiting and hiring, conducting analytics, and ensuring compliance with applicable legal requirements and Company policies.",4.5,"EnergyHub
4.5","Brooklyn, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2007,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
123,Data Scientist,-1,"ABOUT BOOST Marketing Inc.

A top-producing Marketing Organization in Huntington Beach, CA, we specialize in Marketing to Medicare Recipients with an emphasis on Medicare Advantage plans. We strive for excellence and have a passion for helping our clients. Pushing the boundaries of innovation and technology, we generate leads through Data-driven research to scale both vertical and horizontal integration. . Medicare is one of the fastest-growing industries and is only expanding from here! There are 64 million people on Medicare currently, and that number will grow to 90 million by 2030. Every day, over 10,000 people are turning 65 and are in need of coverage!

Wecare about our employeesand areemployee-centric in our management style. With anopen-door policy, we foster ateam culturethat isfamily-oriented. Whether birthdays or achievements, welove to celebrate! We prefer topromote from within, and there are alwaysopportunities for career growthas we expand. Ourtraining and supportare second to none. We want all of our employees to succeed!

Essential Functions
Collecting data through means such as analyzing business results or by setting up and managing new studies
Transferring data into a new format to make it more appropriate for analysis
Creating new, experimental frameworks to collect data
Building tools to automate data collection
Searching through large data sets for usable information
Creating reports and presentations for business uses
Correlating similar data to find actionable results
Exceptional technical writing skills
Ability to communicate complex data in a simple, actionable way
Ability to visualize data in the most effective way possible for a given project or study
Analytical and problem-solving skills
Experience with machine learning and AI
Familiarity with data management tools, cloud tools and big data platforms
Ability to work independently and with team members from different backgrounds
Excellent attention to detail
Data mining, cleaning and munging
Requirements

Master's Degree

Excellent written, verbal communication and presentation skills

Understanding of sales principles and the ability to deliver an excellent customer experience

Good time-management skills with a problem-solving attitude

Work Environment

This job operates in a professional office environment. This role routinely uses standard office equipment such as computers, phones, photocopiers, filing cabinets, and fax machines.

Physical Demands

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to perform the essential functions of this job successfully.

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to talk or hear. The employee frequently is required to stand; walk; use hands to finger, handle or feel; and reach with hands and arms.

Position Type/Expected Hours of Work

This is a full-time position, and hours of work and days are Monday through Friday, Office hours are 7:00 am - 5:00 pm.

Additional Eligibility Qualifications

None required for this position.

AAP/EEO Statement

Boost Health Insurance provides equal employment opportunity to all individuals regardless of their race, color, creed, religion, gender, age, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by state, federal, or local law.

Other Duties

Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties, or responsibilities required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities, and activities may change at any time with or without notice.

Job Posted by ApplicantPro",4.3,"Boost Marketing Inc
4.3","Huntington Beach, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
124,Entity Resolution / Data Correlation Engineer,$69k-$125k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta has an exciting opportunity for a self-motivated and accomplished Computer Scientist to join our entity analytics team. You will work on complex projects involving data analysis, software engineering, and deploying software in a cloud computing environment. The team combines data from disparate sources to visualize the complex relationships between entities. This effort involves large scale data integration and entity resolution leveraging a best in class Novetta product. We are looking for a flexible problem solver with significant technical experience to join a team providing unique solutions for our customers and stakeholders.

Responsibilities include:
Analyze large amounts of data.
Deploy applications on a large-scale data processing cluster using AWS technologies.
Design and implement entity correlation strategies that are tailored to mission needs and unique data qualities.
Develop algorithms and visualization tools to help stakeholders understand their data and prioritize new data sources.
Develop and integrate applications to automate ingestion, processing and monitoring of data
Develop and maintain tools to support operations and maintenance of production and development computing clusters.
Basic Qualifications:
A Bachelor's degree in computer science or related field and a minimum of 5 years of experience; or a Master's degree in computer science or related field and a minimum of 3 years of experience.
Experience in software development/engineering including requirements analysis, software development, installation, integration, evaluation, enhancement, maintenance, testing and problem diagnosis/resolution.
Software development experience on Linux-based systems in Python or shell scripting or JavaScript.
Experience developing against full-featured REST APIs and using a command line interfac
Desired Skills:
Software development experience with JavaScript, Python, or other modern programming languages.
Hands-on experience with Spark.
Experience working with Databricks
Interest in statistical analysis, machine learning, or data science.
Experience with entity resolution products or a background in data matching theory and technologies.
Experience developing applications in AWS.
Security Clearance:
Active TS/SCI with Polygraph
Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.

Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.

For more details, or to submit a referral: bit.ly/NovettaReferrals

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.6,"Novetta
4.6","Herndon, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
125,Data Scientist,$87k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"Need local to Bay Area, CA or Seattle, WA only

Job Description for Data Scientist
5 to 7 years of experience as a data scientist.
Strong skills for mining data, assessing the accuracy and insights from new data sources.
Work with stakeholders to understand data challenges and opportunities
Experience building Machine Learning models for predictive analytics, and NLP. Understanding of Deep Learning models is a plus
Experience with SQL
Master in Statistics, Computer Science, or other STEM field. Ph.D. is a plus.
Knowledge of advanced statistics and hypothesis testing
Python, Pandas, Numpy, Scikit coding skills
Data visualization with Matplotlib, and Seaborn
Experience with at least one cloud data technology GCP, AWS, Azure
Experience with Spark, and Hadoop is a plus.
Effective at telling stories with data.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Creative drive to try data tools, and explore and discover insights from data
NLP experience is MUST
Â

Â
Sl.No

Skill

Years Of Experience
1

Â

Â
2

Â

Â
Â

Â

Â
Â

Â

Â

Â",4.0,"New York Technology Partners
4.0","Seattle, WA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
126,Data Scientist,$87k-$144k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Code

RS0356 Statistician I

Sub-Unit
Department
Neurobiology

Time Status

Full-time

Salary Grade

056

Union

00 - Non Union, Exempt or Temporary

Appointment End Date

30-Apr-2021

Pre-Employment Screening

Education, Identity

Schedule

35 hrs. per week | Monday - Friday | 9:00 am - 5:00 pm

EEO Statement

We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, gender identity, sexual orientation, pregnancy and pregnancy-related conditions, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.4,"Harvard University
4.4","Boston, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Nonprofit Organization,Publishing,Media,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
127,Data Scientist,-1,"Data Scientist

United States (Remote OK) / Data Science / Full-Time

The Opportunity

As a Data Scientist at LifeBell AI, you'll be responsible for developing and validating novel machine learning approaches for early prediction of sepsis and other clinical conditions. You'll work closely with our CTO, CSO, data science core, and engineering teams. You'll join a tight-knit group that values collaboration, continuous improvement, and solving challenging technical and product problems in an emerging space. Plus, we like to have fun along the way.

About Us

LifeBell AI creates intelligent software that saves lives by harnessing the latest advances in machine learning, analytics, and sensor technologies across healthcare. We're a fast-growing, fully funded, Atlanta-based technology startup, with both local and remote employees.

Join us as a data scientist in our mission to reduce morbidity and mortality from sepsis, a life-threatening condition that affects over 48 million people globally each year. Partners include top governmental, healthcare, and academic institutions.

Leadership

LifeBell AI is founded and led by Erez Goren and Gari Clifford, PhD. Erez was previously the founder & CEO of Radiant Systems (NASDAQ: RADS, acquired by NCR for $1.2B), BlueCube Software (acquired by RedPrairie), and Hi-Rez Studios (70M+ players worldwide). Gari is the Chair and Professor of Biomedical Informatics at Emory University, and a Professor of Biomedical Engineering at Georgia Tech. Gari was previously an Associate Professor at the University of Oxford and a Principal Research Scientist at MIT where he commercialized multiple biomedical innovations, and managed a project to collect and analyse the world's largest public database of hospital data.

What You'll Do
Ask questions, connect the dots, and uncover opportunities to improve healthcare
Work on multiple initiatives to create and improve LifeBell AI's models and analytics
Work across the entire machine learning pipeline, including data exploration, feature engineering, model training, deployment, monitoring, and calibration/retraining
What We're Looking For
Masters or PhD in Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, or a related technical field
3+ years of professional experience applying machine learning to real-world problems
Someone who has put models into production and monitored their effectiveness
Team player, who can work and communicate effectively with others
Self-motivated, with a genuine interest in the problems you'll be solving
Preferred
Domain knowledge in biomedical informatics, healthcare, or a related field
Prior publication of high quality peer-reviewed research articles
Ability to work in Atlanta, GA (however, remote-work from anywhere in US is OK)
Ability to obtain a security clearance
Benefits & Perks
Competitive salary with health, dental and vision insurance
Generous vacation, sick day, holiday, and leave policies
Equity incentive plan and 401K matching
Great office transit access, parking, and amenities
Gym membership, snacks & drinks, and a casual dress style
Opportunity for meaningful impact in a team-based environment
Remote-friendly culture with daily stand-ups, virtual lunches, and a video-first attitude
Self-funded, stable technology startup with an approachable leadership team
Work-life balance and team-activities
Core Values at LifeBell AI
Save Lives: Improving patient health outcomes is our north star
Innovate: Our goal is to create industry defining moments, through technology & science
Be Human: We treat ourselves, and each other, with respect & understanding
Aim for Excellence: We push ourselves, and each other, to improve every day
Less is Better: Focus and simplicity matter - we aim to do a few things exceptionally well
Get it Done: Actions speak louder than words, and execution is key
Come As You Are: We aim to build an inclusive workforce. If you're passionate about this role, but do not meet all of the qualifications listed above, we still encourage you to apply. We are an equal opportunity employer and celebrate diversity. We do not discriminate on the basis of age, ancestry, citizenship, color, ethnicity, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or invisible disability status, political affiliation, veteran status, race, religion, or sexual orientation.

Remote Work: We are open to hiring remotely from anywhere in the United States. We know great talent is everywhere, and want to build the best team we can. You do not need to relocate to Atlanta GA for this role, although it's our preference when possible. We do have periodic company retreats and team-events that include remote employees, which may involve occasional travel. These events are intended for your benefit, as an opportunity to connect more deeply with others.

COVID-19: LifeBell AI is committed to hiring during the pandemic, with all interviewing and onboarding done virtually due to COVID-19. Everyone new to the team, along with our current staff, will temporarily work from home until it is safe to return to our office. In the meantime, we've implemented various practices to make remote working as enjoyable and practical as possible.

Posting: If you are a recruiter or placement agency, please do not submit unsolicited resumes to our team unless we have a prior agreement. LifeBell is not liable for and will not pay for any placement fees associated with unsolicited resumes. Thank you.",5.0,"LifeBell AI
5.0",Remote,-1,1 to 50 Employees,2019,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
128,Data Scientist,-1,"Infinia ML is seeking a Data Scientist with a desire to join a new and growing company focused on cutting-edge machine learning and deep learning technology. We provide our customers with immediate business impact through technology solutions that are tailored to their data and business needs. You will work with a dynamic team of researchers and data scientists, collaborating on new machine learning algorithms and their application to multiple fields, including natural language processing, image recognition, and business intelligence. We are looking for individuals who are excited about being exposed to new problems and challenges while working in a flexible and versatile environment.

Typical activities will include:
Developing and evaluating statistical models, machine learning algorithms, and data processing techniques
Applying deep learning techniques to large datasets through GPU-accelerated processing
Processing, characterizing, and managing business-critical data
Developing tools and libraries that support processing and analysis of datasets
Candidates must have the following characteristics:
Ability to identify and design solutions to data-driven problems, evaluate and interpret results, and determine next steps
Ability to develop and prototype solutions efficiently and accurately
Self-motivated with a strong desire to learn new technologies in a fast-moving field
Ability to collaborate and communicate effectively with researchers, developers, and customers
Preferred candidates will meet many of the following qualifications:
Advanced degree in a relevant quantitative field (statistics, computer science, applied mathematics, etc.)
3+ years experience in machine learning, data science, data engineering, and/or computational software development
2+ years development in Python, including libraries such as NumPy, SciPy, pandas, scikit-learn, matplotlib, PyTorch, NLTK
Knowledge of machine learning theory, implementation, and application
Experience with deep learning models, including CNN and Transformer architectures
Experience working with large datasets, including NoSQL and relational databases
Experience with Linux
Experience with cloud computing and Amazon EC2",4.4,"Infinia ML
4.4","Durham, NC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
129,Data Scientist,$70k-$120k (Glassdoor Est.),"Date Posted
2018-10-22

Location
Various Locations

Job Title
Data Scientist

Job ID
IMGDS18
Apply this Job

Job Description

IMG Systems, Inc. seeks Master’s+1yr/Bachelor’s+5yrs exp/equiv. Data Scientist (IMGDS18): Data Visualization, Natural Language Processing (NLP), Machine Learning (ML), Python, Numpy. Mail resume with job ID to: HR, 400 Chisholm Place, Suite 414, Plano, TX 75075. Travel to unanticipated work sites throughout the U.S. Foreign equiv. accepted.",2.7,"IMG Systems
2.7","Plano, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
130,Data Scientist,$73k-$120k (Glassdoor Est.),"Currently, we are looking for talented resources for one of our listed clients. If interested please reply to me with your updated resume or feel free to reach out to me for more details at

Title: Data Scientist

Location: Renton, WA

Duration: 5 Months

Job Description:

Development and evaluation of advanced analytics models, including creating, validating, analyzing, and explaining the data used for model development.
Extract, clean, merge, transform and compile data from various data sources, including relational database, flat files, and unstructured data.
Perform time-to-event analysis and testing to identify significant variables and trends in product reliability.
Integral member of the Advanced Analytics Center of Excellence; working with stakeholders from your division to develop new analytics solutions, identify new data useful for analytics projects, and support analytics best practices.
Develop new process improvements to increase the speed, accuracy, and efficiency of our work.
Provide accurate, relevant, and meaningful ad-hoc analysis to management to support strategic and tactical decision-making.
Create and present materials on data projects.

Required Qualifications:

Bachelor's degree in Business Administration, Computer Science, Engineering, or related field.
Minimum of two years of applicable job experience, with a proven ability to make process improvements.
Experience with, or understanding of statistical techniques, modeling, and machine learning.
Experience with, or understanding of R statistical programming language and building efficient SQL queries.
Substantive experience with programmatically extracting, preparing, and merging data from multiple sources, including relational databases (SQL Server, Snowflake) and flat files (CSV).
Experience with, or understanding of time-to-event modeling techniques for reliability/survivability analysis.
Must be a highly-motivated self-starter and self-directed learner with a creative mind, high attention to detail, and a solution-oriented outlook.
Candidate must demonstrate strong analytical skills, excellent general business acumen, with the ability to concisely and clearly communicate complex topics.
Ability to maintain balance between solid ""pragmatism"" and ""scientific rigor"" to meet the needs of a dynamic business.
Proficiency with Microsoft Office suite.

Preferred Qualifications:

MBA or Master's degree in Computational Finance, Analytics, MIS, or related field; or professional certifications such as CFA, CBIP, or MSCE in Business Intelligence.
Demonstrable in-depth understanding of data structures and ETL processes (including SSIS).
Familiarity with cloud storage and compute on AWS.
Experience with, or understanding of, programming (R, Python)
Experience with working with big data (Scala, Spark, Pig).
Experience with container deployments (Docker, Kubernetes, ECS).
Experience with the operationalization and maintenance of analytics APIs using Plumber, Flask, Swagger, and similar.",4.4,"Denken Solutions Inc
4.4","Renton, WA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2010,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
131,Data Scientist,-1,"Do you desire to work with large amounts of data? Are you interested in building a data science function while doing meaningful work? Have you always wanted your work to have a positive societal mission to help underserved communities?

As a Data Scientist at Possible, you will work on interesting, high impact and intellectually stimulating data science projects. Key responsibilities including; Life cycle credit policy management ranging from acquisition to collections, underwriting/machine learning models development, credit risk portfolio reporting, and monitoring, fraud management and prevention, new product analysis and definition, campaign management, and credit strategy testing.

This role requires a high level of analytical problem solving and collaboration as you work cross-functionally to answer key strategic questions and drive decision making. This role reports directly to the Head of Data Science and ML.
Roles & Responsibilities:
Data Analytics
Designing, developing, and implementing machine learning models / algorithms
Builds underwriting models to increase loan funding rates while lowering losses
Drives improvements in customer acquisition and fund recovery
Identifies and evaluates new data sources to improve customer acquisition and fund recovery
Works holistically across the entire risk management continuum including marketing channel evaluation and pre-approval criteria for existing customers
Continue to test new strategies and models and work with the fund recovery team to improve cash collection
Drives analysis and ongoing improvements to loss performance of new markets.
Working with other departments (including marketing, loan operations, finance, etc) evaluates new product opportunities and forecasts likely loss performance.
Evolves strategies and pricing recommendations to improve performance as the new products scale.
Work experience and education, knowledge and skills
For this position we are looking for an experienced data scientist with:
A bachelors degree in statistics, data science, applied mathematics, computer science, or engineering is required. An advanced degree from a respected academic institution is preferred.
2-3 years of hands-on experience using tools such as R, Python, SQL, Spark
Prior experience using reporting tool such as Tableau, Looker or equivalent
Self-starter with the ability to develop insightful financial models and quantitative analysis, paired with strong critical thinking and sound business judgment
Excellent organizational skills with the ability to set priorities and to work simultaneously on several projects.
Excellent analytical and numerate skills. Attention to detail.
Experience in analyzing large scale data in both structured and unstructured settings
Knowledge of cloud computing and AWS services is a plus
About Possible Finance
Possible Finance is a fast-growing, series B, distributed, Fin-tech startup. We believe financial health is something all Americans deserve, not just the affluent. We’re committed to empowering you with the tools to better your economic situation. We promise to be transparent, serve with kindness, be responsible, and hold ourselves accountable for creating positive change.",4.7,"Possible Finance
4.7",Remote,-1,1 to 50 Employees,2017,Unknown,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
132,Data Scientist,-1,"JOB DESCRIPTION: Data Scientist

Work as a data scientist supporting our marketing acquisition and loyalty teams by doing the following:
Analyzing and modelling out various marketing measurement and attribution models.
Developing strong LTV metrics, along with predictively modelling LTV for individual customers.
Analyzing churn and developing predictive modelling for churn.
Use data visualization tools and techniques to up-level the data acumen of the organization.
As a key member of the data team, you will work with other departments and team members as a mentor to help them build their data awareness and action on data, all while trying to hold your own at Smash Bros. The former will be much easier than the latter.

REQUIREMENTS
Must be willing to have fun while getting things done!
1-3 years of experience in quantitative work
1-3 years of machine learning development experience
Proven track record of applying advanced analytics techniques (regression, classification, and categorization) to solve business problems
Experience with NLP and other text analytics methodologies
Strong statistics skills, such as distributions, statistical testing, regression, etc.
Strong presentation skills and the ability to communicate analytical and technical concepts with confidence and in an easy-to-understand fashion
Strong SQL skills
Proficiency with other querying languages, scripting languages, and statistical/mathematical programming languages (e.g. R, MATLAB, etc.)
Degree in quantitative field (Econ, Stats, Math, Engineering, etc.), Masters degree preferred
BENEFITS
Competitive Compensation
401k Incentive Savings Plan
Health, Dental, Vision, and other Ancillary Benefits
Advancement Opportunities
Open PTO Policy
Weekly team activities
Snacks in the office
In-office gym (to counteract the snacks)
Sweet discounts on gear

Job Type: Full Time

Reports to: SVP of Data & Technology

Location: Draper, UT",4.3,"Rhone Apparel, Inc.
4.3","Draper, UT",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,"Department, Clothing, & Shoe Stores",Retail,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
133,Data Scientist,-1,"Our company, Sootchy Inc. is a dynamic AI-driven fintech startup focused on changing the World by helping people achieve their financial goals. We are currently working to eradicate the $1.5 trillion in student debt held today by 46 million Americans as well as helping all 74 million Americans currently under the age of 19 afford a college education without the huge burden of student loans. We are looking for a Data Scientist to join us in Downtown Los Angeles, CA, and help us leverage solutions that include matching techniques, machine learning, and graph theory to resolve entities across disparate data sets. Sootchy is building a revolutionary product so we need a Data Scientist to dig into data and try to predict and quantify user behavior, map out certain client's journeys, and decide on what features to push to production. Ultimately, these entity relationships will be used to build models that will be incorporated into the Sootchy Platform. What You'll Do: As a Data Scientist, you will: Guide the development of analytics data platform at Sootchy Collaborate with the engineering team to define, design and develop enterprise analytics data sets at scale. Create, measure, and analyze various KPIs to inform decisions and support recommendations across the company Implement innovative quantitative analyses, apply data wrangling techniques, and experiment with new visualization and data governance tools Foster a culture of transparency: act as the main liaison between other departments to ensure data accuracy and uniform understanding of key metrics Possess excellent communication and presentation skills Requirements 2+ years of professional experience programming in Python. Experience programming with additional languages, such as Java, Scala, R, or C highly preferred. 2+ years of experience building machine learning based solutions. Strong candidates will demonstrate how the solution they developed leveraged machine learning to increase the ROI on prior projects. Experience building recommendation systems is highly preferred. 2+ years of experience with dashboarding tools like Tableau or similar (Periscope Data is a plus) 2+ years of experience with SQL (BigQuery and MySQL is a plus) 1+ years of experience working with AWS product suite (e.g. Lambda, S3, DynamoDB, Chalice, etc.) 2+ years building scalable solutions using Hadoop/Spark based technologies Experience building data retrieval solutions (e.g. web crawlers/scrapers, locating rich data sources) highly preferred Ability to take vague requirements and transform them into concise deliverables Ability to manage multiple priorities and a fast-paced environment Bachelor's Degree in Statistics, Mathematics or similar Expertise in data governance, cataloging, and analytics data management Prior experience at a tech company is a plus You will love: Unlimited vacation policy Health, Dental, Vision Coverage 401(k) Refrigerator full of food and drinks Experience the growth of a company from up close and be an instrumental part of molding who we are Leave a mark on an industry that is still in its infancy",-1,Sootchy Inc,"Los Angeles, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
134,Data Scientist,$86k-$147k (Glassdoor Est.),"What This Position is All About:

Reporting to the Manager, Analytics, the incumbent will primarily focus on driving business results through development and execution of world class analytics to meet evolving business needs. He/she will be HBC’s analytics thought leader and focus on developing new programs and optimizing existing personalization tactics across website, email, Mobile site, app and stores.

Who You Are:

Understand business problems and identify analytic needs including machine learning algorithms suitable for solving said problem
Work collaboratively with other team members to define the advanced analytical modeling capabilities, enhancements and outcomes required to enable marketing & personalization use cases
Perform data engineering tasks required for machine learning use case using PySpark/SQL to aggregate, transform, and check multiple data sources into a centralized repository on AWS
Build, maintain and improve machine learning models to perform at scale in a production ready environment
Develop new features and augment tools based on business requirements
Build and maintain clear record of data hierarchy / lineage, to support best-in-class database management and model building
Work collaboratively with the Data Architects, Data Scientists, and other members of the Analytics team to design and build all necessary data pipelines and support other efforts required for the personalization vision
Work with other members of the Personalization Data, Analytics, and Tech teams to peer review code, write unit tests, and provide feedback on data structuring and modeling approaches
Design the test and learn / measurement approaches and techniques for newly deployed use cases
Be a SME of all data sources such as browse, all channel transactions, product, market research, credit, loyalty and 3rd party data to drive efficiencies, maximize profitability, drive customer loyalty, and optimize promotional strategies.
Participate in the strategic development of system capabilities within advanced analytics and modeling, data mining and database marketing

You also Have:

3+ years structuring databases and manipulating large data sets
2+ years writing code in relevant languages (e.g. Python, Hive, SQL, Java or Scala)
1 to 3 years of experience in marketing analytics and database marketing.
1 to 2 years of experience in supporting personalization strategies for an e-commerce industry. Retail experience preferred.
Bachelor's degree required; preferably in Business, Marketing or a quantitative field like Economics, Mathematics or Statistics
Master's preferred
Strong Microsoft Excel skills. Ability to code macros in VBA a plus.
Proven ability to apply findings to business problems to lift revenue and profits.
Knowledge of web analytics packages (e.g. Omniture, Coremetrics or Google Analytics).

As The Data Scientist, You will:

Demonstrated critical thinking and problem-solving skills, leveraging data and working side-by-side with business owners to answer business questions

Prior experience building complex machine learning models

Knowledge of relevant languages/toolse.g. advanced Python(pandas, numpy, sklearn, scipy, statsmodels), SQL (analytic functions, subqueries, etc), Spark (inclMLlib)-using pySpark & Spark SQL, Git & Github, AWS EMR, Airflow, AWS SageMaker, Dataiku or similar platforms

Ability to apply the following modeling approaches / classes of algorithms to business problems e.g. regressions, K Nearest Neighbors, Random Forest, GBM, Neural Networks, boosted trees, LDA, collaborative filtering, Bayesian

Advanced knowledge of model evaluation, tuning, and performance; familiarity with machine learning, mathematical, and statistical packages

Experience with A/B statistical inference testing, design of experiments, and standardization techniques

Experience working side-by-side with business owners, and translating business needs across disciplines into advanced analytics projects with measurable business impact

#LI-ST1

Thank you for your interest with HBC. We look forward to reviewing your application.

HBC provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, HBC complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.

HBC welcomes all applicants for this position. Should you be individually selected to participate in an assessment or selection process, accommodations are available upon request in relation to the materials or processes to be used.",3.0,"Saks Fifth Avenue
3.0","New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,-1,Company - Public,"Department, Clothing, & Shoe Stores",Retail,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
135,Data Scientist,$77k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"Division:
Engineering

As a Data Scientist you'll be responsible for helping trail blaze AI/ML at Lutron. You will apply your analytics, artificial intelligence, machine learning, and cloud technologies knowledge to create foundations for the next generation of Lutron’s smart and cloud connected platform and services.

Your Challenge:

You will be challenged to be influential and make a positive difference working on a team that is purely focused on applying data science and machine learning to various Lutron business problems.

Strong communication skills are essential to deliver your message across various stakeholders/teams with diverse backgrounds and focus areas spanning research, development, engineering, business, and management.

You will be working in a very agile, dynamic environment leading/supporting ongoing activities while starting new ones. Therefore, success in this role requires excellent multitasking and time management skills.

We look to you to surprise us in building breakthrough AI-enabled systems leveraging modern AI techniques to create value from the data collected and generated by our base systems. These AI enabled systems and services will allow us to provide highly individualized advice at a massive scale.

You will apply your advanced data analytics, artificial intelligence/machine learning knowledge and experience to interact with stakeholders, identify new problems and opportunities, develop innovative propositions, contribute to intellectual property, and build and pilot first-of-its-kind demonstrators.

You will take responsibility in implementing, deploying, and supporting Ml/AI artifacts in production environment serving interval business customers.

You will play a strong role in shaping our agenda.

Your skills and qualifications

Masters in Computer Science, Statistics, Machine Learning, Data Science, Electrical Engineering or related field, with 3-5 years of experience in working on data science projects
3-5 years of experience in working on data science projects
Strong technical skills on machine learning/AI with proven track record. These technical skills include, but not limited to, regression techniques, neural networks, decision trees, clustering, pattern recognition, probability theory, stochastic systems, Bayesian inference, statistical techniques, deep learning, supervised learning, unsupervised learning Strong technical knowledge on big data technologies, cloud, and opensource software tools
Experiences and passion in transforming ML models into production codes and deploying into production environment
Outstanding track record of successful solutions design in the digital space
A strong track record of starting new activity areas and E2E management of projects related to analytics enabled solutions and transferring to production as appropriate
Working with partners and /or affiliations, track record in establishing partnerships
Desirable experience in multicultural/global team and influencing decisions at the highest management levels.
Experienced in using AI/ML platforms, technologies, techniques (e.g. TensorFlow, PyTorch, Apache MXnet, Theano, Keras, CNTK, scikit-learn, H2O, Spark MLlib, etc).
Proficiency with SQL and NoSQL databases
Proficiency with scalable data extraction tools (e.g. Cassandra, MongoDB, HDFS)
Proficiency with Scala, Spark, Python, and/or R

Lutron Electronics’ position as the leading manufacturer of lighting controls worldwide, our unsurpassed quality, the breadth and depth of our product offerings, and our commitment to servicing our customers has resulted in annual double-digit growth. This growth has, in turn, allowed the company to continue to invest in finding and retaining the best people to service our customers. Continuous growth has also fueled our ability to constantly develop new technologies and processes that drive the creation of new or better products, solutions, and services.

Lutron offers a competitive compensation and benefits package and a dynamic and professional work environment. We also offer continued growth through increased job responsibilities, courses offered through Lutron University and advancement opportunities. For more information, view our website at www.lutron.com .

EOE/AA

Back
Share
Apply Now",3.8,"Lutron Electronics
3.8","Coopersburg, PA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1961,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
136,Senior Data Scientist - Analytics,$100k-$160k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


Intuit is seeking a Senior Customer Analyst to cover Intuits Consumer Group (TurboTax, Mint, Turbo). We have an exciting opportunity to help shape how we use data to generate hypotheses, surface insights, and build models in order to personalize customer experiences and provide awesome outcomes for the business and our customers. This role will partner closely with data engineering, data analytics, data science, marketing managers, and product management.
What you'll bring


· 5-7 years of experience working in web, product, customer, care, or other related analytics fields. Ability to tell stories with data, educate effectively, and instill confidence, motivating stakeholders to act on recommendations.

· 3+ years applied data science/data modeling experience. Ability to Analyze large amounts of structured and unstructured data and determine suitability for modeling. Broad understanding and demonstrated history of applying various algorithms to business use cases to drive business and customer value.

· Strong modeling foundation hands-on expertise with data mining and statistical modeling techniques such as clustering, classification, regression, tree-based methods, neural nets, support vector machines, anomaly detection, and natural language processing. Expertise with NLP is a plus.

· Expertise in modern advanced analytical tools and programming languages such as Python (highly preferred will be used in this role), Scala, or R. Efficient in SQL, Hive, SparkSQL, etc.

· Ability to manage projects end-to-end to meet objectives and deadlines.

· Outstanding communications skills with both technical and non-technical colleagues.

· MS in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Economics, Operations Research, or equivalent is preferred.
How you will lead


· Partner with cross-functional stakeholders to better understand our users and create a single, accurate view of a customer across businesses to make decisions about how best to acquire/retain them, segment, identify high potential value, and proactively interact with them.

· Own projects from the teams backlog, and partner directly with business partners to effectively execute on a co-owned and evolving product strategy.

· Deliver advanced Data Science capabilities in a meaningful manner through successful proof-of-concept solutions, and later on, smoothly transition the proof-of-concept into production.

· Continuously contribute to the enablement, development, and deployment of ML-driven solutions to integrate within our applications, amplifying our capabilities, automate decision-making, and provide predictive intelligence.

· Contribute to the enablement the development and onboarding of Self-Service Machine Learning frameworks to scale ML capabilities

· Conduct evaluations and assessments of new tools and technologies to ensure that the team stays at the frontier of Analytics.

· Ability to communicate complex analytical concepts clearly and concisely both in written form and verbally to both technical and non-technical audiences, with a track record of strong partnerships with key stakeholders and clients across multiple functions

· Lead projects with hands-on analysis and modeling, drawing from multiple analytical methods to choose the right tool and right level of complexity appropriate for the business challenges

· Collect, analyze, and model available data to advance the customer analytics space and build a broad understanding of the Consumer Groups customers and relevant customer segments.

· Pursue data quality, troubleshoot data validation, and see issues to resolution.",4.3,"Intuit - Data
4.3","San Diego, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1983,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
137,Data Scientist,$60k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who We Are

SimpliSafe is a leading innovator in the DIY security industry with one mission: to make every home secure. We believe in democratizing home safety. As our co-founder Chad Laurans aptly put it, ""you shouldn't have to ask permission to secure your home. You should be able to do it yourself.""

SimpliSafe protects over 3 million Americans and we're growing at a rapid pace. We pride ourselves in being daring innovators, humble cooperators, and data driven thinkers. We go wherever the best idea leads us, work selflessly to get the best outcomes for our customers, and constantly analyze & reevaluate our efforts.

The Job

As part of the Data & Analytics Team, reporting to the Head of Data Science, this role plays a critical part in building out SimpliSafe's analytics capability. As SimpliSafe has been growing significantly over the last few years, its advanced analytics needs have outgrown its current analytics capacity. We are now in the process of increasing the rigor of SimpliSafe's existing models, e.g. for customer segmentation or forecasting, but also support the business with new predictive capability around customer satisfaction, product recommendations, or situational awareness at the property we help protect. The Data Scientist will play an integral part in building out these analytics capabilities as well as in the analysis that leads to a better customer experience and a safer home for them.

What You'll Do:
apply best suited modelling techniques, like deep learning, machine learning or traditional statistical modelling, to the problem at hand,
work with project stakeholders to identify business needs and gather requirements for data analysis or development of new analytics tools,
collaborate with Data Engineering and other Data & Analytics colleagues on the build-out of SimpliSafe's new analytics tools,
convey meaningful insights via effective communication of analysis outcomes,
provide quick-response support to function team members for modelling and analysis projects,
document model creation, assumptions, and future use,
provide training on the models you built for function and Data & Analytics team members,
promote the use of more advanced data science techniques throughout the business.
This is an opportunity to join a new team tasked with transforming the organization to be truly data-driven, upscale its analytics capability and utilize the wealth of information we have access to.

What You'll Need:
Education and Experience
Undergraduate degree in a field linked to data science, business analytics, applied mathematics, computer science, engineering or related field is required; advanced degree is preferred
2+ years relevant industry experience with focus on implementation of data science methods
Experience with data visualization and presentation tools (like PPT) is a plus
Technical Competencies
Proficiency with
core data science methods like machine & deep learning, regression
core concepts in statistics like summary statistics, t-tests, sampling
SQL and relational data modelling
programming languages like Python, R, Scala
libraries and technologies commonly used in data analysis, statistics and ML such as pandas, scikit-learn, XGBoost, tensorflow, Spark
tools commonly used for data analysis such as Jupiter Notebooks
Experience with
data engineering development cycle (SDLC) and tools such as Git
monitoring, evaluating and tuning models in production
data visualization tools like matplotlib or Tableau
Advanced Analytics methods like Simulation (g. MC, dynamic, discrete event) or Optimization (e.g. linear programming, heuristic) a plus
computer vision and NLP a plus
data pipeline tools like AirFlow or Prefect a plus
query engines such as Athena, PrestoDB, Snowflake a plus
agile methodologies a plus
Soft skills
Able to anticipate, identify, and solve critical problems
Flexible, self-motivated, and proactive out-of-the-box thinker
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills
Fluent written and spoken English
Ability and willingness to give and receive honest, balanced feedback
Excellent organizational skills with strong attention to detail, efficient time management, and the ability to prioritize work effectively
Independently and proactively communicates issues, priorities, and objectives
Strong collaborative skills and able to adjust approach to effectively interact with customers at all organizational and technical levels
Ability to respect all of SimpliSafe's and its customer information as confidential",3.3,"SimpliSafe
3.3","Boston, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
138,Data Scientist,$60k-$101k (Glassdoor Est.),"_Redstone Federal Credit Union is actively seeking a Data Scientist in Huntsville, AL today!_*
About Us: *
Redstone Federal Credit Union is a data-rich institution investing in data science experts who can leverage the power of that data. Raise approval rates, suppress charge-offs, crush fraud, make our marketing dollars count. All in the service of our ultimate goal: to give back more to our community and brighten the financial lives of our members.

At Redstone, youll find a board of directors and executive teams who are committed to making data the foundation of our future success, and youll have a lot of influence in how we do that. Youll collaborate with business owners, data analysts, and data engineers to identify, prioritize and formulate data science efforts. Develop and deploy machine learning and decision optimization solutions. Conduct exploratory data analysis (EDA) and inferential statistical analysis. Design experiments. Grow your own skills while training the next generation of data scientists.
Benefits: *
Health/Dental/Vision insurance
Retirement plan, Signing bonus,
Paid time off, Relocation assistance
Tuition reimbursement
Responsibilities: *
Develops supervised and unsupervised machine learning models.
Conducts inferential analysis to draw valid conclusions about a population given sample data.
Design experiments to evaluate potential business improvements, such as (for example) evaluating the effectiveness of marketing promotions on improving sales.
Conducts descriptive and exploratory analytics, understanding and communicating what a dataset can tell us about (for example) members, products, processes, competition, the economic environment, and marketing promotions.
Continuously builds domain expertise in various credit union subject areas, such as (for example) marketing, underwriting, fraud, and service channels.
Performs other related duties as assigned or requested.
Requirements: *
5+ years of work experience or Masters degree in data science, statistics, computer science, or closely related field
5+ years' responsible business domain experience in applied machine learning and decision optimization.
Experience with various open-source toolsets and environments (e.g., Python, Jupyter, R, Scala, SQL, etc.)
Experience in distributed computing (e.g. Apache Spark).
Experience with feature engineering.
Experience with experimental design and inferential statistics.
Experience in consumer finance is preferred.
_Indeed Hire and Redstone Federal Credit Union are working together to find the best candidate for this job. _*
_By applying, you agree to be contacted by our agent, Indeed Hire, and receive updates via text and phone about your application._*
Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
Scala: 1 year (Preferred)
Spark: 1 year (Preferred)
Experimental Design: 1 year (Preferred)
SQL: 1 year (Preferred)
data scientist: 5 years (Preferred)
Applied machine learning in a business setting : 5 years (Preferred)
R: 1 year (Preferred)
Python: 1 year (Preferred)
full agile sdlc methodology: 1 year (Preferred)
analytics: 1 year (Preferred)
hadoop: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Job distance:
Huntsville, AL: Between 31 and 40 miles (Preferred)",3.5,"Redstone Federal Credit Union
3.5","Huntsville, AL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1951,Nonprofit Organization,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
139,Data Scientist,$77k-$124k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company:
Safeway Inc-001

Job Title:
Data Scientist

Address:
5918 STONERIDGE MALL RD, PLEASANTON, California 94588

Job Description:
Position

The Data Science team at Albertsons Companies is looking for an experienced Data Scientist to work for the most transformational food and drug retailers in the United States. Albertsons operates over 2,300 stores under 19 well-known banners including Albertsons, Safeway, Vons, Jewel-Osco, Shaw's, Acme, Tom Thumb, Randalls, United Supermarkets, Pavilions, Star Market, Haggen and Carrs. The company reported revenue of over $60 billion from over 34 million weekly shoppers and is the third largest private company in the country.

Data Science at Albertsons is inspired to build best in class customer experience and revolutionize the food and drug retail industry. We are looking for people who are excited in re-imagining the grocery experience by harnessing the power of AI and digital technologies. The Data Science team collect and rely on big data from existing stores and customer interactions at the 2300 nationwide stores and beyond. We are a highly driven team that apply data science to delight our customers, to improve store operations, to optimize supply chain and to proactively improve product lifecycle.

You will enjoy working with one of the richest data sets in the world, cutting edge technology, and the ability to see your insights turned into business impacts on regular basis. You'll work closely with other data scientists and business partners in identifying and defining data science projects, building machine learning algorithms and models on top of existing data platforms. The candidate will have a background in computer science or a related technical field with experiences working with large data sets and applying data-driven decision making. A successful candidate will be both technically strong and business savvy, with a passion to make an impact through creative storytelling and timely actions. You are a self-starter, smart yet humble, with a bias for action.

Key Responsibilities include, but are not limited to:
* Collaborate with business teams to develop production grade machine learning models on large-scale datasets and improve customers' overall shopping experience
Enhance and apply customer lifetime value models to support various business decision making
Generate sentiment analysis based on surveys and customer feedbacks in order to deliver lovable customer experiences
Identify key drivers for customer satisfaction and opportunities to delight customers through mining complex data
Apply machine learning to enhance recommendation engines and deliver personalized user experience on ecommerce website and loyalty mobile app
Build models and algorithms to fuel growth initiatives for Digital, Merchandising, Marketing and Loyalty teams
Apply predictive modeling techniques to optimize the forecasts for planning needs
Scale up prototypes and implement reliable automated production workflow for models
Collaborate with software development engineers to integrate models
Qualifications:
Masters or PhD degree in quantitative discipline: Computer Science, Engineering, Data Science, Math, Statistics or related fields
2+ years of industry experience in applying data science and modeling methodologies: regression model, survival model, ensemble modeling, NLP, recommendation algorithm, clustering, deep learning algorithm, experimental design (Multivariate/A-B testing) and nonparametric Bayesian modeling etc.
2+ years of experience and proficiency in SQL, Python and/or Spark-ML
2+ years of SQL development skills writing queries, transforming data, mining structured and unstructured data.
2+ years of hands-on experience in building data science solutions and production-ready systems on big data platforms such as Snowflake, Spark, Hadoop
Strong teamwork and communication skill
Ability to write production-level code in Python
Experience with Snowflake, Azure Databricks is a strong plus",3.2,"Safeway Inc
3.2","Pleasanton, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1915,Company - Private,Grocery Stores & Supermarkets,Retail,$10+ billion (USD),-1
140,Data Scientist,$66k-$109k (Glassdoor Est.),"“Join us to make the world's roadways smarter and Safer”
“Join us if you have true passion to improve traffic safety”

“Join us to implement technologies shaping the automotive future”

Savari, a leader in V2X technology is seeking talented and highly motivated Data Scientist for its
Santa Clara Engineering team. Savari seeks to make the world's roadways smarter and safer by
deploying advanced wireless sensor technologies and software’s for V2X environment. With more
than 150 man-years of V2X learning and development and 15 million-plus miles per year of public
testing, Savari is headquartered in Santa Clara, CA and has offices in Detroit, Germany, India and
China. The company is comprised of a core team of industry veterans from the automotive,
semiconductor, software and telecom industries.
www.savari.net

Roles & Responsibilities What you will do

• Help product team to set up tests and perform statistical analysis on results to provide actionable
Insights.

• Analyze various data sets and provide directive insight based on trending

• Build statistical models to predict interactions and segment users based on behavior.
• Work closely with the team to put together seemingly disparate pieces of data, build out the data

pipeline and create interactive dashboards
• Analyze time series data
• Proactively communicate data methodology and results to a diverse set of stakeholders
• Write queries, contribute to larger scale products/projects and perform ad hoc analyses as needed
• Comfortable with working in fast-paced environments to find answers to critical questions with

data and be decisive in an ambiguous situation Develop predictive modelers.

You should have following skills

• Ph.D. or master's degree, or equivalent, in Computer Science, Math, Engineering, or related field

• Expertise in OpenCV, Computer Vision field with 2+ years of hands-on experience involving real-
world data.

• Solid understanding of computer science algorithms, data structures, and numerical optimization
methods

• Strong technical communicator. Plots and graphs should be your tool of choice, and you're happiest
explaining complicated concepts to non-technical audience

• Experience with Tensorflow, Statistical Time-Series, Predictive Modeling and machine learning
Algorithms.

• Demonstrated ability to think strategically about business, product, and technical challenges

Location: Santa Clara, CA

To apply for this job please send your resume at jobs@savari.net",3.7,"Savari
3.7","Santa Clara, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
141,Data Scientist,$101k-$161k (Glassdoor Est.),"As part of the Commercial Data Science team in Commercial Data & Analytics Group, the Data Scientist will lead projects and collaborate with business partners including commercial insights teams, brand teams, sales operations, data teams, external vendor partners, media agencies, service owners and IS partners to develop analytical models and insights across the US Commercial Organization to answer/solve specific business problems. This role will lead advanced analytics projects from the front and will be responsible for end to end execution. This role will innovate and create significant business impact through the strategic use of advanced analytics techniques.

This position will be primarily responsible for: ·
Leading, using and developing data science, machine learning, and artificial intelligence capabilities across Amgens commercial organization
Leading the projects and be part of cross functional teams on projects and/or programs with aims to systematically derive insights that ultimately derive substantial business value for Amgen
Taking the initiative and work independently with minimal supervision
Identifying business needs, doing SWOT analysis, proposing potential analytical approaches for solutions, obtain approvals and the execute the work end to end.
Building high-performance algorithms, prototypes, predictive models and proof of concepts using Python or R
Working with SQL and other DB query languages
Leading, collaborating and communicating cross-functionally with stakeholders to develop appropriate methodology to answer specific business questions
Presenting analysis ideas, progress and results to business partners in clear and impactful manner
Creating powerful stories in PowerPoint. Well versed in MS Office suite specifically Excel and PowerPoint
Assuring compliance with regulatory, security, and privacy requirements as it relates to data assets
Basic Qualifications:

Masters degree and 3 years of data science, business, statistics, data mining, applied mathematics, business analytics, engineering, computer science or related field experience

OR

Bachelors degree and 5 years of data science, business, statistics, data mining, applied mathematics, business analytics, engineering, computer science or related field experience

OR

Associates degree and 10 years of data science, business, statistics, data mining, applied mathematics, business analytics, engineering, computer science or related field experience

OR

High school diploma / GED and 12 years of data science, business, statistics, data mining, applied mathematics, business analytics, engineering, computer science or related field experience

Preferred Qualifications:
Degree in Data Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Applied Physics, Statistics, or Operations Research
Experience leading the projects and in executions of the projects end to end
Experience with databases including relational, SQL, and Graph
Programming experience with Python, R, or SAS and experience with ML libraries like scikitlearn, MLib, Keras, TensorFlow, Pytorch, etc.
Write well-abstracted and reusable code in Python, R, or Scala; you freely navigate in Linux environment;
Detail-oriented technical aptitude with strong logical, problem solving, and decision-making skills
Excellent organization/planning skills and talent for managing many large and complex datasets
Ability to collaborate and influence business partners and other IS resources to drive analytic projects end-to-end
Excellent communication skills to communicate analysis in a clear, precise, and actionable manner
Experience working with large datasets, experience working with distributed computing tools (Spark, Hive, etc.)
Passion for learning and staying on top of current developments in advanced analytics ·
Biotech / Pharma experience
Amgen is committed to unlocking the potential of biology for patients suffering from serious illnesses by discovering, developing, manufacturing and delivering innovative human therapeutics. This approach begins by using tools like advanced human genetics to unravel the complexities of disease and understand the fundamentals of human biology.

Amgen focuses on areas of high unmet medical need and leverages its expertise to strive for solutions that improve health outcomes and dramatically improve peoples lives. A biotechnology pioneer since 1980, Amgen has grown to be one of the worlds leading independent biotechnology companies, has reached millions of patients around the world and is developing a pipeline of medicines with breakaway potential.

Join Us

If you're seeking a career where you can truly make a difference in the lives of others, a career where you can work at the absolute forefront of biotechnology with the top minds in the field, you'll find it at Amgen.

Amgen, a biotechnology pioneer, discovers, develops and delivers innovative human therapeutics. Our medicines have helped millions of patients in the fight against cancer, kidney disease, rheumatoid arthritis and other serious illnesses.

As an organization dedicated to improving the quality of life for people around the world, Amgen fosters an inclusive environment of diverse, ethical, committed and highly accomplished people who respect each other but compete intensely to win. Together, we live the Amgen values as we continue advancing science to serve patients.

Amgen is an Equal Opportunity employer and will consider all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, or disability status.",3.8,"Amgen
3.8","Thousand Oaks, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1980,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
142,Data Scientist,$43k-$74k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tiger Analytics is looking for experienced Data Scientists to join our fast-growing advanced analytics consulting firm. Our consultants bring deep expertise in Data Science, Machine Learning and AI. We are the trusted analytics partner for multiple Fortune 500 companies, enabling them to generate business value from data. Our business value and leadership has been recognized by various market research firms, including Forrester and Gartner. We are looking for top-notch talent as we continue to build the best global analytics consulting team in the world.

As a Data Scientist, you will apply strong expertise in AI through the use of machine learning, data mining, and information retrieval to design, prototype, and build next generation advanced analytics engines and services. You will collaborate with cross-functional teams and business partners to define the technical problem statement and hypotheses to test. You will develop efficient and accurate analytical models which mimic business decisions and incorporate those models into analytical data products and tools. You will have the opportunity to drive current and future strategy by leveraging your analytical skills as you ensure business value and communicate the results.

Key Responsibilities
Collaborate with business partners to develop innovative solutions to meet objectives utilizing cutting edge techniques and tools.
Effectively communicate the analytics approach and how it will meet and address objectives to business partners.
Advocate and educate on the value of data-driven decision making; focus on the “how and why” of solutioning.
Lead analytic approaches; integrate solutions collaboratively into applications and tools with data engineers, business leads, analysts and developers.
Create repeatable, interpretable, dynamic and scalable models that are seamlessly incorporated into analytic data products.
Engineer features by using your business acumen to find new ways to combine disparate internal and external data sources.
Share your passion for Data Science with the broader enterprise community; identify and develop long-term processes, frameworks, tools, methods and standards.
Collaborate, coach, and learn with a growing team of experienced Data Scientists.
Stay connected with external sources of ideas through conferences and community engagements
Requirements
Bachelors Degree in Data Science, Computer Science, or related field
2-5 years of Data Science and Machine Learning experience required
Proficiency in Python or R. Ability to write complex SQL queries
Proficiency with Machine Learning concepts and modeling techniques to solve problems such as clustering, classification, regression, anomaly detection, simulation and optimization problems on large scale data sets.
Ability to implement ML best practices for the entire Data Science lifecycle
Ability to apply various analytical models to business use cases (NLP, Supervised, Un-Supervised, Neural Nets, etc.)
Exceptional communication and collaboration skills to understand business partner needs and deliver solutions
Bias for action, with the ability to deliver outstanding results through task prioritization and time management
Experience with data visualization tools — Tableau, R Shiny, etc. preferred
Benefits

This position offers an excellent opportunity for significant career development in a fast-growing and challenging entrepreneurial environment with a high degree of individual responsibility.",4.4,"Tiger Analytics
4.4","Hartford, CT",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
143,Data Scientist,$98k-$160k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a Data Scientist for the CIA, you will organize and interpret data to inform US decision makers, drive successful operations and shape CIA technology and resource investments. Through CIA's global mission, the Agency has access to unique and highly specialized data sets. You will work with advanced hardware, software and techniques to develop computational algorithms and statistical methods that find patterns and relationships in large volumes of data.
Bachelor's degree preferably in a quantitative science, engineering, or social sciences field.
GPA of at least 3.0 on a 4-point scale
Experience in a science, technology, engineering or mathematics (STEM) related field, such as:
Computer science.
Mathematics or Statistics.
Data analytics.
Quantitative social science.
Economics.
Engineering.
Physics.
Operations research.
As a Data Scientist for the CIA, you will organize and interpret data to inform US decision makers, drive successful operations and shape CIA technology and resource investments. Through CIA's global mission, the Agency has access to unique and highly specialized data sets. You will work with advanced hardware, software and techniques to develop computational algorithms and statistical methods that find patterns and relationships in large volumes of data. Data Scientists clearly communicate their conclusions to a diverse audience and become experts through Agency-sponsored continuing education, attendance at academic and technical conferences as well as collaboration with the Intelligence Community.

For further information and to apply, please visit: https://www.cia.gov/careers/opportunities/science-technology/data-scientist.htmlMinimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree preferably in a quantitative science, engineering, or social sciences field.
GPA of at least 3.0 on a 4-point scale.
Experience in a science, technology, engineering or mathematics (STEM) related field, such as:
Computer science.
Mathematics or Statistics.
Data analytics.
Quantitative social science.
Economics.
Engineering.
Physics.
Operations research.
Familiarity with three (3) key data science skills, strength in at least one (1):
Mathematical techniques to understand and interpret data.
Computational or programming techniques to create reusable and scalable solutions.
Interaction or visualization techniques to enable clarity in interpreting data and making decisions.
Experience solving problems with real world data through thesis research, internships, or work experience.
Demonstrated Creativity, Initiative, Integrity, and leadership abilities.
Ability to work in a diverse team environment and collaborate with subject matter experts.
Desired Qualifications:
Advanced degree in a quantitative field.
Depth of experience and current skills in at least two (2) of the key data science skills.
Experience in requirements analysis, deriving key needs, and working with non-technical experts.
Ability to successfully complete projects with large or incomplete data and provide solutions.
Experience presenting data-driven insights to customers and colleagues.
Experience applying machine learning, natural language processing, or reasoning systems.
Strong written and verbal communication skills.",4.1,"Central Intelligence Agency
4.1","Washington, DC",-1,Unknown,1947,Government,Federal Agencies,Government,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
144,Data Scientist,$64k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"a.dialogApplyBtn {
display: none;
}

Date: Oct 17, 2020

Primary Location:

St. Paul, MN, US, 55107

#job-location.job-location-inline {
display: inline;
}

Company:
NextEra Energy
Requisition ID: 44563

NextEra Analytics is the optimization and analytics team for the world’s largest renewable energy generator. We thrive on solving the toughest problems facing the energy industry and creating innovative forecasting and optimization solutions that lead the way into the next era of energy.

Position Specific Description

NextEra Analytics is currently seeking a well-qualified candidate to join our Applied Math Group as a Data Scientist in St. Paul, Minnesota.

As a member of the Applied Math Group you will be asked:
To solve the problems by applying techniques from mathematics, statistics, computer science, and related disciplines
To develop new products and services in collaboration with NextEra’s engineering, science and business teams
To apply mathematical formulations, scientific rigor and an independent viewpoint to business analyses
To respond quickly and effectively to new (and recycled) business problems as they arise.
The Applied Math team is looking for Data Scientists who want to understand the mathematical properties of the algorithms they use; to write and share the best possible code; to keep learning new tools, algorithms and approaches; and to put their skills to work for one of the largest renewable energy fleets in the world.
Job Overview
This position is responsible for developing algorithms, modeling techniques, and optimization methods that support many aspects of NextEra and FPL business. Employees in this role use knowledge of machine learning, optimization, statistics, and applied mathematics along with abilities in software engineering with a focus on distributed computing and data storage infrastructure (e.g. “Big Data”).
Job Duties & Responsibilities
Develops machine learning, optimization and other modeling solutions
Prepares comprehensive documented observations, analyses and interpretations of results including technical reports, summaries, protocols and quantitative analyses
Works with a variety of datasets, including timeseries data and “big data” requiring analysis on distributed computing platforms
Writes software in R, Python or similar languages and contributes code to product development teams
Performs other job-related duties as assigned
Required Qualifications
Bachelor’s Degree
Experience: 3+ years
Preferred Qualifications
Master’s Degree
Doctoral Degree

Employee Group: Exempt
Employee Type: Full Time
Job Category: Science, Research, and Technology
Organization: NextEra Analytics Inc
Location: St. Paul, Minnesota
Other Work Locations: Minnesota
Relocation Provided: Yes, if applicable

NextEra Energy is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Qualified applicants are considered for employment without regard to race, color, age, national origin, religion, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, genetics, disability, protected veteran status or any other basis prohibited by law. We are committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace.

If you require special support or accommodation while seeking employment with NextEra Energy, please send an e-mail to recruiting-coordinator.sharedmailbox@nexteraenergy.com, providing your name, telephone number and the best time for us to reach you. Alternatively, you may call 1-844-694-4748. Please do not use this line to inquire about your application status.

NextEra Energy will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information.

NextEra Energy does not accept any unsolicited resumes or referrals from any third-party recruiting firms or agencies. Please see our policy for more information.

#LI-RK1

Nearest Major Market: Minneapolis",3.5,"NextEra Energy, Inc.
3.5","Saint Paul, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,-1,Company - Public,Utilities,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$10+ billion (USD),-1
145,Data Scientist,$63k-$106k (Glassdoor Est.),"LexisNexis Risk Solutions

We develop industry-leading compliance solutions to help customers fight financial crimes and stay abreast of anti-money laundering, anti-bribery and corruption, and countering financing of terrorism legislations. LexisNexis Risk Solutions cares about our world and we would love for you to join our team if you want to help solve meaningful problems too.

Data Scientist - Associate
Opportunity to join a vibrant, collaborative team as an entry level statistical modeler conducting statistical analysis and building predictive models for a variety of uses and markets, including credit, fraud, telecommunication, retail, government and business. You would be expected to have a firm understanding of data mining, statistical methods and multiple modeling techniques. As part of the team you would be tasked with finding innovative ways to produce solutions to serve our customers and continually expand your expertise.
Responsibilities:
Assemble, merge and parse large amounts of data to detect meaningful trends and patterns
Explore opportunities to enhance existing data with new features or evaluate new data sources to improve product solutions
Develop analytic models, create and provide analysis code, and work with internal or external stakeholders to validate accuracy of production code.
Consult with internal and external clients regarding analytic solution implementation, score calculations, analytic output, and statistical techniques
Interpret, document and successfully communicate analytic work, requirements, and/or results to stakeholders, including those in non-analytic roles
Conduct analysis and produce reports in support of both existing and new product development and/or customer sales
Understand and execute analytic plans with the appropriate statistical or modeling technique
Proactively identify and communicate data quality issues and successfully work with other teams to implement solutions

Required Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in statistics, data science, mathematics or quantitative methods (or equivalent years’ experience)
1-2 years’ experience building predictive models or conducting data analysis using R, SAS or similar software package.
Knowledge of statistical analysis methodologies and in particular machine learning.
Experience with R, Python or similar software packages
Experience with data manipulation techniques
High degree of creative, analytical and problem-solving skills
Ability to learn quickly and communicate effectively
Ability to work effectively both independently and collaboratively
Willingness to adapt to new techniques and an innovative attitude towards finding solutions
Fluency with presentation and document programs such as PowerPoint, Word, Excel

Preferred Qualifications:
Experience with multi-node computing platforms like Hadoop
Experience with version control through Git
Master’s degree in statistics, data science, mathematics or quantitative methods
Proficient in using R Markdown, or Shiny.
Experience developing tools to aid in data science endeavors

Our team members are dedicated individuals striving to provide our clients with innovative solutions to their very real problems. If you are looking to be a member of a team providing world-class analytics and data-driven solutions for our partners and customers, we welcome you to apply!

We are an equal opportunity employer: qualified applicants are considered for and treated during employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, sex, national origin, citizenship status, disability status, protected veteran status, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law. If a qualified individual with a disability or disabled veteran needs a reasonable accommodation to use or access our online system, that individual should please contact 1.877.734.1938 or accommodations@relx.com.

Please read our Candidate Privacy Policy",3.7,"RELX
3.7","San Diego, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1880,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
146,Data Scientist,$74k-$119k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a full spectrum AWS integrator, we assist hundreds of companies to realize the value, efficiency, and productivity of the cloud. We take customers on their journey to enable, operate, and innovate using cloud technologies – from migration strategy to operational excellence and immersive transformation.

If you like a challenge, you’ll love it here, because we’re solving complex business problems every day, building and promoting great technology solutions that impact our customers’ success. The best part is, we’re committed to you and your growth, both professionally and personally.

Overview

Our Data Scientists are experienced technologists with technical depth and breadth, along with strong interpersonal skills. In this role, you will work directly with customers and our team to help enable innovation through continuous, hands-on, deployment across technology stacks. You will work to build data science pipelines that include building models, A/B testing, natural language processing, computer vision and AR/VR visualizations.

If you get a thrill working with cutting-edge technology and love to help solve customers’ problems, we’d love to hear from you. It’s time to rethink the possible. Are you ready?
What You’ll Be Doing:
Confidence with manipulating complex, large and dense datasets with big data tools; must be comfortable with SQL and large database systems
Ability to Build complex data transformation code
Build complex SQL queries using MongoDB, Oracle, SQL Server, MariaDB, MySQL
Excellent ability to work with structured and unstructured data sets
Deep experience with R or Python, SQL and running ETL jobs
Ability to apply supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques
Strong understanding of continuous learning and model training
Knowledge of data labeling, categorization, and structuring techniques
Expert ability to break down and clearly define problems
Strong ability to communicate highly technical results to a diverse audience
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills
Qualifications & Experience:
3-5 years of hands-on experience in data mining and predictive analytics with statistical modeling techniques
3-5+ years of experience in networking, infrastructure, or database architectures
Experience working with data in the AWS ecosystem
Experience with advanced data science tools
Experience applying computational algorithms and statistical methods to structured and unstructured data
MS or PhD in Applied Mathematics, Physics, Computer Science, Statistics or related technical field
Experience in the cyber security domain
AWS certifications
SQL
Kubernetes is a plus
Artificial Intelligence
Predictive Analytics
Tableau or other visualization tools
Kafka / Confluent
CI / CD and Cloud Native Computing (Docker, Kubernetes, Consul, Vault)
#Onica

About Rackspace Technology
We are the multicloud solutions experts. We combine our expertise with the world’s leading technologies — across applications, data and security — to deliver end-to-end solutions. We have a proven record of advising customers based on their business challenges, designing solutions that scale, building and managing those solutions, and optimizing returns into the future. Named a best place to work, year after year according to Fortune, Forbes and Glassdoor, we attract and develop world-class talent. Join us on our mission to embrace technology, empower customers and deliver the future.

More on Rackspace Technology
Though we’re all different, Rackers thrive through our connection to a central goal: to be a valued member of a winning team on an inspiring mission. We bring our whole selves to work every day. And we embrace the notion that unique perspectives fuel innovation and enable us to best serve our customers and communities around the globe. We welcome you to apply today and want you to know that we are committed to offering equal employment opportunity without regard to age, color, disability, gender reassignment or identity or expression, genetic information, marital or civil partner status, pregnancy or maternity status, military or veteran status, nationality, ethnic or national origin, race, religion or belief, sexual orientation, or any legally protected characteristic. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know.",3.7,"Rackspace
3.7","Dallas, TX",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1998,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
147,Data Scientist,-1,"WHAT WE DO MATTERS:

Here at The Knot Worldwide, we believe in doing work that matters. In 15 countries around the world, our leading family of brands (The Knot, WeddingWire, Bodas, GigMasters, The Bump, How They Asked, Lasting, and more) inspire, inform, and celebrate our communities as they move through life's milestones. From the proposal to creating a home, and starting a family together, we're there for every step of the journey. Our couples and business partners depend on us. They're all in. So are we.

ABOUT THE ROLE AND OUR TEAM:

The Knot Worldwide is in search of a full-time Data Scientist. Our Data Scientists work with stakeholders across all departments within the company. They answer strategic questions and provide insight to internal decision makers ranging from executives and senior management to product managers and team leads. They also work with our product team to develop data driven algorithms that improve features on the website.

This opening is for our Marketplace zone which connects over 2 million engaged couples with +50,000 local wedding vendors (e.g. Venue, DJ, Florist, etc.) across the US each year. This position plays an essential role in solving complex problems across our two-sided marketplace in areas such as pricing, product strategy, and go-to-market optimization.

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Create smarter product solutions for our couples and vendors
Answer strategic questions by analyzing behavioral data
Communicate, collaborate and present results to clients within The Knot Worldwide
Explore novel ways to look at our data
SUCCESSFUL DATA SCIENTIST CANDIDATES HAVE:
Master's Degree or Ph.D. preferred
Experience implementing auction based business models
Strong product experience
Proficiency in key statistical and machine learning techniques (predictive modeling, classification, clustering, text analytics, recommender systems , data mining methods, forecasting, and other advanced techniques)
Proficiency with R or Python
Familiarity with common Linux command line tasks and version control software like git or svn preferable
Ability to communicate effectively and influence others
Ability to work in a fast paced environment and shift gears quickly
At The Knot Worldwide, we believe you are more than a resume and invite you to go for it, take the leap of faith, and apply for this job if it sparks your passion to join TKWW and make a difference!

WHAT WE LOVE ABOUT YOU:
You Dream Big. You iterate and experiment to drive innovation.
You Love Our Users. You keep our global community at the center of everything you do.
You Respect All Voices. Inclusion strengthens us and powers your decisions.
You Hustle Every Day. You favor urgency and own your outcomes.
You Win Together. People are at the heart of our success and you play as a team.
WHAT YOU LOVE ABOUT US:

The Knot Worldwide offers a unique employee experience and we are deeply proud of our award-winning culture. From flexible vacation and generous parental leave benefits to promoting wellness and giving back to our community, we believe in happiness above all else—in and out of the office.

----

The Knot Worldwide provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, or disability. In addition to federal law requirements, The Knot Worldwide complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. The Knot Worldwide expressly prohibits any form of workplace harassment based on race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, or veteran status.

--

This position is not eligible for sponsorship.

--

If you are a resident of California, by submitting your application, you acknowledge that you've read the California Privacy Notice.",3.8,"The Knot Worldwide
3.8",Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2019,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
148,Research Data Scientist,$89k-$145k (Glassdoor Est.),"Facebook's mission is to give people the power to build community and bring the world closer together. Through our family of apps and services, we're building a different kind of company that connects billions of people around the world, gives them ways to share what matters most to them, and helps bring people closer together. Whether we're creating new products or helping a small business expand its reach, people at Facebook are builders at heart. Our global teams are constantly iterating, solving problems, and working together to empower people around the world to build community and connect in meaningful ways. Together, we can help people build stronger communities - we're just getting started.

The Infrastructure Quantitative Engineering group is responsible for the strategic analysis to support and enable the continued growth critical to Facebooks infrastructure organization. We are applied quantitative and computational experts using math, statistics and machine learning to measure & optimize cost, performance, reliability and efficiency of Facebooks infrastructure & global telecom systems to deliver the best experience to our global audience. The ideal candidate will be passionate about Facebook, have strong analytical and modeling aptitude and has experience using data to drive cost effective decision making.
Build pragmatic, scalable, and statistically rigorous solutions to large-scale web, mobile and data infrastructure problems by leveraging or developing state-of-the-art statistical and machine learning methodologies on top of Facebook's unparalleled data infrastructure
Work cross-functionally to define problem statements, collect data, build analytical models and make recommendations
Build and maintain data driven optimization models, experiments, forecasting algorithms, and machine learning models
Leverage tools like Python, R, Hadoop & SQL to drive efficient analytics
Communicate final recommendations and drive decision making
Degree in quantitative field (e.g. Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, Operations Research or other related field)
2+ years of industry or graduate research experience solving analytical problems and building models using quantitative, statistical or machine learning approaches
Experience with Machine Learning, Statistics, or other data analysis tools and techniques
Experience performing data extraction, cleaning, analysis and presentation for medium to large datasets
Experience with at least one programming language (i.e. Python, R, Java, or C++)
Experience writing SQL queries
Experience with scientific computing and analysis packages such as NumPy, SciPy, Pandas, Scikit-learn, dplyr, or ggplot2
Experience with statistics methods such as forecasting, time series, hypothesis testing, classification, clustering or regression analysis
Experience with data visualization libraries such as Matplotlib, Pyplot, ggplot2
Experience with machine learning libraries and packages such as PyTorch, Caffe2, TensorFlow, Keras or Theano
Advanced degree (Masters or PhD or Equivalent experience) in quantitative field
Experience working with distributed computing tools (Hadoop, Hive, Spark, etc.)
Proficiency in algorithmic complexity
Facebook is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law.Facebook is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.",4.5,"Facebook
4.5","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,2004,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
149,Research Scientist,-1,"Founded in Tokyo in 2012, SmartNews has quickly become the go-to source of news for millions of users around the world, and a leading news aggregation mobile app. Our mission is bigger than simply aggregating news, we are working to break through the filter bubble and deliver the world’s quality information to the people who need it.

We have various challenges to solve in order to achieve our mission. We are looking for someone with an insatiable curiosity to deeply understand user experiences and content consumption, and a passion to build a world-class, data-driven product. As a Research Scientist, you will be the key person to solve the most challenging problem together with Product Managers, Engineers and Data Scientists. We are looking for someone who is passionate about providing and discovering the highest quality news and delivering to our users. You will formulate the problems into various research questions, and perform independent research to find the best solution. You will also propose hypotheses, perform testings or simulations, to validate. You will also work together with Engineers to deploy your research solution into production to serve millions of SmartNews users.

Responsibilities
Partner with Product Managers, Engineers, Data Scientists to frame the appropriate research questions, and independently execute research to solve some of the challenging and novel problems at SmartNews
Independently dive into SmartNews’ data, and execute on appropriate projects that leverage mathematical, statistical and machine learning methods
Independently design and execute simulations or various live testings to collect data and prove research project concept
Be able to communicate solutions with Product Managers on realization, and transfer the solutions to production together with engineers
Be able to communicate ideas, methods, opportunities, and results well to all cross functional partners and all levels of management
Requirements
Ph.D. degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Information Technology, or other quantitative fields
3+ years of professional experience
End-to-end experience in research projects, including study design, simulation/testing, data cleaning and wrangling, data analysis, and reporting
Broad experience and deep knowledge with various modern technologies, including at least 2 areas of the followings, experimental design, causal inference, Machine Learning, Reinforcement Learning, Deep Learning, etc
Proficient with Python or R
Exceptional written, verbal, and visual communications
Benefits
Equity included
100% medical, dental and vision insurance coverage (60% coverage for dependents)
Monthly housing, commute, mobile phone and gym allowances
401k matching program
Free lunch, snacks, drinks, etc.
Pet friendly office",4.6,"SmartNews, Inc.
4.6","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
150,Data Scientist,-1,"Atrilogys direct end-client is seeking a Data Scientist for 12+ months contract in Costa Mesa, CA 92626 (Remote for now, must be onsite once Covid-19 restrictions are removed).

Ideal candidate will have P. HD. in economics, statistics, physics, math, or another quantitative field with at least one year professional work experience in performing Text Analytics, Text mining, NLP ( Natural language processing ) functions or the use of SVM ( Support Vector Machine ).

W2 contract only!

Job Description:
Responsibilities:
Partner with various departments (e.g. Product, Engineering, etc.) to frame problems, both mathematically and within the business context
Partner with Product and Engineering teams to bring models to production
Debug Maintain, Tune, and Improve model behavior and performance with live data.
Oversee and facilitate the training of a range of Machine Learning models,
Evaluate the quality of the trained models, using existing and new measures
Report on the current and historical state of our models performance, along with issues and progress,
Incident resolution: Low accuracy troubleshooting, mis-categorization issue analysis
Maintenance and improvement of the existing model development pipeline
Produce ad-hoc analysis/investigations on the modelling pipeline
Document parts of the modeling/testing process
Support development, enhancement and maintenance of training datasets

About You:
At least 1 year on the job experience with Text Analytics and NLP (natural language processing) techniques and sparse data
Advanced degree in economics, statistics, physics, math, or another quantitative field
Strong grasp of probability, statistical inference, optimization algorithms, linear algebra, and calculus.
Understanding of how and when to apply different Machine Learning algorithms
Ability to write production-level code in Python, as well as proficiency with SQL
Strong grasp of Pandas, NumPy, SciPy and Scikit-Learn Python packages, as well as other analytics packages in Python, or Spark
Demonstrable analytical and problem-solving abilities, coupled with an enquiring mind and the ability to learn quickly
Experience or familiarity designing and running both simulated and live experiments (A/B and multivariate tests) to drive KPI improvement
Experience or familiarity building supervised and unsupervised models using statistical or machine learning approaches
Ability to creatively problem-solve, and to thrive in a highly collaborative, multidisciplinary environment
Measure and optimize products and business processes; to identify opportunities, assess risk potentials and explain trends; to drive audience and revenue growth
Holistic and end to end approach to data, including querying, aggregation, deep analysis, visualization and models; communicate and present findings/actionable insights to audiences at varying levels of technical sophistication
Assist in data requirements gathering and data validations to improve data platforms
Flexible and adaptable to learn and understand new technologies
Strong business acumen with ability to clearly articulate research goals and results to technical and business audiences
Efficiently manage his/her own project queue and develop streamlined workflows

Bonus points for
Prior professional experience in the financial industry
Ph.D. in economics, statistics, physics, math, or another quantitative field
Ability to initiate and drive projects from ideation to implementation
Prior professional experience building deep-learning models and familiarity with the popular frameworks (TensorFlow or PyTorch is a huge bonus)
Experience with deep learning and other advanced modeling approaches to extract and automate insights from data
Understanding of current trends in machine learning interpretability and transparency

For immediate consideration please submit your resume in Word format, along with daytime contact information. Client is unable to provide H-1B Visa sponsorship at this time. All submittals will be treated confidentially. Selected candidate may be asked to pass a comprehensive background, credit and/or drug screening. Principals only, no third parties please.

Established in 2000, Atrilogy Solutions Group, Inc. provides organizations of all sizes with high-quality, cost effective information technology (IT) and business process consulting & staffing services. Our industry-leading service model combines experienced project managers with seasoned technical and functional consultants to eliminate client uncertainty and deliver superior value and results.

Clients turn to Atrilogy for expertise in:
· IT staffing and placement (Project Managers, Agile/Scrum Masters, Business Analysts, DBAs, Software Engineers, Mobile Developers (iOS, Android), DevOps, Automation, QA, Systems & Network Engineers, Cyber Security / Information Security Specialists)
· All major ERP & CRM packages (including Oracle, Workday, PeopleSoft, JD Edwards, Lawson, SAP, Dynamics AX, Salesforce, Microsoft CRM, NetSuite)
· Business Intelligence, Data Warehousing, and Big Data Integration
· Creative (Interactive Project Manager/Art Director, Information Architect, UI/UX Designer, Web/Graphic Design)

Atrilogy has been recognized by Inc. magazine as one of the nations fastest-growing, privately-held companies. Headquartered in Irvine, California, Atrilogy also has offices in Denver, Phoenix, Atlanta, and Dallas with satellite offices in Boston, Jersey City, Las Vegas, Seattle, and Delhi, India.


Atrilogy Solutions Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, national origin, protected veteran status, or any other basis protected by applicable law, and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.

In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire.",4.8,"Atrilogy
4.8","Costa Mesa, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
151,Data Scientist,$68k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"NewtonX is building the world's first B2B Knowledge Access Platform. We connect our Fortune 500 clients to subject matter experts with highly specific and hard-to-find knowledge, across all industries. Our mission is to empower people to work smarter and make decisions with confidence, and we're leveraging automation and modern technologies to do it. Our core technologies include a global knowledge network with over 1.4 billion professionals, sophisticated automated outreach platforms, our knowledge graph-driven expert search engine, and a robust client support system.

We are seeking Data Scientists to join our team in shaping the direction of data science across a wide variety of problems, including our proprietary knowledge graph, search functionalities, and more. Our team is smart, visionary, supportive and, above all, excited by what we do! We are looking for strong, inquisitive data scientists with clever solutions, with a desire to join a small but fast growing team (<50>

RESPONSIBILITIES
Construct a deeper and broader knowledge graph by mining both public information and proprietary data.
Develop advanced search functionalities and algorithms to effectively index and find experts matching clients specific needs.
Apply natural language processing and machine learning to generate highly effective searches from client requests automatically.
Optimize the expert outreach platform to increase the response rate.
Define metrics, A/B testing and conduct statistical measurement of features and improvements.
REQUIRED
2-4+ years of industry experience in data science.
Strong track record of applying NLP and ML methods in solving real world problems.
Fluency of large dataset processing with mainstream big data stack.
Ability to communicate complex concepts in a clear and effective manner.
Passion for making knowledge more accessible in the world.
Strong sense of ownership and results-focused.
BONUS SKILLS
Familiarity with Google Cloud Dataflow or Apache Beam & AI Platform
Docker
RabbitMQ
Apache Kafka
Apache Beam, Hadoop, Spark
Jenkins
Python",4.7,"NewtonX
4.7","New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
152,Intern - Data Scientist - Summer,$68k-$112k (Glassdoor Est.),"Lumen’s internship program is a 10 week, fast-paced and exciting opportunity to gain professional experience within your field of study and career interest. Interns within the Strategic Planning and Transformation organization will be part of an accelerated learning experience, to challenge skills learned in the classroom and develop new skills while working on active Lumen work projects. Data Scientist interns will have the potential to work with Data Science, Advanced Analytics, Machine Learning, and Artificial Intelligence. The internship will take place in Broomfield, CO from 6/1/2021 - 8/13/2021.

In addition, interns will connect to our company culture through community outreach projects, engaging with our employee resource groups and developing their professional skills and business acumen through exposure to senior leadership, cutting-edge technology, groundbreaking projects, and a network of mentors and fellow interns. Launch your career with Lumen and be a part of something amazing!

Job Description
Develop and program methods, automated processes, and systems to cleanse
Integrate and analyze structured and unstructured, diverse big data sources
Identify solutions using machine learning and advanced analytics
Work cross functionally across the organization
Executive presentation of project findings/recommendation
Qualifications

Minimum Requirements:
Enrolled at a 4-year accredited college or university
Graduating between August 2021 – May 2023
In pursuit of bachelor’s or master’s in a machine learning, data science, or statistics related degree program
Intern is responsible for their travel to/from work location
Must be available to work 30 – 40 hours, during the specified 10-week timeframe
Experience with applications and statistical computer languages
Preferred Qualifications:
Strong technical knowledge in the areas of computer science, big data architecture, data processing, and machine learning.
Cumulative GPA of 3.0 or higher
Strong sense of urgency and ability to meet deadlines
Ability to demonstrate ownership and accountability
Ability to collaborate and have agility while making effective decisions
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Flexible and adapts well to change
Requisition #: 234772

EEO Statement
We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training.

Disclaimer
The above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job. Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",3.2,"Lumen
3.2","Broomfield, CO",-1,10000+ Employees,1930,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
153,Data Scientist,-1,"DialogTech provides the leading AI-driven conversation intelligence platform for marketers at businesses that value inbound phone calls. When consumers call, DialogTech turns those conversations into actionable insights businesses use to improve marketing ROI, increase sales conversions, and deliver more personalized customer experiences, both online and over the phone. Recognized as the leader and pioneer in call analytics since 2007, DialogTech is the trusted conversation intelligence platform for many of the world's most successful brands and agencies.

We are looking for a passionate, driven, and curious Data Scientist with strong analytical skills to join our Data Science and Analytics team. Your specific title will be commensurate with your experience and skill set. In this role you’ll work with other members of our team to identify new models and algorithms to solve our customers’ business problems. You'll be expected to keep up with current trends in technologies that can be used to improve our data science product offerings.
As a member of our team you’ll:
Craft experiments that drive engagement and other goals.
Work with both structured and unstructured data from our platform.
Investigate ways to demonstrate our conversational data with other types of data from our platform.
Work with customers and product owners to identify business problems.
Visualize results efficient to tell a narrative using data.
Be responsible for the development and implementation of machine learning algorithms and techniques to seek problems and optimize the product.
Work within a collaborative environment.
Experiment, evaluate, and recommend new technologies and innovative approaches that are appropriate for our business needs.

Required Experience:

Bachelors degree in Analytics/Data Science/Computer Science or related field.
2+ years of professional experience in Data Science or Machine Learning
Strong Math skills: statistics, probability, calculus, and linear algebra.
Experience with the Python data science stack and at least one deep learning framework (Tensorflow, PyTorch, etc).
Experience with NLP methodologies such as word vectorisation, document embedding/similarity, topic modelling, and classification.
Excellent pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
Understanding of the scientific process and experiment design.
Able to understand various data structures and common methods in data transformation
Ability to provide thought leadership around machine learning and artificial intelligence.
Python skills: Modules, Objects/Classes, package installation
Familiarity with SQL queries and relational databases.
A close attention to detail in all aspects of your work

Some nice to haves:

Master’s degree in Analytics/Data Science/Computer Science or related field. (preferred)
Experience with Digital Marketing domain, Google Analytics, Adwords, etc.
Familiarity with cloud computing (AWS preferred), clusters, etc.
Familiarity with ElasticSearch, or other document data stores.
Solid understanding of PyTorch 1.0+
Familiarity with sophisticated NLP methodologies such as question answering, summarisation, generative text approaches, and Transformer models.
Join us at one of the 101 Best and Brightest Places to Work in Chicago and nationally, 11 times running, Chicago Tribune's Top 100 Workplaces company and a 2017 Crain's Fast 50 company!

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",4.2,"DialogTech
4.2",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2007,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
154,Data Scientist (Federal),$88k-$142k (Glassdoor Est.),"C3.ai is a leading enterprise AI software provider for accelerating digital transformation. The comprehensive and proven C3 AI Suite uses a model-driven abstraction layer to enable organizations to develop, deploy, and operate enterprise scale AI applications 40x to 100x faster than alternative approaches. www.c3.ai

C3.ai is looking for a Data Scientist (Federal) to solve challenging, novel, and large-scale enterprise problems for Federal clients. In this capacity you will represent C3.ai as a technical expert and help our team to frame problems, choose appropriate machine learning algorithms, and identify opportunities to leverage the C3.ai Suite.

Recent examples of successful engagements include predictive maintenance on oil and gas equipment and aircraft subsystems, supply chain optimization, manufacturing yield optimization, chronic disease prevention, customer spend prediction, and equipment lifetime optimization.

Qualified candidates will have an in-depth knowledge of most common machine learning techniques and their application. You will also understand the limitations of these algorithms and how to tweak them or derive from them to achieve results at large-scale.

This role requires US Citizenship or US Permanent Residence.

Your Responsibilities:
Become an expert in the C3.ai Suite and associated tools to teach, enable, and assist C3.ai customers to build their own applications.
Design and deploy machine learning pipelines for C3.ai's federal customers.
Collaborate with data and subject matter experts from C3.ai and its customer teams to seek, understand, validate, interpret, and correctly use new data elements.
Requirements:
US Citizenship or US Permanent Resident
Bachelor's degree
Strong understanding of machine learning algorithms & principles (regression analysis, time series, probabilistic models, supervised classification and unsupervised learning), and their application
Strong background in mathematics, statistics, and computer science
Excellent programming skills in Python
Ability to drive a project and work both independently and in a team
Smart, motivated, can do attitude, and seeks to make a difference
Excellent verbal and written communication
Preferred
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, or equivalent fields. Specialization in machine learning preferred.
Active Department of Defense (DoD) security clearance (Secret or higher)
Excellent programming skills in JavaScript. Experience with Java and Scala is a plus.
Experience with deep learning, natural language processing, computer vision, or reinforcement learning
A portfolio of projects (GitHub, papers, etc.)
C3.ai provides a competitive compensation package and excellent benefits.

C3.ai is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of any legally protected characteristics, including disabled and veteran status.",4.5,"C3.ai
4.5","Washington, DC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
155,Data Scientist,$112k-$147k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Hive

Hive is a full-stack deep learning platform helping to bring companies into the AI era. We take complex visual challenges and build custom machine learning models to solve them. For AI to work, companies need large volumes of high quality training data. We generate this data through Hive Data, our proprietary data labeling platform with over 1,000,000 globally distributed workers, generating millions of high quality pieces of data per day. We then use this training data to build machine learning models for verticals such as Media, Autonomous Driving, Security, and Retail. Today, we work with some of the largest companies in the world to redefine how they think about unstructured visual data. Together, we build solutions that incorporate AI into their businesses to completely transform industries.

We are fortunate that investors like Peter Thiel (Founders Fund), General Catalyst, 8VC, and others see Hive's potential to be groundbreaking in AI business solutions. We have over 160 talented individuals globally in our San Francisco and Delhi offices. Please reach out if you are interested in joining the AI revolution!

Data Scientist Role

In order to execute our vision, we need to grow our team of best-in-class machine learning engineers. We are looking for developers who are excited about staying at the forefront of deep learning technology, prototyping state-of-the-art neural net models and launching these models into production. We value hard workers who have no qualms working with terabyte-scale datasets, who are interested in learning new technologies at all levels of the machine learning stack, and who move fast and take ownership of their projects. Our ideal candidate has experience creating a working machine learning-powered project from the ground up, contributes innovative ideas and ingenious implementations to the team, and is capable of planning out scalable, maintainable data pipelines.
Responsibilities
Everything involved in analyzing a production data set, including:
Writing code to transform massive raw data output into a structured, usable form
Leveraging more traditional machine learning techniques to uncover hidden relationships in our data sets
Conducting statistical analysis of results to prove / disprove hypotheses, and
Write up reports that our other team members can use to deliver in a product
Interface closely with the Product, Business Development, and Sales teams to answer questions about our data sets that our customers and partners are seeking solutions for
Requirements
You have an undergraduate or graduate degree in computer science or similar technical field, with significant coursework in mathematics or statistics
You have 1-2 years of industry data science experience
You have successfully worked with complex data sets and are familiar with Hadoop / Spark
You know the ins and outs of Python, especially as it applies to the above data processing frameworks
You are capable of quickly coding and prototyping data pipelines involving any combination of Python, Node, bash, and linux command-line tools, especially when applied to large data sets consisting of millions of files
You have a working knowledge of the following technologies, or are not afraid of picking them up on the fly: C++, Scala / Spark, R, Matlab, SQL, Cassandra, Docker
You are comfortable with running and interpreting common statistical tests, and also with common data science techniques including dimensionality reduction and supervised and unsupervised learning
You have great communication skills and ability to work with others
You are a strong team player, with a do-whatever-it-takes attitude
What We Offer You

We are a group of ambitious individuals who are passionate about creating a revolutionary machine learning company. At Hive, you will have a significant career development opportunity and a chance to contribute to one of the fastest growing AI startups in San Francisco. The work you do here will have a noticeable and direct impact on the development of Hive.

Our benefits include competitive pay, equity, health / vision / dental insurance, catered lunch and dinner, a corporate gym membership, etc.

Thank you for your interest in Hive.",3.0,"Hive (CA)
3.0","San Francisco, CA",-1,Unknown,2019,Company - Private,Telecommunications Services,Telecommunications,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
156,Data Scientist,$80k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"Insulet started in 2000 with an idea and a mission to enable our customers to enjoy simplicity, freedom and healthier lives through the use of our Omnipod® product platform. In the last two decades we have improved the lives of hundreds of thousands of patients by using innovative technology that is wearable, waterproof, and lifestyle accommodating.
We are looking for highly motivated, performance driven individuals to be a part of our expanding team. We do this by hiring amazing people guided by shared values who exceed customer expectations. Our continued success depends on it!

Position Overview:
Insulet Corporation, maker of the OmniPod, is the leader in tubeless insulin pump. The Data Scientist role is responsible for supporting research and development of global analytics and data science initiatives, according to Insulet’s data analytics strategy. Working with the Manager, Analytics Technologies and senior technical leaders, you will develop tools and processes to transform data into insights with subject matter experts from cross-functional teams. Using data cleaning best practices, aggregation, and joining large datasets, you will leverage cloud technologies to build analytics reporting for a highly automated manufacturing facility, and for post market quality assurance. You will collaborate with other Data Scientists in the Analytics COE to support cross-functional efforts spanning R&D, medical affairs, quality, and global manufacturing, among others. We are a fast growing company that provides an energetic work environment and tremendous career growth opportunities.

Responsibilities:
• Work with IT and cross functional teams to identify data sources, design data ingestion, clean up, and pre-processing scripts as needed.
• Leverage cloud computing technologies for automated machine learning and analytics pipelines, such as Azure, AWS, GCP, etc.
• Explore data patterns using existing data science tools and self-created programs.
• Perform statistical analysis, predictive modeling, and generate automated reporting as required.
• Support software V&V and IQ/OQ/PQ efforts
• Clearly communicate findings to a broad audience, in relation to business objectives.
• Mentor junior engineers/scientists.
• Performs other duties as required.
Education and Experience:
• Bachelors or Master’s degree in Mathematics, Computer Science, Electrical and Computer Engineering, or a closely related field is required.
• At least 2 years of work experience on machine learning, artificial intelligence, or statistical inferences.
• Experiences in manufacturing, medical device, and/or healthcare industries is desirable.

Skills/Competencies:
• Goal-driven mentality
• Experience in one or more analytic software tools, such as Python, R, Matlab.
• Demonstrated proficiency in SQL and one or more relational databases, such as Oracle, Teradata, Microsoft SQL Server, etc
• Experience in Business Intelligence tools, such as Tableau, Spotfire, Cognos.
• Demonstrated knowledge of software engineering principles and practices.
• Ability to work independently without detailed guidance, while maintaining effective communications with leaders and stakeholders.
• Ability to communicate effectively and document objectives and procedures.",2.6,"Insulet Corporation
2.6","San Diego, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2000,Company - Public,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
157,Data Scientist,$72k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist

20-Oct-2020

Job Description
About the team. The Clinical Products data science team helps supercharge CVS-Aetna’s clinical programs to improve member health and lower costs. Given CVS-Aetna’s size, scope, and deep set of capacities, CVS-Aetna is an unparalleled platform to make a difference in healthcare in the US and beyond. The Clinical Products team has three main goals. First, CVS-Aetna is launching a series of clinical programs that use the resources of the combined CVS-Aetna, and our team delivers the advanced analytics to support those initiatives. Second, the team develops data-driven clinical recommendations that are delivered to members, their providers, and their caregivers. Finally, we build condition-specific models that help other parts of the company (e.g. pricing) better predict member care journeys.

About the position. This Data Scientist will join the newly formed Clinical Products team and support, end to end, one or more of the team’s three objectives. This role will build predictive models, work with clinical experts (e.g. doctors) to translate their subject matter expertise into machine learning models, extract and manipulate data from multiple large data sources, and present her / his work to technical and non-technical stakeholders. This role will also use the results of AB testing to improve the performance of the team’s statistical modeling and targeting.

Req#
70907BR

Job Group
Data & Analytics

Full or Part Time
Full Time

Supervisory Responsibilities
No

Percent of Travel Required
0 - 10%

Posting Job Title
Data Scientist

Potential Telework Position
No

Additional Locations
MA-Wellesley

Primary Location (City, State)
MA-Wellesley

EEO Statement
Aetna is an Equal Opportunity, Affirmative Action Employer

Resource Group
2

Fundamental Components
Develops and/or uses algorithms and statistical predictive models.
Brings clinical insights to inform predictive models: is comfortable reading academic clinically oriented literature and collaborating with clinical subject matter experts to inform predictive models.
Performs analyses of structured and unstructured data to solve multiple and/or complex business problems using advanced statistical techniques and mathematical analyses and broad knowledge of the organization and/or industry.
Collaborates with business partners to understand their problems and goals, develop predictive modeling, statistical analysis, data reports and performance metrics.
Develops and participates in presentations and consultations to existing and prospective constituents on analytics results and solutions.
Interacts with internal and external peers and managers to exchange complex information related to areas of specialization.
Use strong knowledge in algorithms and predictive models to investigate problems, detect patterns and recommend solutions.
Use strong programming skills to explore, examine and interpret large volumes of data in various forms.
Background Experience
2 or more years of progressively complex related experience.
Demonstrates proficiency in most areas of mathematical analysis
Strong knowledge of advanced analytics tools and languages to analyze large data sets from multiple data sources.
Anticipates and prevents problems and roadblocks before they occur.
Demonstrates strong ability to communicate technical concepts and implications to business partners.
Clinically oriented background or professional experience is a plus.
Benefits Program
Benefit eligibility may vary by position.

Candidate Privacy Information
Aetna takes our candidate's data privacy seriously. At no time will any Aetna recruiter or employee request any financial or personal information (Social Security Number, Credit card information for direct deposit, etc.) from you via e-mail. Any requests for information will be discussed prior and will be conducted through a secure website provided by the recruiter. Should you be asked for such information, please notify us immediately.

Clinical Licensure Required
N/A",3.4,"Aetna
3.4","Wellesley, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1853,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
158,Data Scientist,-1,"Who We Are:

Lirio, the world leader in behavior change AI, unites behavioral science and artificial intelligence to deliver hyper-personalized communications that drive actions to better health. The company's cloud-based solution leverages large volumes of patient health information combined with third-party data to compute unique behavioral models that learn to effectively engage people over time by understanding what activates them.

Who You Are:

You're passionate about transforming people's health through technology. You're looking to be part of a dynamic organization that moves quickly, where you can learn and grow, and work alongside colleagues to develop and improve our solutions. You have a growth mindset who seeks progress over perfection.

What You'll Be Doing:

The Data Scientist will be responsible for developing and implementing approaches to data analysis across Lirio's Behavior Change AI Platform as well as being a technical contributor to the machine learning software infrastructure. This role will involve working closely with behavioral scientists, computer scientists, machine learning engineers and data engineers to architect methods and systems for obtaining insights into the efficacy of Lirio behavior change programs, platform operations and machine learning workflows. Tasking for this position will include data science research, exploratory data analysis, machine learning software design and development, user interface and visual analytics design and development, and regular contributions to strategic and tactical discussions about the Lirio Platform and its research and engineering roadmaps. Additionally, this role will embrace Lirio's culture of cross-team collaboration and work closely with Lirio leadership in shaping our data science strategy. The role requires a forward-thinker who is curious about technology and will help Lirio adapt and evolve as technology and customer needs constantly change.

Analytics Design and Development (40%)

Develop and implement analytic insights into the engagement efficacy of the behavioral science libraries and the Lirio AI Behavior Change Platform.
Design and implement visualizations that capture the Lirio Platform's engagement performance for Lirio customers.
Contribute to the design, implementation and analysis of Randomized Control Trials (RCTs) for evaluation of engagement performance.
Lead efforts to develop the Lirio Insights Engine, a framework for exploratory analysis of Lirio Behavior Change data, including applications and visual analytics.
Contribute to the Lirio customer reports and marketing materials using developed analytic approaches.

Behavioral Reinforcement Learning (RL) Design and Development (40%)

Design and implement visualizations that give insight into the operation of Lirio's RL Agent.
Build (visual) analytics around experimental results that measure and compare the performance of two competing approaches in Lirio's RL workflow.
Contribute to the design, implementation, and test of software components that comprise Lirio's RL Agent and its supporting software.
Contributes to technical discussions and plans to improve the company's overall software quality, cadence and delivery lifecycle through automation and CI/CD pipelines using DevSecOps methodologies.

Applied Data Analytics Research (20%)

Research approaches to instrumentation/analysis/visualization of the operation and learning progression of reinforcement learning systems.
Research approaches to analysis and visualization of health care engagement data, relating demographics and behavioral science factors to client/program outcomes.
Contribute to Lirio research roadmaps.

Preferred Qualifications:

Master's degree (Ph.D. preferred) in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, or a related field.
3+ years of experience developing software, competency with python preferred.
3+ years of experience developing visual analytics for insight into complex data.
Experience developing with data science and machine-learning software tools, such as pandas, Tensorflow, R, or PyTorch.
Experience with application development frameworks such as Angular, Flask, Ruby.
Experience with database technologies, data warehousing, and hands-on experience writing SQL queries.
Experience using build tools with continuous integration or continuous delivery.
Strong understanding of the agile software development process.
Experience with cloud service technologies, specifically AWS.",4.1,"Lirio
4.1",Tennessee,-1,1 to 50 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
159,Data Scientist,$77k-$128k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who we are?

PSC Biotech is a leading Biotech Consultancy firm founded in 1996, headquartered in Pomona, California, USA, with global operations in Ireland, India, Singapore, Australia, and the US, serving 350 clients in more than 23 countries worldwide. We provide cloud-based software solutions for Quality Management and Regulatory Inspections, pharmaceuticals contract manufacturing professionals, and metrology services to our clients.

Take your Career to a New Level

PSC Biotech disrupts the conventional consultancy model by aligning our EVP as one of the unique selling points which include the opportunity to work with the most talented cohort of like-minded professionals operating in the Pharma/Biotech Industry. We offer a permanent contract of employment giving exposure to working in Top Pharmaceutical client sites in a diverse-cultural work setting.

We are looking for an experienced Data Scientist for our PSC Software Entity, this would be remote position. Details are as follows:

Expertise/Requirements
Bachelors or higher Degree in Computer Sciences or Data Science with an emphasis on data analysis and structures for machine learning, and artificial intelligence.
Additional experience in statistical modeling, computational biology/chemistry/physics, or mathematic modeling or other relevant areas is desirable.
Passionate about creating replicable, scalable systems around data and analytics.
You think modularly and create robust, reusable patterns and components whenever possible
Expertise and experience in engineering data pipelines using big data technologies on large scale data sets.
Understand the Data Lifecycle and concepts such as lineage, governance and retention
Conceptually familiar with AWS cloud resources (S3, EC2, RDS, etc.)
Excels at taking vague requirements and crystallizing them into scalable data solutions.
Operates independently, demonstrates excellence, and self learns new technologies and frameworks.
Knowledge of United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA), European Medicines Agency (EMA) and other regulatory schema is a plus.
Ability to communicate and work effectively with non-computer science personnel is a plus.
Ability to work well under pressure to provide results in a short time-frame.
PSC is seeking a highly responsive, goal-oriented individual who will bring significant energy and drive to lay the foundation for and help drive delivery of our next generation applications.
This is a remote position.",4.0,"PSC Biotech
4.0","Pomona, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1996,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
160,Senior Data Engineer,$67k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.
Job Description:

Novetta has an immediate need for a Senior Data Engineer to join a fast-paced program in support of a government customer with a very critical national security mission. This is a multi-year program, where the successful candidate will work on an interdisciplinary project team of more than 30 highly qualified individuals with a wide array of skills that include client (reactjs), server (spring java), QA Automation Engineers, UI/UX Designers, and DevOps engineers. The team is responsible for building a next generation Mission Information System and is performing greenfield Software Development using modern technologies via an Agile DevOps approach.

This Senior Data Engineer will play a vital role collaborating as part of this cross-functional Agile team to create and enhance data ingestion pipelines and address big data challenges. The Senior Data Engineer will work closely with the Chief Architect, systems engineers, software engineers, and data scientists on the following key tasks:
Provide Extraction, Transformation, and Load (ETL) experience coupled with enterprise search capabilities to solve Big Data challenges
Design and implement high-volume data ingestion and streaming pipelines using Open Source frameworks like Apache Spark, Flink, Nifi, and Kafka on AWS Cloud
Leverage strategic and analytical skills to understand and solve customer and business centric questions
Create prototypes and proofs of concept for iterative development
Learn new technologies and apply the knowledge in production systems
Monitor and troubleshoot performance issues on the enterprise data pipelines and the data lake
Partner with various teams to define and execute data acquisition, transformation, processing and make data actionable for operational and analytics initiatives

Required Qualifications / Experience:
BS in Computer Science, Systems Engineering, or a related technical field or equivalent experience with at least 8+ years in systems engineering or administration (6+ years with a MS/MIS Degree).
Must have an active Top Secret security clearance and able to obtain a TS/SCI with Polygraph.
3 years of experience with big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, NiFi.
3 years of experience with object-oriented/object function scripting languages: Python (preferred) and/or Java.
3 years of experience with and managing data across relational SQL and NoSQL databases like MySQL, Postgres, Cassandra, HDFS, Redis, and Elasticsearch.
3 years of experience working in a Linux environment.
2 years of experience working with and designing REST APIs.
Experience in designing/developing platform components like caching, messaging, event processing, automation, transformation and tooling frameworks.
Experience developing data ingest workflows with stream-processing systems: Spark-Streaming, Kafka Streams and/or Flink.
Experience transforming data in various formats, including JSON, XML, CSV, and zipped files.
Experience with performance tuning of ETL jobs.
Experience developing flexible ontologies to fit data from multiple sources and implementing the ontology in the form of database mappings / schemas.
Strong interpersonal and communication skills necessary to work effectively with customers and other team members.
Preferred Qualifications / Experience:
Data engineering experience in the Intelligence Community or other government agencies.
Experience with Microservices architecture components, including Docker and Kubernetes.
Experience developing microservices to fit data cleansing, transformation and enrichment needs.
Experience with AWS cloud services: EC2, S3, EMR, RDS, Redshift, Athena and/or Glue.
Experience with Jira, Confluence and extensive experience with Agile methodologies.
Knowledge about security and best practices.
Experience developing flexible data ingest and enrichment pipelines, to easily accommodate new and existing data sources.
Experience with software configuration management tools such as Git/Gitlab, Salt, Confluence, etc.
Experience with continuous integration and deployment (CI/CD) pipelines and their enabling tools such as Jenkins, Nexus, etc.
Detailed oriented/self-motivated with the ability to learn and deploy new technology quickly.
Clearance Level: TS/SCI with Poly


Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.


Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.


Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.
For more details or to submit a referral, visit bit.ly/NovettaReferrals.

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.6,"Novetta
4.6","Reston, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
161,Data Scientist,$115k-$184k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description

PubMatic delivers superior revenue to publishers by being the sell-side platform of choice for agencies and advertisers.

The PubMatic platform empowers independent app developers and publishers to maximize their digital advertising monetization while enabling advertisers to increase ROI by reaching and engaging their target audiences in brand-safe, premium environments across ad formats and devices.

Since 2006, PubMatic has created an efficient, global infrastructure and remains at the forefront of programmatic innovation. Headquartered in Redwood City, California, PubMatic operates 14 offices and nine data centers worldwide.

Job Description

We are immediately hiring a strong Data Scientist to join our growing team in Redwood City.

The ideal candidate will apply quantitative analysis, modeling and data mining to help drive informed business and product decisions for PubMatic.

Responsibilities:
Perform deep dive analysis to understand and optimize the key product KPIs
Apply statistics, modeling, and machine learning to improve the efficiency of systems and relevance algorithms across our business application products
Conduct data analysis to make product recommendations and design A/B experiments
Partner with Product and Engineering teams to solve problems and identify trends and opportunities
Collaborate with cross-functional stakeholders to understand their business needs, formulate and complete end-to-end analysis that includes data gathering, analysis, ongoing scaled deliverables and presentations
Qualifications
BA/BS or MS degree with emphasis on coursework of a quantitative nature (e.g., Statistics, Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Data Sciences)
3 years of experience working with statistical packages (e.g. R, SAS, Stata or MATLAB)
Experience with articulating product questions and using statistics to arrive at an answer
Experience with scripting in SQL - extracting large data sets and design of ETL flows
Work experience in an inter-disciplinary/cross-functional field
Deep interest and aptitude in data, metrics, analysis, trends and applied knowledge of measurement, statistics and program evaluation
Distinctive problem solving skills and impeccable business judgment
Capable of translating analysis results into business recommendations
#LI-DNI

Additional Information

Coronavirus notice: PubMatic is actively working to ensure candidate and employee safety. Currently, all our hiring and onboarding processes will be carried out remotely through virtual meetings until further notice.

Benefits: Our benefits package includes the best of what leading organizations provide, such as stock options, paternity + maternity leave, healthcare, dental and vision insurance, Perkspot and unlimited PTO - that we actually require you to use! And when we’re back in the office, we all benefit from a kitchen loaded with healthy snacks and drinks, catered lunches twice a week, and much more.

Diversity and Inclusion: PubMatic is proud to be an equal opportunity employer; we don’t just value diversity, we promote and celebrate it. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",4.1,"PubMatic
4.1","Redwood City, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
162,Research Scientist - Methane Remote Sensing,$39k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Sustainable Energy Development Lab at Harrisburg University, led by PI Dr. Arvind Ravikumar, is seeking a research scientist with a focus on Methane Remote Sensing. In this project, we will evaluate the role of low-earth orbit satellite systems to isolate, detect, and measure point source methane emissions from oil and gas activity. We will be conducting direct ground-based validation experiments through field work and modeling. Remote work is possible with the exception of field related travel. Initial appointment will be a term of 1– 2 years with the potential for extension based on funding and performance.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES (Duties may vary and other duties may be assigned):
Assist the PI in project management and coordinate research group meeting across universities, regulatory agencies, oil and gas operators, and other stakeholders
Design, plan, and execute field campaigns to evaluate satellite technologies for methane emissions detection (field sites will be located in the US or Canada)
Develop statistical models in python to analyze data
Develop FEAST model to support analysis of satellite data collected in this study
Write peer-reviewed journal publications and present at academic conferences and other meetings
POSITION REQUIREMENTS
All applications must include a one– page statement indicating your research interests and how your prior work informs it, career goals, and anything else you would like to share that is critical to your success
A Ph.D. is preferred but not required
Masters degree in Engineering, with a particular interest in candidates with experience in remote sensing, air pollution monitoring, or greenhouse gas observations
Experience working with satellite data (broadly defined) is encouraged
Field work experience is preferred
An interest in or understanding of methane emissions from oil and gas operations
Strong written and verbal communication skills
ABOUT HARRISBURG UNIVERSITY

Harrisburg University offers an applied science and technology education for students who want a degree and a dedicated pathway to a career. Its focus is to educate career-minded individuals in the areas of science, technology, engineering and math (STEM careers), giving them the tools to succeed, while helping to shape their communities, locally and beyond. Our goal is to help stimulate economic growth in our region by establishing a STEM educated workforce— a necessary resource in today’s economy.

MISSION

Harrisburg University of Science and Technology is an independent educational institution offering innovative academic and research programs in science and technology that respond to local and global needs. The institution fosters a diverse community of learners, provides access and support to students who want to pursue a career in science and technology, and supports business creation and economic development.",4.5,"Harrisburg University of Science and Technology
4.5","Harrisburg, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2004,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
163,Data Scientist,$78k-$137k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist

21-Sep-2020

Auto req ID
52643BR

Job Code
RS0356 Statistician I

Location
USA - MA - Boston

Business Title
Data Scientist

Sub-Unit
-----------
Appointment End Date
30-Apr-2021

Salary Grade
056

Time Status
Full-time

Union
00 - Non Union, Exempt or Temporary

Basic Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree and 3+ years of related experience.

Additional Qualifications and Skills
Master’s (or higher) degree in quantitative discipline (computer science, engineering, physics, or similar)preferred. We expect good knowledge of the Python programming language, as well as experience in Unix/Linux. Experience with databases, in particular SQL, handling and analyzing high-dimensional neural data, ability to work well in a team. Additional experience in implementation and use of probabilistic machine learning methods/models is a plus.

Additional Information
This is a term appointment ending on April 30, 2021 with the possibility of renewal contingent on funding.

Harvard offers an outstanding benefits package including:

Time Off: 3 - 4 weeks paid vacation, paid holiday break, 12 paid sick days, 11.5 paid holidays, and 3 paid personal days per year.

Medical/Dental/Vision: We offer a variety of excellent medical plans, dental & vision plans, all coverage begins as of your start date.

Retirement: University-funded retirement plan with full vesting after 3 years of service.

Tuition Assistance Program: Competitive tuition assistance program, $40 per class at the Harvard Extension School and discounted options through participating Harvard grad schools.

Transportation: Harvard offers a 50% discounted MBTA pass as well as additional options to assist employees in their daily commute.

Wellness options: Harvard offers programs and classes at little or no cost, including stress management, massages, nutrition, meditation, and complementary health services.

Harvard access to athletic facilities, libraries, campus events, and many discounts throughout metro Boston.

The Harvard Medical School is not able to provide visa sponsorship for this position.

Department
Neurobiology

Pre-Employment Screening
Education, Identity

Schedule
35 hrs. per week | Monday - Friday | 9:00 am - 5:00 pm

Job Function
Research

Job-Specific Responsibilities
We are looking for an innovative and enthusiastic team member to join our multi-university project to unravel the neural basis of causal inference. The project involves collecting high-dimensional neural data that needs to be stored, managed, and analyzed. The data scientist will oversee the initial setup, and continual customization of the DataJoint-based data neural data sharing and analysis platform that will be used by all project members. They will provide robust implementations of existing neural data analysis methods, based on contemporary approaches in probabilistic machine learning, that will be used by all project members and shared with the neuroscience community at large. Furthermore, they will develop new data analysis methods, again based on probabilistic machine learning, that are suitable for the large neural datasets generated by the project. They will present any developed methods at scientific conferences, write manuscripts, and publish them in specialized journals.

School/Unit
Harvard Medical School

EEO Statement
We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, gender identity, sexual orientation, pregnancy and pregnancy-related conditions, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.6,"Harvard Medical School
4.6","Boston, MA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1782,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
164,Data Scientist,-1,"Benefits
Medical, Dental, and vision plans
401(k) retirement plan
Flexible vacation policy – take what you need
Paid parental leave
Tuition Reimbursement Program
Free access to gym at both locations
Training and development opportunities at cutting edge data-science conferences across the country
Collaborative and exciting work culture – work with people you’ll love
Opportunities to grow quickly and work with experts in the industry and with clients that are industry giants
Limited travel – especially compared to other consulting companies
Opportunity to work at a company where your opinion matters – we value data over tenure and stress the importance of an inclusive environment
Unlimited access to Coursera courses both for personal and professional development
Fun team building off-sites and opportunities – we ensure that we support our collaborative culture by getting the whole team together multiple times throughout the year
Our data scientists leverage elite modeling and industry context to develop custom, practical solutions to our client’s business problems. Their ability to understand, navigate, and manipulate a range of complex data structures enable them to work within our client’s environments to optimally structure their data for analysis. Through collaboration, they identify the most effective algorithms and modeling techniques to solve each client’s problem.

Ideal data scientists have a Bachelors or Masters in a quantitative field and several years of work experience in a relevant field. Data Scientists must be able to work seamlessly with different types and qualities of data and be able to work backward from a deep understanding of the business problem to develop the appropriate models. Complete fluency in a statistical package such as Python (preferred), SAS, or R is required. Experience and comfort in an analytically intense environment is preferred, though not required.",5.0,"2nd Order Solutions
5.0","Glen Allen, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
165,Data Scientist,-1,"Senior Data Scientist

Location: NYC Office or Fully Remote

About Vic.ai

Vic.ai is creating the ""Intelligent Accounting"" era, using artificial intelligence to automate accounting and provide advisory, business insight, and eventually business foresight.

We're a Series A stage start-up, founded by three Norwegian entrepreneurs and backed by renowned Silicon Valley investors (including Costanoa Ventures, Cowboy Ventures, and GGV Capital). We're US-based, but our team is global, from New Zealand to California. We're bringing AI to Finance and Accounting because the industry is ripe for automation and big-data insight and the market is huge: $200B just in the US.

We have two main office locations, New York and Oslo. We have a well established remote-work culture, and over 50% of our team has worked fully remotely since we started.

About you

You've been a software engineer for 5+ years, but you've been a tinkerer and a builder your whole life. We're a team of builderswhen we aren't building Vic.ai, we're tinkering with a personal project, contributing to open source, modding a drone, building a computer from components, etc.

You know a great data pipeline from a standard one, because you started out building textbook ones, and learned through experience all the things that make a pipeline robust, transparent, and scalable.

You're ready for the next step in your career, ready to take on fast-moving challenges. You're enthusiastic about AI and the possibilities it opens for software development and transforming traditional work. You aim at reaching greatness and delivering exceptional outcomes in your work.

As a team player, you are not afraid of reaching out to your colleagues to discuss development challenges, especially when you are stuck trying to solve a specific issue.

You are fluent in English.

Role details

You will become part of our core back-end team reporting to our Engineering Manager and responsible for the systems that tie everything together into a production environment for our customers. The main focus of the role is to develop and scale our core cloud-based processing service, which includes our OCR technology, extracting data from various sources into databases, generating datasets for machine learning and structuring communication with our AI models.

We mainly develop in and use
Python
Pandas
AWS (EC2, RDS, KMS, SNS, etc)
Docker + Kubernetes + Rancher
Git
extensively throughout our platform, so advance knowledge of these is highly preferred.

In addition, our technology stack includes the following components, knowledge of which is desired:
Django
Celery
Elixir + Phoenix
Angular.io / TypeScript
Tesseract + Textract
TravisCi
Key areas of responsibility
You will own the data pipelines that feed and interact with our AI models! You will build them, monitor them, scale them.
Our AI eats large amounts of data. You will work closely with our AI team to set up scalable data storage solutions, for managing our datasets.
As part of continuous improvement take ownership of relevant system components to improve functionality, stability and/or capability
Qualifications

Bachelor or Master's Degree in Computer Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, or similar studies

Experience
Experience (3+ years) with Python, including extensive experience with Pandas.
Experience operating, scaling, and optimizing databases and storage systems on the cloud. Strong AWS experience preferred
You know that deploying software is as much about the environment as it is about the code: experience with docker, unit testing, Ci systems (TravisCi or CircleCi preferred), performance monitoring, log monitoring, and security
What we offer
An exciting work environment operating at the forefront of AI technology development
A company full of talented, curious, and friendly people
A competitive compensation package
Company-paid benefits for employees such as medical, dental, vision, disability, and life insurance
The opportunity to work fully remotely
Flexible time schedules
A workstation and tools of your choice",5.0,"Vic.ai
5.0",Remote,-1,1 to 50 Employees,2016,Unknown,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
166,Data Scientist,$45k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist


Conshohocken, PA


Full Time Permanent


IT & Digital Solutions


Application deadline
2020-10-30

Candidate profile (title)

WHY WE WILL LOVE YOU

Candidate profile (text) - Default language

• Good knowledge of modern applied algorithms (predictive and prescriptive) for extracting insights and making decisions based on data
• Good knowledge of data pre-processing techniques, e.g. in relation to missing data points
• Broad knowledge of relevant programming languages (such as Python and others), including an understanding of concepts from functional and/or object-oriented coding paradigms
• Broad knowledge of probability theory and statistics, including the distinction between correlation and causality and how to verify the latter using controlled experimental design techniques (e.g. A/B testing)
• Broad knowledge of SQL and the role it plays in data science
• Good understanding of collaborative software engineering practices (Agile, DevOps), in which solutions evolve through the effort of self organizing cross-functional teams
• Good knowledge of digital product development, and the importance of rapid validated learning cycles for optimizing performance long term
• Good knowledge of IKEAs corporate identity, core values and vision of creating a better everyday life for the many people

QUALIFICATIONS
• Formal qualifications (BSc, MSc, PhD) in computer science, econometrics, engineering, mathematics, or equivalent
• Minimum 2 years of professional experience as a (Junior) Data Analyst or (Junior) Data Scientist
• Broad knowledge of data processing for large datasets
• Demonstrable experience working in Agile or DevOps communities of engineering practice
• Preferred: Familiarity with cloud computing environments, e.g. Amazon Web Services or Google Cloud Platform

Key responsibilities (title)

WHAT YOU'LL BE DOING DAY TO DAY

Key responsibilities (text)

• Develop and promote for advanced analytics frameworks and services that improve business performance within or
across multiple domains as part of cross-functional digital product teams
• Drive the adoption of algorithmic decision-making at scale within Group Digital to increase performance of our digital products and effectiveness of our co-workers by actively educating and encouraging fellow team members to prioritize use cases for analytics and automation
• Build software that is scalable, resilient and robust with respect to imperfect input data, minimizing unintended technical errors and system down time and ensuring a pleasant customer experience globally
• Apply and utilize modern software development practices and related technologies, including debugging and version controlling, in order to efficiently deliver flexible digital solutions in close collaboration with others
• Write demanding SQL queries that Extract, Transform and Load data from storage to an appropriate format, using joins, nesting and similar operations as an integral component of data processing pipelines
• Ensure that solutions fulfill and adapt to actual business needs to continuously generate value for Ingka by working closely together with co-workers from different functions
• Promote and apply agile ways of working in relation to data science, including rapid prototyping, continuous deployment, and performance measurement by default in order to maximize key metrics and ensure that we realize the OKRs set by Group Digital

Team vision (text)

We set the digital agenda to keep IKEA leading in an uncertain and fast-moving environment. We drive the development, provision and operation of our digital
products and services through the use of existing and emerging new technologies and agile delivery methods to deliver at pace.

At the same time, we provide a home to develop and extend the business, people, and technical skills needed to ensure continuous improvement and growth of our digital capability

Drive the transformation of Ingka into a more data driven company by building and deploying intelligent software for automated decision support and autonomous decision-making, freeing time for coworkers, and improving the performance of our digital products to create a better customer experience.

Local section (title)

Some other stuff

Local section (text)

Travel required: Less than 10%


WHY YOU WILL LOVE US

From the deep forests in Sweden, we have spread our culture and values around the world. At the heart of our offer are our beautiful home-furnishing products and solutions, made with care for our planet, reaching millions of customers. At the heart of our business, are our wonderful co-workers representing diversity in all dimen­sions and passionate for life at home. We all contribute with our uniqueness and we want to grow and develop together. Our vision, “to create a better everyday life for the many people” inspires and guides us in everything we do. This is IKEA.


WHAT WE ALL HAVE IN COMMON

Living our values
Being your unique self, while respecting and including others
A passion for home furnishing
Performing & delivering while learning & developing
Having fun!",3.7,"IKEA
3.7","Conshohocken, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,1943,Company - Private,Home Furniture & Housewares Stores,Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
167,Data Scientist,-1,"Aptive is seeking a Data Scientist to compile data analyses in support of a variety of health care innovation projects for the Department of Veterans Affairs.

The Data Scientist will support individual projects in their data and analytics needs, use existing data to develop business cases, and support portfolio-wide analyses of effectiveness and impact. Awareness of the Veterans Health Administration data storage platforms, such as the Corporate Data Warehouse (CDW), or the appropriate SQL knowledge to run data queries is a plus.

A strong candidate must demonstrate the ability to clean, manipulate, and analyze data using modern programming languages (Python, SAS, MATLAB, C++, R, Java, SQL, PL/SQL) or business intelligence platforms; this ability will support the team as they run Machine Learning Challenges. The ideal candidate would understand research methodologies commonly utilized in the health care innovation space and be able to design a research methodology with limited client input. Finally, the person would also help the program office assess effectiveness of their projects, which requires some unique problem solving.

This mid-level, full-time position is in Washington, DC with regular telework options available. (Please note: Due to COVID-19, this worksite requirement will not go into effect until social distancing restrictions are lifted by the appropriate health officials.)

MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS.
At least 8 years' relevant experience within government consulting and organizing analytic results for further analysis.
Bachelor's Degree in Mathematics, Engineering, Statistics, Computer Science or related discipline.
Experience manipulating datasets with at least one modern programming language or business intelligence platform (Python, SAS, MATLAB, C++, R, Java, SQL, PL/SQL).
Must be proficient in Tableau or equivalent.
Ability to work onsite in Washington, DC
Ability to obtain and maintain a public trust clearance.
Legal authorization to work in the U.S.
JOB DUTIES.
Find patterns in data and clearly articulate the entire analysis (e.g., methodology, results, assumptions, constraints) using various suites of tools.
Creatively apply visualizations to large datasets using tools like Tableau, Power BI, or Qlik.
Prepare comprehensive written reports, presentations, and charts based on research, collection, and analysis of data.
Review Business requirements, their analytical and operational reporting needs.
DESIRED SKILLS.
Experience working with Veteran Affairs data (i.e. Corporate Data Warehouse).
Flexible mindset focused on delivering quality deliverables on tight deadlines.
Excellent problem-solving capability.
Ability to get up to speed quickly on complex issues; desire to work in a fast-paced, rapidly evolving environment.
Capable self-starter with a drive to get all types of work done and high attention to detail.
Excellent ability to communicate across most mediums and settings.
ABOUT APTIVE.

Aptive is a modern federal consulting firm focused on human experience, digital services and business transformation. Our employees receive competitive compensation, along with company-paid health care and short-term disability plans. We also offer a 401K plan with company match, paid time off, flexible savings accounts, commuter benefits and company-sponsored professional education opportunities.

Our work inspires people, fuels change and makes an impact. Join our team to be part of positive change in your community and our nation.

EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER.

Aptive is an equal opportunity employer. We consider all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, parental status, veteran status, age, disability or any other protected class.

Veterans, members of the Reserve and National Guard, and transitioning active-duty service members are highly encouraged to apply.

Apply Now",3.9,"Aptive
3.9","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
168,Data Scientist,-1,"At Goldbelly, we believe in the emotional power of food. For many of us, food is a language of love. It's more than just nourishment. It's memories, it's connection, it's comfort.

We understand how truly important our mission is. We are here to bring a smile to people’s faces, an edible hug, a connection to a loved one even though you may not be with them, a moment of nostalgic comfort, a craving from a beloved food memory.

We are looking for a seasoned Data Scientist to join our team in New York.
Responsibilities
Build upon our data infrastructure to develop a fully fledged BI suite to make sure our decisions are always data informed.
Work closely with cross-functional teams of growth marketing, product managers, engineers who are passionate about Goldbelly's success.
Develop a deep understanding of how our marketplace functions across the entire user journey
Own and iterate upon our various recommendation systems
Drive meaningful ROI and impact upon our full funnel acquisition and retention
Qualifications
MS or BS + 5 yrs experience in predictive modeling, data science, machine learning, or user and entity behavior analytic development
At least 4 years focused on applications of Data Science/Analytics
An M.S. in Mathematics, Computer Science, Electrical and Computer Engineering, or equivalent degree.
The right candidate has a background in probability and statistics, applied mathematics, or computational science and a history of solving difficult problems using a scientific approach.
Analytic development - SQL, NoSQL, graph-based, Key/Value stores, document stores, Python and/or R
Experience applying machine learning to real-world production systems
Excellent written and oral communication skills, strong sense of ownership, urgency, and drive
Ideal Candidate has experience building and managing a full data org
Ideal Candidate has experience working with large scale e-commerce or marketplace platforms and running analytics on big data sets
Ideal Candidate has produced and iterated on recommendation systems for consumers",-1,Goldbelly,"New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
169,Data Scientist,$66k-$113k (Glassdoor Est.),"Develops and applies interdisciplinary methods, algorithms, statistics, and research techniques in the development of data driven solutions to extract knowledge, provide insights, and present information from data in various structures and unstructured forms.

Principal Duties and Responsibilities (*Essential functions)

Performs analysis of data systems, such as Big Data systems *
Performs statistical analysis and provides input for reports and dashboards*
Assists in the development of data products, reports, and dashboards or other display techniques*
Evaluates data, algorithms, and their interaction to improve algorithm performance*
May apply advanced statistics, including natural language processing and machine learning to create solutions
Assists with data modeling and data virtualization*
Writes code to preprocess and clean data
May conduct unit testing and troubleshooting

At COLSA, people are our most valuable resource and centered at our core value. We invite you to unite your talents with opportunity and be a part of our “Family of Professionals!” Learn about our employee-centric culture and benefits here.

Required Skills

Required Experience

Bachelors degree or higher in computer science, data science, engineering, math, statistics, operations research or related field or equivalent experience
Minimum of 5-8 years related experience
U.S. Citizenship required
Preferred familiarity with data analysis and presentation tools
Working knowledge of current operating systems and programming languages
Active DoD Top Secret security clearance with eligibility for DIA-SCI access. Candidate selected must successfully pass a DIA CI polygraph within 60 days of hire

Preferred Qualifications

Experience with Machine Learning / Deep Learning, Advanced Analytics, Neo4j, MongoDB, ArangoDB, SQL and NOSQL databases
2+ years programming experience in Python, R, Julia, TensorFlow, CUDA, JavaScript, Scala, Java, Unix/Linux, C, C++
Proactive self-starter capable of finding and solving problems with little guidance
DoD Analyst background
Data engineering experience: working with large amounts of structured and unstructured data

Applicant selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. COLSA Corporation is an Equal Opportunity Employer, Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disabled. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin.",4.2,"COLSA
4.2","Huntsville, AL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1980,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
170,Data Scientist,$99k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you looking for an opportunity to combine your extensive breadth of data science expertise and top-notch understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms? As a data scientist, you would put your keen knowledge and experience to use identifying high-value analytical targets, goals, and opportunities within business intelligence and analytics. This role will enable you to perform advanced analytical exploration, which may include predictive analytics, outlier detection, semantic analysis, and natural language processing.
As part of the Application Development team, you would be the lead modeler for machine learning and AI efforts, determining the correct libraries and algorithms to use. This role supports model development within the team, as well as the productionalization and ongoing maintenance and retraining of those models. Each day, you would work to develop the advanced analytics processes and capabilities that enhance our product offerings and increase the firm’s competitive advantages.
Key responsibilities
Collaborating with various business units to identify data-driven, machine learning business opportunities
Working with the architecture and product teams as needed to understand company needs, devise solutions, and assist in the integration of trained models into other products or processes
Implementing appropriate statistical, mathematical, or coding methodologies as needed for advanced analytics use cases
Selecting features, building and optimizing classifiers, and using machine learning techniques
Performing data mining and advanced analytics using appropriate state-of-the-art methods
Identifying and extending the company’s data with third-party sources of information when needed
Enhancing data collection procedures to include information that is relevant for building analytic systems
Collaborating with architecture, product, and business intelligence teams to identify big data opportunities, as well as standardizing advanced analytics to increase the value of those opportunities
Keeping up to date with technology trends, specifically analytics, machine learning, AI, and DevOps
Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for advanced analysis
Performing ad hoc analysis and presenting results clearly
Educating and mentoring other team members on advanced analytical concepts and processes
Core strengths
Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms, such as k-NN, Naive Bayes, SVM, and Decision Forests
Able to conceptualize advanced analytical processes, such as machine learning and deep learning
Experience with common data science toolkits and libraries, such as R, Python, Weka, NumPy, and MatLab
Good written and verbal communication skills
Familiar with data visualization tools, such as D3.js and ggplot
Excellent SQL skills
Experience with ETL processes and capabilities
High level of applied statistics skills, such as distributions, statistical testing, and regression
Solid scripting and programming skills in SQL, Python, C#, or Java
Data-oriented personality
Self-driven, curious, and creative
Additional skills and knowledge
Previous experience with financial services or financial service product delivery a plus
PhD in statistics, machine learning, computer science, or the natural sciences, especially physics or any engineering disciplines, desired
Have we piqued your curiosity? Can you see yourself thriving in this opportunity? Let’s introduce ourselves.
About Commonwealth—and Our Anything but Common® Culture
Commonwealth Financial Network® is the largest privately held Registered Investment Adviser–independent broker/dealer in the U.S., with offices in Waltham, Massachusetts, and San Diego, California. Since 1979, we’ve been delivering indispensable service to independent financial professionals so they, in turn, can put their clients first. Our technology, research, resources, and support—plus a variety of affiliation models—deliver what today’s independent advisors need to thrive.
That being said, we are a financial services company with a unique mission—one that encompasses purpose, vision, and core values in equal measure. Staying true to these guiding principles is the reason we are recognized so often and by so many for the quality of life we enjoy here. We believe it directly translates to a better experience for everyone: employees, advisors, clients, and our communities.
Creating a supportive culture where everyone can thrive is a mission we take seriously. From professional development to comprehensive benefits, grassroots leadership opportunities, generous bonus and stock option incentive plans, opportunities to unwind and connect, and so much more, Commonwealth is not just a great place to work—it’s a place that, for many, feels like home.
We care about your online safety as a prospective employee and encourage you to exercise caution when responding to job postings online. Commonwealth Financial Network® will never ask potential hiring candidates to pay or transfer funds as a precondition of interviews or employment, nor will we authorize recruiters or agents to do so on our behalf.
Commonwealth Financial Network is an equal opportunity employer that is committed to a diverse workforce.",3.7,"Commonwealth Financial Network
3.7","Waltham, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1979,Company - Private,Brokerage Services,Finance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
171,Laser Development and Optical Imaging Research Scientist,-1,"Position: *Laser Development and Optical Imaging Research Scientist
Position Summary: *LiveBx seeks to fill a position for a full-time Laser Development and Optical Imaging Research Scientist, to join its diverse and talented design group. This individual will contribute to the development of novel label-free imaging technologies, working side-by-side proven scientific leaders that continue to push the boundaries of innovation in this rapidly expanding field. The candidate will have a key role in the design of robust femtosecond lasers, operate the corresponding optical imaging technologies and systems, and perform/manage translational imaging studies involving cell lines, _in vitro_ tissue models, and human tissue specimens. This position will work closely with research personnel at the University of Illinois at
Urbana-Champaign Biophotonics Imaging Laboratory, LiveBx company founders, as well as closely interface with market leading customers, industry partners, and R&D collaborators.
Compensation: *Base salary $60,000 - $80,000 annually with benefits; Additional incentive compensation available for meeting project and company milestones, including an equity profits interest for advanced candidates.
Duties and Responsibilities*:

• Innovate and develop robust fiber-based femtosecond lasers for nonlinear optical imaging applications.

• Innovate and develop novel nonlinear optical imaging systems, including both hardware and software, for applications in biological discovery and translational biomedical imaging.

• Develop and design fiber-optic-based beam delivery systems for multimodal nonlinear imaging.

• Evaluate and modify current system software and algorithms, hardware control and data acquisition software, user interfaces, and software for data storage and communication.

• Perform qualitative and quantitative imaging using various optical imaging systems on cell lines, _in vitro_ tissue models, and/or human tissue specimens using established procedures and independent judgment to determine probable causes for low- and high- quality images.

• Perform established quality assurance procedures (quality control testing, instrument function checks and calibrations), maintain appropriate documentation, and report irregularities per company policy.

• Assess accuracy and validity of obtained test results by applying knowledge of relevant scientific principles, recognize changes that are critical to research studies, and identify probable causes for irregular and atypical findings.

• Maintain records of tests, examinations, and final results for all record functions and inquiries related to imaging human tissue specimens.

• Continue to develop professionally (e.g., member of professional society, attend conferences, and keep up on latest advances in the field).

Education and Experience*:

• B.S/M.S. (Ph.D. preferred) degree in optical engineering or the physical sciences.
• 3+ years of research experience in ultrafast optics and/or nonlinear optical imaging.
Key Competencies*
• Understanding of optical systems design principles.
• Must be a results-driven self-starter with the ability to work independently as well as collaborate with team members on projects and initiatives.
• Proven ability to design, assemble, and validate complex optical systems through hands- on laboratory experimentation and development.
• Aptitude in decision-making and problem-solving.
• Strong analytical and data-driven mindset that translates into innovation and robust designs.
• Flexibility and adaptability in priorities, tasks, and schedule.
• Highly organized and detail oriented.
• The ability to multi-task, prioritize, plan, and use time efficiently to stay on point, work with a sense of urgency, and meet deadlines is crucial.
• Ability to use discretion and maintain a high level of confidentiality.
• Effectively and professionally convey information, internally and externally, through verbal and written communication skills.
Preferred Qualifications*
• 7+ years of research experience in ultrafast optics and/or nonlinear optical imaging.
• 3+ years of industry experience in designing robust and manufacturable lasers.
• Direct technical expertise in ultra-fast lasers, non-linear optics, and laser source engineering.
• Skilled in the use of optical design, system control, and analysis tools such as Zemax and Matlab.
• Training or experience in crafting grant proposals, responding to FOAs from federal agencies (NIH, NSF, DoD, AFOSR, etc.).
• Knowledge of industry safety standards including CDRH, CE, UL, and laboratory safety compliance.
• Demonstrated leadership in optical engineering.
• Imaging of biological specimens utilizing microscopy-based imaging systems.
• Experience working with cell lines, _in vitro_ tissue models, animal models, and/or human tissue specimens.
• Enjoy working on and with diverse interdisciplinary teams.

This is a full-time, benefits-eligible position. Compensation is commensurate with skills and experience.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $60,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Education:
Master's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.livebiopsy.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,LiveBx,"Champaign, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
172,Data Scientist,$72k-$120k (Glassdoor Est.),"Preferred Qualifications

Master’s degree or doctorate in statistics or another applied science field or equivalent experience
Considerable experience with statistical tools and packages (e.g., SAS, SPSS, Minitab, R) and methods to incorporate statistical results into analyses
Proficiency in at least one programming language, such as Python, Java or C/C++
Strong knowledge of statistical methods, particularly in the areas of modeling and business analytics
Comfort manipulating and analyzing complex, high-volume, high-dimensionality data from varying sources
Ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear, precise and actionable manner
Experience with modeling and forecasting
Working knowledge of standard querying with SQL
Advanced hands-on experience with the Microsoft Office suite
Proven track record as a lead resource for the business
Strong written and verbal communication skills

Job Summary

The Data Scientist works with business owners and Technology teams to provide deep analysis and guidance on crucial business opportunities across many areas within the company. They draw upon their knowledge and experience in applied statistics, data mining, modeling and forecasting to ensure that results are accurate and clear, providing actionable opportunities for business leaders. The Data Scientist must be detail-oriented and highly aware of the impact of their analysis and solutions across the company. They take initiative and focus on finding innovative solutions for a myriad of business challenges.

Responsibilities

Work closely with various teams across the company to identify and solve business challenges utilizing large structured, semi-structured and unstructured data
Drive the collection of new data and the refinement of existing data sources for deep statistical analysis and modeling
Clean data in preparation for analysis and modeling
Perform statistical summaries and tests for relevant business questions
Develop predictive statistical, behavioral or other models via supervised and unsupervised machine learning, statistical analysis and other modeling techniques
Translate business opportunities into data-driven machine learning and modeling solutions that revamp the business process
Deploy applicable models into production system for business use
Perform statistical testing to enhance the predictability of deployed models
Summarize conclusions and solutions for presentation
Develop strong relationships with subject matter experts
Develop best practices for experimentation

Who We Are

Amrock is one of the largest providers of title insurance, property valuations and settlement services in the nation. The company is an authorized agent of the highest-rated title insurers in the industry, and its solutions power many of the nation's largest residential lending institutions. Amrock is a preferred provider to five of the top 20 Fortune 100 companies and many of the largest residential mortgage lenders. The company is based in Detroit and retains regional operating centers in Ohio, California, Pennsylvania and Texas.

Disclaimer

This is an outline of the primary responsibilities of this position. As with everything in life, things change. The tasks and responsibilities can be changed, added to, removed, amended, deleted and modified at any time by the leadership group.",3.8,"Amrock
3.8","Detroit, MI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Real Estate,Real Estate,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
173,Data Scientist,-1,"About Shogun:

Shogun is a B2B2C fintech company that helps home improvement contractors grow their business by offering competitive financing options to their customers. Our SaaS platform -- Hearth (www.gethearth.com) -- gives contractors an effective and competitive way to sell more jobs with financing as well as get paid quickly with a new invoicing tool. Backed by 8VC, Founders Fund, and other prominent leaders in Silicon Valley, Shogun is the fastest growing company in the home improvement financing space. We’re always looking for smart, ambitious people to join our San Francisco and Austin offices. Build something amazing with us and join a rapidly growing company!

About this Role:

Data is key to Shogun for informing product decisions, optimizing operations and guiding company strategy. This team member will partner with all departments to inform and track strategic initiatives with data. A combination of data management and business sense is expected for this role. As the first member of a new team, you will get to set standards and processes for data within the organization.

Job Responsibilities:
Leverage data to understand users and their product usage, developing insights that apply to product, marketing, and business strategy.
Partner with executives, product managers, engineers, marketers, designers to translate data insights into smarter decisions and applications.
Establish and manage KPIs that measure the health of the business, product performance, and customer experience quality.
Build dashboards and reporting processes to monitor business and product trends.
Develop frameworks, tools, and best practices to apply data insights towards business questions.
Conduct analyses and build models that identify opportunities and drive growth.
Analyze experiment data, communicate results, and drive decisions.
Potential projects may include forecasting business performance, developing data personas, and modeling customer health.
Qualifications:
Undergraduate and/or graduate degree in Math, Economics, Statistics, Engineering, Computer Science, or other quantitative field.
Excellent SQL skills and some experience with either Python or R
Proven ability to wrangle large datasets, explore and utilize raw data feeds
Demonstrated aptitude toward Data Storytelling and Root Cause Analysis using data
Ability to deliver on tight timelines and prioritize multiple tasks while maintaining quality and detail
2+ years experience as a Data Scientist, or Data Analyst using advanced analytical methods
Familiarity with hypothesis testing or modeling/regressions
Ability to work in a self-guided manner
Excellent communication and organization skills
Location: We are hiring for this position in our office in downtown San Francisco, CA (currently remote)

More About Us: Shogun embraces diversity. We are proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and do not discriminate on the basis of sex, race, color, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, religion, national origin, citizenship, marital status, veteran status, or disability status. We consider employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.",4.0,"Shogun
4.0","San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Brokerage Services,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
174,Data Scientist,$71k-$124k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist

Are you an experienced, passionate pioneer in technology – a solutions builder, a roll-up-your-sleeves technologist who wants a daily collaborative environment, think-tank feel and share new ideas with your colleagues - without the extensive demands of travel? If so, consider an opportunity with our US Delivery Center – we are breaking the mold of a typical Delivery Center.

Our US Delivery Centers have been growing since 2014 with significant, continued growth on the horizon. Interested? Read more about our opportunity below …usdcsacampaignoct20

Work you’ll do/Responsibilities

Work with data science techniques and libraries to show data’s applicability to business problems.
Perform exploratory data analysis to define analytical models.
Develop advanced quantitative models using a variety of programs/software to support predictive assessments.
Provide expertise for analytical, programmatic, strategic, and operational analysis.
Explain analytics model behavior/results in the vernacular of business.
Perform technical risk analysis and reliability assessments.
Perform multiple forms of advanced analyses, sustainment, optimization, text analytics, machine learning, parametric and non-parametric statistical models and techniques.
Build, test, validate and demonstrate analytical models through various relevant error metrics and calibration techniques.
Provide recommendations for plans, programs, strategies, policies and budgets.
Design algorithms that require a number of different models/methods to be used in an ensemble.
Deploy models into production.

The Team

Analytics & Cognitive

In this age of disruption, organizations need to navigate the future with confidence, embracing decision making with clear, data-driven choices that deliver enterprise value in a dynamic business environment.

The Analytics & Cognitive team leverages the power of data, analytics, robotics, science and cognitive technologies to uncover hidden relationships from vast troves of data, generate insights, and inform decision-making. Together with the Strategy practice, our Strategy & Analytics portfolio helps clients transform their business by architecting organizational intelligence programs and differentiated strategies to win in their chosen markets.

Analytics & Cognitive will work with our clients to:

Implement large-scale data ecosystems including data management, governance and the integration of structured and unstructured data to generate insights leveraging cloud-based platforms.
Leverage automation, cognitive and science-based techniques to manage data, predict scenarios and prescribe actions.
Drive operational efficiency by maintaining their data ecosystems, sourcing analytics expertise and providing As-a-Service offerings for continuous insights and improvements.

Qualifications

Required

Bachelor’s degree or equivalent work experience in Statistics/Technology/Science/Engineering/Applied Mathematics or a similar quantitate analytics field.
3+ years of experience in developing algorithms using data science technologies to build analytical models.
3+ years of data extraction/manipulation experience using scripts specific to Python and/or R.
3+ years of experience with Python and/or R programming.
2+ years of experience with presentation and data analysis software such as: SAS, R, SPSS, MATLAB, Qlikview, Excel and Access +python.
3+ years of modeling experience using a variety of regression and supervised and unsupervised learning techniques.
3+ years of experience in data wrangling/cleansing, statistical modeling, and programming.
Travel up to 20% (While 20% of travel is a requirement of the role, due to COVID-19, non-essential travel has been suspended until further notice).
Must be willing to live and work in one of our Center locations:
Lake Mary, FL (Orlando area)
Mechanicsburg, PA (Harrisburg area)
Gilbert, AZ (Phoenix area)
Must be legally authorized to work in the United States without the need for employer sponsorship, now or at any time in the future.

Preferred

PhD in a quantitative analytics field.
Experience with Tableau or similar visualization tool.
Business analytics experience in one or more of the following industries: Insurance, Consumer Products and Packaged Goods, and Human Resources.
Experience conducting Modeling and Simulation Analysis, DoD Science and Technology (S&T) Analysis, Program Analysis and Evaluation, C4/IT and Cyber Analysis, Manpower Analysis, Training and Education Analysis, DoD Logistics, Maintenance, and Supply Analysis, Naval Amphibious Shipping Analysis, Strategic Plans Analysis, Strategic Investment Analysis, Cost and Economic Modeling and Analysis, Operations Research Analysis, Readiness Analysis, Force Preservation Analysis.

How you’ll grow

At Deloitte, our professional development plan focuses on helping people at every level of their career to identify and use their strengths to do their best work every day. From entry-level employees to senior leaders, we believe there’s always room to learn. We offer opportunities to help sharpen skills in addition to hands-on experience in the global, fast-changing business world. From on-the-job learning experiences to formal development programs, our professionals have a variety of opportunities to continue to grow throughout their career.

Benefits

At Deloitte, we know that great people make a great organization. We value our people and offer employees a broad range of benefits.

Deloitte’s culture

Our positive and supportive culture encourages our people to do their best work every day. We celebrate individuals by recognizing their uniqueness and offering them the flexibility to make daily choices that can help them to be healthy, centered, confident, and aware. We offer well-being programs and are continuously looking for new ways to maintain a culture where our people excel and lead healthy, happy lives.

Corporate citizenship

Deloitte is led by a purpose: to make an impact that matters. This purpose defines who we are and extends to relationships with our clients, our people and our communities. We believe that business has the power to inspire and transform. We focus on education, giving, skill-based volunteerism, and leadership to help drive positive social impact in our communities. Learn more about Deloitte’s impact on the world.

Recruiter tips

We want job seekers exploring opportunities at Deloitte to feel prepared and confident. To help you with your interview, we suggest that you do your research: know some background about the organization and the business area you’re applying to. Check out recruiting tips from Deloitte professionals.",3.8,"Deloitte
3.8","Gilbert, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,1850,Company - Private,Accounting,Accounting & Legal,$10+ billion (USD),-1
175,Data Scientist,$72k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a Data Scientist, you will have the unique opportunity to work on a program developing target models and advancing state-of-the-art modeling and prediction capabilities. This program will develop and train machine learning models to detect and discern features in scenes and develop an adversarial patch framework to defeat the trained classifiers.
Our delivery teams are driven to explore new ideas and technology, and care deeply about collaboration, feedback, and iteration. We follow SAFe agile practices, embrace the Ops ethos(DataOps/DevSecOps/MLOps) to “automate-first”, use modern tech stacks, and constantly challenge each other to grow and improve.
If cutting edge data science projects resonate with you and you care deeply about joining a mission-driven company with a strong growth direction and diverse culture, we'd love to learn more about you. Check out the details below, and let’s connect.

Technical members of our solutions teams require little guidance, but love to learn, collaborate, and problem solve. This position requires a mid to senior level of experience, a passion for mission support, and a strong desire to solve our customers’ hardest technical and data challenges.
The Data Scientist will be responsible for the following:
Develop, train and evaluate Machine Learning models
Develop strategies for data augmentation and synthetic data
Utilize models to detect and classify targets within scenes
Develop adversarial attacks to defeat trained classifiers

Requirements:
TS/SCI clearance required
5+ years of related experience
Experience with deep learning frameworks such as PyTorch, Tensorflow or MXNet
Prior experience with the Intelligence Community and methodological experience in some of the following areas
Relationships and discovery (correlating, enriching, and prioritizing target data)
Situational awareness (unifying data into a single context, allowing the current situation to be accurately and quickly understood)
Systems modeling (building a computational analog of real-world-system to understand how it operates, what it is capable of, and how it can be fooled)
Experience with Synthetic Aperture Radar data strongly preferred
We're looking for a motivated Data Scientist eager to advance not only your professional career, but also the missions of our Intelligence and Defense communities. At NT Concepts, you'll be able to:
Meaningfully impact the company's growth, and share in the rewards accordingly
Develop your own career path through our What’s Next program, which emphasizes personal growth through training and certification
Work on programs of importance that directly impact National Security and the world
Work in a fun, “challenging yet rewarding” fast-paced environment
#CJ
#JT",3.6,"NT Concepts
3.6","Chantilly, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1998,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
176,Data Scientist,$81k-$139k (Glassdoor Est.),"Date Posted

Location

Requirements
10/14/2020

Edison, NJ (Remote)

Job Description:
The person will be part of the Data Science team for a Diaspak’s client. He/ She will work with different stakeholders as SME for data engineering/data science work.
A typical work day will involve working with stakeholders in individual contributor role and upscaling the quality of team’s deliverables.
The person will also be required to participate actively in brainstorming sessions for improvement opportunities and take it to completion.
A suitable candidate should have 8-10 years of experience in a similar role and should possess a go -getter attitude. He/ She should be able to deal with aggressively changing environment.
Experience in insurance preferred but not mandatory.
Key Responsibilities & Skillsets:
8+ years of experience in analytics, machine learning, advanced statistical techniques, AI and data engineering jobs.
Excellent communication & presentation skills.
Experience in managing Python codes and collaborating with customer on model evolution.
Excellent in project management, team management and conflict management skills.
Good knowledge of data base management and Hadoop/Spark, SQL, HIVE, Python (expertise).
Superior analytical and problem solving skills.
Should be able to work on a problem independently and prepare client ready deliverable with minimal or no supervision.
Data Management Skillsets:
Ability to understand data models and identify ETL optimization opportunities. Exposure to ETL tools is preferred.
Should have strong grasp of advanced SQL functionalities (joins, nested query, and procedures).
Strong ability to translate functional specifications / requirements to technical requirements.

Apply Now",3.5,"Diaspark
3.5","Edison, NJ",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1993,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
177,Data Scientist,-1,"Back to search results
Previous job

Next job

JOB DESCRIPTION

A BIT ABOUT OUR DATA SCIENCE & ANALYTICS TEAM

Mars Petcare Data Science & Analytics team is core to our strategy. We’re using digital, data and customer insights to transform our business by finding answers to problems that we’ve often never asked ourselves before. Our vast data assets are being combined to build a 360° view of pets and pet owners to not only power Kinship’s businesses but also influence the next great ideas in the pet care space. This role will be key in helping us understand the power of our data, and how this translates into value for our company, our pets, and pet owners everywhere. Frequently the projects will be ambiguous, but that’s part of the fun; you will determine the best way to leverage our data to tell the right story for any given audience.

HOW YOU’LL CREATE A BETTER WORLD FOR PETS
Apply advanced analytics & data science approaches to understand and predict pet and pet owner behaviors
Collaborate with internal and external teams to ensure we focus on pet-centric product and service recommendations
Support new pet technology businesses and partners by generating actionable insights from our data assets
Develop compelling stories that provide insight into the drivers of business performance and pet/pet owner behavior
WHO WE NEED TO CHART THE FUTURE OF PET CARE

We strive to hire people who are passionate about our mission: Shaping the Future of Pet Care. For all of our Kinship roles, we look for candidates who exemplify our core values. We believe what we do is just as important as how we do it, and we aim to hire people who are:
Optimistic
Purposefully Inquisitive
Open to All
And for this role, we hope you have the following skills we require to knock it out of the dog park:
Truly inspired by, and want to live, our purpose of creating a better world for pets.
4+ years’ experience in a data science role handling varied and complex data
Varied technical experience in delivering statistical analytics, data science and insight on large-scale consumer data sets across multiple sectors, including packaged goods and retail
Hands-on experience with Python is required; Familiarity with PySpark is also desirable
Comfortable with ambiguity, with a passion for collaboration to achieve objectives
A Bachelor’s degree in quantitative field (economics, statistics, business, computer science) or equivalent experience
Passion for growing and strengthening a business using data driven approaches
Familiarity with cloud-based computing services e.g. AWS, Databricks, etc.
Enjoys explaining how technical concepts to both non-technical and technical stakeholders.
WHY JOIN US?

We offer our associates a unique opportunity to have a completely customizable career within pet care. Through Kinship you will work with and learn from a community of industry executives, pet partners, entrepreneurs, and fellow associates across our startup investment companies, outside partners, and in Mars Petcare. Our nimble and flexible approach to work allows you to make an immediate impact across businesses, while learning new skills at every stage. The diversity of our work opens doors to big opportunities and unlocks enormous potential for countless career experiences in pet care. Join us in our mission to chart the future of pet care, alongside the industry’s brightest minds.

Kinship’s offices are global, and so are our associates. We are located in NYC, San Francisco, Portland, London, Helsinki, Shanghai, and in Moscow. Many of us flex between our dog-friendly hubs and our home offices. Today, Kinship offers exceptional benefits for you, your family, and your pets, generous paid time off, exponential opportunities to build a career within pet care, and progressive reward packages. Interested? Let’s take big strides, together.",4.0,"Mars
4.0",United States,-1,10000+ Employees,1911,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
178,Data Scientist,$79k-$106k (Glassdoor Est.),"What’s significantly better than working on a typical data science team? How about working on a data science team in which you’re directly making an impact in the revolutionary field of artificial intelligence even as an entry level team member? (well, statistically significant that is). Pardon the pun, but at Spectrum we’re certain that our team is pumped up to work not only with like-minded data-savvy and fun loving professionals, but also to work with cutting edge new tools like our predictive, artificially intelligent proprietary software. So, if your confident that you want to make a direct impact in your next job today, then please keep on reading.

Responsibilities

Beyond working with state of the art technology you will have many different fantastic projects to work on as a Data Scientist at Spectrum. Here are just a few different responsibilities you can expect off the bat:
Work with IT teams, management and/or data scientists to determine organizational goals
Mine data from primary and secondary sources
Clean and prune data to discard irrelevant information
Analyze and interpret results using standard statistical tools and techniques
Pinpoint trends, correlations and patterns in complicated data sets
Identify new opportunities for process improvement
Provide concise data reports and clear data visualizations for management
Some Characteristics That Define You

We understand that as a Data Scientist for Spectrum, you have many different professional goals and personal interests. As such here are just a few different things that typically define our team members on the Data Science team:
Analytical. In order to solve problems and build innovative new digital marketing campaigns, it is essential that you know how to take an idea and analyze it from all of its angles.
Patient. As a data scientist, you know that you work with extremely large data sets on a daily basis. As such we are looking for someone who is not only meticulous, but patient enough to sit and sift through that data in a thorough way.
Creative. Beyond just analyzing data sets, you are an explorer and a puzzle solver. Pulling insights out of your data and understanding how those insights can better shape our tools is something that you live to do.
Student. More so than most industries, the field of data science is always changing and evolving. As such, you are always looking to learn new things and gain new skills.
Business-Savvy. Beyond the wicked data science skills you bring to the table, we also want you to consider the business implications of our data tools. From the ways our team will use them to how our customers will use them, we always want you to keep the user and the business application in mind.
Required Skills and Experience

On top of the many intangible skills you bring to the table, there are many skills that can help improve the efficiency and success of your work at Spectrum. Here are a few of those required skills and experience that you will come in with as a Data Scientist on our team:
A bachelor’s degree/pursuing a bachelor's degree in computer science, mathematics, statistics, information systems, or a related field
Experience with statistical modeling
Fundamental knowledge of R and/or SAS languages
Experience with SQL databases and database querying languages
Experience with data mining and data cleaning
Experience with data visualization and reporting techniques
Written and verbal expression
Benefits

As a Data Scientist at Spectrum there are a ton of fantastic perks and benefits that come along with your work. Here are just a few of the benefits you can expect when joining the Spectrum family:
Comprehensive medical & dental insurance
Retirement planning & company matching
Generous PTO, including sick days & holidays
A state-of-the-art office environment
Nintendo Switch in-office gaming such as FIFA, Arms, Mario Kart, and Rocket League
Year-round gym memberships
Paid continuing education
Casual dress code
Flexible scheduling
Free-Lunch-Friday
Company sponsored parties and group activities outside of the office",3.5,"Spectrum Communications and Consulting
3.5","Chicago, IL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1992,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
179,Data Scientist,-1,"Webflow is a visual web development platform that empowers non-coders to create incredible experiences for the web.

We're looking for a Data Scientist to inform the future of Webflow with data by building a deep understanding of how our customers create for the web with our product. You'll partner directly with key product stakeholders to identify interesting business questions and provide the data and quantitative analysis to answer them, leading the development of KPIs and helping teams understand how to improve our user experience.

As an early member of our data team, you'll also be working to improve our data warehouse by thoughtfully developing clean and reliable data pipelines for lasting impact. We're looking for an empathetic, humble, curious and collaborative team member who is excited to provide meaningful, actionable insight to teams at Webflow while helping to shape our foundational data capabilities.

About the role
Location: SF or Remote (US timezone)
Full time
As a Data Scientist you'll …
Enable our product teams with quantitative analysis to understand how customers engage with Webflow, diving deep into impactful questions alongside key stakeholders and delivering actionable insights.
Lead the definition of product and business success metrics, building tools for monitoring and surfacing drivers of KPIs (Key Performance Indicators) .
Partner with technical and non-technical team members to execute experiments, answer open ended business questions with data, and research levers for improving our product
Develop our data foundation, building new pipelines and models that contribute to our connected, complete understanding of our customer journey. We currently use stitch, dbt, snowflake and Tableau!
That said, these responsibilities are just the start! At Webflow, we encourage you to contribute wherever your interests take you — and shape your role accordingly. And this isn't just a philosophical bent: we actually give you 4 hours a week (10% of the work week) to pursue passion projects outside of your role responsibilities.

About you


You'll thrive as (a) Data Scientist if you:
have prior experience working as a data scientist (or the equivalent in quantitative analysis), especially alongside product teams.
bring your knowledge of applied statistics (e.g. predictive modeling, hypothesis testing, regressions), segmentation or experimentation (e.g. A/B testing) in an industry setting
have strong understanding of SQL, and experience with a programming language like Python or R
thrive collaborating with product teams in a fast-paced and sometimes ambiguous environment
engage both technical and nontechnical audiences with clear and compelling communication
If you don't meet 100% of the above qualifications, you should still seriously consider applying. Studies show that you can still be considered for a role if you meet just 50% of the role's requirements.

About us


At Webflow, we believe that our success will be defined not only by what we do — but also by how and why we do it. So, here is the Webflow ""why"" and our ""how"":

Our dual missions — one for the world, one for us
For the world: To empower everyone to create for the web and spark an unprecedented wave of digital innovation.
For ourselves: Lead fulfilling, impactful lives.

Our core behaviors (how we act)
Start with customers
Practice extraordinary kindness
Be radically candid
Move intentionally fast
Just fix it
Lead by serving others
Dream big
Our commitments to you
We'll pay you! This is a full-time, salaried position that includes equity
We'll invest in your physical and mental well-being with health, dental, and vision benefits and a monthly stipend for health and wellness expenses
We'll pay you to take a vacation … seriously. We'll give you a $1,000 bonus for taking your first vacation with us that is more than 5 days
We offer flexible parental leave
We provide remote employees with the equipment they need to create a great remote work environment
We will offer you the support you need to help you grow as an impactful Data Scientist and a human being
Ready to apply?


If you share our values and enthusiasm for empowering the world, we'd love to review your application! We promise we do take the time and care to review every application we receive. However, as much as we wish we could interview everyone who submits an application, we cannot guarantee an interview or feedback due to the unprecedented volume of applications we are receiving today. We are rooting for you, and hope you do consider applying.

Note: You'll need valid U.S. work authorization to join us.",4.3,"Webflow
4.3",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
180,Data Scientist,-1,"About ConcertAI

ConcertAI is the leading provider of precision oncology solutions for biopharma and healthcare, leveraging the largest collection of research-grade Real-world Data and the only broadly deployed oncology-specific AI solutions. Our mission is to improve translational sciences; accelerate therapeutic clinical development; and provide new capabilities for post-approval studies to accelerate needed new medical innovations to patients and to improve patient outcomes.
ConcertAI has emerged as one of the highest growth technology companies in Real-world Data and AI, backed by industry leading private equity companies: SymphonyAI, Declaration Partners, Maverick Ventures, and Alliance|Bernstein.

Role Summary

As a Data Scientist at ConcertAI you will be responsible for data exploration, analysis, and predictive/descriptive modeling on patient data for various stakeholders in the oncology and healthcare domain. You will report to the Vice President of Data Products. You should have a good mix of programming/CS, visualization, stats/math, and ML skills (with a particular strength in at least 2 of those areas), and ideally, you have been applying those skills in in healthcare. You will design methods and models around client driven needs and you will collaborate with various subject matter experts to inform those methods. You will assist the client delivery team with insights, dashboards, and ad-hoc analytics. You will also work with the engineering team to build prototypes and models for new product development.
Responsibilities
Understand client / product needs and translate them into tactical R&D initiatives with defined goals and timelines.
Reason about healthcare specific problems to analyze visualize, interpret, and contextualize results.
Run a variety of analytics from data QA to complex models.
Understand the differences and tradeoffs between various ML/Stats techniques and be able to select them appropriately, and apply them in a meaningful way.
Implement models using high level software packages (SKlearn, R, TensorFlow, Spark).
Collaborate on software projects with engineers, providing analytical guidance and contributing to codebase.
Requirements
B.sc or higher in a STEM field, with formal training in CS, stats, and math.
Strong programming abilities in at least one high level language (python, stata, R).
Knowledge of statistical methods- regression, ANOVA, EDA, PCA, etc.
Knowledge of machine learning methods- un/supervised, non/parametric, ensemble.
Basic visualization skills- matplotlib/seaborn/plotly/etc, tableau.
Experience with big data – Cloud data warehouses, cluster computing, Spark, MapReduce/Hadoop.
Intimate familiarity with the python data science stack (pandas, sklearn, numpy/scipy, pyspark).
Knowledge of advanced computational techniques and AI: neural networks, bayesian networks, mixture models, NLP, stochastic. optimization, HMMs, MCMC, search, NLP, image processing.
Advanced visualization skills- interactive custom visualizations in d3.js, plotly, etc.
Learn More About ConcertAI

ConcertAI is transforming how healthcare is delivered and dedicated to improving patient outcomes in oncology by offering innovative solutions on how data and intelligence is used to solve healthcare problems. We are creating something special in our culture, by building a collaborative, engaged, patient focused, team approach to our mission. Our high-performance teams are looking to add great talent to the mix and we are hiring for the right mix of new skills and diverse mindset. Learn more about ConcertAI at www.concertai.com or on LinkedIn .",3.6,"ConcertAI
3.6","New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
181,Data Scientist,-1,"What we do:

Uptake is the premier Industrial AI company, providing a predictive analytics SaaS platform that empowers major industry leaders to optimize performance, reduce asset failures, and enhance safety. At Uptake, we combine our strengths — machine learning, analytics, data visualization, and software development — to deliver actionable insights that make industry more reliable, productive, safe and secure.

What Data Scientists Do Here:

Data science is at the core of what we do at Uptake. We collaborate with engineering, product, and other teams to contribute insights and data science best practices to all parts of the business.

Typical day to day tasks for a data scientist might include:
Collaborating with teams to analyze problems.
Learning a new programming language or data science technique - we continually build our skills and explore new things.
Building, testing, and deploying supervised or unsupervised learning models.
Writing data analysis reports for internal use.
Building tools to enable other data scientists to scale their knowledge and increase impact.
Working with customers to develop analyses that help them solve business problems and drive value.
What We Are Looking For:
Bachelor's degree or higher in a relevant field
Passion for data science! We want candidates who love data science and are excited about what they do.
Some ways previous successful candidates have demonstrated this are by:
Writing relevant blog posts and/or articles.
Participating in relevant online communities.
Expressing detailed knowledge of and genuine interest in Uptake’s unique methods, products, data, and technology within a cover letter.
Ability to write sophisticated machine learning and data analysis code in Python or R
Some ways previous successful candidates have demonstrated this are by:
Contributing to influential Open Source Projects like sklearn, XGBoost, tidyverse, Tensorflow, pytorch, Kafka, Spark, Elasticsearch etc.
Describing a data science model they developed that is deployed in a live setting within a resume or cover letter.
Making a high quality data science project available in a public forum like GitHub or Kaggle.
Publishing work in Data Science related journals or conferences such as ICML, NIPS, JML, KDD, and INFORMS.
Experience communicating effectively with people at all levels of an organization. Our data scientists regularly share complex insights with all kinds of people.
Some ways previous successful candidates have demonstrated this are by:
Teaching data science to non-data scientists in an academic or professional setting.
Elaborating in a cover letter or resume ways that they have professionally collaborated with others in the organization and the impact that collaboration had on the organization’s KPIs.
Nice to Have:
2+ years professional experience working in an analytics focused role
Experience working with IoT systems, ranging from DIY home projects to industrial IoT deployment
Substantive contributions to open source projects in the areas of data science or machine learning
Experience developing software projects with large teams using collaboration tools like git and Jira
Experience with CI/CD tools like Docker and Jenkins
Master’s degree or PhD in a relevant field
Experience working in one of the following industry areas:
Industrial technology
Agriculture
Mining
Energy
Transportation
Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S.

Uptake welcomes and encourages applications from all individuals, without regard to any prohibited ground of discrimination, including from people with disabilities. Accommodations are available upon request for candidates taking part in all aspects of the selection process.",2.2,"Uptake
2.2",Remote,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
182,Data Scientist,$79k-$133k (Glassdoor Est.),"This role will be responsible for unleashing data-driven actionable business insights at Bob’s Discount Furniture. This role will partner with cross-functional business leaders to identify and deliver key business insights to drive customer satisfaction, revenue growth, cost saving and operational efficiencies. This role will leverage retail & CPG industries best practices to quickly find deep business insights, build predictive analytics solutions and leverage prescriptive analytics based on proven approaches. This role will collaborate with various stakeholders to identify internal and external data, leverage traditional and modern methodologies and use various open source systems to find, present, implement and monitor insights. This role, as an individual contributor, will have a passion to quickly learn business process, leverage data and data science methodologies in innovative way to find compelling business insights. This role will be remote.

Responsibilities
Collaborate with cross functional business stakeholders to understand current business processes and to find opportunities for deep business insights
Analyze business goals, build hypothesis and identify key data sources from internal and external sources
Perform data wrangling and feature engineering using open source systems
Perform descriptive analytics and diagnostics analytics to provide causal inference
Build predictive analytics and forecasting solutions
Provide prescriptive analytics solutions for various domain ranging from marketing, sales, finance, HR and supply chain functions
Build analytics to have better insights on consumer preference and buying behaviors
Develop, maintain, and improve holistic data sets, reports, and dashboards to monitor company performance and communicate key business insights, risks and findings to management teams
Use a data-informed approach to inform and drive day-to-day focus and operational efficiencies
Collaborate and partner with business stakeholders in a way that supports the vision and sustains a culture that treats analytics as a corporate asset
Review work with leadership and partners on an ongoing basis to calibrate deliverables against expectations
Help identify long term opportunities within sales and supply chain cycle through the creation of models, algorithms and machine learning techniques
Participate in identifying and assessing the value of new data sources and analytical techniques to ensure ongoing competitive advantage
Accountable for long term ownership of models developed and evolution of those models as assigned
Remain current on research techniques and become familiar with state of the art tools applicable to your function
Required Qualifications
Minimum of 5+ year hands-on experience working on analytics for Retail / CPG industry domain
Expert level knowledge to perform diagnostics analytics to find drivers of business performance and customers choices.
Experience in building production-level algorithms and predictive analytics systems along with data pipelines
Solid experience in analytics software (SAS, R, Python)
Experience in data analysis using SQL and data visualization tools (Power BI)
Knowledge of marketing analytics, customer analytics and supply chain analytics initiatives
Strong work ethic and high level of personal integrity and accountability
Excellent communication and interpersonal and consultative skills to work effectively with vendors, clients, peers, and IT management and staff
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Degree in Predictive Analytics, Data Science or other related area of study
Minimum 5+ years of solid, diverse hands-on work experience using SAS, R or Python for Retail / CPG industry domain
Experience with Power BI is preferred
Applicable certifications is preferred

Bob’s Discount Furniture is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer and is committed to reasonably accommodating qualified persons with disabilities to enable them to perform the essential duties of their position.",4.0,"Bob's Discount Furniture
4.0","Manchester, CT",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1991,Company - Private,Home Furniture & Housewares Stores,Retail,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
183,Data Scientist,$120k-$140k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description:

Quartet is a pioneering healthcare technology company striving to improve the lives of people with mental health conditions. We connect people to a personalized care team to get them the right care at the right time. Our collaborative technology platform and range of services brings together physicians, mental health providers, and insurance companies to effectively improve patient outcomes and drive down healthcare costs. Backed by $153MM in venture funding from top investors like Oak HC/FT, GV (formerly Google Ventures), F-Prime Capital Partners, Polaris Partners, Centene Corporation and Echo Ventures. Quartet is headquartered in NYC and is currently operating in several markets across the United States Pennsylvania, Washington, Northern California, New Jersey, North Carolina, Louisiana, and Illinois.

About the team & opportunity:

As a Data Scientist at Quartet, you will work on a range of projects -- developing statistical analyses to study impact of Quartet interventions; predicting mental health needs among populations; building machine learning models to suggest timely and appropriate behavioral health care interventions for patients. You'll develop a deep understanding of Quartet interventions and the predictive models and algorithms.

You will design and develop effective models, features, and algorithms involving multiple datasets, including user activity, Electronic Health Records (EHR), admissions, discharges and transfers (ADT), medical claims, pharmacy claims, and lab test claims. Leverages knowledge of computer science, machine learning, data mining and software architecture to build high-quality data products. Supports the design of Quartet products, including: an entity resolution and de-duplication library for linking patients and providers data, which is collected from multiple sources; a machine learning application for the detection of opioid use disorder in patients using supervised learning and deep learning; and an optical mark recognition (OMR) computer vision application for transcribing paper assessments.

Accountabilities:
Research and develop machine-learning and statistical models in Quartet Health's platform to improve software personalization and recommendations for users
Drives a data-informed process for experimenting with new products to improve patient outcomes and operational efficiency.
Performing ML research, exploratory data analysis, and computer-vision modeling; developing model evaluation and online maintenance methodologies, including confidence estimation, calibration, and concept drift
Develop general-purpose frameworks to support machine learning applications in production.
Minimum Qualifications:
2-3 years experience as a data scientist.
Formal training in statistics and computer science.
Knowledge of mathematical fundamentals: probability theory, linear algebra and statistics.
Strong data transformation and extraction skills with SQL databases.
Strong statistical programming skills in both Python and R.
Comfort/self-sufficiency with Amazon Web Services infrastructure.
Comfort/self-sufficiency with Linux command line.
Comfort/self-sufficiency with git for version control.
Ability to work on projects from initial to final phase- beginning by defining a problem, developing an implementation plan, and overseeing deployment and maintenance.
Ability to clearly communicate across disciplines and work collaboratively.
Experience with any of the following: Docker, TensorFlow, Keras, Numpy, Scipy, Pandas, Gensim, Scikit-learn, NLKT, Jupyter
Employee Benefits for Quartet include: Unlimited vacation, volunteer opportunities, team events, mental healthcare coverage of 15 free therapy sessions + unlimited copay reimbursements, medical, dental + vision coverage, generous parental and military leave, commuter benefits, 401K, and stock option grants.

Want to know what Quartet life is like? Click here to meet our team.

Quartet is committed to building a diverse team and fostering an inclusive culture, and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We embrace and encourage our employees' differences in race, religion, color, national origin, gender, family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, veteran status, disability, pregnancy, medical conditions, and other characteristics. Headhunters and recruitment agencies may not submit resumes/CVs through this Web site or directly to managers. Quartet does not accept unsolicited headhunter and agency resumes. Quartet will not pay fees to any third-party agency or company that does not have a signed agreement with Quartet.

Please note: Quartet interview requests and job offers only originate from quartethealth.com email addresses (e.g. jsmith@quartethealth.com). Quartet will also never ask for bank information (e.g. account and routing number), social security numbers, passwords, or other sensitive information to be delivered via email. If you receive a scam email or wish to report a security issue involving Quartet, please notify us at: security@quartethealth.com.

Have someone to refer? Email talent@quartethealth.com to submit their details to us.",3.7,"Quartet Health
3.7","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
184,Data Scientist,$69k-$116k (Glassdoor Est.),"In a world where there is seemingly an infinite number of Government Services firms, we strive to not just be ""a"" place to work, but to be ""the"" place to work! Here at ASET Partners we are looking for a Data Scientist to service as Subject Matter Expert (SME) to for our client's Information Technology Operations Center (ITOC) visualizations.

Responsibilities:

• Prepare data for use and create visualizations for the data extracted with the help of Tableau.
• Collect and process large volumes of data in various formats, structured and unstructured.
• Establish connections to Data Sources.
• Add or Create Dimensions, Measures and Calculations.
• Perform Data Modeling in Tableau Desktop.
• Identify patterns and meaningful insights from data by analyzing it.
• Develop Workbooks and Hyper Extracts on Tableau Desktop.
• Design dashboards.
• Manage Tableau Server.
• Manage big data.
• Twist SQL queries for improving performances.
• Examine glitches in business processes and resolve them.
• Build prototypes on Amazon Web Services (AWS) in support of a critical mission requirements.
• Collaborate in a rapid feedback environment to deliver process improvements to the end user.
• Use critical thinking and a variety of software tools and languages to tackle new challenges.
• Provide Data analytics, data modeling, data correlation/ integration and data visualization (e.g., metrics and dashboards using leading Business Intelligence (BI) tools such as Tableau and ServiceNow report function.
• Develop Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs).
• Integrate multiple data streams and feeds from networks, infrastructure services, mission/ business applications into a near, real-time dashboard (heads up display) for use in troubleshooting and the presentation of situational awareness briefings to executive staff.
• Ability to utilize pre-built dashboards/add-ons within the system as well as be able to create custom dashboards and search queries to meet the ITOC needs.
• Provide recommendations/action plans for incorporating new data streams to present additional visualizations.
• Perform technical knowledge transfer to government and military personnel to enable them to create independent dashboards and data ingestion streams within the system.

Qualifications:

• Active/current TS/SCI with CI-Poly or ability to pass a CI-Poly required.
• Bachelor's degree or equivalent training and/ or experience.
• Ten years of specialized experience in software engineering.
• DoD and IC experience desired.
• Ability to effectively prioritize and execute tasks while under pressure.
• Must be proficient Tableau.

ASET Snapshot:

• We are a growing IT consulting and professional services firm that combines large-business experience with small-business efficiency and ingenuity
• Founded in 2008
• We are a HUBZone certified small business
• Profitable from day one, zero debt
• Offices in Alexandria, VA and Baltimore, MD
• Over 75 employees and growing
• Over 15 active contracts supporting 10+ Federal Agencies
• Our mission is to drastically change our client's expectations... one program at a time

Top 10 Reasons Our Employees Love Working at ASET:
Outstanding benefits! Including: health, dental, and vision care, a 401k retirement plan with up to a 4% company paid contribution, and employee achievement and merit awards to name a few.
We have very high hiring standards, so their co-workers are just as smart and talented as they are.
We are not profit driven; we are results driven and believe that profits will follow.
Unlike Office Space, our employees do not have eight bosses. They have just one or two, and they are not micromanagers. It's not our style and we just don't have time for it!
We're different than the rest. Our employees love our unique small-company culture.
We have established a trusted relationship with all our clients and refuse to make recommendations that aren't in our clients' best interests.
They feel appreciated and recognized for the contributions they make each day.
We offer a healthy work-life balance, flexible schedules, and competitive pay.
They love that we have been constantly growing. It's exciting to add new folks and it offers many opportunities for career advancement and growth.
We work hard, and we play hard, too! We host quarterly company-wide lunches, regular happy hours and an annual New Year's party in January as a way of saying 'thank you' to our hard-working staff.",4.5,"ASET Partners
4.5","Reston, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
185,Data Scientist,$68k-$113k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

SAIC, a leading provider of systems development &
deployment, targeting & intelligence analysis, systems engineering &
integration, and training capabilities and solutions for the Intelligence
Community, is seeking creative and dedicated professionals to fulfill their
career goals and objectives while delivering mission excellence on programs of
national importance. Join our team today as we Redefine Ingenuity!

The Sponsor manages a large number of data scientists of
varying levels of experience, and provides them challenging and exciting
project work in a fast-paced learning environment that cultivates and promotes
their ability to deliver impactful data science products across the entire
Sponsor organization.

Responsibilities include but not limited to:
Working with cross-functional
teams with data at all stages of the analysis lifecycle to derive
actionable insight.
Translates mission needs
into an end-to-end analytical approach to achieve results.
Performs the pre-analytics
areas of data collection and understanding, data cleansing and
integration, and data storage and retrieval.
Determines the appropriate
analytics based on the data and the desired outcomes, using techniques
including feature detection, statistics, data mining, predictive modeling,
machine learning, natural language processing, and business intelligence.
Interprets the validity of
results and communicates the meaning of those results.
Has familiarity with data
wrangling, analytics, and visualization software and programming
languages, including analytics methods for big data.
Follows a scientific
approach to generate value from data, verifying results at each step and applies
advanced technical principles, theories, and concepts.
Participates with senior
managers to establish strategic plans and objectives and recommends/makes
decisions on administrative or project work matters and ensures effective
achievement of program, project, or organizational objectives.
Qualifications

Mandatory Requirements:
Active TS/SCI with Polygraph
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Math, Engineering, Analytics, or related field. Relevant years of experience may be substituted in lieu of a degree.
8 years professional experience with analytic methods and tools in: machine learning, artificial intelligence, data modeling, or probability and statistics.
8 years experience working with diverse data types.
8 years experience working on an Amazon Web Services infrastructure, including the C2S environment
8 years experience defining, analyzing, tracking, and reviewing requirements using JIRA
8 years experience with data science architecture/management techniques, data operations, or formal data science training.
8 years experience using Microsoft Excel for data manipulation; using formulas, look ups, pivot tables.
Demonstrated experience with AI/ML libraries including Tensorflow and Pandas
Demonstrated experience with MySQL, AWS RDS, AWS S3, and Mongo
Optional Requirements
Demonstrated experience translating complex, technical findings into a narrative (i.e. tell a story with the data) in graphical, verbal, or written form.",3.9,"SAIC
3.9","Herndon, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,2013,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
186,Data Scientist,$119k-$192k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Datadog:

We're on a mission to build the best platform in the world for engineers to understand and scale their systems, applications, and teams. We operate at high scale—trillions of data points per day—providing always-on alerting, metrics visualization, logs, and application tracing for tens of thousands of companies. Our engineering culture values pragmatism, honesty, and simplicity to solve hard problems the right way.

The team:

The Cloud Cost Optimization team works directly with the CTO and is responsible for identifying and executing on cost-saving opportunities, providing engineering teams actionable visibility into spend, and empowering finance to understand and incorporate the complexities of cloud costs.

The opportunity:

As a Data Scientist on the CloudOps team, you’ll work with and analyze usage and billing data generated from cloud applications. Datadog operates in sophisticated multi-cloud, multi-region, classical, containerized, and serverless environments, and you will be responsible to unify these disparate sources and disentangle their primary cost drivers. You will share your work directly with the highest levels of leadership at Datadog and it will have an impact on the direction of the engineering organization.

You will:

Build marginal cost models using cloud usage and cost data, and use these models to discover trends and build forecasts
Own and refine cloud provider billing data ingestion pipelines
Develop new ways to understand the relationship between cloud resource consumption in complex containerized environments and business drivers
Think deeply about what data and actionable views to surface from CxO down to individual engineers deploying new projects
Develop metrics that bring clarity too complicated environments including containers, shared resources, and bespoke cost variables.

Requirements:

You’ve worked with leadership to define a problem space, select questions to be answered, and created repeatable compelling reporting to “solve” stakeholder understanding
You have experience creating and maintaining data ETL pipelines using Spark, Luigi, Airflow, and other open-source technologies using programming languages like Python, Scala, SQL
You’re comfortable spending the day in notebooks (Zeppelin, Jupyter, Observable, etc) and have frequently used notebooks to share findings and create insight for yourself and others
You enjoy getting to the bottom of arcane data sets; and creating logic to make those same datasets understandable to the masses
You’re comfortable with ambiguity in the early stages of a project; and appreciate the work needed to determine the how in reaching an objective
You’re familiar with cloud infrastructure; and what an engineers may consider when deciding on a serverless solution, or a particular cloud server.
You have a BS/MS/PhD in a scientific/quantitative field or equivalent experience

Bonus points:

Have previously worked with cloud provider billing data
Interested in business outcomes, high impact projects that have a tangible result on business metrics. You’ve worked on these projects in the past and are eager for more.
You’ve faced a tradeoff between increasing infrastructure cost or increasing the cost to team time. You’ve been woken up by infrastructure alarms.
You hold some strong opinions on the features in AWS Cost Explorer, the GCP billing console, or Azure Cost Management + Billing",4.2,"DataDog
4.2","New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2010,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
187,Data Scientist,$91k-$146k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

Thomson Reuters Special Services, LLC delivers a comprehensive suite of solutions designed to help customers achieve mission objectives, address uncertainty, and identify and manage risk. We leverage Thomson Reuters market-leading solutions to help our clients perform intelligence collection and analysis of a range of security, regulatory and compliance issues e.g., cyber security, threat finance, insider threat detection, and risk management.

The Data Scientist will be responsible for managing, understanding and analyzing in-house and customer data including text mining, developing predictive systems, risk scoring, creating efficient algorithms, data quality improvement and other related activities. This individual will work closely with the TRSS Analysts and government partners to drive, identify, evaluate, design and implement statistical analyses of gathered open source, proprietary, and customer data to create analytic metrics and tools to support TRSS analysts, customers and existing product offerings.

Successful candidates will have the opportunity to contribute directly to the features and capabilities deployed in our applications. They will work with customers to assist in gathering requirements and contributing to Statements of Work (SOWs) for new sales or POCs and executing design post sale while getting deeply involved into the delivery of the proposed solutions. The role will interface with the customer and provide continuity of technical and data-exploration expertise to ensure we are delivering a workable solution that meets the customer requirements and technical capabilities. The position requires a proactive, mission-oriented person who strives to produce the best possible work for the customer.

Key Responsibilities and Duties:
Work with interdisciplinary engineering and research teams on designing, building and deploying data analysis systems for large data sets.
Work closely with customers to apply data science to their mission specific content.
Create algorithms to extract information from large data sets.
Establish scalable, efficient, automated processes for model development, model validation, model implementation and large-scale data analysis.
Develop metrics and prototypes that can be used to drive business decisions.
Provide thought-leadership and dependable execution on diverse projects.
Identify emergent trends and opportunities for future client growth and development.
Researches and identifies Artificial Intelligence (AI) methods including Machine Learning (ML) and Natural Language Processing (NLP) methods
Identifies new applications of AI in the context of Thomson Reuters and TRSS content sets
Explores existing data for insights and recommends additional sources of data for improvement
Qualifications:
Must have or be able to acquire and maintain a US Government Security Clearance current or recent active clearances (Secret/TopSecret) or BI investigations are highly preferred.
Excellent programming skills in one major programming language (Java/Python/R/Scala)
Must be creative, intellectually curious, and willing to experiment and work in dynamic organizations and situations, sometimes with little oversight or well-defined requirements.
Must take ownership for defined areas of accountability, most critically the integrity of the technical and data design in terms of meeting customer needs, design delivery and supportability
A good understanding of distributed computing concepts
Experience with database, workflow and orchestration frameworks preferred (e.g. SQL, Kafka; NiFi, Docker, Kubernetes, etc.)
Big Data analytics experience preferred
Strong background in engineering, process data management, or service management in a medium size complex technology environment.
Previous experience with data modeling for graphs.
Experience in complex analysis of processes and tools
Experience facilitating gathering input from subject matter experts.
Excellent understanding of ML, NLP and statistical methodologies
Ability to test ideas and adapt methods quickly end to end from data extraction to implementation and validation
Experience with search engines, classification algorithms, recommendation systems and relevance evaluation methodologies a plus
Experience leading project work focused on a specific process area.
Strong planning, time management and organizational skills
Good team player / self-starter with the ability to work using own initiative.
Do you want to be part of a team helping re-invent the way knowledge professionals work? How about a team that works every day to create a more transparent, just and inclusive future? At Thomson Reuters, weve been doing just that for almost 160 years. Our industry-leading products and services include highly specialized information-enabled software and tools for legal, tax, accounting and compliance professionals combined with the worlds most global news services Reuters. We help these professionals do their jobs better, creating more time for them to focus on the things that matter most: advising, advocating, negotiating, governing and informing.

We are powered by the talents of 25,000 employees across more than 75 countries, where everyone has a chance to contribute and grow professionally in flexible work environments that celebrate diversity and inclusion. At a time when objectivity, accuracy, fairness and transparency are under attack, we consider it our duty to pursue them. Sound exciting? Join us and help shape the industries that move society forward.

Accessibility

As a global business, we rely on diversity of culture and thought to deliver on our goals. To ensure we can do that, we seek talented, qualified employees in all our operations around the world regardless of race, color, sex/gender, including pregnancy, gender identity and expression, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, disability, age, marital status, citizen status, veteran status, or any other protected classification under applicable law. Thomson Reuters is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer providing a drug-free workplace.

We also make reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities and for sincerely held religious beliefs in accordance with applicable law.

More information about Thomson Reuters can be found on thomsonreuters.com.

Locations
McLean-Virginia-United States of America",4.1,"Thomson Reuters
4.1","McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,2008,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
188,Search Science Data Scientist,$103k-$168k (Glassdoor Est.),"Looking to make an impact on the future of global commerce? Do you want to shape how millions of people buy, sell, and engage around the world? The Search Query Understanding team is the biggest contributor to eBay’s search/query processing and drives a significant portion of revenue. We are growing at a rapid pace and committed to building a stellar team. We are a team where people who think and do things differently and win are rewarded and grow. Our team is results-oriented and hardworking. We are building solutions for core e-commerce search problems such as query rewriting, query annotation/classification, query recovery with state-of-the-art ML algorithms tailored to understand large-scale user behavioral signals. The environment is friendly and fun. We get things done that make a difference. We are looking for stellar applied researchers to join us and build the next generation of query understanding products in eBay search. If you enjoy the scale and technical complexity of query processing (understanding query intent, entity resolution and tagging, categorization, intelligent query rewrites and clustering, application of knowledge graph, to name a few) and want to be at the frontier of applied research in e-commerce, join now. Help us redefine query understanding at eBay. Job Responsibilities Seek scientifically valid solutions that deliver real value to eBay customers Build machine learning models and data pipelines to deliver insightful yet practical solutions Work with multiple teams to help promote standard scientific methodologies and processes in your field Present key technical and novel research work in public forums and conferences Basic Qualifications MS or PhD in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, or equivalent PhD or 1-3 years (with MS) of industrial experience in a related field Experience with one or more of the following: classification, regression, NLP, GBM, recommendation systems, clustering, fraud detection, DeepLearning/Neural Networks, or related Experience in big data processing, e.g. Hadoop, SQL, Spark Experience with Python or R, and Java or Scala or C/C++ (Optional) Related publications in quality conferences or journals This website uses cookies to enhance your experience. By continuing to browse the site, you agree to our use of cookies View our privacy policy View our accessibility info eBay Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, and disability, or other legally protected status. If you are unable to submit an application because of incompatible assistive technology or a disability, please contact us at talent@ebay.com. We will make every effort to respond to your request for disability assistance as soon as possible. For more information see: EEO is the Law Poster EEO is the Law Poster Supplement",3.8,"eBay Inc.
3.8","San Jose, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1995,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
189,Data Scientist,$83k-$138k (Glassdoor Est.),"Basic Job Information

Joborder Id : 987656415
Title : Data Scientist
Location : Marysville, OH
Position Type : Contract
No of Opening : 1

Job Description

Hello,

I am Harry from Sysmind. I have a below urgent requirement. Please have a look-

Title - Data Scientist

Location - Marysville, Ohio

Duration: 6 month

Job Description & Project overview.

Machine Learning/Data Science with Python(Scikit KLearn, keras etc) and R

Data Engineer with Data Architect background

Understanding of different Visualization tools (Tablue, R-Shyny etc)

Must Have:
8+ years of experience in Analytics and Data Science
Experience with data science toolkits, such as R/Python Programming – (Scikit KLearn, keras etc)
Vizualization tools like – Tableau / R shiny / Py charm
SQL know how
A Thorough Command on Statistics & Analytical Applications in Mfg domain – but not compulsory
Ability to Time Frame Business Issues to Deliver Analytics Solutions
Very Good Understanding of Analytical Processes and SOP’s and its interconnectivity + Product Perspective to Deployment of Models.
Excellent knowledge of the data validation, data preparation, data visualization for the analytical models
Must have Delivery Experience.
Soft Skills:

Excellent written and verbal communication skills and ability to work in a team
Outstanding analytical and problem-solving skills
Excellent client presentation",4.1,"SysMind
4.1","Marysville, OH",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
190,Data Scientist,$70k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Date: Oct 23, 2020

Location: Fayetteville, NC, US, 28303

Company: HII's TSD

Huntington Ingalls Industries is America’s largest military shipbuilding company and a provider of professional services to partners in government and industry. For more than a century, HII’s Newport News and Ingalls shipbuilding divisions in Virginia and Mississippi have built more ships in more ship classes than any other U.S. naval shipbuilder. HII’s Technical Solutions division provides a wide range of professional services through its Fleet Support, Mission Driven Innovative Solutions, Nuclear & Environmental, and Oil & Gas groups. Headquartered in Newport News, Virginia, HII employs more than 42,000 people operating both domestically and internationally.

Job Description
HII-Technical Solutions Division (HII-TSD) is currently seeking a Data Scientist for our Fort Bragg location.

This position provides the United States Special Operations Command (USSOCOM) complete, cross-cutting solutions to effectively integrate and optimize the various and disparate sources, methods, technologies to effectively translate and integrate academic research and commercial best practices into sustainable analytic workflows. These increased capabilities will lead to more efficient and effective search and discovery; meaningful exploitation and analysis; and ability to rapidly integrate and effectively leverage new sources, methods and technology that account for non- technical end users; in support of informed resource allocation and optimization, actionable insight, and meaningful anticipation and influence.
Essential Job Responsibilities
Collects, analyzes and interprets numerical data from various sources such as surveys, experiments, and studies.
Compiles reports, charts, and tables based on established statistical methods.
Plans methods to collect information and develop questionnaire techniques according to survey design.
Conducts surveys, evaluates reliability of source information, adjusts and weighs raw data, analyzes and interprets statistics and organizes results.
Prepares conclusions and predictions based on data summaries.
Other duties may be assigned as necessary.
Minimum Qualifications
15 years relevant experience with Bachelors in related field; 13 years relevant experience with Masters in related field; 10 years relevant experience with PhD or Juris Doctorate in related field; or High School Diploma or equivalent and 19 years relevant experience.
Minimum of 15 - years’ experience in scientific research with acumen towards law enforcement, military science and advanced targeting using proven market analytics. Proof of experience must be through documented or published work that includes peer review journals.
Experience implementing machine learning, data mining, and statistical algorithms for pattern recognition and the development of predictive models in required. Shall possess strong oral and written communication skills and be capable of effectively directing subordinates.
Clearance: Must possess and maintain a TS/SCI clearance

Preferred Requirements
Minimum of 20 - years’ experience in scientific research with acumen towards law enforcement, military science and advanced targeting using proven market analytics
Doctorate/PhD in human behavior or social science research and an expertise in implementing computational modeling, visualization of human behavior, statistics, applied mathematics, computer science and data analytics.
Strong understanding of utilizing geospatial data for predictive analysis.
Background in image science, imagery exploitation, spatial analysis and computer vision.
Experience with a wide range of databases is strongly desired.

Huntington Ingalls Industries is an Equal Opportunity/Vets and Disabled Employer. U.S. Citizenship may be required for certain positions.

Nearest Major Market: Fayetteville",3.6,"Huntington Ingalls Industries Inc.
3.6","Fayetteville, NC",-1,10000+ Employees,2011,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
191,Data Scientist,$77k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"LOCATION 4287 Route 130 S Edgewater Park NJ US 08010

Overview

The BI Developer II will be responsible for developing solutions for a mature Retail Merchandising/Business Intelligence platform. The right candidate will have a strong database background, data mining and statistical analysis. Prior Retail experience is a plus. Must have the ability to contribute in all phases of the Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC) including gathering requirements, providing programming support, preparing functional and technical documentation, testing, user acceptance and rollout. Must have strong interpersonal and relationship building skills & strong written and verbal communication skills.

Burlington is committed to being an employer of choice. We offer a competitive wage and benefit package including a generous paid time off plan, a company matched 401(k) and an associate discount. Our associates make a difference in the lives of customers, colleagues, and our communities through various social responsibility initiatives. As a growing company, we offer a variety of professional development and career growth opportunities.

Responsibilities:
Develop ETL programs using SQL, Store Procedures, Shell scripts and Perl in a Linux environment.
Architect highly scalable and high performing technology solutions for a large BI platform.
Suggest and develop alternative approaches to resolving problems.
Create appropriate documentation in work assignments such as program code, and technical documentation.
Develop test plans to verify logic of new or modified programs.
Assist in resolving production support problems and help meet pre-defined SLAs for system availability.
Work collaboratively with other team members to foster an environment of respect, open communication and cross functional expertise.
Research and develop statistical learning models for data analysis
Keep up-to-date with latest technology trends
Communicate results and ideas to key decision makers
Implement new statistical or other mathematical methodologies as needed for specific models or analysis
Optimize joint development efforts through appropriate database use and project design
Requirements:
Bachelor's Degree or higher
5+ years Information Technology experience
5+ years practical experience with SAS, ETL, data processing, database programming and data analytics
4+ years of Oracle SQL, Oracle PL/SQL
4+ years of Shell Scripting
4+ years of Java/Python
4+ years extensive background in data mining and statistical analysis
Able to understand various data structures and common methods in data transformation
Excellent pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
Working knowledge with Analytical tools like MicroStrategy
Today's Date 10/15/2020

Posting Number 2020-134406

Location US-NJ-Edgewater Park

Address 4287 Route 130 S

Zip Code 08010

Position Type Regular Full-Time

Career Site Category Corporate

Position Category Information Technology

Evergreen Yes",3.1,"Burlington Stores
3.1","Edgewater Park, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,1972,Company - Public,"Department, Clothing, & Shoe Stores",Retail,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
192,DATA SCIENTIST,$77k-$129k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

Who are we? Watch to find out!

Koch Minerals & Trading is looking for a Data Scientist to join our Data Science Team in Houston, TX. The Data Science Team at KM&T partners with trading groups to find practical applications for machine learning and other specialized technologies that contribute to our profitability. The Data Scientist will be responsible for leveraging large, complex datasets to gain an objective view of commodities markets. They will evaluate and develop trading strategies based on their insights and inform the development of analytical systems that streamline the process of generating ideas. Further, they will experiment with new techniques and datasets to expand the capabilities of the Data Science team.

[CL1]

Working on the Data Science Team at KM&T provides individuals many opportunities to own multiple projects simultaneously in a dynamic and fast-paced global trading environment.

The successful candidate must have the following attributes:

·Expert on working with time series data within the commodities trading space

·Solid understanding of analytics and applied statistics[SN2]

·High sense of urgency

·Interpersonal skills to work directly with traders and analysts

·Exceptional oral and written communication skills

·Great team player

·Ability to work independently and remain highly motivated and self-directed

A Day In The Life Typically Includes:

Work closely with analysts, traders, developers, and other data scientists to develop powerful analysis, models, and analytical solutions
Identify and collect relevant datasets along with Analysts and Developers
Design and upkeep explanatory data models
Design and evaluate trading strategies
Produce predictive models and maintain forecast datasets
Promote a culture of experimentation that challenges conventional financial modelling

What You Will Need:

Basic Qualifications:

2+ years’ experience working with financial time series and advanced statistics
Expert analytical programming skills in Python
Expert in visualization tools such as Tableau, Plotly, Power BI, etc.
Expert in numpy, scipy, pandas, matplotlib, seaborn, scikit-learn, keras/TensorFlow, statsmodels
Experience developing machine learning pipelines in cloud platforms (AWS, Azure, Google Cloud)
Experience in designing experiments and conducting independent research[SN3]

·Master’s degree in Data Science, Business Analytics, Statistics, Financial Engineering, or related field from an accredited institution

What Will Put You Ahead?

Preferred Qualifications:

5+ years experience in a commodities trading environment
Experience with distributed computing, system design, and web development
Experience with Scrum/Agile/Kanban
Experience with source control
Deep knowledge of AWS
Exposure to NoSQL technologies

Want to learn more about Koch Minerals & Trading?

Koch Minerals & Trading, with offices in Houston, Geneva, London, Singapore, etc. is a global commodity trading company participating in nearly all commodity markets but focusing in petroleum and energy.

Salary and benefits commensurate with experience.

We are an equal opportunity employer. Minority/Female/Disabled/Veteran
Except where prohibited by state law, all offers of employment are conditioned upon successfully passing a drug test.

This employer uses E-Verify. Please visit the following website for additional information: www.kochcareers.com/doc/Everify.pdf

Follow us

[CL1]With the detail in the rest of the intro, I feel comfortable removing this.

[SN2]Solid understanding of analytics and applied statistics

[SN3]Added this point to emphasize that person can create new trading frameworks",3.8,"Koch Supply and Trading
3.8","Houston, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1940,Company - Private,Oil & Gas Exploration & Production,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$10+ billion (USD),-1
193,Senior Data Scientist,$129k-$204k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are looking for a Data Scientist who will be responsible for shaping our company’s data strategy innovating the $85B digital and linear television advertising market. You are passionate about all things data and tech, and have extensive knowledge of the digital space. You are accomplished in the areas of creating new analysis and deriving business-changing insights and you are ready to support the strategic objectives of a highly cross-functional organization.

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Your work will have an outsized impact on tools we’re building, forecasting, planning, allocation, and audience behavior prediction
Work with Pb-scale data sets representing the total US video and TV audiences
You will build new, and support scaling out existing models in support of audience segmentation
You will be working with the data-engineering team to product ML pipelines and coordinating data models with other engineering teams
Building Data Models and managing machine learning pipelines
QUALIFICATIONS:
Managing ML pipelines with tools such as Python, Julia, and Apache Spark
SQL fluency and an understanding of relational data models
Comfortable in the Linux environment
A master of all trades mentality and an ability to embrace new challenges regularly
Eager and energized to work with some of the latest open source technologies
Able to work on-site in Los Angeles, CA
PhD in Data Science, Physics, Mathematics or other scientific field
PERKS:
Unlimited paid time off each year
Annual vacation stipend
Onsite gym, fitness classes and personal trainer
Casual dress code
Kitchen stocked with healthy snack snacks
Health, dental and vision benefits
Parental leave
Epic growth
ABOUT

At VideoAmp, we believe in challenging advertising paradigms to maximize value for clients. We do this by enabling companies to execute on business outcomes across their media investment instead of more traditional media metrics. VideoAmp is the software and data solutions company powering the convergence of the linear TV and digital video advertising. Our solutions connect linear TV viewership with addressable data assets to benefit the marketing and media industries. This enable marketers and content owners to holistically plan, transact, and measure deduplicated audiences across digital video, OTT, connected and linear TV advertising.

Come and join us!",3.6,"VideoAmp
3.6","Los Angeles, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
194,Data Scientist,$115k-$183k (Glassdoor Est.),"Posted: Oct 9, 2020
Weekly Hours: 40
Role Number:
200197391
At Apple, new ideas have a way of becoming great products, services, and customer experiences very quickly. Bring passion and dedication to your job and there's no telling what you could accomplish.

Marcom is Apple’s Global Marketing Communications group. We oversee all of Apple’s advertising and marketing to ensure the flawless development and execution of world-class communications.

Do you love problem solving and thinking beyond an obvious solution? Do you thrive in ambiguity and teams where little direction should fuel your creativity? We are looking for a Data Scientist to lead Analytics & Optimizations on the Marcom Analytics Team. We are looking for a self-starter with web analytics and marketing science experience with a wide range of technical skills.
Key Qualifications
Strong communicator with excellent verbal and written presentation skills - able to evangelize data informed decision-making at all levels.
5+years of experience developing analytical dashboards, measuring impact of online site changes and its impact on traffic, engagement and revenue.
In-depth knowledge of digital analytics data, measurement, methodologies and industry standards.
Strong sense of design and presentations skills
Self-starter can take a project from start to finish with minimal supervision
Flexibility to deal with rapidly changing, time-constrained launch schedules.
Able to balance multiple projects and assignments.
Highly detail-oriented, organized, and patient.
Strong working knowledge of SQL, Teradata preferred
Expertise in Tableau and similar Data Visualization tools
Strong working knowledge of process automation using a scripting language
Solid understanding of fundamental statistical concepts and measurement methodologies
Experience in working across different global cultures a plus.
Description
Apple Marcom is seeking a Data Scientist to design, engineer, develop analytical dashboards and solutions that have direct and measurable impact to www.apple.com as well as Apple’s digital media and social media campaigns.

This person will be a member of the Marcom Analytics Team and be responsible for providing critical analysis/ insights to help inform and optimize digital strategy for Apple's digital communication. The person hired for this role will be responsible for creation and delivery of ad hoc analyses, user dashboards and other self-serve analytics resources for the worldwide teams.

The right candidate will need to have an understanding of digital analytics, as well as creative best practices for campaign effectiveness and content nuances by platform (online, video, social, paid search, in app, etc) in order to help drive strategy and measure success.

To be successful in this position candidate should be a self-starter, driven, accountable and passionate about data. Most importantly, be curious, ready to learn and evolve and able to develop strategic partnerships across both the Data Science and many business stakeholders across Apple.
Education & Experience
BS or equivalent Degree - Marketing, Finance, Business Analytics, or related fields. Master’s degree in Business Administration or Marketing Science is desirable.",4.2,"Apple
4.2","Santa Clara, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
195,Data Scientist - Deep Learning,$117k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist - Deep Learning

Verb Surgical - a Google and Johnson & Johnson joint venture!

Verb is looking for a Data Scientist with experience applying Deep Learning Methods to real world problems. In this position you will be analyzing surgical video and robotic kinematic data to help improve the performance of surgeons. You will interface directly with surgeons to better understand their needs and where machine intelligence can help improve their surgical experience and expedite their learning and improvement. You will use these insights to build both deep learning and traditional models that will build the new generation of digital surgery.

Qualifications:

Strong experience designing quantitative modeling experiments to solve fuzzy real world problems.
Good communication skills to clearly understand the problems of experts outside your field as well as collaborate with other data scientists.
Deep understanding deep learning models and methods allow you to design and redesign models to solve new applications.
Strong experimental design that will allow you to verify the utility of models in practice.
Passion for research and curiosity that calls you to go beyond good enough to create something innovative and exciting.
Experience Required:

Masters in a quantitative field such as computer science, electrical engineering, statistics, biostatistics, applied math, etc. PhD preferred
3+ years working in data science/ deep learning is required.
Experience with deep learning libraries (pytorch, tensorflow, keras, etc.) as well as statistical modeling software (scikit-learn, statsmodels, python or R)
Experience directly interfacing with customers, particularly medical professionals.
Experience turning research projects into consumer products
Ability to write beautiful, production ready code.
Physical Demands: No physical demands required.
Who is Verb Surgical?
Verb Surgical is shaping the future of surgery. A new future, a future unimagined even a few years ago, which will involve machine learning, robotic surgery, instrumentation, advanced visualization, and data analytics. A future of surgery that aims to achieve improved patient outcomes, lower costs, and greater hospital efficiency.

Verb Surgical was founded with technology, expertise, and funding from Verily (formerly Google Life Sciences) and Ethicon, a medical device company in the Johnson & Johnson family of companies. This company will continue in strong partnership with Verily and Johnson & Johnson (Google and Johnson & Johnson Team for Robotic Surgery) to advance the surgical tools and capabilities available to surgeons and OR professionals today.",3.5,"Verb Surgical
3.5","Mountain View, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
196,Data Scientist,-1,"Job Responsibilities

Need someone with great forecasting skills
Need someone who can predict a value in the future that’s not 0 or 1
Demand forecasting
(Find someone out of the financial sector) – stock market, hedge fund, procurement, supply chain
Dimensionality reduction (what have you done in reducing dimensions?)
What have you done beyond ‘PCA’ principal component analysis?
Once we identify a candidate that has done more than PCA – we are cooking!

Month to Month Outlook:

Will works with hundreds and thousands of rows of data
Team Size is large (will be a lot of analysts and scientists and their duties are split up) This data scientist will:
Work on problem type with a consultant
Come up with Target variable – Time frame
Set problems up correctly – Predict skews
Work with analysts on algorithmic assets
Complete algorithmic assets – Goal is hand off to analysts once completed for future use, etc.

Top 3 Technologies/Skills per HM:

Strong data science background + machine learning
Strong experience with scikit-learn (library for machine learning) – need to be fluent in algorithms
Experience with neural networks + developing in Python
2-3 years working experience with industrial business projects applying algorithms
Building projects from ground up
Driving process from technical POV
Explain solutions + understand business process vs data problems

Years’ experience/Degree requirements/ Certifications: 2/3 years’ experience. MS is strong preferred. Will take bachelor’s Degree if candidates are rock-stars in the above skills section.

Experience & Education Required

Work with product managers and clients to better understand the business problem
Think through a business problem and come up with a set of hypotheses
Create a list of potentially relevant supporting data elements
Work with data engineers and/or data analysts to procure data and test it for problems
Collaborate with other Data Scientists
Propose modeling approaches
Mine the data to check completeness, value distributions, etc.
Increment data: data imputation and feature engineering
Test data for signal
Run feature selection
Tune the model
Set up tests for the model health
Collaborate with product managers to find the best way to present the results

Work with developers on productionizing models-A minimum of 3 years of post-academic experience developing advanced analytics and applying data science in a business environment
Experience in data mining techniques and methodologies (data prep/modeling, classification, regression, clustering, causal modeling, AI, machine learning, ensemble approaches)
Experience developing in Python within a production environment
Advanced experience in data visualization tools with a strong grasp of effective data modeling and visualization practices
The ability to rapidly develop proof of concepts and test new ideas, as well as the ability to scale these ideas into production ready models that can be deployed within our organization
Examples of how your passion for data driven decision making and intellectual curiosity translated in to value for your organization",4.8,"Colsh Consultants
4.8","Chicago, IL",-1,Unknown,2005,Unknown,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
197,Data Scientist,$92k-$151k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


At Texas Capital Bank, we are driven by a single-minded and unwavering mission: to serve business and the individuals who run them. We use a consultative approach and innovative technologies to develop new ideas that give the bank and our clients a competitive advantage. We partner with our customers to push the boundaries of what’s possible—together.

Headquartered in Dallas, Texas Capital Bank has offices in Austin, Fort Worth, Houston, Richardson, Plano and San Antonio, and we serve clients in a variety of industries from coast-to-coast.

We are on the Forbes Best Banks in America list, and were named a top place to work by The Dallas Morning News, Houston Chronicle and San Antonio Express-News. For further information, please visit us at www.texascapitalbank.com.

The FCC team is responsible for identifying, investigating and monitoring relationships that pose a money laundering or terrorist financing risk in support of all legal and regulatory requirements relating to anti-money laundering (AML) and counter terrorism financing. As part of the FCC’s technology team, you will be responsible for developing and enhancing models while creating reports and performing ongoing analysis to support FCC’s transaction monitoring, customer due diligence and sanction screening programs. An ideal candidate will have quantitative or technical background with modeling experience, and an ability to communicate and collaborate well with FCC teams, and our partners in other business units, to effectively execute tasks.

Responsibilities
Develop and tune models for transaction monitoring, sanctions filtering, and customer risk rating.
Complete pre-implementation requirements including model methodology documentation and impact analysis per FCC’s model governance documentation.
Create effective management reporting and support ad hoc analytics requests relating to transaction monitoring, sanctions filtering and customer risk rating systems
Use data analytics, machine learning, and/or process automation to improve the efficiency and/or effectiveness of FCC’s transaction monitoring system.
Develop dashboards to enhance analysis and reporting related to workload, system performance, and tuning/validation processes.
Multi-task across several ongoing projects and daily duties of varying priorities as required
Ability to make good judgments, decisions, negotiate and problem solve
Ensures standards and best practices used in development are followed and maintained
Qualifications
2+ years of experience in analytical field
2+ years of experience in SQL
Experience with Tableau
Development experience in a scripting language e.g. Python, Perl, etc.
Experience using statistical tools (e.g. R, SAS)
Knowledge of quantitative research and data science techniques
Strong data interpretation, data visualization and presentation skills required
Strong verbal and written communication skills required
Strong problem solving and analytical skills required
Strong organizational skills and ability to prioritize tasks with little supervision
Experience working in a team-oriented, collaborative environment with good interpersonal skills
Proactive with a positive attitude
Degree in Computer Science, Math, Physics, Engineering, Statistics, Data Science, Economics or other technical field preferred
Previous Actimize model development and tuning experience preferred
Previous Banking/ Financial Services experience preferred",4.0,"Texas Capital Bancshares
4.0","Richardson, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1998,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
198,Data Scientist I,$76k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"DAT Solutions is looking for a Data Scientist to join our fantastic Product Management team.

This is a 100% remote position.

This is your opportunity to bring everything you’ve learned about developing statistical and machine learning models to a team that is defining the future of supply chain analytics.

You’ll be part of a company that is transforming an industry, and you’ll use your expertise to solve business problems in the SaaS space, and to create new ways forward.

Candidate Profile
Skilled in applying the latest and most relevant data modeling tools.
Experience developing compelling, relevant solutions that deliver greater value to customers.
Ability to partner with team members in Product, Data Science, and Engineering.
Strong desire to understand the transportation markets and its influencers.
Strong programming skills, and ability to analyze large datasets and perform statistical analysis.
Highly developed qualitative analysis skills to develop complex models.
What You’ll Do
Develop statistical and machine learning models in R and Python.
Conduct relevant research and data analysis; create reports for internal clients.
Deliver quantitative analysis of structured, semi-structured, and unstructured data.
Work within small teams to develop, test, and harden advanced analytical models.
The Skills and Experience You’ll Need
Advanced statistics, machine learning, and NLP knowledge.
Product analytics experience.
Data visualization experience using Tableau and Power BI.
Operations research and optimization knowledge.
Process management experience; proven ability to effect process change.
Skilled in developing algorithms using R, Python, and Java on ML platforms such as Spark and H20.
Bachelor’s degree required; advanced degree in Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, or other technical disciplines
Master’s Degree or higher strongly preferred.
About DAT

DAT Solutions is a next-generation SaaS technology company that has been at the leading edge of innovation in trucking, freight, and transportation supply chain logistics for 42 years. We wrote the book on freight automation, and continue to transform the industry year over year by deploying a suite of software solutions to millions of customers every day - customers who depend on DAT for the deepest, broadest, most relevant data, and accurate insights, to help them make intelligent business decisions and successfully run their companies. We operate the largest truckload freight marketplace in North America, with 183 million freight matches in 2019, and a database of $118 billion of global shipment annual market transaction data. DAT Solutions is based in Beaverton, OR, with offices in Colorado, Missouri, Texas, and Bangalore, India.

For additional information, seewww.DAT.com/company

DAT Solutions embraces the value of a diverse workforce, and believes it is a core strength of our company that we encourage those values in every DAT employee, at every level of our organization, regardless of tenure or rank. We provide equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, disability, genetic information, marital status, amnesty, or status as a covered veteran in accordance with applicable federal, state, and local laws.

DAT Solutions offers competitive compensation and an excellent benefit package that includes medical, dental, and vision coverage, flexible savings accounts, 401K, Life and AD&D insurance, a comprehensive Paid Leave program, and a Tuition Reimbursement program.

Sponsorship and relocation assistance are not offered for this position.

All referrals and résumés are managed exclusively through the Human Resources Department.

DAT Solutions will not consider unsolicited résumés from vendors including search firms, fee-based referral services, and/or recruitment agencies.",3.7,"DAT Solutions
3.7","Denver, CO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1978,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
199,Data Scientist,$66k-$111k (Glassdoor Est.),"Responsibilities·
Analyze large datasets to glean actionable insights and identify emerging opportunities·
Create metrics to measure the success of products, services, and features.·
Use data mining and machine learning skills to design and develop products which drive engagement, growth, retention, and monetization.·
Develop and deploy scalable classification, regression, ranking, and optimization algorithms.·
Work with data engineers and other stakeholders in data products pipeline to enable automation of the data-driven products.·
Communicate both routine and ad-hoc data analysis results in a clear, insightful and actionable way.
Minimum Qualifications ·
BA/BS in Statistics, Computer Science, Math or other related technical fields.·
2+ years prior research, data science, or engineering experience in building and implementing recommender systems, machine learning models/algorithms, etc.·
Excellent programming skills - ability to prototype effective simple or complex algorithms and collaborate with engineering team to implement them in the production system·
Familiarity with or willingness to learn large-scale distributed computing tools (Hadoop, Hive, etc.)
Preferred Qualifications ·
PhD or MSc degrees in Statistics, Computer Science, Math or other related technical field. ·
Proficient in R or Python. ·
Familiar with or have contributed to open source machine learning tools/platforms.·
First author publications in top-tier conferences or journals.
Powered by JazzHR",4.2,"IntelliPro Group Inc.
4.2","Santa Clara, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
200,Cloud Data Engineer,$88k-$119k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who is Trace3?

Trace3 is a leading Transformative IT Authority, providing unique technology solutions and consulting services to our clients. Equipped with elite engineering and dynamic innovation, we empower IT executives and their organizations to achieve competitive advantage through a process of Integrate, Automate, Innovate.

Our culture at Trace3 embodies the spirit of a startup with the advantage of a scalable business. Employees can grow their career and have fun while doing it!

Trace3 is headquartered in Irvine, California. We employ more than 850 people all over the United States. Our major field office locations include Atlanta, Denver, Detroit, Indianapolis, Grand Rapids, Lexington, Los Angeles, Louisville, San Diego, San Francisco, and Scottsdale.

Ready to discover the possibilities that live in technology?

Come Join Us!

Street-Smart - Thriving in Dynamic Times

We are flexible and resilient in a fast-changing environment. We continuously innovate and drive constructive change while keeping a focus on the ""big picture."" We exercise sound business judgment in making high-quality decisions in a timely and cost-effective manner. We are highly creative and can dig deep within ourselves to find positive solutions to different problems.

Juice - The ""Stuff"" it takes to be a Needle Mover

We get things done and drive results. We lead without a title, empowering others through a can-do attitude. We look forward to the goal, mentally mapping out every checkpoint on the pathway to success, and visualizing what the final destination looks and feels like.

Teamwork - Humble, Hungry and Smart

We are humble individuals who understand how our job impacts the company's mission. We treat others with respect, admit mistakes, give credit where it's due and demonstrate transparency. We ""bring the weather"" by exhibiting positive leadership and solution-focused thinking. We hug people in their trials, struggles, and failures – not just their success. We appreciate the individuality of the people around us.

JOB SUMMARY:

The Data Engineer (DE) provides technical expertise primarily in the Engage and Evolve phases of Trace3's services framework. In the ""Engage"" phase, the BDE primarily delivers building and integration. The DE also may assist in delivering development and customization services in the ""Evolve"" phase. The DE is a deeply technical role in their specific discipline area(s) of expertise (Data Scientist, Programmer, Hadoop Engineer, etc.)

SUMMARY OF ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS:
Minimum 6 months of designing, building and operationalizing large scale enterprise data solutions and applications using AZURE or AWS data and analytics services in combination with custom solutions - Spark, Azure Data Lake, HDInsights, SQL DW, DocumentDB, Search, Elastic Pool etc.
Minimum 6 months of hands-on experience analyzing, rearchitecting and re-platforming on-premise data warehouses to data platforms on AZURE or AWS cloud using AZURE or AWS custom services.
Minimum 6 months of designing and building production data pipelines from ingestion to consumption within a hybrid big data architecture, using Java, Python, Scala etc.
Minimum 6 months Experience in performing detail assessments of current state data platforms and creating an appropriate transition path to AZURE or AWS cloud.
Hands-on Cloud experience with examples of solutions designed and implemented at production scale.
REQUIRED SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE:

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Technical Science or 3 years of technical architecture and build experience with large scale solutions.
Minimum 6 months of experience in architecting large-scale data solutions, performing architectural assessments, crafting architectural options and analysis, finalizing preferred solution alternative working with IT and Business stakeholders.
6 months of hands-on experience architecting, implementing operating large production Hadoop clusters on Cloud using Azure HDInsight or Amazon EMR.
6 months of hands-on experience in implementing Kafka pipelines for streaming data ingestion into Azure or AWS cloud,
6 months of hands-on experience designing and implementing data ingestion solutions using Azure Data Factory, AWS Glue or using custom approaches.
6 months of hands-on experience designing and implementing data lakes on AZURE or AWS cloud serving analytics and BI application integrations.
6 months of experience in designing and optimizing data models on AZURE or AWS cloud using data stores such as AWS Redshift, Amazon RDS, Amazon Aurora, Azure Cosmos DB, Azure SQL Data Warehouse and Azure SQL Databases/Managed Instances.
Minimum 6 months of experience introducing and operationalizing self-service data preparation tools (e.g. Trifacta, Paxata) on AZURE.
Minimum 6 months architecting and implementing metadata management on AZURE.
Architecting and implementing data governance and security for data platforms on AZURE.
Designing operations architecture and conducting performance engineering for large scale data lakes a production environment.
Craft and lead client design workshops and provide tradeoffs and recommendations towards building a solutions.
IMPORTANT ATTRIBUTES

Entrepreneurial in a team setting
Entrepreneurial: anticipates and identifies what needs to be done and takes action
Team setting: communicative, aware of potential synergies and conflicts
Energized by growing the business from the ground up
Consultative problem solving
Clearly understands clients' short- and long-term goals and obstacles and constraints even in ambiguous/vague settings
Uses these to frame the problem
Develops solutions that leverages repeatable components
Demonstrates clarity and confidence to clients by articulating issues and solutions in clients' contexts
Innovative
Continuously seeks to develop ever-better way to frame the problem and to develop solutions than those that are generally accepted
Willing and able to develop and test new hypotheses
Aware of and challenges conventional approaches within the realistic parameters of time, capabilities, and budgets
Results-oriented
Self-identifies strategies, milestones, and plans, and focused on achieving them
Resourceful and finds ways to circumvent obstacles or minimizes their impacts
The Perks:
Comprehensive medical, dental and vision plans for you and your dependents
401(k) Retirement Plan with Employer Match, 529 College Savings Plan, Health Savings Account, Life Insurance, and Long-Term Disability
Competitive Compensation
Training and development programs
Stocked kitchen with snacks and beverages
Collaborative and cool office culture
Work-life balance and generous paid time off
***To all recruitment agencies: Trace3 does not accept unsolicited agency resumes/CVs. Please do not forward resumes/CVs to our careers email addresses, Trace3 employees or any other company location. Trace3 is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes/CVs.",3.5,"Trace3
3.5","Irvine, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
201,Data Scientist,$70k-$112k (Glassdoor Est.),"Summary:

The Data Scientist functions with a high degree of autonomy and is responsible for building and optimizing data systems, creating Machine Learning models, analyzing Big Data for Toyoda Gosei (TG) North America Corporation (TGNA), and TG Americas Manufacturing Companies (AMCs).

Primary Duties and Responsibilities:

Design and select the most appropriate modeling techniques and data visualization for Big Data analysis
Perform analysis to determine functional/user, and conceptual/logical/physical design requirements for system and user interface design and functionality
Design and implement Reports and Dashboards using BI tools
Participate in projects aimed at improving prediction, driving optimization, and developing processes via advanced statistical / mathematical methods in an enterprise production environment
Maintain up-to-date algorithms and methods for Machine Learning and Analytics
Consistently engage in learning activity to stay abreast of mathematical and technical methodology as it applies to data visualization Provide expertise and support to AMCs on data quality and software process improvement (SPI)
Assist in the development of a proprietary IOT system, ensuring machine interoperability and centralized data aggregation
Collaborate with AMCs to centralize & ensure horizontal deployment (Yokoten) of data modeling knowledge/standards
Software programming on an “as-needed” basis to ensure system stability, usability, and functional requirements are met utilizing ASP.Net and C# languages
Collaborate cross functionally to ensure effective system deployment, including training, for all AMCs
Drive optimization by being actively engaged in continuous improvement efforts (kaizen)
This role requires the completion of other duties as assigned

Qualifications and Competencies:

Minimum of Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math (or other related areas) or equivalent years of relevant experience is required; Master degree preferred
Able to understand various data structures and common methods in data transformation
Experience in statistical modeling, machine learning, or data mining practice
Experience in SQL, relational databases, database concepts, dimensional modeling and database design
Experience with BI tools
Proficient in one or more programming languages such as C#, Python, .NET
Strong analytical and quantitative problem solving ability
Ability to consistently meet deadlines is required
Effective verbal, non-verbal, negotiation and written communication skills are required
Ability to sustain a high degree of professionalism in interacting with internal and external customers is required
Effective attention to detail, problem solving, analytical and organizational skills is required",3.0,"Toyoda Gosei North America Corporation
3.0","Troy, MI",-1,10000+ Employees,1949,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
202,Data Scientist,-1,"Domain Experience:

3+ years-experience in machine learning and predictive analytics

Strong knowledge of statistics and predictive methods such as SEM, multiple and logistic regression, Bayesian modeling, support vector machines, neural net training, tree induction techniques like CHAID, CART, random forest, random tree, etc.

Able to translate complexÂdataÂinto actionable insights and recommendations.

Strong understanding of the Financial Services is required.

Experience with financial models, risk models, marketing cross-sell, up-sell, retention, and customer lifetime value models preferred.

15 years plus Real world experience in monetizing models and making money (Retail or Distribution industry)

Expert in R, Vanatge etc (Sri you know our environment, some one who can coach our team)

Â

Soft Skills:

Multi-tasking and priority setting â ability to effectively manage multiple projects of varying complexity.

Ability to work independently and as part of a team.

Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal.

Technical Skills/Experience:

Experience with statistical modeling

Practical experience in preparingÂdataÂfor machine learning

Practical experience in using and designing regression, SVM, clustering, and other classification models.

Nice to have experience in optimization

Nice to have experience in Spark, Tensorflow, parallel computation

Experience with largeÂdataÂstores, both SQL and noSQL (e.g. Hadoop)

Python, R, Matlab

Node.js, Scala for services, Postgres for theÂdatabase

Kubernetes, for deployment and Devops

AWS for infrastructure, leveraging EC2, S3, SWF, CloudFront, Route53, and much more

Proven capabilities in presenting technical findings to non-technical audiences

Â

Â",4.7,"Unicom Technologies INC
4.7","Chicago, IL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
203,"Scientist, Analytical Development",$51k-$95k (Glassdoor Est.),"Novavax, Inc.(Nasdaq:NVAX) is a late-stage biotechnology company that promotes improved health globally through the discovery, development, and commercialization of innovative vaccines to prevent serious infectious diseases.Novavaxrecently initiated development of NVX-CoV2373, its vaccine candidate against SARS-CoV-2, the virus that causes COVID-19, and achieved positive Phase 1 clinical trial results. NanoFlu, its quadrivalent influenza nanoparticle vaccine, met all primary objectives in its pivotal Phase 3 clinical trial in older adults. Both vaccine candidates incorporate Novavax' proprietary saponin-based Matrix-M adjuvant in order to enhance the immune response and stimulate high levels of neutralizing antibodies.Novavaxis a leading innovator of recombinant vaccines; its proprietary recombinant technology platform combines the power and speed of genetic engineering to efficiently produce highly immunogenic nanoparticles in order to address urgent global health needs.

We are looking for a scientist with extensive experience on assay development, qualification and validation for protein nanoparticle vaccines using multiple spectrophotometric methods including Enzyme linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA), UV-Vis spectrometry and total protein analysis. Experience and knowledge with capillary electrophoresis and SDS-PAGE, high performance liquid chromatography (HPLC) techniques such as reversed phase, size exclusion, ion exchange, affinity, etc, and particle size analysis are a plus. The position requires involvement in the development and qualification/validation of assays, OOS investigations and troubleshooting, writing SOP, development report and qualification/validation report. The ideal candidate will make detailed observations, analyze data, interpret results, and exercise appropriate technical judgment in the design, execution, and interpretation of experiments under supervision of senior scientist.

Responsibilities include but are not limited to:
Develop, qualify and validate analytical assays to quantitate the content and activity of proteins in protein nanoparticle vaccines.
Write SOP's, development report and assay qualification/validation reports.
Perform in-process testing to support process development activities.
Perform tech transfer to Quality Control and other groups.
Thoroughly analyze and review data and provide summary to line manager.
Troubleshoot assays.
Maintain effective communication with other groups regarding sample testing and results.
Review in-process testing data and provide testing summary to Process Development group.
Present scientific findings and in-process testing summary at internal meetings.
Demonstrated teamwork and organizational skills.
Proven ability to influence across functions and organizations.
Minimum Requirements:
Master's degree in biological science, chemistry, analytical chemistry, or biochemistry with a minimum of 2 years in Biotechnology industry.
A thorough understanding of analytical assay development and instrumentation protein analysis is required.
Ability to critically analyze data using statistical tools and to compile technical reports.
Novavax is headquartered in Gaithersburg, Maryland with additional facilities in Uppsala, Sweden and Bohumil, Czech Republic. Novavax is traded on the Nasdaq Stock Market under the symbol NVAX and is dedicated to developing novel vaccines to address infectious disease.

Novavax offers a base salary, annual bonus, equity grants, professional career development/growth opportunities, and a comprehensive benefits package including medical, dental, vision, Rx, STD, LTD, Life, Optional Life, 401(k) plan.

Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

Novavax is an equal employment opportunity employer. Employment and advancement opportunities are available to all individuals on an at-will basis, regardless of their race, color, national origin, religion, ancestry, citizenship status, military or veteran status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, marital status, family responsibilities, pregnancy, disability, genetic information, protective hairstyle, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state, or local law.

Job Posted by ApplicantPro",3.4,"Novavax
3.4","Gaithersburg, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1987,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
204,Data Scientist,$57k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"A trusted partner at nearly three million commercial customer locations, Ecolab (ECL) is the global leader in water, hygiene and infection prevention solutions and services. With annual sales of $13 billion and more than 45,000 associates, Ecolab delivers comprehensive solutions, data-driven insights and personalized service to advance food safety, maintain clean and safe environments, optimize water and energy use, and improve operational efficiencies and sustainability for customers in the food, healthcare, hospitality and industrial markets in more than 170 countries around the world.

Ecolab’s Institutional division, serving the restaurant and hospitality market, is seeking a business focused Data Scientist to unlock the value in data assets while creating new and unique offerings for customers. As a data scientist in the Advanced Analytics organization, you will play a pivotal role in planning, executing and delivering machine learning-based projects. The bulk of the work will be in machine learning (ML) modelling, management and problem analysis, data exploration and preparation, data collection and integration, as well as operationalization. You will be a key interface between the advanced analytics team and the business unit and various other departments (such as IT). Candidates need to be very much self-driven, curious and creative.

In this role, we are looking for:

A problem-solving mindset with the ability to understand business challenges and how to apply your analytics expertise to solve them.
The unique person who can present complex mathematical solutions in a simple manner that most will understand including customers.
An individual excited by innovation and new technology and eager to finds ways to employ these innovations in practice.
A team mentality empowered by the ability to work with a diverse set of individuals.

What’s in it For You:

Opportunity to take on some of the world’s most meaningful challenges, helping customers achieve clean water, safe food, abundant energy and healthy environments.
Ability to make an impact and shape your career with a company that is passionate about growth.
Support of an organization that believes it is vital to include and engage diverse people, perspectives and ideas to achieve our best.

What you will do:

Problem Analysis and Project Management.
Inspire the organization about the business potential and strategy of artificial intelligence.
Collaborate across the business to understand IT and business constraints.
Manage data science projects and the corresponding key performance indicators (KPIs) for success.
Data Collection and Integration.
Understand new data sources and process pipelines and catalog/document them.
Acquire access to various databases and other sources systems such as SQL or graph databases.
Create data pipelines for more efficient and repeatable data science projects.
Data Exploration and Preparation.
Apply statistical analysis and visualization techniques to various data.
Generate hypotheses about the underlying mechanics of the business process.
Test hypotheses using various quantitative methods.
Display drive and curiosity to understand the business process to its core.
Network with domain experts to better understand the business mechanics that generated the data.
Machine Learning.
Apply various ML and advanced analytics techniques to perform classification or prediction tasks.
Acquire domain knowledge and integrate it into ML solutions, for example, from an understanding of financial risk, customer journey, quality prediction, sales, marketing.
Testing of ML models, such as cross-validation, A/B testing, bias and fairness.
Operationalization.
Collaborate with ML operations, data engineers, and IT to deploy ML solutions.
Follow established best practices around ML production infrastructure.
Network with internal and external partners.
Upskill yourself (through conferences, publications, courses, local academia and meetups).
Collaboration with other technical teams within the organization.
Encourage and leverage the reuse of artifacts.
Be encouraged and expected to innovate and be creative in your data analysis, problem solving and presentation of solutions.

Minimum Qualifications:

Bachelor’s Degree in Data Science, Math, Statistics, Computer Science or related field with an emphasis on analytics with 3+ years related experience, or
Master’s Degree in Data Science, Math, Statistics, Computer Science or related field with an emphasis on analytics with 1+ years of related experience
Experience working with statistics/analytics/visualization tools, preferably in the Microsoft Azure Suite.

Preferred Qualifications:

Ph.D. degree in Data Science, Math, Statistics, Computer Science or related field with an emphasis on analytics.
Experience working in Python/SQL/Jupyter.
Self-driven, curious and creative with a collaborative mindset.
Demonstrated ability to work in diverse, cross-functional teams in a dynamic business environment.
Strong communication and presentation skills.

Our Commitment to Diversity and Inclusion

At Ecolab, we believe the best teams are diverse and inclusive, and we are on a journey to create a workplace where every associate can grow and achieve their best. We are committed to fair and equal treatment of associates and applicants. We recruit, hire, promote, transfer and provide opportunities for advancement on the basis of individual qualifications and job performance. In all matters affecting employment, compensation, benefits, working conditions, and opportunities for advancement, we will not discriminate against any associate or applicant for employment because of race, religion, color, creed, national origin, citizenship status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expressions, genetic information, marital status, age, disability, or status as a covered veteran.

In addition, we are committed to furthering the principles of Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) through Affirmative Action (AA). Our goal is to fully utilize minority, female, disabled and covered veteran individuals at all levels of the workforce. Ecolab is a place where you can grow your career, own your future and impact what matters.

We will consider for employment all qualified applicants, including those with criminal histories, in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable state and local laws, including the City of Los Angeles’ Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring Ordinance and the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance.",3.7,"Ecolab
3.7","Saint Paul, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,1923,Company - Public,Chemical Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
205,Data Scientist,-1,"Who you are

The first Data Scientist at Finrise will play an imperative role in enabling patient financing for out-of-pocket healthcare expenses. You recognize that 56% of Americans with a less than ideal FICO Score need new ways to evaluate creditworthiness in efficient and holistic ways. You’re excited about tackling technical problems that most wouldn’t dare touch. Working with unstructured and nontraditional data doesn’t scare you. Data science, predictive models, and statistics are second nature. You excel in building machine learning systems, conducting foolproof analyses, and leading cross functional projects. While banks are busy evaluating 30-year-old FICO scores, created before a time of the internet and smartphones, you’re building models which will decide who to lend to in real-time. Instead of hiring hundreds of people to manually review, you’re adding new data points to ensure accurate scoring. You’re hands-on, creative, and hyper-analytical. You understand that the ultimate measurement of success is enabling patients to afford care in a time of need, with a fair rate, in terms they understand. At the end of the day, you want to change the way credit is evaluated.

What you'll be doing
Designing and developing core machine learning infrastructure
Conducting statistical analyses to assess the value of new data points and vendors
Building and deploying production risk models to improve Finrise patient underwriting
Hiring and leading a team of best-in-class data scientists
What you should already have
Background in mathematics, statistics, or engineering
Some understanding of credit and/or risk underwriting
Bachelors required; Advanced degree preferred
Strong programming ability, preferably in Python
Deep understanding of machine learning and mathematics
A scrappy team player with an ability to thrive and effectively communicate in a fast-paced, numbers focused environment
Interested? Send us an email to careers@finrise.com",5.0,"Finrise
5.0","Burlingame, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
206,Data Scientist,-1,"JOB SUMMARY

TheData Scientist plays an integral role as part of the Data Sciences team, supporting EMR queries and reporting projects.

RESPONSIBILITIES

Key Responsibilities
Understand electronic health record (EHR) and other healthcare (HC) data in order to merge disparate data and run queries across it to answer clinical and non-clinical questions
Manage and perform queries on electronic health record systems for clinical study feasibilities and patient selection for clinical studies
Model data and perform advanced analytics on EHR and other healthcare data sets, to understand impact of various factors on results, looking for trends
Manage projects that require interaction with data as well as people to create value from new data products
Develop methods in predictive analytics using HC data in clinical research
QUALIFICATIONS AND EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS

Required:
MS/PhD in Data Science, Healthcare Informatics or a related field
Electronic health record system proficiency and general familiarity with healthcare data including working knowledge of ICD9/10 codes
Proficiency in programming - Python, R (other languages, e.g., Julia a plus)
Proficiency in Tableau
Advanced Microsoft Excel skills required
Proficiency at data wrangling
Statistical knowledge a plus
Essential Skills:
Ability to act and operate independently with minimal daily direction from manager to accomplish objectives
Established interpersonal and communication skills
Aptitude to work effectively with a wide range of constituencies in a diverse community
Proficient with Microsoft Office applications, intermediate to advance knowledge required with advanced Excel required
Ability to meet assigned deadlines and manage multiple deadlines
Disciplined in work habits and programming/analysis habits
Able to function as team member, open and sharing skills and results
Experience with working within a busy and fast-paced start-up company environment
WORKING CONDITIONS

This job operates in a professional office environment and also remotely. This job will operate over Microsoft TEAMS and use other tools for remote work and communications, as well as work in an office setting, depending on the location and working conditions.

WORKING SCHEDULE

Some flexibility in hours is allowed, but the employee must be available during the“core” work hours of 9:30 a.m. to 3:30 p.m. and must work 37.5 hours each week to maintain full-time status. Occasional evening and weekend work may be required as job duties demand.

TRAVEL REQUIREMENTS

Little travel is required for this position.

The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by individuals assigned to this position. They are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel. More in-depth information can be found in SOP's, working guidelines, policies, etc.

Elligo is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity for all employees and to providing employees with a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. All employment decisions at Elligo are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to race, color, religion or belief, national, social or ethnic origin, sex (including pregnancy), age, physical, mental or sensory disability, HIV Status, sexual

orientation, gender identity and/or expression, marital, civil union or domestic partnership status, past or present military service, family medical history or genetic information, family or parental status, or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate. Elligo will not tolerate discrimination or harassment based on any of these characteristics. In addition, Elligo will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities.",3.7,"Elligo Health Research
3.7","Austin, TX",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
207,Data Scientist,-1,"Apply your communications skills working closely withbusiness partners, data scientists, data engineers and technical implementationteams across the company to establish model monitoring and reporting plans.

Help to establish a scalable monitoring and reportingcapability for the data science team and our business partners using variousprograms, libraries and visualization tools to monitor and report on a widevariety of model types
Participate in other model governance activities like datavalidation or helping with model validation activities.

Responsibilities:

· Work with Business Partners, Tech teams and department team members todefine/confirm monitoring requirements:

o Data sources

o Metrics/KPIs

· Build of system/ dashboards to monitor:

o Business metrics

o Statistical modelperformance and real time monitoring and alerting

· Review reporting results with Business Partners on a regularbasis
Provide insights based uponmonitoring results

· Owner of performance reports and related presentations.

· Partner with technical team for monitoring solution(s) and dailyoperations

· Develop monitoring libraries to streamline the monitoring process

· Determine timing for model re-fit when model performancedeteriorates
Coordinate model refit withdata scientists

· Maintain and report on statistics of model usage, errors, andexceptions.

· Participation in ad-hoc model governance activities such as datareview/validation

Requirements


Education: Masters degree

· Expert with BI tools such as Tableau, Shiny, Dash, Power BI, Qlik

· Working experience with databases and writing complex queries(SQL, Hive, Hadoop)

· Portfolio of completed BI/Reporting experience

· 2+ years in a similar role

· Some formal training in statistics and/or machine learning

· Good understanding of statistical models and machine learningconcepts, software (R, Python)

· Experience working with Data Scientists and Business Partners

· Excellent communication skills

Benefits
Remote Work Temporarily",4.1,"No Limit Technology
4.1","New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
208,Data Scientist,-1,"Department: Product and Technology

Team: Data
Location: Remote, GMT +/- 3 hours
Career level: Early to mid-career professionals

Role Description

The Data Scientist is a member of the global Product team. This position is a full-time remote role, preferably based in GMT time zone or plus or minus a couple hours to overlap the in-country team working hours as much as possible.

You will develop key components of myAgro’s technology and data platform, which will have global reach. An important responsibility of this role will be to create and define the data architecture, data pipelines, and data reporting and dashboards used by the team. This will include use of Tableau and similar for visualizations, programming with Python and libraries for pipelines and data processing, and using the principles of human-centered design to build impactful tools and ways to use our data to bring higher impact and decisions. You will also be working closely with the field operations and program teams directly, so written and verbal communication skills are critical. This position reports to the CTO.

Key responsibilities are:
Data roadmap: Own and drive the development of myAgro’s data products and tools to support scaling to 1 million farmers; deeply understand use cases, develop functional specifications, and work directly with the Product Management team in order successfully to rollout comprehensive solutions.
Data processes and standards: Oversee the data management process, providing support and training on techniques for working with data and best practices for visualizations and reporting, and create processes and standards to be used within myAgro for future team growth.
Data architecture: Working collaboratively with the team, design and build myAgro’s data systems, data pipelines, and ETL tools.
Data analytics: Uncover trends and patterns behind data, and share insights with the Program team to enhance evidence-based decision making.
Data reporting and visualization: Understand user needs, and build reports and dashboards to help users directly interact with data and gain insight into what is happening.
Support: Collaboratively troubleshoot, fix bugs and be responsive to myAgro’s ticketing platform. Solve problems quickly and communicate with related teams as needed
Required Skills & Qualifications
Proven, strong communication skills and ability to work cross culturally
Experience working with Python
Experience working with Tableau
Experience working with AWS tools (EC2, RDS, S3, IAM)
Experience working with SQL databases
Proven record of being a self-starter and delivering on projects.
A passion for the mission, vision and values of myAgro
Preferred Skills and Qualities
Familiarity with using common development tools (ticketing, version control)
Experience driving data initiatives and/or data quality programs.
French proficiency a plus but not required. The tech team primarily works in English
Ability to bring motivation, positivity and fun in the working environment
myAgro provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants without regard to race, colour, religion, sexual orientation, marital/parental status, national origin, age, disability, political opinion, social status, veteran status, and genetics. myAgro complies with all applicable federal, provincial and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment",3.4,"myAgro Farms
3.4",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Unknown,Farm Support Services,Agriculture & Forestry,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
209,Data Scientist,$107k-$176k (Glassdoor Est.),"Small Teams; Big Data

At Tapad, we look for individuals who are motivated by complex and challenging work. We want to work with people who share compelling solutions to those challenges, solutions informed by their unique experiences, passions, and expertise.

We are looking for a Data Scientist to research and develop state-of-the-art algorithms and help build models to support Tapad's mission to create the world's largest identity graph. As part of Tapad's Data Science team, you will leverage cutting edge technologies and techniques to impact our core intellectual property and commercial products. This includes, but is not limited to, machine learning, deep learning, NLP, Google Cloud AI Platform, BigQuery, TensorFlow Extended, and Kubeflow Pipelines.

Tapad Data Scientists are responsible for turning new ideas into innovative products. You will work closely with our technologists to actualize your research and solutions into concrete commercial products and services. You will also collaborate with product managers and business stakeholders to understand our customers' needs and the broader addressable market.

When you work with us, you matter. We ask our employees to make an impact and feel it is only right to give a lot in return. We offer every employee a 401k with matching, generous parental leave, and unlimited PTO (and we mean it!). We believe if you're sick, feel like you're getting sick, or just need a personal day, you should take that time to get better. We have free virtual lunches every month, free continuous education, and an open-door policy every day. We make sure our virtual office is a welcoming space full of individuals who can teach and learn from one another every day.

Technologies we use at Tapad (don't worry, we'll teach you):
Python, SQL, Scala
Spark, SparkML, SciKit Learn, AutoML, BigQuery ML, TensorFlow Extended (TFX)
Google Cloud Platform (GCP), BigQuery, Apache Airflow
We are looking for candidates who meet some of the following qualifications:
Master's degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g. Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Chemistry, etc.)
3+ years experience in applying machine learning techniques, advanced analytics, and statistics, either in an academic setting or as a data scientist
Experience working with large data sets using SQL, Spark, Hadoop, or MapReduce
Understanding of programming concepts and experience with programming languages, such as Python, R, Java, Scala, MATLAB
Strong communication skills, both verbal and written
Experience working in a large-scale, distributed system environment
Bonus Qualification & Experience:
Ph.D. in a quantitative discipline
Experience using cloud computing technologies
A day in the life as a Tapad Data Scientist:
You will use machine learning (e.g. deep learning), clustering, statistical modeling, and other advanced techniques to infer connections from petabytes of data
Employ predictive modeling, data mining, graph algorithms, and other data science techniques to contribute to and enhance our cross-device identity resolution portfolio
Design experiments and apply appropriate metrics to measure the impact of the developed models
Partner with other data scientists and engineers to turn various machine learning, clustering, and statistical solutions into viable and scalable products
Collaborate with product managers and business partners to understand market needs and to help identify new opportunities for Tapad
Tapad Perks:
Generous PTO - no accruing necessary
401k matching, Life, LTD & STD Insurance, dental, vision, and telehealth plan with 24/7 access to a dedicated team of physical and mental healthcare providers
Scala School (we'll teach you!), Coursera, LinkedIn Learning, peer-led professional development, and an abundance of resources to help you stay sharp
Unlimited snacks and beverages, collaboration catered lunches (virtual lunches until we're back in the office)
Discounts on gym memberships
Foosball, ping pong, diversity and inclusion group, book club, Tough Mudder, push-up challenges, and tons of other extra-curricular activities that will make you feel like part of the Tapad family (virtual game nights and happy hours until we're back in the office)
Check out our #TapadLife page to see what our employees have to say
Find more about our engineering culture HERE
More about Tapad:

Founded in 2010, Tapad cracked the code on cross-device marketing technology. Our groundbreaking, proprietary technology assimilates trillions of data points to find the relationship between smartphones, desktops, laptops, tablets, and connected TVs. Ten years later, we are processing data at petabyte scale, with an engineering team that comprises roughly half of our entire organization. When you work with us, you matter, and your work matters.

In combination with large-scale data processing and open-source technologies, we use Scala to build our device graph. Across our engineering teams, we also use Scala, GCP, Spark, Kubernetes, Python, TypeScript, and anything else that helps us get the job done. We're open-minded about new technologies, we're passionate about what we do, and we make time for everyone to learn and grow as the industry changes. Engineers at Tapad are approachable and ambitious people who think outside the box and solve big problems collaboratively. Are you up for the challenge?

Tapad is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and will consider all qualified applicants regardless of age, sex, race, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital or family status, disability, or any other legally protected status.

Tapad does not accept resumes from unsolicited search firms nor recruiters. In no event shall fees be paid to any unsolicited search firms nor recruiters, regardless of whether the candidate is made an offer or accepts a placement at Tapad. All resumes received through any channels will be considered the sole property of Tapad.",4.2,"Tapad
4.2","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
210,Data Scientist,$111k-$177k (Glassdoor Est.),"COMPANY OVERVIEW


Proudly Farmers First℠!

What do you get when you cross the best of Silicon Valley innovation and technology with the value driven mission of Family Farmers around the world?

Farmers Business Network, Inc. (FBN℠)!

FBN℠ was created by farmers for farmers and is on a mission to power the prosperity of Family Farmers around the world by leveling the playing field through insights, commerce and community. Our goal is to enable them to make smart business decisions that maximize their farms profit potential for generations to come, helping to ensure the fundamental economic viability and sustainability of family farms and rural communities.

We are a dynamic, and innovative AgTech company that offers competitive compensation and benefits and is backed by top investors including Google Ventures, Kleiner Perkins, DBL Partners, T Rowe Price and Temasek.

THE ROLE

How can we sustainably feed the world? With the population set to reach nine billion by 2050 and available farmland decreasing, the odds are stacked against us. This problem falls squarely on the shoulders of farmers, who are increasingly working harder for less. FBN helps farmers to solve these problems.

Farmers are often forced to make key decisions in the face of significant uncertainty about their impact. FBN applies technology and data science to this challenge. We're building the world's largest agronomic dataset - made up of billions of data points, gathered from sophisticated sensors on farm equipment. The network effect of farmers sharing their data allows us to deliver unprecedented analyses that help farmers make data-driven decisions - we're not just building new technology, we're also making new agricultural scientific discoveries.

We're looking for data scientists who are enthusiastic about applying big data to help farmers!

Data science underlies every product that we build at FBN, so you'll see your work directly translate into new products for our farmers. The data science team at FBN:
Explores one of the world's most unique, interesting, and diverse datasets.
Furthers scientific understanding about what affects agricultural production.
Uncovers insights that help farmers efficiently support a growing population.
Makes meaningful improvements in the world by translating data science into products that help farmers increase yield and efficiency.
Required Skills
Deep understanding of statistical modeling concepts.
Familiarity with machine learning algorithms.
Excellent programming skills (R or Python preferred).
Preferred: understanding of agricultural systems (soil chemistry, plant physiology, entomology, etc…).
Required Experience
MS or greater in statistics or related discipline, OR MS or greater in agronomy or related discipline with strong data analysis skills.
Farmer's Business Network, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer and participates in U.S. Citizenship and Immigration's E-Verify program.",3.4,"Farmer's Business Network, Inc.
3.4","San Carlos, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Farm Support Services,Agriculture & Forestry,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
211,Data Scientist,$80k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you want to work at the forefront of artificial intelligence and machine learning? CapaxGlobal has a significant data analytics and management presence across many industries. With that footprint comes massive amounts of data that can inform us about markets and ways to improve our client business practices. This position will be part of the Data Science and Machine Learning team and will bring strong quantitative skills to our data science capabilities. You work in a multidisciplinary team exploring, connecting and mining internal data sources and will develop data models using algorithms for pattern detection and forecasting. In this position you will be managing projects that use advanced analytics techniques, such as optimization, forecasting, machine learning, predictive analytics, and statistical analysis, to develop solutions that help deliver significant value to a variety of Capax’s partners and clients. Candidates will be exposed to a wide spectrum of high visibility projects ranging from sales effectiveness, competitive intelligence, fraud detection, time series forecasting, operational efficiency, sourcing and procurement, supply-chain optimization and financial analysis.

Location: Chicago IL | Philadelphia PA | Remote

Travel: Up to 30%

Responsibilities

Develop and code models by applying algorithms to large structured as well as unstructured data sets for our more complex projects. Develop visualization products to share analysis across a large group of business users.

Design strategies and propose algorithms to analyze and leverage data from existing as well as new data sources.

Continuously seek out industry best practices and develop skills to create new capabilities for data analytics at clients to improve business decisions.

Network with business stakeholders to develop a pipeline of data science projects aligned with business strategies. Translate complex and ambiguous business problems into project charters clearly identifying technical risks and project scope.

Participate on cross-disciplinary project team of database specialists, data scientists, and business subject-matter experts to complete project deliverables.

Qualifications

Bachelor’s degree from an accredited college/university in Computer Science, Computational Linguistics, Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering, Bioinformatics, Physics, Operations Research or related fields.

Master’s degree in data science, applied mathematics, or bioinformatics preferred.

Minimum 6 years relevant work experience (if Bachelor’s degree) or minimum 3 years relevant work experience (if Master’s degree) with a proven track record in driving value in a commercial setting using data science skills.

In-depth knowledge of various modeling algorithms e.g. Linear, GLMs, trees based models, neural networks, clustering, PCA, and time series models.

Proficiency in R (e.g. ggplot2, cluster, dplyr, caret), Python (e.g. pandas, scikit-learn, bokeh, nltk), Spark – MLlib, H20, or other statistical tools.

Minimum 2 years experience working in a data science or machine learning environment.

In-depth knowledge of databases, data modeling, Hadoop, and distributed computing frameworks.

Experience in software development environment, Agile, and code management/versioning (e.g. git).

Strong EDA skills and experience/knowledge.

Ability to understand complex and ambiguous business needs and applying the right tools and approaches.

Collaborative team player.

Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal.

Experience developing and testing machine learning and/or statistical projects.

Strong presentation skills. Ability to present statistical results to lay persons in an easy to understand way.

We are looking for all levels of data science experience, jr through sr.",4.7,"Capax Global LLC
4.7","Chicago, IL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1998,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
212,Data Scientist,-1,"Data Scientist

Job Code : PS10052B Job Type : Contract
Discipline : IT And Software Engineering Experience Req : 10+ year(s)
Company : Northwest Software, Inc. Education Req : Bachelor
Location : USA-North Carolina-Raleigh Salary Range : Not Avaliable
Job Description:
Data Scientist
Long Term
Raleigh, NC

Description:

Our client requires the supplier to provide a Data Scientist to join the Service Management Office in the form of service level management, problem resolution and management by ensuring that processes
are in place to identify root cause and anomalies of issues and corrective actions needed are tracked through resolution.

Activities will include:

• Analyze and Model Incident, Problem and Change trends to identify opportunities for service improvements
• Performs and interprets data studies and experiments concerning new data sources or new uses for existing data sources
• Develops analytics using data mining, statistical, forecasting, and modeling techniques
• Develops prototypes, proof of concepts, algorithms, predictive models, and custom analysis
• Determines new ways to improve automation through machine learning leveraging data output, aggregation, analytics, algorithms, orchestration, machine learning and visualization.
• Assists in identifying right tools for improvement to support of automation and predictive
learning external to the organization
• Provides guidance and technical support to executives, contractors and employees in other
functional areas

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS

• Experience in building large scale Machine Learning systems from scratch.
• Ability to think abstractly and deal well with ambiguous/undefined problems.
• Experience taking a leading role in defining models for complex data lakes, and making that information useful at various level, from operations to senior stakeholders.
• Strong object-oriented design and coding skills.
• Experience with distributed (multi-tiered) data processing models and algorithms.
• Ability to effectively articulate technical challenges and solutions.

Education:

Bachelor's or master’s degree in Mechanical Engineering, Mathematics, Computer Science or
related field.
Skill Requirements :
Machine Learning

The desired candidate must have experience in building large scale Machine Learning systems from scratch. Please briefly describe your related experience.
Object-oriented design and coding skills

The desired candidate must have Strong object-oriented design and coding skills.. Please briefly describe your related experience.",4.3,"Northwest Software Inc.
4.3","Raleigh, NC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1988,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
213,Data Scientist,-1,"Job Description


Job #: 1089853

Apex Systems has an immediate need for Data Scientist!! This will be FULLY REMOTE and a DIRECT HIRE.You will be supporting one of our Major government clients. No Clearance or certification are needed! Please see below for detail.

Pay: $130,000 - $140,000 (Full Benefits)

Location: Fully Remote

Needs: Expert Level with Python and Machine Learning

If you are interested in this role you will need to apply be sending your resume to Tyler at tcopley@apexsystems.com and providing the best time to reach out, thank you!

Responsibilities (NOT ALL experience is required)
Engage closely with customers to understand requirements and influence product direction
Develop and implement novel ML assessment tests, work closely with software engineering team to deploy these tests to product
Contribute to product vision
Study latest papers in around ML security and reliability.


EEO Employer

Apex Systems is an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate or allow discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, creed, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, breastfeeding, or related medical conditions), age, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, genetic information, registered domestic partner status, marital status, disability, status as a crime victim, protected veteran status, political affiliation, union membership, or any other characteristic protected by law. Apex will consider qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable law. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 844-463-6178.",3.8,"Apex Systems
3.8","Ashburn, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1995,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
214,Data Scientist,-1,"South San Francisco Bay, California Requirements: BS in Computer Science or Math or equivalent experience At least 2+ years of experience in cryptocurrency 4-7 years formulating data science research & executing projects, engineering ETL processes, building machine learning models, and evaluating fitness & confidence of results using Python, PySpark, Scala Required Skills for all Data Science Team Candidates: Solid development foundation >= 7 years developing highly usable analytics tools Highly self-directed & able to work a project from conception through delivery (e.g., from formulation, execution and evaluation of the research through to development and integration into product) Good understanding of the blockchain technical space and data structures >= 4 years analyzing relevant data structures (i.e., in tabular or network forms) Clear dedication to continuous learning Python, Jupyter, Scala, Avro, Spark, Kafka, Cassandra, Yugabyte > 2 years’ Experience in large-scale network analysis, graph database implementation at scale Perks & Benefits We offer a comprehensive benefits package, including competitive salaries, stock options for senior roles, medical, dental and vision — which cover domestic partners as well — plus life and disability coverage, 20 vacation days, and a 401K plan. If you are interested, send your resume to contact@ciphertrace.com",3.7,"CipherTrace
3.7","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
215,Data Scientist,-1,"MUST BE A U.S. CITIZEN WITH AN ACTIVE TS/SCI SECURITY CLEARANCE *
Ability to develop analytics for multiple cyber weapon systems with many different infrastructure and end-point devices. Ability to incorporate predictive, descriptive, and presumptive modeling; machine learning; artificial intelligence into analytics. Must be able to code proficiently in one or more of the following languages: Python, R, Scala, Spark, and Maven. Develop algorithms in one or more of the following Machine Learning areas: anomaly detection, one/few-shot learning, deep learning, unsupervised feature learning, ensemble methods, probabilistic graphical models, reinforcement learning. Ability to develop analytics based upon the Mitre ATT&CK Matrix or other applicable CS&D framework to discover, identify, characterize, and/or create signatures for cyberspace threat activity. Ability to assist in the development and implementation of a data analytics program. Develop robust documentation and comprehensive user manuals for all developed projects

Original Hire Document for data scientist below:

Job Responsibilities:

· Perform big data analysis on information technology infrastructure and end-point devices

· Customer outreach and engagement

· Problem solving

· Time management

· Collaborate with others

· Mission focused

· Deliver findings

· Accept and assess customer data, dashboard, requirements

· Identify new ways to visualize and analyze data

· Develop analytics to identify anomalous activity based on customer requirements

· Perform hunt operations identifying anomalous activity

· Produce reports based on misconfigurations and/or anomalous activity discovered through analysis

Knowledge/Skills Ability:

Required:

· Ability to analyze and assess software development or data acquisition requirements and determine optimum, cost-effective solutions.

· Proficiency in one or more big data programming languages, such as R, Python, Scala, or Spark and Maven.

· Experience working with a hybrid team of analysts, visualization experts, engineers, and developers to conduct research, and build and deploy complex, but easy-to-use analytical platforms.

· Previous experience performing research in Data Analytics or big data.

· Be Director of Central Intelligence Directives 6/4 eligible (Top Secret) with a current Single Scope Background Investigation (SSBI)

Minimum Experience/Education:

· At least one (1) of the following:

· Four (4) years experience in cyberspace operations

· IAT Level 1 per DoD 8140 (Net+, Sec+, etc.)

· Experience on National/Service cyber weapon system/platform within last five years

Highly Desired:

· Education/ Certifications:

· 4+ years of experience in data analytics or quantitative intelligence analysis

· Four (4) years of experience in an intelligence field at a tactical or operational level

· DoD 8570 IAT related BA/BS degree

\*BEAT LLC IS AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER - DISABILITY AND VETERANS\*

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee discount
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Data Analytics: 4 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
License:
CompTIA Security+ (Required)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.9,"B E A T LLC
4.9","San Antonio, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Telecommunications Services,Telecommunications,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
216,Data Scientist,$64k-$109k (Glassdoor Est.),"LS Technologies is seeking a Data Scientist to support the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) at the William J. Hughes Technical Center in Atlantic City, NJ. Qualified candidates will have experience with data modeling and analysis.

Responsibilities
Contributes to a cross-disciplinary team focused on:
high fidelity modeling and simulation
statistical analysis
engineering
advanced programming and computing techniques
Performs data-centric modeling, analysis, and reporting of aviation concepts
Performs experimental designs and execution
Participates in all aspects of the data science pipeline:
Procurement
Wrangling
Analysis
Communication
Maintenance
Qualifications
Bachelor's Degree in operations research, computer science, engineering, business, mathematics, information systems, or management science (or 5 years of relevant experience)
Minimum 2 years' experience in a professional environment
Required experience:
Strong statistical background
Data processing / wrangling (clustering/classification, data mining, summarization)
Exploratory and qualitative analysis (regression, clustering)
Diagnostic checking
Data reporting and documentation
Data stewardship, including cleaning/provenance/workflow/process documentation
R/Python
Apache Spark 2.0+
SQL/Relational DBs
Preferred (but not required) experience:
Data modeling
Data visualization (JS, Python, R)
Predictive analysis tools/algorithms
Cloud-Based Computing (Amazon Web Services, Google Cloud Platform, Microsoft Azure, etc.)
Hadoop
GitHub/GitLab
JMP
NoSQL / Document Stores
Object-oriented design/development and related principles
Must be able to obtain a Public Trust Clearance.

LS Technologies, LLC provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.

Job Posted by ApplicantPro",3.9,"LS Technologies, LLC
3.9","Atlantic City, NJ",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
217,Data Scientist,-1,"The Chan Zuckerberg Biohub (""CZ Biohub”) is an independent nonprofit medical research organization based in the San Francisco Bay Area. The Chan Zuckerberg Biohub supports scientific research to cure, prevent or manage disease in our children’s lifetime. Our mission is to understand the fundamental mechanisms underlying disease and to develop new technologies which will lead to actionable diagnostics and effective therapies. We harness the power and possibility of collaboration to drive discovery and set the standard for open, impactful science. For more information, please visit czbiohub.org.

Opportunity

The Data Science and Infectious Disease teams at CZ Biohub work closely with local, national, and international organizations and departments of public health to enable informed decision making using next-generation sequencing data, advanced statistical analyses and mathematical modeling. During the coronavirus pandemic, CZ Biohub has been working with UCSF to provide COVID-19 testing, sequencing samples and providing actionable information to local health departments, and enabling genomics-based surveillance in California through phylogenetics and mathematical modeling.

We are looking for a data scientist with mathematical modeling experience to join our team for predictive and analytical projects related to the COVID-19 pandemic. The role will involve working directly with public health departments to understand their needs and to provide actionable information from modeling analyses to support public health decision and policy making. In addition to working on specific public health problems, the data scientist will contribute to open-source software and workflows, develop new methods as needed, and collaborate with academic researchers on scientific projects. Strong communication skills are essential for this position in addition to technical skills.

We are open to more junior candidates who have at least a Bachelor’s degree, and relevant coursework and internship experience.

Requirements
PhD in Epidemiology, Population Genetics, Ecology and Evolution, Systems Biology, Computational Biology, Machine Learning or related disciplines;
OR Bachelor’s/Master’s in the above disciplines with relevant experience;
Working knowledge of Bayesian statistics and inference;
Experience with or relevant coursework in mathematical models used to study infectious disease transmission, ecology, mobility, networks or related areas;
2+ years of experience with Python or R;
Experience with data visualization software or packages such as ggplot2, matplotlib, d3;
Strong communication skills with both technical and non-specialist audiences.
In the cover letter, candidates should address:
Why are you interested in working on infectious disease modeling projects?
Why are you interested in working for CZ Biohub?
How does this role fit into your longer-term goals?
Preferred/Desired Qualifications
Previous experience with whole genome sequencing, mobility, or geospatial data;
Experience working with decision-makers in government and healthcare institutions;
Understanding of infectious disease and epidemiologic processes;
Experience with cloud computing, Github, or machine learning.
What We Provide
Resources to disrupt and innovate at the frontiers of our knowledge of biology and disease.
A collegial and collaborative environment consisting of diverse expertise.
Existing collaborations within CZ Biohub: Advanced Optical Microscopy, Cell Atlas, Bioengineering, Data Science, Genome Editing, and Infectious Diseases.
Access to collaborators, resources and facilities at the three partner campuses (UCSF, Berkeley and Stanford) and at partner institutions in the Bay Area and beyond.
Competitive compensation and benefits commensurate with the experience.
Benefits

We offer a robust benefits program that enables the important work Biohubbers do everyday. Our benefits include healthcare coverage, life and disability insurance, commuter subsidies, family planning services with fertility care, childcare stipend, 401(k) match, flexible time off and a generous parental leave policy. In addition, we honor our commitment to career development and our value of scholarly excellence through regular onsite opportunities to learn from the world's leading scientists.

CZ Biohub is an equal opportunity employer committed to diversity of thought, ideas and perspectives. We are committed to cultivating an inclusive organization where all Biohubbers feel inspired and know their work makes an important contribution. Therefore, we provide employment opportunities without regard to age, race, color, ancestry, national origin, religion, disability, sex, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, or any other protected status in accordance with applicable law.

Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Headhunters and recruitment agencies may not submit resumes/CVs through this Web site or directly to managers. CZ Biohub does not accept unsolicited headhunter and agency resumes. CZ Biohub will not pay fees to any third-party agency or company that does not have a signed agreement with CZ Biohub.",3.6,"Chan Zuckerberg Biohub
3.6","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Nonprofit Organization,Health Fundraising Organizations,Non-Profit,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
218,Data Scientist,-1,"TeePublic is looking for a Data Scientist to join its growing team in NYC. This individual will be a highly motivated and organized self-starter with the ability to handle multiple priorities at once. This individual will be integral in helping scale a fast-paced, rapidly growing team with a culture built on passion, hard-work, and fun.

You'll be an embedded member of the Content and Data team, working with product, data engineering, and software engineering to build machine learning algorithms and solve complex problems around search and personalization. With more than 4 billion SKUs to manage, we are a living, breathing big data challenge. We've built the foundation of our data infrastructure and done the initial analysis -- you will be the catalyst to accelerate and optimize content discovery.

You will play an integral role in facilitating the already rapid growth of TeePublic by:
Building production grade models on large-scale datasets to optimize content discovery by utilizing advanced statistical modeling, machine learning, or data mining techniques and marketing science research
Developing and maintaining machine learning infrastructure that powers our ranking and recommendation models
Using Natural Language Processing to understand content across product meta data and user searches
Applying clustering and classification techniques to identify clusters of customers based on purchase, demographics, and on-site behavior
Use models to address key growth challenges and provide meaningful insights on problems such as significance testing and A/B testing
Job Requirements
You have the technical competence to perform advanced analytics
You have coding experience, specifically wrangling (such as with Python, SQL, Java, and/or Scala) and analyzing (such as with Pandas or R) large datasets
You have worked extensively with machine learning (such as Tensorflow, Torch), natural language processing, and advanced analytics (e.g. time series, regression, neural networks, mathematical optimization)
You have built and applied clustering (such as k-means, hierarchical, and mean shift) and classification (e.g. k-nearest neighbor, logistic regression, decision tree, random forest) algorithms
This role is located in our NYC office, though we are remote for the foreseeable future.",5.0,"TeePublic
5.0","New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Media & Entertainment Retail Stores,Retail,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
219,Data Scientist,-1,"Please note, all positions at Binance require relevant experience. Applications without required experience will not be considered.

Binance is the global blockchain company behind the world’s largest digital asset exchange by trading volume and users, serving a greater mission to accelerate cryptocurrency adoption and increase the freedom of money for people around the world.

Are you looking to be a part of one of the most influential companies in the blockchain industry and contribute to the crypto-currency revolution that is changing the world?


Data driven based business is the core in helping us to use cloud native platform to serve tens of millions of crypto-currency users. Engineers and Data Scientists across the company use the data platform to do interesting and impactful analysis for continuous innovations. As a data scientist, you will have the opportunity to leverage rich data (PB-level scalability) and state-of-art machine learning infrastructure to develop data products which are used by our tens of millions of crypto-currency users. You will collaborate with a strong team of engineers, data analysts, business operation and product/marketing managers to define and build solutions, features, algorithms and products based off our rich data and cutting-edge machine learning technology.
We have multiple openings available and much more are coming due to our rapid growth of business. Sample projects include:
· User behavior and pattern analysis: KYC, Anti-Money Laundry and abnormal user automated recognition to provide our users with safe and more accurate information service.
· Digital data asset: obtain the blockchain based data to perform chain-based data analysis, prediction and recommendations.
· Personalized recommender system: leverage of our PB-scale data warehouse to perform in-depth analysis and recommender system for our end-users.
· Data driven customer feedback and satisfaction analysis: leverage of machine learning techniques to understand customer’s feedback and satisfaction with proven data evidence and analysis.
To be successful in this role, you MUST be a quick learner, stellar machine learning skills with rich and solid experience from inception to business impact, strong communication capabilities and work well in cross-functional teams (e.g. with data users from different marketing and consumer team). This is a great opportunity to enhance your machine learning /data science skills in markets and familiarize with Blockchain based technology and etc while making a real impact on Blockchain and Crypto-Currency technology globally.
Qualifications
3+ year experience developing machine learning models at scale from inception to business impact.
Deep understanding of modern machine learning techniques and mathematical underpinning, such as classifications, recommendation systems, optimization and etc.
Working with data size from Terabyte to Petabyte scale
Good experience with Python, Java and/or Scala is preferred (2+ years) with solid project experiences.
Master’s Degree with at least 2 years machine learning experience or PhD.
Experience in Deep Learning is a plus.
Experience in product-ionizing machine learning model is a plus.
Conditions
• Do something meaningful; Be a part of the future of finance technology and the no.1 company in the industry
• Fast moving, challenging and unique business problems
• International work environment and flat organisation
• Great career development opportunities in a growing company
• Possibility for relocation and international transfers mid-career
• Competitive salary
• Flexible working hours, Casual work attire",3.4,"Binance
3.4","Asia, TN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
220,Data Scientist,-1,"Skilled data scientist with machine learning, image analysis, statistical analysis experience.
Needs to be able to write ML in python and work with MSFT Azure, Data Factory and Databricks ML Flow modeling tool. SQL Server is a plus as well.",4.3,"Peterson Technology Partners
4.3","Milwaukee, WI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1997,Contract,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
221,Research Scientist - National Global Oil and Gas Policy Dvlpmt,$39k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Sustainable Energy Development Lab at Harrisburg University, led by PI Dr. Arvind Ravikumar, is seeking a research scientist with a focus on National/Global Oil and Gas Policy Development. The research scientist in this position will be responsible for developing and maintaining the FEAST simulation framework. The Fugitive Emissions Abatement Simulation Tool (FEAST) is a python-based, Monte-Carlo model that simulates methane emissions mitigation policies across several jurisdictions. The tool is used by state and federal regulators to assess the cost-effectiveness of methane policies, help oil and gas operators evaluate methane emissions detection technologies, and provide a platform to develop long-term methane mitigation policies. Remote work is possible with the exception of field related travel. Initial appointment will be a term of 1– 2 years with the potential for extension based on funding and performance. There is also opportunity for the candidate to start their own consulting firm based on this work (if interested).

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES (Duties may vary and other duties may be assigned):
Expand the FEAST model to include new technologies, policies, and methane emissions data
Maintain the code-base of the FEAST model
Assist regulatory agencies, O&G operators, and other stakeholders with technical and policy analyzes
Communicate with external stakeholders through papers, webinars, and other presentations
Work will be divided amongst the following areas: 40% modeling, 30% collaboration, 20% software development, and 10% writing
Publish peer-reviewed journal publications and present at academic and non-academic conferences as required
POSTION REQUIREMENTS
All applications must include a one– page statement indicating your research interests and how your prior work informs it, career goals, and anything else you would like to share that is critical to your success
Interest or familiarity with global climate policy related to supply-side oil and gas production
An interest in or understanding of methane emissions from the oil and gas industry
Expertise in python, and some experience in software development
Strong written and verbal communications skills
PhD preferred, but not required; Masters’ degree in engineering or computer science
ABOUT HARRISBURG UNIVERSITY

Harrisburg University offers an applied science and technology education for students who want a degree and a dedicated pathway to a career. Its focus is to educate career-minded individuals in the areas of science, technology, engineering and math (STEM careers), giving them the tools to succeed, while helping to shape their communities, locally and beyond. Our goal is to help stimulate economic growth in our region by establishing a STEM educated workforce— a necessary resource in today’s economy.

MISSION

Harrisburg University of Science and Technology is an independent educational institution offering innovative academic and research programs in science and technology that respond to local and global needs. The institution fosters a diverse community of learners, provides access and support to students who want to pursue a career in science and technology, and supports business creation and economic development.",4.5,"Harrisburg University of Science and Technology
4.5","Harrisburg, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2004,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
222,"Senior Manager, Data and Machine Learning Engineering",$139k-$245k (Glassdoor Est.),"11 West 19th Street (22008), United States of America, New York, New York

Senior Manager, Data and Machine Learning Engineering

As a Capital One Senior Manager of Data Engineering, you'll be part of an Agile team dedicated to breaking the norm and pushing the limits of continuous improvement and innovation. You will participate in detailed technical design, development and implementation of applications using existing and emerging technology platforms. Working within an Agile environment, you will provide input into architectural design decisions, develop code to meet story acceptance criteria, and ensure that the applications we build are always available to our customers. You'll have the opportunity to mentor other engineers and develop your technical knowledge and skills to keep your mind and our business on the cutting edge of technology. As a Senior Data Manager, you will need to understand how to apply technologies in categories such as:

Cloud Computing Services (AWS, Azure, etc.)

Data Management Solutions (Metadata, Lineage, Quality)

Big Data Programming Frameworks (Hadoop, Spark, etc.)

Big Data Storage and Visualization Solutions

Machine learning (ML) Programming Frameworks (scikit-learn, PyTorch, Dask, Spark, or TensorFlow)

Streaming Technologies

Performance and Scaling Techniques

Data Integration Patterns

Microservices

Open Source Software

Who You Are:

You yearn to be part of cutting edge, high profile projects and are motivated by delivering world-class solutions on an aggressive schedule

Someone who has experience productionalizing big data and machine learning solutions

Someone who is not intimidated by challenges; thrives even under pressure; is passionate about their craft; and hyper focused on delivering exceptional results

You love to learn new technologies and mentor junior engineers to raise the bar on your team

It would be awesome if you have a robust portfolio on Github and / or open source contributions you are proud to share

The Job:

Collaborating as part of a cross-functional Agile team to create and enhance software that enables state of the art, next generation Big Data & Machine Learning applications

Building efficient storage for structured and unstructured data

Collaborates with business analysts, data analysts, data scientists, and suggests and leads architecture decisions.

Developing and deploying distributed computing Big Data and Machine Learning applications using Open Source frameworks like Apache Spark, Spark MLlib, and Kafka on AWS Cloud

Utilizing programming languages like Java, Scala, and Python

Utilizing Hadoop modules such as YARN & MapReduce, and related Apache projects such as Hive, Hbase, Pig, and Cassandra

Designing, building, and scaling complex data pipelines for machine learning models and evaluating their performance.

Leveraging DevOps techniques and practices like Continuous Integration, Continuous Deployment, Test Automation, Build Automation and Test Driven Development to enable the rapid delivery of working code utilizing tools like Jenkins, Maven, Nexus, Chef, Terraform, Ruby, Git and Docker

Performing unit tests and conducting reviews with other team members to make sure your code is rigorously designed, elegantly coded, and effectively tuned for performance

Basic Qualifications:

Bachelor’s Degree or military experience

At least 2 years of experience leading Data Engineering or Machine Learning teams.

At least 3 years of experience with data gathering and preparation for machine learning models.

At least 3 years of experience building, scaling, and optimizing machine learning systems.

At least 4 years of experience programming with Python, Scala, or Java

At least 4 years of experience working with machine learning tools (scikit-learn, PyTorch, Dask, Spark, TensorFlow)

At least 3 years of experience developing and deploying machine learning solutions in AWS, Azure, or Google Cloud Platform

Preferred Qualifications:

4+ years of UNIX/Linux experience

2+ years of Agile engineering experience

Master’s Degree or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Mathematics.

Mastery of one or more ML model architectures such as neural networks, decision trees, Bayesian models, association learning, or deep learning

3+ years of experience productionizing, monitoring, and maintaining machine learning models

4+ years of experience designing and building data intensive solutions using distributed computing

Contributed to open source ML software.

Authored/co-authored a paper on a ML technique, model, or proof of concept.

Impacts the ML industry through conference presentations, papers, blog posts, or patents.

Experience designing, implementing, and scaling complex data pipelines for ML models and evaluating their performance.

Ability to communicate complex technical concepts clearly to a variety of audiences.

Capital One will consider sponsoring a new qualified applicant for employment authorization for this position.",4.0,"Capital One - US
4.0","New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
223,"Data Scientist, Toolbox Software",$97k-$154k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Role

Service Engineering exists uniquely at the intersection of firmware/hardware design, service, diagnostics, manufacturing, quality, and reliability. We multiply efforts of service in the areas of diagnostics, repairs, and maintenance, while simultaneously reducing the need for each. As a Service Engineering Data Scientist, you will be responsible for data-driven decision making and data products on a wide variety of cross-functional projects within the global Service Engineering organization. You will have an integral part in critical projects that improve our products, support them in the field, and improve our diagnostics capabilities. You are skilled in both analyzing data and building data pipelines. You are strong in data visualizations, and have an excellent ability to extract insights from data.

Responsibilities

Use big-data technologies to solve complex problems in a fast-paced environment.
Explore and understand Tesla's various data platforms and systems and drive the team as a whole to be more data-driven.
Extract insights from data, summarize and clearly communicate them, and develop visualizations and/or other tools for self-service of those insights.
Partner with department leadership team to gather critical data to prioritize projects and measure success.
Build data pipelines, develop efficient queries in SQL and leverage Spark/Presto to query the entire Tesla fleet.

Requirements

Expert in data visualization and dashboard creation with Tableau or similar tools.
Expert with relational databases and SQL.
Proficient in Python coding, software version control, and software testing with an attitude of fast iteration.
Strong foundation in statistics, probability, and experimental design.
Experience with big data systems such as Hadoop and Spark.
Self-starter and adept at navigating distributed teams; can work independently and find the best data sources to provide insights to the team.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.

Desired Skills

Interest and knowledge of NoSQL and time series databases.
Proficiency in data science libraries such as Pandas or Numpy.

Tesla participates in the E-Verify Program",3.6,"Tesla
3.6","Palo Alto, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2003,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
224,Data Scientist,$78k-$133k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description
Participates in the development, validation and delivery of algorithms, statistical models and reporting tools. Solves moderately complex analytical problems.

Fundamental Components
Develops, validates and executes algorithms and predictive models to investigate problems, detect patterns and recommend solutions. Explores, examines and interprets large volumes of data in various forms. Performs analyses of structured and unstructured data to solve moderately complex business problems. utilizing advanced statistical techniques and mathematical analyses. Develops data structures and pipelines to organize, collect and standardize data that helps generate insights and addresses reporting needs. Uses data visualization techniques to effectively communicate analytical results and support business decisions. Creates and evaluates the data needs of assigned projects and assures the integrity of the data. Explores existing data and recommends additional sources of data for improvements. Documents projects including business objectives, data gathering and processing, detailed set of results and analytical metrics.

Background Experience
Demonstrates good written and verbal communication skills. Able to present information to various audiences.Effectively resolves problems and roadblocks as they occur.Demonstrates proficiency in several areas of data modeling, machine learning algorithms, statistical analysis, data engineering and data visualization.Ability to work with large data sets from multiple data sources.3 years of relevant programming or analytic experience. Masters degree preferred.Bachelor's degree or equivalent work experience in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Business Analytics, Economics, Physics, Engineering, or related discipline.

Education
Master's degree

Percent of Travel Required
0 - 10%

Business Overview
At Aetna, a CVS Health company, we are joined in a common purpose: helping people on their path to better health. We are working to transform health care through innovations that make quality care more accessible, easier to use, less expensive and patient-focused. Working together and organizing around the individual, we are pioneering a new approach to total health that puts people at the heart.

We are committed to maintaining a diverse and inclusive workplace. CVS Health is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. We do not discriminate in recruiting, hiring or promotion based on race, ethnicity, gender, gender identity, age, disability or protected veteran status. We proudly support and encourage people with military experience (active, veterans, reservists and National Guard) as well as military spouses to apply for CVS Health job opportunities.",2.9,"CVS Health
2.9","Wellesley, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1963,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10+ billion (USD),-1
225,Data Scientist,$87k-$139k (Glassdoor Est.),"LOCATION: Remote (home based) with some travel to New York, Washington DC, Boston.

About Us VIDEO

Founded in 2013, Pivotal Software, Inc. combines our leading cloud-native platform, tools, and methodology to empower the world's largest organizations to adapt to change and build great software. Our technology unleashes developer productivity, while fulfilling our mission to transform how the world builds software.

You

As a data scientist on Pivotal's Data Science team, you'll be working on a wide variety of data problems for a diverse range of clients. You will often be asked to learn new technologies and domains on the fly. You should be comfortable working under deadlines and making tough decisions. Consequently, you will frequently have to balance achieving an immediate goal with scalability and productionalizability.

The role offers room for personal and professional growth, and you won't be working in isolation. Data Science at Pivotal is an encouraging and supportive team, where ideas and challenges are addressed collaboratively. We're looking for the kind of person who will try and solve a problem on their own first, but isn't afraid to ask for help or say ""I don't know.""

Us

The Data Science team at Pivotal is primarily a consulting practice; we are tool agnostic, working with our customers to solve real world problems. Our customers, like us, are cross-disciplinary. We service engagements with use cases running from customer churn to optimization to detecting fraud and misconduct. We are not just doers, we are also educators and enablers.

Your Day

While there is no such thing as a ""typical day"", these are activities we frequently find ourselves doing:

Working with clients to uncover and frame new opportunities for data science. Clients often come to us without a clear understanding of what we can do, so this is our chance to open their eyes to new possibilities for their businesses.
Exploring client datasets, looking for actionable insights we can present.
Engineering features, training models, tuning hyperparameters and evaluating the results. We emphasize rigor, because data science done right at this stage leads to models that shine in production.
Taking the models we build into production. This is an exciting stage for anyone who likes collaborating with engineering teams and seeing their model become real when users interact with it.
Helping our clients develop their internal data science practices, from hiring and recruiting to data capturing, so that they can be successful when we hand off the project.

Required Skills / Experiences

Clear and empathetic communicator. You'll be the one sharing your insights with clients and stakeholders at check-ins, documenting your work, and even explaining your model to client data teams as part of a handoff. As such, communication and empathy are essential parts of your toolkit.
Advanced knowledge of statistical modeling and/or machine learning methods. These are the tools we need to go from analysis to prediction.
Strong programming skills. Left to our own devices most of us work in Python, but learning the client's tech stack is an important part of the job.
Strong exploratory data analysis skills. Every engagement starts with an investigation of the data, and thorough EDA saves us a lot of headaches in the long run.
Some travel is expected, depending on location and skillset. We mostly work out of the Pivotal office closest to the client, but sometimes we have to be on site for an extended period of time.
At least a bachelor's degree in an analytical or technical field. This could be applied mathematics, statistics, computer science, operations research, economics, etc. Higher education welcome and encouraged.

This role will support US government clients that require US citizenship. Given this, US citizenship is required for you to apply.

Desired Skills / Experiences

2+ years of work in a data-centric field (data science or data engineering).
Experience with relational databases.
Exposure and experience working in a Linux environment.
You have a specialization in an area like NLP, optimization, or image processing.
Hands-on experience working in a distributed computing environment or proven theoretical understanding of parallelism.

Pivotal is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer that will consider all qualified applicants, regardless of race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, gender identity or expression, national origin, genetics, age, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by applicable law.",4.4,"Pivotal Software
4.4","Washington, DC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2013,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
226,Data Scientist,$59k-$101k (Glassdoor Est.),"ECS is seeking a Data Scientist to work in our Adelphi, MD office. Please Note: This position is contingent upon contract award.

Job Description:
Provide expert enterprise experience as a Data Scientist, mining and analyzing data from various sources to drive decision support and improvement of organization strategies. The ability to assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources/attributes and data collection techniques. Working with structured and unstructured data to prepare in-depth analysis, this includes the normalization and canonicalization of data to ensure consistent inputs. Introduce validation and reporting techniques to ensure the veracity of data. Developing custom data models and algorithms to apply to data sets and extract additional insights. Providing expertise in exploratory data analysis, pattern discovery, and advanced analytical techniques.

Evaluate methods to thwart adversarial attacks of cyber defenses. Your expertise will assist in determining the existence and identification of vulnerabilities in current machine learning algorithms for visual (facial/object) identification, spoofing biometrics, data poisoning, etc. In your role, you will be crucial in identifying potential weaknesses and counter-measures to defeat the exploitation.

Required Skills:

TS/ SCI Clearance
Must be a U.S. Citizen
Masters' Degree in Computer Science, Cyber, Information Technology, Mathematics, Physics, Engineering,
or similar discipline with 6-8 years of experience
or Bachelors Degree with 8-10 years of experience.
5 years’ experience mining and analyzing data
At least 1 year of experience with AI security research problems (adversarial examples, data poisoning, model inversion, etc.)
At least 1 years of machine learning experience
At least 2 years of experience with researching deep neural network techniques
At least 3 years of cyber security experience
At least 1 year of experience with machine learning techniques other than neural networks
At least 1 year of experience with large-scale data engineering projects
At least 1 year of biometric spoof detection (facial, fingerprints, etc.)
At least 1 year of cyber-attack forecasting
Be prepared to provide publications and/or presentations to demonstrate your communication skills

ECS is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate or allow discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, age, national origin, citizenship, disability, veteran status or any other classification protected by federal, state, or local law. ECS promotes affirmative action for minorities, women, disabled persons, and veterans.

ECS is a leading mid-sized provider of technology services to the United States Federal Government. We are focused on people, values and purpose. Every day, our 3000+ employees focus on providing their technical talent to support the Federal Agencies and Departments of the US Government to serve, protect and defend the American People.",3.9,"ECS Federal LLC
3.9","Adelphi, MD",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2000,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
227,Data Scientist,-1,"Zoba is building the next generation of spatial analytics to improve the efficiency of cities and the lives of people that live in them. Currently, we’re focused on providing industry-leading demand estimation and optimization to shared mobility companies around the world. Zoba is backed by leading investors including CRV, Founder Collective, and Mark Cuban.

Zoba is a data science company, and as such the data science and engineering teams work closely to build Zoba’s core products. Zoba has one of the world’s largest micromobility datasets--tens of millions of ride events and growing exponentially. At Zoba, you would use this data to:

- Discover drivers of micromobility demand
- Disentangle the causal impacts of seasonality, weather, and operational decisions on mobility system performance
- Develop dynamic pricing models

We are currently looking for a data scientist to join our growing team. The anticipated start date for this position is December 1st, 2020.
The role entails
Interfacing with customers to understand their needs and how those needs can be addressed with mathematical tools
Estimating the effects of changes in mobility operations
Developing pricing models which build upon Zoba’s demand estimation and optimization pipelines
Collaborating with Zoba’s engineering and product teams to implement new models and refine existing pipelines
Working with detailed, granular mobility data
What we are looking for
Demonstrable expertise in data science applied to mobility or a related field, either through academic or industry experience
Technical creativity and clarity in technical communication
Strong coding and implementation skills
Strong math modeling skills
A bias towards action, team-first mindset and willingness to take on the challenges of an early stage startup
An interest in spatial data, mobility, and making an impact on cities
Nice to have
Experience with our current stack: Python, Django, AWS, PostGIS, Julia
Experience with spatial data or geostatistics
A year or more of industry data science experience
Proficiency with any of the following: deep learning, hierarchical Bayesian models, mixed integer optimization, causal inference
Experience with dynamic pricing
At Zoba, we view diversity as a strength and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for employees of all backgrounds.",-1,Zoba,"Boston, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
228,Data & Applied Scientist,$101k-$159k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join us as we work towards Microsoft’s mission of empowering every person and every organization on the planet to achieve more. The Modern Life Experiences (MLX) team is expanding its global footprint and we need your help in bringing consumer products directly to the people who need them. We are agile team at Microsoft with the goal of developing consumer features for the modern workforce across surfaces and platforms. We work collaboratively and iterate quickly. We keep alive an inherently startup-like, risk-taking culture but we also take the responsibility seriously to carry one of the world's most recognizable software brand names - Microsoft. Our mission is to build customer-driven experiences that transform personal data into personal value and empower modern achievers and families to accomplish what matters most. By creating easy-to-use mobile and web experiences, we are helping individuals and families gain peace of mind, to ultimately allow them to focus on what’s most important: each other. We are looking for a Data Scientist with passion and knowledge of customer lifecycle and user behavior to join our cross-functional data team. You’ll sit right at the junction of product, marketing and engineering to help us understand the current state of our customers, come up with hypothesis for improving the products and recommend experiments. You’ll contribute to the data integrity and constantly help improve our internal processes. This is a great opportunity to apply statistical and more advanced data science techniques to engagement, retention, and growth programs that have meaningful and visible impact on our business. Responsibilities Responsibilities Work with Product to define business metrics and feature success metrics Apply advanced analytical and modeling method to improve user retention, engagement, and conversion metrics Provide comprehensive analysis of funnel conversion and perform ad-hoc deep-dive on user behavior Propose experimental designs to optimize business strategies across product surfaces and marketing channels Communicate campaign and experiment results to internal audiences, make recommendations on product roadmap and decisions Keep up to date with the latest advances in the field and apply them in the organization Qualifications Qualifications 1-2 years of experience using analytics to solve problems, understand user behavior and drive business decisions SQL and performing analysis with large datasets using Python or R BS/BA Degree in Math, Engineering, CS or another Quantitative field Strong understanding of funnel optimization best practices that can positively impact key business metrics Understanding of statistical analysis and experimental design, AB testing Managing priorities and stakeholder expectations Ability to communicate insights verbally, visually, and written Ability to collaborate with Product and streamline requirements in actionable deliverables Experience with distributed computing and data pipeline (Hadoop/Spark etc.) Experience with data collection and data pipelines a plus Machine Learning modeling experience a plus Knowledge of internal Microsoft Data Science (Azure ML, Cosmos, Scope, etc) tools a plus Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran status, race, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable laws, regulations and ordinances. We also consider qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability during the application or the recruiting process, please send a request via the Accommodation request form. Benefits/perks listed below may vary depending on the nature of your employment with Microsoft and the country where you work.",4.3,"Microsoft
4.3","San Francisco, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1975,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
229,Data Scientist,-1,"Title: Data Scientist

Location: Chicago or North NJ (near Newark) (Multiple Openings)

Job Type: Full Time/ Contract to Hire

Salary: Open

Requirements:

• Minimum 5-10 years of hands-on experience with statistical software tools: SQL, R, Python

• 3+ years- experience in business analytics, forecasting or business planning with emphasis on analytical modeling, quantitative reasoning and metrics reporting

• Experience working with large data sets in order to extract business insights or build predictive models

• Proficiency in one or more statistical tools/languages - Python, Scala, R SPSS or SAS and related packages like Pandas, SciPy/Scikit-learn, NumPy etc.

• Good data intuition / analysis skills; sql, plsql knowledge must

• Banking / Financial Sectors (preferred / not a must)

Note: If interested please send your updated resume and include your rate requirement along with your contact details with a suitable time when we can reach you. If you know of anyone in your sphere of contacts, who would be a perfect match for this job then, we would appreciate if you can forward this posting to them with a copy to us.",4.0,"Two95 International Inc.
4.0","Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
230,"Development Scientist I/II, DNA Amplification",$43k-$90k (Glassdoor Est.),"New England Biolabs is inviting applications for the position of Development Scientist I. The successful candidate will work on goal-oriented projects within a dynamic group of polymerase/ amplification researchers to identify novel solutions to complex amplification-related challenges. This position offers opportunities to develop novel reagents, engage with customers, attend scientific conferences and learn from technically-and commercially-focused colleagues across the company.

Primary Responsibilities:
Develop and characterize DNA amplification-related technologies, assays, reagents and kits
Collaborate with colleagues across the company (research, production, marketing, etc.) to successfully launch products relevant to current and cutting-edge workflows
Create content for technical and marketing materials
Present findings to internal and external customers/collaborators
Understand and address customer-related technical needs
Required Qualifications and Experience:
Ph.D. in Biochemistry or related field
Strong data analysis and biochemistry/molecular biology experience
Excellent interpersonal skills
Effective verbal and written communication
Scientific enthusiasm and integrity
An ability to balance multiple projects and excel in a team environment
Preferred Qualifications and Experience:
Minimum of 2 years’ experience strongly preferred
EEO Statement

New England Biolabs is committed to fostering a diverse and inclusive community; as an EEO/AA employer, New England Biolabs considers applicants for employment without regard to, and does not discriminate on the basis of, race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status or disability. More in-depth details of EEO are available here.

New England Biolabs is a participating employer in the Employment Verification (E-Verify) program.

OFCCP’s pay transparency policy can be found on OFCCP’s website at www.dol.gov/ofccp

If you need an accommodation for any part of the employment process because of a medical condition or disability, please send an email to hr@neb.com or call 978-927-5054 to let us know the nature of your request.",4.9,"New England Biolabs
4.9","Ipswich, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1974,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
231,"Data Scientist, Analytics",$85k-$137k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the Team The Analytics team is looking for experienced Data Scientists to guide measurement, strategy, and tactical decision-making across the company across a variety of teams and levels. Data Scientists at DoorDash work to uncover insights and turn them into relevant recommendations, driving decisions for the entire organization. Analytics is integral to all operational areas at DoorDash. Please apply here for all non-managerial levels within the following analytics teams: Growth - Consumer Growth - Marketing Logistics & Platform Merchant & Sales New Business Verticals Operational Excellence - Customer Experience About the Roles As a Data Scientist at DoorDash, you'll use your quantitative background to mentor other scientists and dive into large datasets to guide decision-making. We tackle a multitude of exciting challenges including customer acquisition, fraud and support, marketing, balancing supply and demand, new city launches, marketplace efficiency, and more. If you enjoy finding patterns amidst chaos, and have experience using analytics to affect revenue, growth, operations or beyond, we're looking for someone like you! You're excited about this opportunity because you will… Use quantitative analysis and the presentation of data to see beyond the numbers and understand what drives our business Build full-cycle analytics experiments, reports, and dashboards using SQL, R, Python, or other scripting and statistical tools Work alongside of mentor junior analysts on how to use more advanced methods and solve challenges Produce recommendations and use statistical techniques and hypothesis testing to validate your findings. Provide insights to help business and product leaders understand marketplace dynamics, user behaviors, and long-term trends Identify and measure levers to help move essential metrics and make recommendations Work backwards from understanding and sizing problems to ideating solutions Report against our goals by identifying essential metrics and building executive-facing dashboards to track progress Collaborate with engineering to implement, document, validate, and monitor our logging We're excited about you because you have… A degree in Math, Physics, Statistics, Economics, Computer Science, or similar domain 5+ years of experience in data analytics, consulting, or related quantitative role Experience working with funnel optimization, user segmentation, cohort analyses, time series analyses, regression models, etc Expertise of SQL queries, ETL, A/B Testing, and statistical analysis (e.g. hypothesis testing, experimentation, regressions) with statistical packages, such as Matlab, R, SAS or Python Proficiency in one or more analytics & visualization tools (e.g. Chartio, Looker, Tableau) The insight to take ambiguous problems and solve them in a structured, hypothesis-driven, data-supported way The determination to initiate and lead projects to completion in a scrappy environment Why You'll Love Working at DoorDash We are leaders - Leadership is not limited to our management team. It's something everyone at DoorDash embraces and embodies We are doers - We believe the only way to predict the future is to build it. Creating solutions that will lead our company and our industry is what we do - on every project, every day We are learners - We're not afraid to dig in and uncover the truth, even if it's scary or inconvenient. Everyone here is continually learning on the job, no matter if we've been in a role for one year or one minute We are customer obsessed - Our mission is to grow and empower local economies. We are committed to our customers, merchants, and dashers and believe in connecting people with possibility We are all DoorDash - The magic of DoorDash is our people, together making our inspiring goals attainable and driving us to greater heights We offer great compensation packages and comprehensive health benefits About DoorDash DoorDash is a technology company that connects customers with their favorite local and national businesses in over 4,000 cities and all 50 states across the United States and Canada. Founded in 2013, DoorDash empowers merchants to grow their businesses by offering on-demand delivery, data-driven insights, and better in-store efficiency, providing delightful experiences from door to door. By building the last-mile delivery infrastructure for local cities, DoorDash is bringing communities closer, one doorstep at a time. Read more on the DoorDash Engineering blog or at www.doordash.com. Our Commitment to Diversity and Inclusion We're committed to growing and empowering a more inclusive community within our company, industry, and cities. That's why we hire and cultivate diverse teams of the best and brightest from all backgrounds, experiences, and perspectives. We believe that true innovation happens when everyone has room at the table and the tools, resources, and opportunity to excel.",3.9,"DoorDash
3.9","San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2013,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
232,Data Scientist,$67k-$116k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist*
Company Description*
DataLab USA is an analytics and technology driven database marketing consultancy. We combine sophisticated technology, cutting edge analytics and an intrinsic understanding of marketing to build large-scale addressable marketing programs for Fortune 500 companies. Our clients operate in multiple verticals: Financial Services, Insurance, Telcom, and Travel & Leisure.
Key responsibilities/duties include: *
· Build, implement and maintain predictive models through their full lifecycle.

· Identify patterns & trends in data, and provides insights to enhance business decision making.

· Identify challenges and opportunities from client strategy discussions and taking ownership of solution.

· Set up and monitor monthly model recalibration process.

· Generate complex ad-hoc analyses combining disparate concepts or creating new approaches.

· Design and create new analytic procedures & automation.

· Review corporate model scoring QC.

· Review corporate data transformation QC.
Education and Experience: *
· MS/PHD in a quantitative discipline or BS in a quantitative discipline with commensurate experience

· Regular SQL use for querying data

· Experience programming with at least one language

· Use of statistical software (e.g., R, Python)

· Experience with Tableau (or other data visualization platform)

· Experience with Excel

· Financial or insurance industry experience strongly preferred

· 3-5 years of Database Marketing and Data Mining experience

DataLab USA is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: Up to $999,999.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Ability to Commute/Relocate:
Germantown, MD 20876 (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.datalabusa.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",3.6,"DataLab USA
3.6","Germantown, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
233,Microfluidics Engineer / Scientist,$75k-$122k (Glassdoor Est.),"To continue our solid growth, we are seeking a talented and highly motivated Microfluidics Engineer/Scientist to join our growing organization. In this role, the Scientist or Engineer will work within the Technology group and with cross-functional teams, as well as 3rd party partners and collaborators to develop technologies that will enable the development of miniaturized Simoa systems. This role will involve the development and characterization of new capabilities to demonstrate the feasibility of miniaturization of Simoa assays. This person will work closely with software developers and assay scientists to provide proof-of-principle data on miniaturized systems. They will also provide a link between the Technology team and the development teams (engineering and assay) to transfer new miniaturization technologies from feasibility into full development. The Scientist or Engineer will be expected to communicate their work via presentations at conferences and in peer-reviewed publications.

Key Responsibilities:
Feasibility research on miniaturization technologies applicable to Simoa
Test platform design, system integration and verification pertaining to the miniaturization approaches
Invention of technologies that enable Simoa miniaturization
Collaboration with technology development partners to develop and evaluate miniaturization technologies
Technology scouting of external miniaturization approaches
Collaboration with assay scientists in the Technology group to demonstrate Simoa assays on miniaturized systems
Interacting with engineering and assay development groups to transfer new Simoa technologies from feasibility to full development
Skill and Knowledge Requirements:
Proven ability to collaborate in a multi-disciplinary environment
Strong background in experimental design and communication of scientific results
Background in miniaturization technology research and/or development for biomedical and analytical chemistry applications
Experience with specific microfluidic technologies, e.g., digital microfluidics, droplets, etc. preferred
Experience in working with breadboard and/or engineering prototype systems, system integration and design verification
Excellent quantitative analytical skills and trouble-shooting skills
Must be a self-starter and motivated to learn new laboratory techniques and relevant engineering software packages
Track record of publications on miniaturization technologies preferred
Minimum Experience and Education:
Master's degree or above in physical sciences or engineering disciplines (physics, chemistry, chemical engineering, mechanical engineering, biomedical engineering) required
Industrial experience in assay and instrumentation development preferred
Experience with quality management system preferred
Travel Requirements:
Some travel expected to visit collaboration or development partners, and to attend scientific conferences
Quanterix is a company that's digitizing biomarker analysis with the goal of advancing the science of precision health. The company's digital health solution, Simoa, has the potential to change the way in which healthcare is provided today by giving researchers the ability to closely examine the continuum from health to disease. Quanterix' technology is designed to enable much earlier disease detection, better prognoses and enhanced treatment methods to improve the quality of life and longevity of the population for generations to come. The technology is currently being used for research applications in several therapeutic areas, including oncology, neurology, cardiology, inflammation and infectious disease. The company was established in 2007 and is located in Billerica, Massachusetts. For additional Information, please visit https://www.quanterix.com.

Quanterix is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Quanterix is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. Quanterix will make reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with known disabilities, in accordance with applicable law.",3.3,"Quanterix
3.3","Billerica, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2007,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
234,Data Scientist,-1,"Company Description

ArborMetrix advances healthcare through data science by transforming data into insights for decision-making. Our healthcare analytics and technology solutions deliver clinically-rich and relevant evidence at the level of precision needed to measure and improve clinical outcomes, advance care, and optimize performance. Our data science platform allows for efficient aggregation and deep analysis of healthcare data, and deploys advanced analytics that deliver credible, trusted insights that lead to results that have a real impact on real people.

Job Description

Data Scientists build solutions to feed our healthcare performance-measurement and analytic web applications. These applications help customers optimize the quality and efficiency of hospital and specialty care. Data Scientists are technically, scalability, and product focused. This includes all aspects of the data science pipeline: dataset preparation, validation, modeling, visualization, and presentation.

JOB RESPONSIBILITIES

Create solutions that democratize and improve Data Science work.
Develop and implement modern Data Science-based offerings
Build models, diagnose, validate and improve the performance of the models
Communicate effectively internally and externally
Assess technical challenges, program solutions, and solve complex problems
Maintain and automate legacy implementations
Working across multiple domains/languages: Python, Docker/K8S, SQL, GNU/Linux, Java, etc.

Qualifications

Modern open-source technology skills are a must.
Flexibility in thinking about data structures
A desire to learn, challenge the status quo, teach, and break boundaries.
Ability to work in a team environment and be flexible in taking on multiple projects
Numerically inclined with a tolerance for imperfection
Python/Java and GNU/Linux skills preferred.

Additional Information

All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.

Please submit a cover letter with your resume.",4.4,"ArborMetrix
4.4","Ann Arbor, MI",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
235,Data Scientist,$50k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Data Scientist

Office Location| Boston, MA, US

Department: Data Science

Company

The RepTrak Company is the world's leading reputation data and insights company. We provide the only global platform for data-driven insights on Reputation, Brand, and ESG. Our proprietary RepTrak® model is the global standard for measuring and analyzing the sentiment of the world using proven data science models and machine learning techniques across industries and geographies. Subscribers to the RepTrak® Program use our predictive insights to protect business value, improve return on investment, and increase their positive impact on society. Established in 1997, The RepTrak Company owns the world's largest reputation bench marking database of over 1 million company ratings per year used by CEOs, boards, and executives in more than 60 countries worldwide.


We are developing data-driven products proving that doing and saying the right things is a good business. Good Business. Better World.

We are looking for a motivated, enthusiastic individual to join our data science team. The role is a blend of hands-on data science work, an eye for innovation, and an understanding of the markets in which we work.

The new Data Scientist / Sr. Data Scientist will be part of our Global Data Science, based in our Boston headquarters.

Specific Responsibilities include
Develop cutting edge advanced analytics, AI and machine learning algorithms and models to enhance and innovate our data-driven SaaS offerings
Automate commonly used analyses into POC advanced analytics packages
Work with text mining, text analytics and NLP
Manage the creation, development, and iterative improvement of training sets for machine learning solutions that power our core product
Identify, test and use industry available data science and machine learning packages, tools and platforms
Create model comparison benchmarks and model selection processes
Support Engineering in model optimization and productization
Work with media data to create novel models and work with our cross-functional media team on bringing these models into our products
Manage strategy for multi-source data collection and merging for advanced analytics and ML/AI modeling
Work on Media data scraping algorithms
Deploy a variety of supervised and unsupervised machine learning models, including ensemble methods, deep learning, transfer learning, clustering and other state of the art techniques
Research latest developments in AI/ML and NLP to keep innovating our solutions and offerings


Professional Qualifications
3+ years of experience in Data Science, AI/ML modeling, and data processing and analysis, from the creation of the dataset to the final model in production
Strong data pre-processing and data manipulation skills
Data quality and data cleansing techniques
Strong knowledge of Python and relevant to data science Python packages and tools, including data visualization
Advanced data analytics skills, including proven hands-on experience of building models in Python with relevant libraries and packages
Understanding of Cloud Platforms (e.g. AWS/Azure/GCP) and ability to use them for developing, training and testing machine learning models, including deep learning models
Familiarity with TensorFlow, Keras, PyTorch
Understanding of the principles of data strategy and architecture
Familiarity with autoML tools is a plus
Experience or familiarity with R and/or SPSS is a plus
Text mining and NLP background is a plus
You will also need to have
3+ years' track record of successfully executing data science projects, including ability to meet deadlines, overcome challenges, manage stakeholder expectations and produce clear deliverables
Ability to develop new ideas into structured deliverables
Strong analytical and problem-solving capabilities
Strong stakeholder management and interpersonal skills
Strong communication skills
Desirable qualifications
A technical background and an academic scientific degree in Mathematics, Computer Science, Data Science or similar
Sc. or Ph.D. is a plus
Compensation

The Data Scientist / Sr. Data Scientist role encompasses a compensation package including a competitive salary and a bi-annual performance bonus plan. The RepTrak Company offers a full benefits program including company holidays, paid vacation, and more. The RepTrak Company is committed to diversity in the workplace and is an Equal Opportunity Employer.

For more information about the firm, please visit our website at https://www.reptrak.com/",3.5,"The RepTrak Company
3.5","Boston, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
236,"Data Scientist, Insurance",$102k-$160k (Glassdoor Est.),"THE ROLE

Tesla's mission is to accelerate the world's transition to
sustainable energy. Tesla Insurance Services (TIS) supports this mission by
reducing the cost of ownership of our vehicles and improving the customer
experience. The insurance data science team is responsible for building and
maintaining our telematics and pricing models to accurately predict, measure,
and price risk based on customer driving behavior.

RESPONSIBILITIES

·
Contribute to all stages of
the insurance telematics model including but not limited to problem
formulation, data pre-processing, features engineering, sample design, algorithmic
selection and evaluation, hyper-parameter tuning, and deployment

·
Partner with vehicle and
data engineering teams on feature analysis across a broad range of fleet data
and contribute to shared machine learning platform and infrastructure

·
Partner with actuaries on
incorporating telematics model into our pricing models and provide
documentation and support for regulatory approval

·
Develop and maintain
feedback loop to evaluate and refine our pricing models based on claims and loss
data and work with actuaries to file

REQUIREMENTS

·
Graduate degree in quantitative field (math, economics,
financial engineering, operations research, finance, and/or statistics)

·
8+ years of experience in
roles related to actuarial
science, applied statistics and analyzing risk, preferably
with a portion in the insurance industry in underwriting or actuarial roles

·
Applied statistics and machine learning experience (regression analysis, time
series, probabilistic models, supervised and unsupervised methods)

·
Proficiency in Python and experience with open-source ML
libraries and frameworks like Scikit-learn, PyTorch, and Tensorflow

·
Proficiency in SQL and experience with commercial and
emerging databases, technologies, and languages

·
Ability to self-start and
self-direct work in an unstructured environment, comfortable dealing with
ambiguity

·
Excellent problem-framing,
problem solving and project management skills and ability to change direction
quickly

Preferred

·
ACAS or FCAS

·
Experience with cloud
platforms (AWS, Azure, GCP)

·
Experience with git and
version control workflows

·
Experience with continuous
integration pipelines and infrastructure (Docker, Jenkins, Kubernetes)",3.6,"Tesla
3.6","Fremont, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2003,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
237,Medical Technologist/Medical Laboratory Scientist,$19-$36 Per Hour(Glassdoor Est.),"To us, it’s about living life to the fullest while serving our patients, teammates, neighbors and friends. We are dedicated and passionate in everything we do, seeking challenge and appreciating the routes that got us here. Whether our path is clinical or not, we all came to find balance and meaning in our lives within the work we are passionate about and the adventures we live.

POSITION PURPOSE:
Performs CLIA moderate and high complexity laboratory tests and analyses; recognizes and corrects problems; possesses in depth knowledge of laboratory techniques, principles, and instruments; correlates and interprets test results. Provides physicians with rapid and accurate test results.
ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS:
Performs CLIA moderate and high complex lab testing, automated and non-automated, in hematology, chemistry, blood bank, microbiology, coagulation, serology, and molecular diagnostics.
Performs, statistically evaluates, troubleshoots, and records quality control, calibrations, validations on test assays.
Performs and records preventive maintenance on lab instrumentation. Identifies, evaluates, and performs corrective maintenance on lab equipment.
Validates, correlates with patients' diagnosis, interprets, & reports laboratory test data; enters data into LIS system and reviews it's completeness and accuracy. Reports and interprets data to physicians, infection control, regulatory agencies, as required.
Performs specimen collection, handling, processing, storage. Evaluates specimens quality for testing and troubleshoots deviations.
Assists in the development of QA and QI projects; collects and tabulates QA data.
Assists with training and education of new med techs and lab assistants.
Maintains competency and continuing education in general lab practices.
Perform other duties as assigned. Must be HIPAA compliant.
MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:

Experience:
1 year in a CLIA high complexity lab perfered.

Certification(s):
Medical Laboratory Scientist (MLS) by the American Society for Clinical Pathology (ASCP) or
Medical Technologist (MT) by the American Medical Technologists (AMT)",3.9,"Vail Health
3.9","Vail, CO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1966,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
238,Scientist II or Senior Scientist T Cell Biology,$78k-$93k (Glassdoor Est.),"Precigen is seeking a highly motivated and creativeScientist II or Senior Scientist(level determined by candidate experience)with experience in T cell biology, chimeric antigen receptor generation (CARs) and CAR T cell analysis to join our ImmunoOncology Department in Germantown, Maryland.ImmunoOncology is a rapidly growing and exciting area of cancer therapy, with the promise to revolutionize the way patients are treated.The successful candidate will have an in-depth understanding of T cell biology and immunotherapy.

DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Apply expertise in T cell immunology and molecular biology to lead and influence projects within the development of Precigen’s product portfolio.
Plan the evaluation strategy and conduct the in vitro studies with human T cells for functional testing
Plan, perform and assess novel adoptive T cell therapies anti-tumor activity in relevant in vivo murine models.
Clear communication in both oral and written form.
Manage timelines and deliverables.
Develop reports for various projects.
Supervise research associates.
Utilization of appropriate technology, i.e. Outlook, PowerPoint, and other programs to create and distribute reports and key information.
Coordination of parallel tasks across multiple projects, demonstrating prioritization.
Interpret and effectively execute upon a variety of instructions provided in written, oral, diagram or schedule formats.
Self-motivated and independently minded.
Positive interpersonal skills with the ability to interact with individuals from a variety of levels and function.
Self-organizer, meticulous hands-on habits, keen attention to detail.
Strong quantitative and analytical skills.
Responsive, can-do attitude.
SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES:

·1 - 3 Research Associates

EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE:
Ph.D. in immunology, cellular and/or tumor biology or a closely related field.
Strong background in cancer immunotherapy or the biology of the tumor microenvironment, huma immunology and experience working with engineered T-cells strongly preferred.
Five (5) or more year’s post-doctoral experience, industry experience a plus.
Direct hands on experience with generating and analyzing chimeric antigen receptor (CAR) T cells function
Must have experience in flow cytometry and fluorescence activated cell sorting (FACS), immune cell phenotyping of immune cell subsets; experience with human immune cells is preferred.
Experience designing and developing primary immune cell assays using key immune cell populations.
Hands-on expertise in T-cell functional characterization assays includingin vitrocytotoxicity, proliferation, and cytokine/chemokine measurements.
Expertise inin vitro T-cell isolation and expansion methods.
Proficient in cell culture aseptic technique.
Experience in viral and non-viral methods of gene transfer.
Experience with PK/PD, in vitro T cell assays, including ELISPOT, ELISA, Luminex and flow cytometry read-out.
Proficient in multi-parameter flow cytometry (panel design, sample acquisition, data processing.)
Experience in molecular and cellular biology techniques, including but not limited to: PCR, qPCR, cloning and western blot.
Proficiency in the analysis and understanding of immune cells and molecules.
DESIRED KEY COMPETENCIES:
Ability to understand and execute on the company’s mission and values.
Maintain a high degree of ethical standard and trustworthiness.
Capable of fostering change in an organization.
Deals with conflict in a direct, positive manner.
Ability to think and adapt to a rapidly changing environment and demands.
Able to reach rational conclusions through complex processing of information.
Fosters innovation through creative solutions.
Effective organization and implementation of group projects.
Maintain a high degree of accuracy and attention to detail.
Energized by accomplishments and excellence in the workplace.
Capable of high performance in independent work as well as in team setting.
Comfortable in a fast-paced small company environment with minimal direction and able to adjust workload based upon changing priorities.
EOE MFDV",3.4,"Precigen
3.4","Germantown, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
239,Data Scientist,-1,"Location: San Jose, CA, Irving, TX
Salary: DOE

What You’ll Do
As a member of this dynamic and fast-paced team, you will perform cross-functional data engineering and analysis in a big data environment.

Specific responsibilities include:

Collect and organize data requirements and processes
Work with data engineers to ensure the availability of accurate and timely data
Perform impact assessment and deep-dive analysis in collaboration with stakeholders to ensure data integrity, consistency, usability, and completeness
Write SQL for data support for business processes and ETL in Hadoop
Identify patterns and trends and communicate them to stakeholders
Assess usability of new data sources
Apply statistical analysis to quantify impact of business processes.
Extract patterns and actionable insights from data.

Top Skills Required

Demonstrate ability and job history of

Predictive Analytics
Modeling of Predictive Analytics
Statistics Background
SQL, HADOOP and SPARK Experience

Qualification

Bachelor’s degree or equivalent
Strong statistical foundation including descriptive analysis and hypothesis testing
Creative problem solver – ability to identify and analyze complex patterns
Effective communicator with both technical and non-technical audiences.
Proficient in SQL and at least one programming (or scripting) language SPARK, HADOOP",-1,ELT Solutions,"San Jose, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Self-employed,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
240,Data Scientist,-1,"About Understory
Climate change is creating a crisis for the insurance industry and those who rely on it for financial security.

Every year, severe weather causes billions of dollars of damage. Yet traditional insurers lack the tools to accurately assess and price severe weather risk. Without knowing what to expect, insurers expect the worst, leading to unaffordable premiums. For industries such as retail automotive and agriculture, traditional insurance is becoming unattainable. These business owners are at risk of financial devastation whenever a storm strikes.

Understory is the first company to solve the insurance coverage crisis with data-driven insurance for severe weather, starting with hail. Our growing network of ground-based Dot weather sensors, combined with our Atmospheric Intelligence AI, allow us to assess and price any weather risk in the world.

When severe weather strikes, Understory detects it and triggers a fast, predetermined payout. There are no burdensome financial deductibles, and no lengthy claims process. Ultimately, Understory allows capital to quickly flow where it’s needed most after a disaster, protecting everything from automobiles to the world’s food supply.

About the Role:
An Understory Data Scientist assists in the analysis of weather station and air quality sensor data to improve our understanding of weather and air quality. They work closely with engineers and software developers to advance pattern detection algorithms, data analysis, prototyping systems, and large-scale applications that help produce interesting and meaningful weather products for our customers.

Core Responsibilities Will Include:
○ Use geospatial analytics on lots of new and unique data to answer questions from clients and the business
○ Analyze client and business needs and provide data-based recommendations
○ Leverage brand new data to advance our understanding of severe weather and its impacts on people and property
○ Build production-ready models using data from Understory’s networks
○ Incorporate new findings with current weather models to improve them
○ Work with our software team to explore the usefulness and usability of high-density data

About You:
○ Master’s in mathematics, computer science, finance, economics, or science-related field, or equivalent professional experience
○ 1+ years of experience in commercial data analysis or machine learning
○ Experience in algorithm development with Python, Matlab, R regression analysis, cohort analysis, clustering, predictive models, and machine learning
○ Experience with information retrieval and geospatial analysis fundamentals
○ Familiarity with state-of-the-art machine learning algorithms
○ Comfortable working with UNIX-based systems
○ Independent with the ability to work well as part of a team
○ Comfortable in a fast-paced and dynamic professional environment
Compensation Includes:
Competitive salary
Company equity
Health benefits 100% covered for your entire family
Dental and vision benefits 100% covered for your entire family
Unlimited vacation policy
Frequent company and team-building events
Lots of company swag",4.5,"Understory
4.5",Remote,-1,1 to 50 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
241,Data Scientist,-1,"Want to use your expertise and help people around the world further their education?

As a Data Scientist, you will help analyze Plexuss' product and UX data to build and grow an engaging platform for students and higher education institutions worldwide. The analysis you deliver will strategically advance how Plexuss ideates, builds, measures, and improves its website and mobile app. You will use your quantitative skills to analyze disparate data sources (both qualitative and quantitative) to present comprehensive views of customer experience. You will continue to build models and look for opportunities to iteratively improve the Plexuss user experience.

We are a strong believer that cultural fit is a strong contributor to long term employee contentment. Help us determine if this role is a good fit for you by completing our mandatory hiring questionnaire(this takes less than five minutes to complete):

https://www.surveymonkey.com/r/33CSHZY
Key Competencies and Responsibilities*
Interacts with design, marketing, and other stakeholders to identify questions and issues for data analysis and experiments.
Designs, develops, and programs methods, processes, and systems to consolidate and analyze unstructured data sources to generate actionable insights and solutions to improve the Plexuss user experience.
Develops and codes software programs, algorithms and automated processes to cleanse, integrate and evaluate large datasets from multiple disparate sources.
Identifies meaningful insights from large data and metadata sources; interprets and communicates insights and findings from analysis and experiments.
Develop (machine learning) algorithms that provide meaningful recommendations to our users, ultimately shaping their college planning process.
Education and Experience Requirements*
Bachelor's Degree in a quantitative field. Social Science / Art / Humanities double majors are especially encouraged to apply.
Strong quantitative analytical skills; with statistical analysis competence in techniques such as correlation, regression, KPI metric development, segmentation modeling and algorithms
Fluent in either Python or R, has experience working with cloud-based computing platforms and big data tools.
Strong command of SQL (we use MySQL)
Experience in data mining, advanced data manipulation, machine learning and statistical analysis.
Experience with data visualization
Knowledge of Elastic Search
Strong verbal and written communication skills to present analysis and insights including trends and opportunities to stakeholders and the business
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
License:
Hiring Questionnaire Completed (Required)",4.7,"Plexuss
4.7","Walnut Creek, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
242,"Environmental Scientists, Geologists, or Environmental Engineers - Entry to 4 Years Experience",$56k-$83k (Glassdoor Est.),"Work for an Industry Leader
Challenging Projects & Dynamic Work Environment
Extensive Training Program
Community Service Opportunities

Langan is an award-winning ENR Top 500 Design Firm that offers integrated engineering and environmental services for both public and private sector clients at sites located throughout the United States and abroad. Langan receives numerous recognitions for its technical expertise as well as its work environment, including “Best Places to Work” by NJBIZ, Zweig Group’s “Hot Firm” and ranked “Best Firm to Work For” in four categories, “Best Places to Work in Pennsylvania” by Best Companies Group and Pittsburgh Business Times “Best Places to Work in Western PA”, “Top Engineering Firm” by both San Francisco Business Times and Silicon Valley Business Journal. Visit our website for more information about our awards and recognitions.

Langan offers its employees opportunities that provide challenge and responsibility within an environment where they can grow and flourish! Join our team of industry leaders and make a difference on some of the most exciting and interesting projects in the field!

Langan has openings for Environmental Scientists, Geologists, or Environmental Engineers - Entry to 4 Years Experience in our New York, NY office. As the successful candidate, you will have a positive, can-do attitude in performing: environmental site investigation and remediation work; soil and groundwater sampling; vapor intrusion investigation; remedial investigation, design, implementation, and monitoring; drilling supervision; pilot tests; data management, processing and evaluation; and report preparation. In addition, possession of a strong technical education, professional demeanor, and desire to learn is essential.

Job Requirements:
Bachelor's degree in Environmental Engineering, Environmental Science, or Geology required, Master's degree preferred;
FE/EIT certification preferred;
Related local (New York State and/or New York City) environmental experience with a knowledge and understanding of local environmental regulations preferred;
Knowledge of groundwater flow and LNAPL/DNAPL behavior preferred;
Experience in preparing field documentation, project specifications, and reports;
Working knowledge of computers and AutoCAD design software; GIS a plus;
Strong attention to detail with excellent analytical, judgment, and problem-solving capabilities;
Demonstrated ability to follow direction and work in a team environment;
Excellent written and verbal communication and organizational skills;
40-hour OSHA HAZWOPER certification preferred; and
Position requires work Monday through Friday with occasional evenings and weekends.
We offer competitive compensation packages; full-time employment company paid medical, dental, and vision coverage; life insurance, short- and long-term disability insurance; 401(k)/Roth with company match; extensive training; buddy and mentoring programs; employee referral and professional license bonuses; educational reimbursement; and much more!

Equal Opportunity Employer",4.2,"Langan Engineering and Environmental Services
4.2","New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1970,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
243,Data Scientist - Business Growth,$112k-$181k (Glassdoor Est.),"JD.COM Silicon Valley R&D Center is looking for an exceptional self-motivated data scientist to join our Business Growth Business Unit. Business Growth Business Unit owns the marketing and advertising technology platform of JD.COM. As a data scientist, you will be able to work on data generated by billions of advertising views and hundreds of millions of JD.COM's active users and customers; your work will have a direct impact on customers' shop experience within and outside JD.COM. Also, you will closely work with a group of energetic and dynamic research scientists and data scientists from diverse backgrounds (Operations Research, Economics, Computer science, Mathematics and etc.) to tackle challenging strategic marketing problems and build cutting-edge data-driven marketing solutions and products to optimize and improve the marketing efficiency and the growth of JD.COM's marketing and advertising technology platform. To build these solutions and products, you will develop data pipelines to integrate large-scale customer and marketing information, discover key business insights from data, and build and improve models to predict and estimate core marketing variables. About the team: The role is under the Customer Asset and Marketing Resource Analytics (CAMRA) team. We focus on developing analytical technologies to provide actionable business insights and automated solutions in order to enhance the efficiency of marketing resources management for marketers on JD platform (incl. external advertisers, sellers as well as internal marketing and customer management teams), with the ultimate goal to acquire, retain and grow customer asset. Responsibilities: Work with research scientists and data scientists to build innovative and scalable marketing solutions and products to improve the marketing efficiency of the platform Dive into various data sources across JD.COM and build data pipelines to integrate key customer, marketing, and advertising data. Apply data mining, quantitative analysis, and visualization techniques to provide key business insights into our marketing platform, examine our marketing solutions and products, and find areas of improvement. Develop statistical models for estimate and predict key marketing variables as a core element in our marketing solutions and products Collaborate with product managers and engineers to facilitate the development and deployment of our marketing products Qualifications: Master or Ph.D. degree in Operations Research, Quantitative Economics, Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or other quantitative fields Hands-on experience with large scale data and computing platforms such as Hadoop, Hive and Spark Experience with data manipulation and analysis across multiple data sources using SQL Experience with scripting languages such as Python Strong data analytics skills and the ability to clearly communicate and present key data insights with both technical and non-technical teams Ability to build rigorous and robust estimation and predictive models Thrive in a fast-paced, innovative environment Excellent verbal and written communication About JD-Business Growth The Business Growth BU at JD.com was established in 2011. The engineering team is a group of dynamic geeks from world-class universities and industry-leading companies working in fields such as machine learning, analytics, statistics, NLP, information retrieval, system infrastructures, etc., based in Beijing and Mountain View, CA. We do battle every single day with some of the most significant, rewarding and fun problems in the technology industry, including but not limited to search/display, ads retrieval and recommendation, spam-traffic and click-farm detection, AI/machine learning infrastructure development, traffic and revenue prediction, ads pricing, audience expansion, etc., and we are looking to add great talent to our growing family! JD.com is an Equal Opportunity Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class.",3.6,"JD.com
3.6","Mountain View, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,"Department, Clothing, & Shoe Stores",Retail,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
244,Data Scientist,$65k-$109k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Purpose: The primary purpose of this position is to serve as the data scientist with a split portfolio between the Atlantic City office and the Austin chemistry group.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:

Performs data analytics, specifically data clean-up, data processing, predictive modeling, chemometric statistical modeling and analysis, multivariate data analysis, machine learning, and/or data mining, as related to scientific data.
Applies technical skills to plan and execute assigned project work including development of computational models, programming of detection algorithms, and machine learning.
Maintains operational capabilities of computation assets as needed by project requirements.
Leads meetings with company clients by preparing and presenting meeting materials in meetings.
Appropriately annotates project developed computer code through comments and user manuals.
Presents technical results through the drafting of technical reports.
Presents experimental results and recommended actions at internal project meetings.
Supports business development efforts as needed by drafting technical sections of proposals, providing proposal review, assessing levels of effort required to complete proposed work, and brainstorming technical solutions to client problems.
Other duties as assigned.

Required Knowledge, Skills & Abilities (KSA's):

Required KSA's
Ability to plan sequence of experiments to answer complicated technical questions
Ability to lead group of co-workers in execution of a task
Software programming proficiency with Java, C, R, Python, and/or MATLAB
Working knowledge of statistics as it applies to scientific data
Ability to communicate technical information to non-technical audiences
Team player with a positive attitude
Preferred KSA's
Department of Homeland Security Suitability
Department of Defense Secret Clearance
Working knowledge of software development practices including Agile development and Git version control
Sufficient business knowledge to support proposal efforts

Education/Experience: Incumbent professional should have a Ph.D. or master's degree in a physical science (preferably chemistry), statistics, or data science and significant experience in computer programming, computational modeling, or software development.

Certificates and Licenses: No specific certificates or licenses are required for this position.

Clearance: The ability to obtain a Secret clearance and Department of Homeland Security suitability is required for this position.

Supervisory Responsibilities: The incumbent professional may oversee junior level staff members performing tasks.

Working Conditions/ Equipment: The incumbent professional is expected to work and/or be available during regular business hours. He/she should also generally be available via e-mail or phone during non-business hours as needed to address critical issues or emergencies. He/she may be required to travel on behalf of the company up to 25%.

The above job description is not intended to be an all-inclusive list of duties and standards of the position. Incumbents will follow any other instructions and perform any other related duties, as assigned by their supervisor.",3.1,"Signature Science, LLC
3.1","Egg Harbor Township, NJ",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
245,Data Scientist,$78k-$130k (Glassdoor Est.),"Gannett Co., Inc. (NYSE: GCI) is an innovative, digitally focused media and marketing solutions company committed to strengthening communities across our network. With an unmatched reach at the national and local level, Gannett touches the lives of nearly 140 million people monthly with our Pulitzer-Prize winning content, consumer experiences and benefits, and advertiser products and services. Gannett brands include the USA TODAY and more than 260 daily local newspaper brands, digital marketing services companies ReachLocal, WordStream, and ThriveHive and U.K. media company Newsquest. There's never been a better time to join our talented team. Visit Gannett.com/Careers to learn more about our opportunities, and visit Gannett Privacy Policy to understand our privacy policy. Gannett is seeking a Data Scientist with a strong blend of technical and consultative skills to drive its digital advertising business. You will be part of a team that develops data-driven insights and product features in collaboration with stakeholders across Product and Engineering. This role has the option to work 100% remote or to be based out of our McLean, VA office (upon return to the office). Responsibilities: • Find creative uses for both structured and unstructured data ranging from ad logs to content. • Maintain and enhance current models, tools and data sources. • Consult with stakeholders to assess needs, scope projects and develop data solutions to address business pain points. • Develop and deploy models to deliver increasingly valuable, repeatable and scalable analytic solutions. The ideal candidate: • Has a passion for helping stakeholders find data solutions to business problems • Has an inquisitive mind and sound judgement when it comes to distinguishing signal from noise • Is solution oriented and can communicate with stakeholders in non-technical terms using effective data visualization, making end products engaging and user-friendly • Has demonstrated experience working autonomously to deliver timely results • Is a team player and able to build collaborative, cross-functional relationships • Has BA/BS in a quantitative field (computer science, economics, math, statistics, engineering), advanced degrees or BA/BS plus 1-2 years of relevant experience preferred Technical skills: • Proficient in Python or R and associated machine learning packages. • Project experience with one or more of the following: regression, classification, NLP, time series, deep learning, experiment design. • Solid knowledge of SQL. • Familiarity with Git and experience in deploying projects to AWS or Google Cloud a plus. • Experience or interest in digital advertising a plus. Gannett Co., Inc. is a proud equal opportunity employer. We are a drug free, EEO employer committed to a diverse workforce. We will consider all qualified candidates regardless of race, color, national origin, sex, age, marital status, personal appearance, sexual orientation, gender identity, family responsibilities, disability, education, political affiliation, or veteran status.",2.9,"Gannett
2.9","Los Angeles, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1906,Company - Public,Publishing,Media,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
246,Data Scientist,$81k-$133k (Glassdoor Est.),"Current employees and contingent workers click here to apply and search by the Job Posting Title.
iHeartMedia

Job Summary:

iHeartMedia is the number one audio company in the United States, reaching nine out of 10 Americans every month – and with its quarter of a billion monthly listeners, has a greater reach than any other media company in the U.S. The company’s leadership position in audio extends across multiple platforms including 850 live broadcast stations; streaming music, radio and on demand via its iHeartRadio digital service available across more than 250 platforms and 2,000 devices including smart speakers, digital auto dashes, tablets, wearables, smartphones, virtual assistants, TVs and gaming consoles; through its influencers; social; branded iconic live music events; and podcasts as the #1 commercial podcast publisher globally. iHeartMedia also leads the audio industry in analytics and attribution technology for its marketing partners, using data from its massive consumer base.

The Data Scientist will provide research, modeling, analysis, and guidance using Advanced Analytics and Data Science techniques to develop and support data and model-driven decision making through leading-edge business solutions. The Data Scientist will engage directly with business and technology partners to research, identify, and seek out information, facts, and data, and will conduct and promote scientific, inquisitive, and innovative approaches to business decision problems and technical solutions.

Responsibilities:
Demonstrate passion about using data assets and mathematical modeling to optimize systems, processes, and products across iHeartMedia
Use emerging tools and technology to develop advanced analytics models and automation in content programming, ad sales and operations, consumer insights, music research, audience attribution, demand and revenue forecasting, and other areas of the company
Assist or lead the formulation, calibration, validation, and implementation of predictive analytics, statistical, and machine learning models
Employ a pragmatic approach to evaluate new algorithms and technologies for positive impact within iHeartMedia
Communicate complex solutions and ideas to a variety of stakeholders (other team members, IT leadership, and business leaders) in easily understandable language
Work on a number of projects as a member of the project team and/or as an individual contributor
Write code that meets standards and delivers desired functionality using agreed upon technology
Participate in system and user acceptance testing
Participate in project planning sessions to gather user requirements
Assist in the preparation of time estimates for project schedules
Troubleshoot production problems within area of expertise
Utilize and stay current in programming languages and software technology
Qualifications:
Master’s Degree in Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Operations Research, Industrial Engineering, or a related analytical field – Ph.D. desired
3+ years of industry experience in a data science, machine learning, or predictive analytics role, formulating and implementing predictive analytics models, or in an optimization or operations research related role, formulating and implementing large-scale mathematical programming models
A demonstrable scientific foundation and understanding of concepts in area of expertise: for predictive analytics this includes theoretical statistics, estimation theory, consumer choice modeling, machine learning, etc., and for operations research this includes linear and discrete optimization, nonlinear optimization, goal programming, and metaheuristics, as well as extensive experience with algebraic modeling languages and optimization solvers such as XPRESS, CPLEX, or Gurobi
Solid programming skills in a general-purpose language and expertise in Python or R
Exceptional analytical, decision-making, and problem-solving skills as well as solid communication and presentation skills with technical and non-technical audiences
Experience and understanding of software development practice concepts and technology obtained through formal training and/or work experience
Location

San Antonio, TX: 20880 Stone Oak Parkway, 78258

Position Type

Regular

The Company is an equal opportunity employer and will not tolerate discrimination in employment on the basis of race, color, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, religion, disability, ethnicity, national origin, marital status, protected veteran status, genetic information, or any other legally protected classification or status.

Our organization participates in E-Verify. Click here to learn about E-Verify.

Current employees and contingent workers click here to apply and search by the Job Posting Title.",3.3,"iHeartMedia
3.3","Austin, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1972,Company - Public,Radio,Media,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
247,Data Scientist,-1,"At White Ops, we are all about keeping it human. We are the global leader in bot mitigation. We protect more than 200 enterprises—including the largest internet platforms—from sophisticated bots by verifying the humanity of nearly one trillion online interactions every week. The most sophisticated bots look and act like humans when they click on ads, visit websites, fill out forms, take over accounts, and commit payment fraud. We stop them.

Founded in 2012 in a Brooklyn sci-fi bookstore, our Bot Mitigation Platform protects enterprises from the sophisticated bots that threaten them. It's an ongoing war that we fight passionately every day. Join our mission to stop bots, disrupt the economics of cyber crime, and keep it human.

The Data Science team at White Ops is building the algorithms that run behind the scenes and power our bot detection engine. We deploy state-of-the-art statistical and machine learning models at a massive scale that distinguish human activity from automated bots.

What you'll do:
Develop algorithms (i.e. rule based, statistical, machine learning) that automatically detect emerging threats
Evaluate and implement data analysis strategies to improve detection efficacy at internet-scale
Ad hoc investigations to respond to emerging threats with velocity and quality
Collaborate with product, engineering, customer success, to define and develop new product features that will delight our customers
Research for case studies and white papers on bot detection
Contribute to toolkits and platforms that scale detection analytics
Who you are:
You have a strong sense of ownership which drives you to find ways to do things better, faster, and cheaper
You look to find new and innovative ways to solve complex problems through rigorous experimentation, all by yourself
You are open, transparent and work in tight collaboration with anyone
You constantly drive for correctness and performance, in that order
You are a data scientist, analyst, engineer and have solved difficult problems to prove it
You have proficiency with SQL, Python
You have familiarity with tools, libraries and platforms such as Jupyter notebooks, Pandas, NumPy etc
Track record of independent, creative problem solving with large amounts of complex data
Knowledge of how the Internet works
Comfort with ad tech terminology
Background in data science for security is a plus
Knowledge of how web browsers work is a plus
Benefits and Perks
Unlimited vacation policy
Stock options, 401(k), and commuter benefits
Competitive salary and benefits
Medical and dental insurance for all full-time employees
Fully paid parental leave
Professional development fund
Great coaching from senior leaders and challenging development opportunities
Life at White Ops:

Our HQ office is located in the heart of New York City. We are growing the company deliberately with a keen eye towards maintaining a culture that values diversity, lifestyle, and career growth. We are doing meaningful work and we need people to join our mighty team. We are proud of our overwhelmingly positive presence on Glassdoor and Built in NYC. We have offices located in NYC, DC, Victoria, and London.",3.8,"White Ops
3.8",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
248,Data Scientist,$59k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"Cognizant continuously seek outstanding associates when recruiting new employees. We pride ourselves on having extensive experience working with clients in all major markets. Cognizant's delivery model is infused with a distinct culture of high customer happiness. We consistently deliver positive relationships, cost reductions and business results. Roles and Responsibilities
Works with the business team to identify the right business problem, gather the requirements and data required to answer the same
Undertaking data collection preprocessing, analysis and Data exploration
Building models to address business problems
Presenting information using data visualization techniques
hypothesis testing and statistical modeling are part of daily activities
Involved in development testing evaluation and optimization of models developed
Analyzes data and generates insights that can be articulated to business stakeholders Qualification
Experience in application development creating Kafka streams and APIs writing python scripts
Strong in Python Experience with Agile methodology preferred
Build business cases around Account Opening & Funding processes and experience in Insurance and Finance domains
Strong academic credentials in economics, mathematics, statistics or a science field Computer Science, IT Operations Research, Applied Math, Engineering, Statistics
Employee Status : Full Time Employee
Shift : Day Job
Travel : No
Job Posting : Oct 14 2020

About Cognizant Cognizant (Nasdaq-100: CTSH) is one of the world's leading professional services companies, transforming clients' business, operating and technology models for the digital era. Our unique industry-based, consultative approach helps clients envision, build and run more innovative and efficient businesses. Headquartered in the U.S., Cognizant is ranked 194 on the Fortune 500 and is consistently listed among the most admired companies in the world. Learn how Cognizant helps clients lead with digital at www.cognizant.com or follow us @USJobsCognizant.

Cognizant is recognized as a Military Friendly Employer and is a coalition member of the Veteran Jobs Mission. Our Cognizant Veterans Network assists Veterans in building and growing a career at Cognizant that allows them to leverage the leadership, loyalty, integrity, and commitment to excellence instilled in them through participation in military service.
Cognizant is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected Veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.
If you have a disability that requires a reasonable accommodation to search for a job opening or submit an application, please email CareersNA2@cognizant.com with your request and contact information.",3.7,"Cognizant Technology Solutions
3.7","Charlotte, NC",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,-1,-1,$10+ billion (USD),-1
249,Data Scientist,$60k-$103k (Glassdoor Est.),"We have an opportunity for a Data Scientist to join our talented Data Analytics team. The successful candidate will work with customers and the engagement team to support the project management, project data analysis, process improvement, data conversion, and integration needs of our federal customer.

Typical responsibilities include
Collecting large sets of structured and unstructured data from disparate sources.
Cleaning and validating data to ensure accuracy, completeness, and uniformity.
Analyzing data to identify patterns and trends.
Developing solutions and integrating, extending, and contributing to Open Source software
Devising and applying models and algorithms to mine the stores of big data.
Interpreting data to discover solutions and opportunities.
Requirements
Active Secret Clearance
Strong client engagement skills
Experience with languages such as Python, R, SAS, and SQL
Experience with version control systems, including Github or Gitlab
Experience with designing, developing, and deploying analytic software and algorithms
BS degree in Physics, Computer Science, Mathematics, or another quantitative discipline
Desired skills
Experience with open source Big Data tools including Apache Spark or Apache NiFi
Experience with entity resolution
Experience with Natural Language Processing using modern deep learning techniques
Benefits

Perks of working at NetImpact Strategies:
Your health comes first – we offer comprehensive medical, dental, & vision insurance that starts the first of the month after you join the team
Invest in your future – 401(k) Plan – Immediately vested employer contributions; no matching required
Work hard, play hard – we offer a generous Paid Time Off (PTO) policy and observe ALL ten (10) federal holidays
Pawsitively pawesome – Pet Insurance (because our little critters are part of our families, too!)
Invest in your education – Tuition reimbursement, internal training programs, & company-sponsored industry certifications
Be part of a dynamic and collaborative work environment recently ranked by The Washington Post as a Top Work Place in 2019!
Have fun and celebrate and give back – Team building activities, community volunteering, quarterly HQ days, & an offsite annual awards banquet
ABOUT US

NetImpact Strategies specializes in Strategy and Business Transformation, IT Modernization, Data-Driven Intelligence, Cloud Services, and Cybersecurity. We are a team of skilled Consultants who listen to our clients’ needs. We design and implement comprehensive, tailored solutions that are both mindful of the client's culture and organizational dynamics. As mission needs change, new priorities emerge, technologies advance, and methodologies evolve; NetImpact stands out as a trusted advisor that can solve the challenges of today while looking for the opportunities of tomorrow. Our professionals stay abreast of these changes to provide agile, outcome-focused results for federal agency strategic and tactical needs. Approaching engagements as a partner, we provide solutions that empower our clients to achieve results that align with their mission and strategic vision.

ACCESSIBILITY NOTE

NetImpact Strategies is committed to complying with all applicable provisions of the Americans with Disabilities Act, as amended (“ADA”), and applicable state and local laws. It is NetImpact’s policy not to discriminate against any qualified person or applicant with regard to any terms or conditions of employment on the basis of such individual’s disability. Consistent with this policy of non-discrimination, NetImpact will provide reasonable accommodations to an individual with a disability, as defined in the ADA or applicable law, who has made NetImpact aware of his/her disability, unless doing so would cause undue hardship to NetImpact. If you are an applicant and need a reasonable accommodation when applying for job opportunities within NetImpact, or request a reasonable accommodation to utilize NetImpact’s online employment application, please contact careers@netimpactstrategies.com.

EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER

NetImpact is committed to the development of a creative, diverse, and inclusive work environment. In order to provide equal employment and advancement opportunities to all individuals, employment decisions at NetImpact will be based on merit, qualifications, and abilities. NetImpact does not discriminate against any person because of race, color, creed, religion, sex (including gender identity, sexual orientation, and pregnancy), marital status, national origin, disability, age, veteran status, genetic information or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, and local laws (referred to as ""protected status"").",4.1,"NetImpact Strategies
4.1","Vienna, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
250,Data Scientist,$110k-$155k (Glassdoor Est.),"Title: Data Scientist
Location: Oakland, CA 94612
Duration: Contract
Job Description:
Client is in the middle of modernizing many of the IT infrastructure systems and business applications.
Importantly, the District is implementing a new Computer-Aided Dispatch and Automated Vehicle Location (CAD/AVL) system.
All the District 635 buses are equipped with the latest and the greatest mobile edge computing and 4G network devices.
From this new implementation, client will begin to receive larger datasets than before.
The polling rate for the new system for each bus has increased from 1 minute to 15 seconds, bringing in more vehicle location, telemetry data and historical data.
Outside of the primary CAD/AVL data, onboard integration will bring in data from the client Signal Priority, Farebox, Digital Video Recorders, and Automatic Passenger Counter systems.
This new influx of Big Data, Artificial intelligence (AI), Machine learning, and the Internet of Things (IoT) will require a Data Scientist, an architect that will design and implement an infrastructure to handle the influx of huge volume of data.
Roles & Responsibilities:
The candidate will become familiar with the various modules of the new CAD/AVL, as well as data from the existing transit system and Data warehouse to make recommendations on the appropriate data ingestion and integration standards, practices, and tools.
In the intent on sharing data with the public or internally, this position will assist the IT management to implement the data governance plan and open data platform.
Required Experience:
The position must have experience in Team Data Science Process (TDSP), moving data to Azure Data Lake and analytics using U-SQL.
Required Skills:
This position will require data science skills such as Statistics, Machine Learning, Multivariable Calculus & Linear Algebra, data wrangling & intuition, and data visualization & communication.
About our Company: -

22nd Century technologies is a Minority (MBE) that supports demanding staffing programs for Corporations and State and Local Government Agencies. Its journey began in 1997 by supporting large Federal contracts which nudged us in the direction of creating large candidate pools across the country. Over the last 20 years, we have built a strong business model that is carefully constructed to deliver on multiple facets. We have proven past performance of providing services that exceed our clients' expectations. Today 22nd Century technologies supports clients in all 50 states and has grown to be a company that is trusted and sought for providing a complex mix of workforce solutions. With a firm grip on the entire spectrum of staffing solutions, we have placed more than 500,000 skilled resources and delivered 15 million+ man-hours.
“22nd Century Technologies is an Equal Opportunity Employer"" and “US Citizens & all other parties authorized to work in the US are encouraged to apply.""",3.4,"22nd Century Technologies
3.4","Oakland, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
251,Data Scientist,$90k-$146k (Glassdoor Est.),"Your Mission

As a Data Scientist in Mobileum you will work within the Engineering Risk BU and you will contribute to the evolution of Mobileum Active Intelligence platform with improved analytics capabilities to deliver telecom-industry leading data analytics and machine learning platform. You will work integrated in the ML and Analytics team wrangling data problems from identifying data requirements to implementing analytics and machine learning solutions from experiments into production pipelines.

This position will be based in Braga and/or Lisbon.

WHAT WE ARE LOOKING FOR

To join our team, YOU must HAVE:
A degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or similar;
3+ years of experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models;
Experience in developing and deploy production ML pipelines;
Good applied statistics skills, such as distributions, statistical testing, regression, etc;
Experience using statistical computer languages (Python, SQL, etc.) to manipulate data and extract insights from large data sets;
Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms and their real-world advantages/drawbacks, such as k-NN, Naive Bayes, SVM, XGBoost, Decision Forests, Autoenconders, LSTMs, AutoML, etc;
knowledge on design and optimizing outlier models is a plus;
Experience with common data science toolkits, such as R, NumPy, Scikit-learn, PyOD etc ;
Experience with data visualisation tools, such as GGplot, Matplotlib, Seaborn, etc
Good scripting and programming skills using languages like Python and Java
Experience on using technologies such like SOAP, REST APIs, XML, Spark, Hive;
Linux knowledge and shell scripting programming;
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques
Read, write and talk English every day in a multi-cultural environment.


And YOU must BE:
Be a practical and results oriented person;
Be available to travel;
Enjoy designing and implement new products;
Methodical;
Be product but also customer oriented;
Enjoy challenges;
If you feel that you've got what it takes to work with us and want to join a young and dynamic team, APPLY NOW!!!

Your Mission

As a Data Scientist in Mobileum you will work within the Engineering Risk BU and you will contribute to the evolution of Mobileum Active Intelligence platform with improved analytics capabilities to deliver telecom-industry leading data analytics and machine learning platform. You will work integrated in the ML and Analytics team wrangling data problems from identifying data requirements to implementing analytics and machine learning solutions from experiments into production pipelines.

This position will be based in Braga and/or Lisbon.

WHAT WE ARE LOOKING FOR

To join our team, YOU must HAVE:
A degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or similar;
3+ years of experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models;
Experience in developing and deploy production ML pipelines;
Good applied statistics skills, such as distributions, statistical testing, regression, etc;
Experience using statistical computer languages (Python, SQL, etc.) to manipulate data and extract insights from large data sets;
Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms and their real-world advantages/drawbacks, such as k-NN, Naive Bayes, SVM, XGBoost, Decision Forests, Autoenconders, LSTMs, AutoML, etc;
knowledge on design and optimizing outlier models is a plus;
Experience with common data science toolkits, such as R, NumPy, Scikit-learn, PyOD etc ;
Experience with data visualisation tools, such as GGplot, Matplotlib, Seaborn, etc
Good scripting and programming skills using languages like Python and Java
Experience on using technologies such like SOAP, REST APIs, XML, Spark, Hive;
Linux knowledge and shell scripting programming;
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques
Read, write and talk English every day in a multi-cultural environment.


And YOU must BE:
Be a practical and results oriented person;
Be available to travel;
Enjoy designing and implement new products;
Methodical;
Be product but also customer oriented;
Enjoy challenges;
If you feel that you've got what it takes to work with us and want to join a young and dynamic team, APPLY NOW!!!",3.2,"Mobileum
3.2","Cupertino, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
252,Data Scientist,$89k-$150k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position â Data Scientist

Location â Phoenix AZ

Position â Fulltime/Permanent with us

Please let me know the salary you are expecting per year

Â

JD:

Â

Data Scientist

Job Description: Looking for Data Scientist having experience in developing and operationalizing AI/ML models. The ideal candidate should have strong programing experience in Python and Spark..

Â

Responsibilities:

Â
Perform data modelling using advanced statistical analysis, unstructured data processing and developing predictive models.
Implement statistical and data mining techniques e.g hypothesis testing, machine learning and retrieval processes on a large amount of data to identify trends, patterns and other retrieval information.
Implement different machine learning techniques: Generalized Linear and Non- Linear models, Time Series Analysis, Random Forest, Gradient Boosted Machines, Text Mining, Deep Learning, Neural Networks, Supervised and Unsupervised methods using python and spark.
Lead the development of high -performance algorithms for predictive analytics, Testing and implementing these algorithms in scalable, product-ready code
Work with machine learning frameworks such as Scikit-Learn, H2O, Keras, TensorFlow.
Perform model evaluation, tuning and performance and scalability of scientific techniques and communicate the findings
Â

Technology Skillset required:
? Python
? Spark
? Pyspark
? HIVE
? SQL
Â

Good to have
? Neural Networking
? H2O
? Keras
? TensorFlow",4.3,"Softcom Systems
4.3","Phoenix, AZ",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
253,Data Scientist,$68k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"Address:

790 N Water Street

Job Family Group:

Data Analytics & Reporting

The Data Scientist, Anti-Money Laundering (AML) Modeling and Machine Learning position will be responsible for the design, development, and deployment of AML models for transaction monitoring. This position supports the ongoing efforts of the U.S. AML Office to develop leading edge models that employ traditional quantitative techniques, and state-of-the-art machine learning algorithms and technologies.

Responsibilities include data preparation and analysis, construction of machine learning solutions to extract meaningful insights within transactional activity, and summarizing findings into concise language for AML management. The successful candidate will provide subject matter expertise in methods used for the detection of suspicious activity, and in identifying red flags related to transactional activity, which are the foundation of AML transaction monitoring. The Data Scientist will also be responsible for developing and maintaining required model documentation in support of model development and validation activities.

Key Accountabilities
Assess the quality of the data for model development.
Assist in the research and design of transactional and informational data elements required during the development of new suspicious activity monitoring methods.
Perform statistical analysis of transactional data utilized within automated AML monitoring applications.
Analyze the effectiveness of automated monitoring methods and provide recommendations for improvement based on identified risk and control gaps.
Design, develop, and deploy machine learning solutions to detect suspicious activity.
Develop insights from transactional activity and model output and summarize findings into a business level sense to AML management.
Assist in preparing model documentation to support the model development/validation process.
Authorities
Provide and recommend actions to mitigate risk and use judgment-based decision-making regarding AML policies and procedures.
Use and access confidential information related to customer information, product and financial information while adhering to corporate standards for dealing with that type of data.
Cross Functional Relationships
AML Team (CAMLO Office, FIU, Enterprise AML Modeling and Data Governance)
Product Groups
Line Of Business' (AMLRO's)
Model Risk Vetting Group
Technology & Operations
Qualifications and Skills

Basic Qualifications
Undergraduate degree required. Advanced degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering, Computer Science, Data Science or related field preferred
3+ years of experience in data extraction, manipulation, analysis, modeling, and reporting
3+ years of experience in machine learning including unsupervised and supervised algorithms
Experience with Python, R, SAS, SQL, and Datameer
Preferred Qualifications
Extensive hands-on experience with Python and SQL is HIGHLY preferred
Knowledge of anti-money laundering related requirements
Prior experience in financial crime, risk assessments
Prior AML experience
Skills
Analytic Thinking In-depth
Data Mining & Modeling In-depth
Problem Solving In-depth
Communication In-depth
Applied Innovation Working
Risk Management Working
Project Management Working
Managerial Leadership Working
We’re here to help

At BMO Harris Bank we are driven by a shared Purpose: Boldly Grow the Good in business and life. It calls on us to create lasting, positive change for our customers, our communities and our people. By working together, innovating and pushing boundaries, we transform lives and businesses, and power economic growth around the world.

As a member of the BMO Harris Bank team you are valued, respected and heard, and you have more ways to grow and make an impact. We strive to help you make an impact from day one – for yourself and our customers. We’ll support you with the tools and resources you need to reach new milestones, as you help our customers reach theirs. From in-depth training and coaching, to manager support and network-building opportunities, we’ll help you gain valuable experience, and broaden your skillset.

To find out more visit us at https://bmoharriscareers.com.

BMO Harris Bank is committed to an inclusive, equitable and accessible workplace. By learning from each other’s differences, we gain strength through our people and our perspectives. BMO Harris Bank N.A. is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected Veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law. Accommodations are available on request for candidates taking part in all aspects of the selection process. To request accommodation, please contact your recruiter.",3.7,"BMO Financial Group
3.7","Milwaukee, WI",-1,10000+ Employees,1817,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
254,Data Scientist,$92k-$150k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position:
Data Scientist

Job Description:

Black Knight is the premier provider of integrated technology, services, data and analytics that lenders and servicers look to first to help successfully manage the entire loan life cycle. Our deep understanding of regulatory and compliance issues complements the knowledge, technology and solutions we offer to help our clients achieve their business goals. Black Knight offers leading software systems; data and analytics offerings; and information solutions that facilitate and automate many of the business processes across the mortgage life cycle.

Black Knight’s Innovation Lab, HeavyWater, is team of 15+ developers and product enthusiasts engineering a next generation Artificially Intelligent Virtual Assistant known as AIVA. AIVA works alongside operators, loan officers and lenders to make their jobs more efficient.

Our team employs leading-edge cloud computing technology and leverage Amazon Web Services to build AIVA’s infrastructure. Her make-up is well beyond mainstream workflow automation/RPA . We’re continuously training AIVA’s lexicon to give her context what she’s studying. We tinker with algorithms and build deep learning networks to fortify her skill sets as she reads through bank statements, pay stubs, W2s and more. Most importantly, we capitalize on HUGE data sets from our enterprise clients so we can optimize our feature selection at scale.

JOB FAMILY DESCRIPTION

Data Scientists are responsible for analyzing data to gain insights to benefit the enterprise. Uses large data sets to find opportunities for product and process optimization and uses models to test the effectiveness of different courses of action. Responsible for using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations. Use a flexible, analytical approach to design, develop, and evaluate predictive models and advanced algorithms that lead to optimal value extraction from the data. Drives business results with data-based insights and discovers solutions hidden in large data sets improve business outcomes.

GENERAL DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES

Works with stakeholders throughout the organization to identify opportunities for leveraging company data to drive business solutions.
Mines and analyzes data from company databases to drive optimization and improvement of product development, marketing techniques and business strategies.
Assesses the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques.
Develops custom data models and algorithms to apply to data sets.
Uses predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, revenue generation, ad targeting and other business outcomes.
Develops a testing framework and test model quality.
Coordinates with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes.
Develops processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy.
Performs other related duties as required.

EDUCATIONAL GUIDELINES

Bachelor’s degree in Mathematics, Finance or the equivalent combination of education, training, or work experience. Master’s degree or PHD in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or another quantitative field is strongly preferred.

GENERAL KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS & ABILITIES

Experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models
Knowledge and experience in statistical and data mining techniques
Experience using statistical computer languages (Pig, Python, SQL, etc.) to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications strongly preferred.
Experience working with and creating data architectures strongly preferred.
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks a plus.
Experience creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms and statistics: regression, simulation, scenario analysis, modeling, clustering, decision trees, neural networks, etc. a plus.
Strong problem solving skills with an emphasis on product development preferred.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills for coordinating across teams
Coding knowledge and experience with several languages: C, C++, Java, JavaScript, etc. a plus.
Experience analyzing data from 3rd party providers such as Google Analytics, Site Catalyst, Coremetrics, Adwords, Crimson Hexagon, etc. a plus.
Experience with distributed data/computing tools such as Map/Reduce, Hadoop, Hive, Spark, MySQL, etc a plus.
Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders using tools such as Periscope, Business Objects, D3, etc. a plus.

JOB FAMILY LEVEL

Intermediate professional level role. Works with financial models of increasing complexity using advanced mathematical, analytical or econometric tools. Defines and discerns key aspects of problems that require intricate analysis and research, and develops complex solutions within a broad technical and business context. Works on small to large, complex projects that require increased skill in multiple technical environments. Works on multiple projects as a project team member or sometimes as a project lead. May coach more junior technical staff. Typically requires five (5) or more years of related work experience in developing mathematical formulas, algorithms and computer programs to create complex models of market trends and risks.

Black Knight is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, age, and protected veteran or military family status. Our employees’ diversity is our strength, and when we embrace our differences, it makes us better and brighter. Black Knight’s commitment to inclusion is at the core of who we are, and motivates us in how we do business each and every day.

Location:
Philadelphia, PA

Time Type:
Full time",3.2,"Black Knight
3.2","Philadelphia, PA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,2013,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
255,Data Scientist,$91k-$145k (Glassdoor Est.),"What We Do:
Data Scientists at the SEI use advanced analytics, data science, artificial intelligence, and machine learning to help our government and industry clients research and solve cyber security challenges. In this role, you will work with our customers to identify areas where advanced statistical techniques can help tackle problems, plan and develop prototype solutions, and build out final products. You'll get a chance to work with elite cyber security professionals and university faculty to build new technologies that will influence national cyber security strategy for decades to come. You will co-author research proposals, execute studies, and present findings to DoD sponsors and at academic conferences.

Our team works on a wide range of projects. Some of our current work includes developing metrics and experimental designs for large-scale cyber security research programs, researching human-in-the-loop machine learning, and building classifiers to identify security vulnerabilities in code. Additionally, we have burgeoning work in deep fake video creation and detection, quantum computing, and natural language processing. We have access to a wide variety of cyber-related data, including malware samples, netflow data, cyber security training runs and tests, incident tickets, and more. If you are a data science or statistics expert with an interest in cyber security, we want to hear from you!

Requirements:


BS in data science, machine learning, computer science, statistics, or related highly-quantitative discipline with eight (8) years of experience or equivalent combination of training or experience; or MS in data science, machine learning, computer science, statistics, or related highly-quantitative discipline with five (5) years of experience; or PhD in data science, machine learning, computer science, statistics, or related highly-quantitative discipline with two (2) years of experience.
Willingness to complete modest travel to various locations to support the SEI’s overall mission.
You will be subject to a background check and will need to obtain and maintain a U.S. Department of Defense security clearance.

Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
Deep understanding of statistical modeling techniques and advanced data analytics
Proficient with at least one mathematical/statistical programming package (e.g., R, python numpy/scipy/pandas, MATLAB, etc.)
Expertise in one or more of the following: machine learning techniques (e.g., K-means, SVM, neural networks), quantum computing, deep fake videos, cryptography, data visualization, natural language processing
Innovative and inquisitive with ability to imagine novel analytical solutions to problems
Thrives in a multi-disciplinary environment
Strong communication skills

Desired Experience:
Experience in predictive modeling, data science, or machine learning
Experience applying software engineering techniques in solution development
Experience in cybersecurity and privacy is a plus
Demonstrated ability to learn new concepts and grow into new areas of work
Experience supporting test and evaluation for large-scale government research programs is a plus

More Information

Please visit “Why Carnegie Mellon” to learn more about becoming part of an institution inspiring innovations that change the world.
A listing of employee benefits is available at: www.cmu.edu/jobs/benefits-at-a-glance/.

Carnegie Mellon University is an Equal Opportunity Employer/Disability/Veteran.",3.0,"Software Engineering Institute
3.0","Pittsburgh, PA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1984,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
256,"Data Scientist, Analytics",$108k-$174k (Glassdoor Est.),"Facebook's mission is to give people the power to build community and bring the world closer together. Through our family of apps and services, we're building a different kind of company that connects billions of people around the world, gives them ways to share what matters most to them, and helps bring people closer together. Whether we're creating new products or helping a small business expand its reach, people at Facebook are builders at heart. Our global teams are constantly iterating, solving problems, and working together to empower people around the world to build community and connect in meaningful ways. Together, we can help people build stronger communities - we're just getting started.

Were looking for Data Scientists to work on our core and business products (ex. Instagram, Messaging, Growth, Engagement, Ads) to help shape the future of what we build at Facebook. You will enjoy working with one of the richest data sets in the world, cutting edge technology, and the ability to see your insights turned into real products on a regular basis. The perfect candidate will have a background in a quantitative or technical field, will have experience working with large data sets, and will have some experience in data-driven decision making. You are focused on results, a self-starter, and have demonstrated success in using analytics to drive the understanding, growth, and success of a product.
Apply your expertise in quantitative analysis, data mining, and the presentation of data to see beyond the numbers and understand how our users interact with both our consumer and business products
Partner with Product and Engineering teams to solve problems and identify trends and opportunities
Inform, influence, support, and execute our product decisions and product launches
The Data Scientist Analytics role has work across the following four areas:
Product Operations: Forecasting and setting product team goals, designing and evaluating experiments, monitoring key product metrics, understanding root causes of changes in metrics, building and analyzing dashboards and reports, building key data sets to empower operational and exploratory analysis, and evaluating and defining metrics
Exploratory Analysis: proposing what to build in the next roadmap, understanding ecosystems, user behaviors, and long-term trends, identifying new levers to help move key metric, and building models of user behaviors for analysis or to power production systems
Product Leadership: influencing product teams through presentation of data-based recommendations, communicating state of business, experiment results, etc. to product teams and spreading best practices to analytics and product teams
Data Infrastructure: working in Hadoop and Hive primarily, sometimes MySQL, Oracle, and Vertica, and automating analyses and authoring pipelines via SQL and Python based ETL framework
2+ years experience doing quantitative analysis within a large-scale company or fast-paced environment
BA/BS in Computer Science, Math, Physics, Engineering, Statistics or other technical field
Experience in SQL or other programming languages
Development experience in any scripting language (PHP, Python, Perl, etc.)
Experience communicating the results of analyses with product and leadership teams to influence the strategy of the product
Knowledge of statistics (e.g. hypothesis testing, regressions)
Experience manipulating data sets through statistical software (e.g. R, SAS) or other methods
Advanced degrees
Experience with distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop)
Experience working within the tech sector preferred
Facebook is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law.Facebook is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.",4.5,"Facebook
4.5","Menlo Park, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2004,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
257,Data Scientist,-1,"About Us: We make software that anyone can mold and shape to take on every challenge — from taking personal notes to running large companies. We've been building together since 2016 and are trusted by customers including Nike, Airbnb, Slack, Samsung, and more. We're excited to be growing a team as diverse and creative as the millions of people we reach worldwide, and a company where everyone can thrive. About The Role: Do you want to help define what data means at Notion? As one of our first Data Scientists, you'll be instrumental in setting what our data strategy looks like as we grow the business, and then doing the hands on work to execute against it. There will be significant variation from one day to the next, but whether you're exploring what a successful Notion account looks like, building out a core activity data set, or creating a model to deliver leads to the sales team, you'll absolutely be having impact on the direction of the business. What You'll Do: You'll set the foundation for what data means at Notion, determining how we balance product intuition with analytical rigor. You'll build data pipelines that transform messy raw data into tables that are reliable, broadly useful, and clear. (We currently use DBT, Snowflake, Mode Analytics, Fivetran, Census, Amplitude, Segment, and more). You'll collaborate with team leads across the business to understand and support their data needs. You'll design and enact the process for using statistical inference to evaluate the success of changes, from product launches to marketing campaigns. You'll build models to understand and predict things like user growth, product engagement, conversion, churn, and more. You'll build and maintain KPI dashboards that teams rely on for making key decisions. You'll communicate your findings with the rest of the company, and drive and verify change in our product and business (Insights are useful. Impact is even better!) What We're Looking For: You've spent meaningful time as a data scientist. You are a SQL expert. You have no problem regularly leveraging window functions, UDFs, self-joins, and other complex SQL functions to accomplish your data analysis goals. You have expertise in at least one scripting language (ideally Python or R). You know how to use statistical inference to drive product and business recommendations. You have experience building predictive models, and you know how to evaluate their effectiveness. You have a bias for using the right tools to get a job done with maximum efficiency. You have experience making tradeoffs between speed and accuracy. You have strong product sense and user intuition which inform the questions you ask of the data you are analyzing. Bonus Points: You have led or managed a Data Science team. You have led initiatives across multiple product areas and communicated findings with leadership and product teams. You have worked at a fast-growing start-up. You have experience building out data infrastructure that facilitates speed, reliability, and scalability. You have prior experience with data-distributed tools (Scalding, Hadoop, Pig, etc) and statistical libraries.",4.0,"Notion
4.0","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
258,Data Scientist,$107k-$173k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


Southern California-based Karma is more than just a car company. Although we are best known as a creator of soul-stirring luxury electric vehicles, Karma has emerged as a high-tech incubator offering innovators a perfect platform to prove their emerging technologies. Every Revero is designed at our Headquarters in Irvine and created with great individual care and world-class craftsmanship at the Karma Innovation and Customization Center in Moreno Valley, CA.

The Data Scientist, reporting to the Manager, Data Sciences and Innovation, is responsible for data collection,analyze, extract, normalize, and label relevant data from multiple sources to provide interpretation andVisualizations reports around key data-driven projects.

Responsibilities
Design and build new data set processes for modeling, data mining, and production purposes.
Determine new ways to improve data and search quality, and predictive capabilities.
Perform and interpret data studies and product experiments concerning new data sources or new uses forexisting data sources.
Develop prototypes, proof of concepts, algorithms, predictive models, and custom analysis.
Create visualizations and reports to show insights obtained from data mining efforts.
Interact with multiple internal and external sources in support of ongoing and proof of concept projects.
Ensure timely, accurate and credible information is provided and interpreted and distilled into actiondriven information for diverse audiences.
Attend trade shows, conferences and learning opportunity to familiarize with the industry-leading trendsin data sciences and predictive analytics to help drive Karma’s Data sciences and technology departmentdevelopment.
Other duties, as assigned.
Qualifications


Education
A Bachelor’s degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, OperationalResearch, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.) or equivalent experience.
Required Skills
3+ years’ experience in data preparation, model creation and feature tuning.
Familiar with AWS Cloud based tool set for data storage, ETL, modelcreation and code repository.
Advanced ability to code in Python and SQL and related libraries.
Vehicle and automotive industry knowledge preferred but is not required.
Experience in implementing data sets into BI and Visualizations (PowerBi)would be preferred but is not required.
Must be energetic, self-motivated and self-organized. Willing to do whatever is requiredto get the job done.
Comfortable with working in a small team in daily activities in a fast-paced environment.
Possesses a strong work ethic and high level of professionalism.
Passionate about luxury, technology and innovation
Experience working with SAP applications Fiori, C4C, and Hybris is a plus.
Proficiency in MS Office Suite (Outlook, Excel, Word, PowerPoint, Teams, and relevant system software.
Basic knowledge of Quality Management Systems (ISO 9001:2015) and Environmental ManagementSystems (ISO 14001:2015), as applicable
NO 3rd Parties, Principals Only, Please

Join Karma as we transform transportation and mobility with innovative team work.

Karma Automotive offers a complete benefits package including medical, dental, vision, life, STD, LTD; paid vacation, holidays and personal days; and a 401K with matching contributions. Relocation assistance may be available.

Karma Automotive LLC is an equal employment opportunity (EEO) employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of age, race, gender identity and expression, color, sexual orientation, marital status, pregnancy or related conditions (including breastfeeding), national origin/ancestry, religion, military/veteran status, genetic information, citizenship status or any other characteristic and group protected by applicable law. Karma Automotive LLC complies with the Americans with Disabilities Act to ensure equal access to all qualified individuals with a physical or mental disability. Valid driver’s license may be required based on essential duties.",2.0,"Karma Automotive
2.0","Irvine, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
259,Data Engineer,-1,"Imagine a future where you’re shaping how we use and consider data in trading to enable the green transformation of the energy sector

Join us in this role where you’ll be industrializing the collection of large amounts of data and designing data stores that provide a platform for the development of trading models for the US power markets.

Welcome to US Trading

You’ll be part of a growing team where you, together with your colleagues, will be developing a truly data-driven approach to trading in collaboration with fundamental analysts, quantitative analysts, meteorologists, and traders. In a fast-paced innovative culture, you’ll be integral in turning data into information leading to improved decision-making.

You’ll play an important role in:
designing, building, and maintaining data pipelines for modern cloud-based analytics and productionizing, deploying, and monitoring forecast and simulation models
developing/architecting scalable machine learning models in close collaboration with analysts and traders
providing assistance and direction in the development of hedging strategies, structured transactions, and long-term asset developments
optimizing data pipelines’ stability and performance
performing statistical analyses on time-series data and developing and industrializing data analysis and pricing tools.
To succeed in the role, you:
possess strong programming skills as well as experience with Python, Kafka, Spark, SQL, Azure, etc.
preferably have experience with machine/deep learning, Pytorch, and Tensorflow
hold a top tier MSc/PhD in a quantitative discipline (e.g. math, physics, or engineering)
possess excellent communication skills and the ability to work both collaboratively and independently.
Join a world leader in green energy

Ørsted is a global leader in offshore wind energy and ranked the world’s most sustainable company. To be a frontrunner, we invest significantly in employee development and from the moment you join us, we’ll support your personal and professional growth. Here, you’ll get the opportunities that will unleash your full potential, and you’ll experience a collaborative, diverse, and dynamic work environment.

Shape the future with us

Send your application no later than December 7, 2020. We’ll be conducting interviews on a continuous basis.

For the US, please don’t hesitate to contact the Recruitment Specialist by email on us_recruitment@orsted.com if you’d like to know more about the position.

Please note that for your application to be taken into consideration, you must submit your application via our online career pages.
Apply

Share on LinkedIn

Print",4.4,"Ørsted
4.4","Chicago, IL",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$10+ billion (USD),-1
260,Data Scientist,-1,"Job Description for Data Scientist

Â

Â5 to 7 years of experience as a data scientist.

ÂStrong skills for mining data, assessing the accuracy and insights from new data sources.

ÂWork with stakeholders to understand data challenges and opportunities

ÂExperience building Machine Learning models for predictive analytics, andÂNLP. Understanding ofÂDeep Learning models is a plus

ÂExperience with SQL

ÂMaster in Statistics, Computer Science, or other STEM field.ÂPh.D. is a plus.

ÂKnowledge of advanced statistics and hypothesis testing

ÂPython, Pandas, Numpy, Scikit coding skills

ÂData visualization with Matplotlib, and Seaborn

ÂExperience with at least one cloud data technology GCP, AWS, Azure

ÂExperience with Spark, and Hadoop is a plus.

ÂEffective at telling stories with data.

ÂExcellent written and verbal communication skills

ÂCreative drive to try data tools, and explore and discover insights from data

ÂNLP experience is MUST

Â",-1,softsnippets,"Seattle, WA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
261,Data Scientist,-1,"***Please note: All hiring and recruitment at Spring Health is handled with a valid '@springhealth.com' email address only or from the following recruitment firm addresses: @hays.com, @oxeonpartners.com, @neptunepeople.com, @rivierapartners.com, @swingtalent.com, @joanneweavergroup.com, @creativepeopleinc.com and @clutchtalent.com. If you receive a message from a sender whose domain is not @springhealth.com or one of the aforementioned firms, please beware that those communications are not authorized or coming from Spring Health. ***

Our mission: helping individuals and organizations thrive by eliminating every barrier to mental health.

Spring Health is a comprehensive mental health benefit for employers. We help employees understand their mental health issues and connect with best-in-class providers to get the right treatment at the right time.

We are an award-winning, passionate, and mission-driven team with the support of leaders in psychiatry, and backed by prominent VCs including Northzone, Rethink, RRE, and General Catalyst. From early detection to full recovery, Spring Health is the only clinically validated solution proven to be more effective than traditional mental healthcare. By combining the latest technology with vetted providers, we engage 1 in 3 employees, reduce recovery times, and reduce healthcare costs.

We are looking for a Data Scientist to join our R&D team. You will be responsible for designing, developing, and implementing data products throughout our organization. You will collaborate with a team of engineers, designers, product managers, social workers, psychologists, and scientists.

We are creating the future of mental healthcare: within your first year, you’ll discover something no human ever knew before about mental health.
What you’ll do at Spring Health:
Develop analytics and secure reporting approaches for a high-performing network of mental health providers
Work with product and engineering teams to improve user acquisition, patient adherence, and clinical outcomes
Develop data infrastructure to ingest and integrate multiple data sources, ETL, validate, and create automated reports for clients
Design and build data deliverables across multiple contexts, such as: claims analyses/financial ROI, longitudinal treatment outcomes, provider quality, and risk stratification algorithms
What we expect from you:
BA/BS in Psychology, Economics, Biology, Biochemistry, or other STEM-related field.
Fluency in R
Strong presentation skills — fluently tell a compelling clinical or business story with data
Strong written communication skills — quickly compose client-facing communications or publications for peer-review
Experience with Git, Python, SQL, parallel/distributed computing, cloud computing, and other data science toolkits
Experience or knowledge of traditional statistics, e.g. measures of central tendency, descriptive statistics, and inferential statistics
Possess the initiative and ability to self-direct projects and solve unconventional problems
Proximity to NYC: minimum 2 days per week in our NY HQ, max 3 days remote
What we’d love to see:
STEM PhD— especially in Applied Sciences (e.g. Biostatistics, Psychiatry, Psychology, Biological Sciences), or 3-4 years of equivalent data analysis experience
Experience using any of the following data: EMR, clinical trials, claims data, longitudinal
Demonstrated passion for, and understanding of, mental illness and broader U.S. healthcare system
Experience programming and testing statistical/machine learning models
Experience using data visualization techniques to present key findings
Ability to quickly and independently pick up concepts and skills
Experience working cross-functionally with operations, product, engineering, and design teams
Why you’ll love working at Spring Health:
Competitive compensation plan, including equity in the company: we want you to own a piece of what you’re building.
Comprehensive benefits: we offer 401k, health, dental and vision benefits as well as free mental healthcare!
World-leading science: we’re shaping the future of mental healthcare, and are at the forefront of peer-reviewed science. You’ll be the first human to discover something about how to treat mental illness.
Flexible vacation plan: our open vacation-policy allows you to take the time off you need when you need it.
Great people: make an impact on something that truly helps people alongside an incredible team.
We care about diversity: diversity allows us to build an excellent patient experience. We are an equal opportunity employer and we do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.
We value: humility, entrepreneurship, passion for mental health, honesty and candor/directness
If you're interested in the role, please submit your CV/Resume via email to careers@springhealth.com, along with one code sample and one writing sample.

The code samples can be in any language, and the writing sample should either be 250 words, or include a 250 word abstract. Communication skills are really important to us, and we are particularly looking for a simple, direct writing style and the ability to articulate a question and research methodology clearly.",3.6,"Spring Health
3.6","New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
262,Principal Data Scientist,$96k-$156k (Glassdoor Est.),"Embark on a career putting innovative, reliable, and agile products and ideas into orbit, and beyond. Northrop Grumman has opportunities waiting for you that play a vital role in human space exploration, national defense, and scientific discovery, supporting multiple programs across the universe. With us, you'll discover a culture of curiosity and collaboration that will have you Defining Possible from the day you start. Our space systems connect and protect millions of people on earth every day, now and for the future. Explore your future and launch your career today.

Northrop Grumman Space Systems is seeking a Principal Data Scientist This position will be located at Hill AFB, UT and will support the Ground Subsystems Support Contract (GSSC) program.

The successful applicant will:
Develop and implement artificial intelligence and machine learning models to solve complex data problems
Interpret large amounts of data using advanced visualization techniques and tools
Merge and transform big datasets to ensure data integrity and usability
Develop a process to maintain quality and performance of statistical models and quickly identify enhancements opportunities
Communicate advanced concepts and information in an understandable manner for audiences of varying levels of competency
Maintain an up-to-date knowledge of technology trends
Properly document code, artifact description, implementation, and use case.
Be an eager and fast learner
Work on a fast pasted collaborative team in an agile environment
As a full-time employee of Northrop Grumman Space Systems, you are eligible for our robust benefits package including:
Medical, Dental & Vision coverage
401k
Educational Assistance
Life Insurance
Employee Assistance Programs & Work/Life Solutions
Paid Time Off
Health & Wellness Resources
Employee Discounts
This position's standard work schedule is a 9/80. The 9/80 schedule allows employees who work a nine-hour day Monday through Thursday to take every other Friday off.

UTSpace

Qualifications:

Basic Qualifications:
Minimum of a Bachelor of Science in Data Science, Computer Science, Physics, Statistics, Mathematics, or related quantitative field
Minimum 5 years of relevant experience with a bachelor's degree; or 3 years with a Master's; or 0 years with PhD
Demonstrated experience with Programming in Python, R, or Node.js
Demonstrated experience manipulating dataframes through SQL, pandas, or tidyverse
U.S. Citizenship and the ability to obtain a Secret Security Clearance
Preferred Qualifications:
Active Secret Security Clearance or higher
Familiarity with any of the following: Tensorflow, Theano, Keras, PyTorch, NLTK, PyStan, PyMC3, Rstan, ElasticSearch, PyCuda
Familiarity with Graph, NoSQL, Hadoop, SMACK, or Neo4J/OWL
Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www.northropgrumman.com/EEO. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.",3.9,"Northrop Grumman
3.9","Hill AFB, UT",-1,10000+ Employees,1939,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
263,Data Scientist,$65k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist

Position Summary

The Data Scientist applies machine learning and statistical techniques to help solve JetBlue’s most complex commercial and operational challenges. The Data Scientist will be responsible for exploring and creating compelling visualizations of new datasets, identify key features and engineer new ones to be used in modeling, and discover the modeling approaches that deliver the best results based on appropriate evaluation metrics. The Data Scientist reports to the Manager, Data Science.

Essential Responsibilities

Collaborate with teams across the business to translate their needs or challenges into machine learning or statistical problems

Support the development of data products through exploratory data analysis, feature engineering and model building

Effectively communicate experiments, models and analytics outputs with partners

Other duties as assigned

Minimum Experience and Qualifications

Bachelor’s Degree in computer science or a quantitative discipline

One (1) year of relevant industry experience

Proficiency in Python, SQL, git and common data science and machine learning libraries

Experience building machine learning models

Able to write production quality code and be familiar with software engineering best practices, including testing and version control

Ability to communicate their findings to both technical and non-technical audience

Must pass a ten (10) year background check and pre-employment drug test

Must be legally eligible to work in the country in which the position is located

Preferred Experience and Qualifications

Advanced degree in computer science or a quantitative discipline

Three (3) years of relevant industry experience

Experience applying various data science techniques such as: Forecasting, Recommendation Systems, A/B Testing, Logistics Optimization, Churn Analysis, Segmentation Analysis, and Deep Learning

Experience using Databricks, PySpark / Spark, Snowflake, dbt, Azure Cloud

Crewmember Expectations:

Regular attendance and punctuality

Potential need to work flexible hours and be available to respond on short-notice

Well-groomed and able to maintain a professional appearance

When working or traveling on JetBlue flights, and if time permits, all capable crewmembers are asked to assist with light cleaning of the aircraft

Must be an appropriate organizational fit for the JetBlue culture, that is, exhibit the JetBlue values of Safety, Caring, Integrity, Passion and Fun

Promote JetBlue’s #1 value of safety as a Safety Ambassador, supporting JetBlue’s Safety Management System (SMS) components, Safety Policy and behavioral standards

Identify safety and/or security concerns, issues, incidents or hazards that should be reported and report them whenever possible and by any means necessary including JetBlue’s confidential reporting systems (Aviation Safety Action Program (ASAP) or Safety Action Report (SAR))

Equipment:

Computer and other office equipment

Work Environment:

Normal Office Environment

Physical Effort:

Generally not required, or up to 10 pounds occasionally, 0 pounds frequently. (Sedentary)",4.0,"JetBlue Airways Corporation
4.0","Long Island City, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Company - Public,Transportation Management,Transportation & Logistics,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
264,Data Scientist,$81k-$131k (Glassdoor Est.),"Bayer is a global enterprise with core competencies in the Life Science fields of health care and agriculture. Its products and services are designed to benefit people and improve their quality of life. At Bayer you have the opportunity to be part of a culture where we value the passion of our employees to innovate and give them the power to change.
Data Scientist

YOUR TASKS AND RESPONSIBILITIES

The primary responsibilities of this role, Data Scientist, are to:
Provide technical contributions in a fast-paced team environment to accelerate our efforts on building an analytics-driven product pipeline;
Perform statistical analysis, computer programming, predictive modeling and experimental design;
Build cross-functional relationships to collaboratively partner with the business and effectively network within the Data Science Community;
Use advanced mathematical models, machine learning algorithms, operations research techniques and strong business acumen to deliver insight, recommendations and solutions;
Contribute to the development of code, bioinformatic analyses pipelines, computational tools and databases for mining and visualizing large genomic data sets.);
Develop sustainable, consumable, accurate and impactful reporting on model inputs, model outputs, observed outputs, business impact and key performance indicators;
Present compelling, validated stories to all levels of organization, including peers, senior management and internal customers to drive both strategic and operational changes in business;
Develop Code;
Work on Stat/Model;
Domain Knowledge and Consulting Industry Experts.
WHO YOU ARE

Your success will be driven by your demonstration of our LIFE values. More specifically related to this position, Bayer seeks an incumbent who possesses the following:

Required Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree with at least five years of experience or Master’s degree with at least two years of experience or Ph.D.;
Educational preparation or applied experience in Machine Learning, Electrical/Industrial Engineering, Operation Research, Statistical Genetics, Statistics, Biostatistics, Bioinformatics, Genomics, Computational Biology, Applied Mathematics, Computer Science or other related quantitative discipline;
Demonstrate intermediate proficiency in computational skills and level of experience building data models using R, Python or other statistical and/or mathematical programming packages;
Strong proficiency in predictive modeling to include comprehension of theory, modeling/identification strategies and limitations and pitfalls;
Intermediate proficiency in machine learning algorithms and concepts;
Experience in successful delivery of valuable analysis through application of domain knowledge; evidence of ability to strong business acumen;
Strong communication competencies to include presentations and delivery of complex quantitative analyses in a clear, concise and actionable manner to extended team and small groups of key stakeholders.
YOUR APPLICATION
Bayer offers a wide variety of competitive compensation and benefits programs. If you meet the requirements of this unique opportunity, and you have the ""Passion to Innovate"" and the ""Power to Change"", we encourage you to apply now. To all recruitment agencies: Bayer does not accept unsolicited third party resumes.
Bayer is an Equal Opportunity Employer/Disabled/Veterans

Bayer is committed to providing access and reasonable accommodations in its application process for individuals with disabilities and encourages applicants with disabilities to request any needed accommodation(s) using the contact information below.
Location: United States : Missouri : Creve Coeur
Division: Enabling Functions
Reference Code: 282541

Contact Us
Email: hrop_usa@bayer.com",4.1,"Bayer
4.1","Creve Coeur, MO",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1863,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
265,Data Scientist,-1,"*This position will be based in Boston, MA*

Position Summary

Alexion is seeking a talented Data Scientist to join Alexion’s Data Sciences, Genomics, and Bioinformatics (DGB) team which focuses on the the design, building, and deployment of novel data science solutions spanning Early Discovery, Target Identification, Translational Medicine and Diagnostics. These solutions have included a graph-database of the entire rare-disease landscape annotated with prevalence, severity, clinical trial options, and genetic signature; a genomics-based rare-disease patient prevalence platform to inform licensing/acquisition opportunities; and an AI-based phenotype- and genome-driven rare-disease diagnosis decision-support systems. These efforts have been published in top flight journals and have received multiple awards and recognitions – including one collaboration which won a GUINNESS world record!

The successful candidate will join a highly skilled team which prides itself on creating strategic value and catalyzing change across Alexion through the innovative application of data sciences. The candidate will need to effectively collaborate with other colleagues at Alexion with diverse scientific backgrounds to deliver novel quantitative solutions and analyses.

Job Duties & Responsibilities
Apply state of the art and innovative approaches to handling disparate life sciences datasets
Interface with Antibody Engineering, Target Identification, Biomarker and Clinical Development teams collaboratively define solutions and/or answer questions
Conduct end-to-end data analysis from a variety of disparate life sciences datasets through transformations producing impactful visualization and reporting the findings analysis
Design and Implement novel machine learning workflows and algorithms on unstructured, disparate data sets
Develop software tools and scripts at scale to support data analysis and interpretation pipelines.
Present and discuss findings with project teams, support iterative solutions development and scientific research.
Integrate and summarize large-scale data and information across multiple scientific, translational, and clinical domains.
Take a hands-on role and deliver on highly visible multiple projects
Rapidly identify and prototype methods and visualizations to answer key business questions
Communicate effectively with team members, experts and regulatory authorities.
Inspire others on culture change
Essential Qualifications
PhD degree in computational biology, bioinformatics, computer science or a related field, with strong background in data science and machine learning
2+ years of hands-on bioinformatics experience in an academic, industry, or government setting with a strong record of accomplishments and project delivery.
Strong knowledge of human genetics, molecular biology, as well as biological pathways and networks
Proven experience in software development such as Java, Python, C/C++, etc.
Expert knowledge of statistical analysis packages like R, SAS or similar.
Familiarity with concepts, tools and data formats used for sequence analysis, protein structure modeling and integration of diverse -omics datasets
Strong enthusiasm and curiosity about the intersection of biology, data and technology
Be able to work independently within distributed team environment made of both internal and external stakeholders and contributors
Demonstrated ability to handle multiple priorities
Excellent communication and presentation skills with specific experience in cross functional collaborations.
Preferred Qualifications
Familiarity with cloud computing services and its service offerings
Familiarity with data visualization tools and dimensionality reduction
Knowledge of immunology, antibodies and protein engineering
Familiarity with computational drug development desired
Proficiecy in building end-to-end data analysis workflows (e.g. KNIME, Cromwell)
Familiarity in the use of controlled clinical terminologies and ontologies (UMLS, SNOMED, ICD, etc)
Familiarity in the use of rare disease and scientific controlled terminologies and ontologies (ORDO, OMIM, HPO, GO, etc.)
*LIJB-1

Boston, MA, United States

Some opportunities happen only once in a lifetime - like a job where you have the extraordinary opportunity to change lives. At Alexion, such opportunities arise through our unwavering mission to serve patients and families affected by rare diseases. These patients are our guiding star, and we act with integrity, urgency, and discipline because we know their lives are at stake.

Alexion is a global biopharmaceutical company focused on serving patients and families affected by rare diseases and devastating conditions through the discovery, development and commercialization of life-changing medicines. As a leader in rare diseases for more than 25 years, Alexion has developed and commercializes two approved complement inhibitors to treat patients with paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria (PNH) and atypical hemolytic uremic syndrome (aHUS), as well as the first and only approved complement inhibitor to treat anti-acetylcholine receptor (AchR) antibody-positive generalized myasthenia gravis (gMG) and neuromyelitis optica spectrum disorder (NMOSD). Alexion also has two highly innovative enzyme replacement therapies for patients with life-threatening and ultra-rare metabolic disorders, hypophosphatasia (HPP) and lysosomal acid lipase deficiency (LAL-D) as well as the first and only approved Factor Xa inhibitor reversal agent. In addition, the company is developing several mid-to-late-stage therapies, including a copper-binding agent for Wilson disease, an anti-neonatal Fc receptor (FcRn) antibody for rare Immunoglobulin G (IgG)-mediated diseases and an oral Factor D inhibitor as well as several early-stage therapies, including one for light chain (AL) amyloidosis, a second oral Factor D inhibitor and a third complement inhibitor. Alexion focuses its research efforts on novel molecules and targets in the complement cascade and its development efforts on the core therapeutic areas of hematology, nephrology, neurology, metabolic disorders and cardiology. Headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts, Alexion has offices around the globe and serves patients in more than 50 countries. Further information about Alexion can be found at: www.alexion.com.

As a leading employer in our industry, Alexion is proud to offer a highly competitive package of base and incentive compensation as well as a comprehensive benefits program designed to support the health, wellness and financial security of our employees and their families. Benefits include group medical, vision and dental coverage, group and supplemental life insurance, 401(k) with company match, tuition reimbursement, relocation assistance and much more.",3.5,"Achillion
3.5","Boston, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
266,Data Scientist,$73k-$125k (Glassdoor Est.),"Title: Data Scientist @ Springfield, VA
Terms of Hire: Full time.
Salary: $ 175,000–$190,000 / YR + Benefits

Job description
**Active TS/SCI Security Clearance Required***
Our client is looking for an energetic and experienced data scientist and or modeling expert with experience working within a Multi-Int environment.
Responsibilities:
Works with large structured / unstructured data sets, various rest/wms data services, multiple database programs and collection systems, in a modeling and analytical environment, solving hard intelligence problems and issues.
Uses exploratory data analysis techniques to identify meaningful relationships, patterns, or trends from complex data
Combines applied mathematics, programming skills, analytical techniques, and data to provide impactful insights for decision makers
Researches and implement optimization models, strategies, and methods to inform data management activities and analyses
Applies big data analytics tools to large, diverse sets of collection data to assess risk of adverse threat activities
Qualifications:
10 years of experience as an intelligence analyst (single-INT or all-source) utilizing data from multiple intelligence disciplines (HUMINT, SIGINT, GEOINT, OSINT, MASINT) required
Experience using spatial and statistical analysis techniques for performing problem solving against disparate datasets required
Scripting knowledge (JS, Python) is a huge plus and any experience using model based analytics programs like JEMA, NODE RED, etc. and software packages like SAS is beneficial
Active TS/SCI Clearance REQUIRED
Desired exp:
Keyhole Markup Language (KML) and GIS software such as Google Earth, ArcGIS
Experience using Joint Enterprise Modeling and Analytics software (JEMA), FADE/ MIST
Database administration and query languages (predominantly SQL Select statements),
Python expressions or other related scripting languages
HTTP, HTML, CSS and programming languages such as Java, JavaScript, Python and various web service frameworks
You Will Enjoy:
An opportunity to be a part of a great culture, an awesome team, a challenging work environment, and some fun along the way!
Apply today to learn more and be part of our Growth story.
All applications will be kept strictly confidential and once shortlisted, our team will be in touch with you for further discussions.

Department: Scout
This is a full time position",3.3,"Cedent Consulting
3.3","Springfield, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
267,Data Scientist,-1,"About Shogun:

Shogun is a B2B2C fintech company that helps home improvement contractors grow their business by offering competitive financing options to their customers. Our SaaS platform - Hearth (www.gethearth.com) - gives contractors an effective and competitive way to sell more jobs with financing as well as get paid quickly with a new invoicing tool. Backed by 8VC, Founders Fund, and other prominent leaders in Silicon Valley, Shogun is the fastest growing company in the home improvement financing space. We’re always looking for smart, ambitious people to join our San Francisco and Austin offices. Build something amazing with us and join a rapidly growing company!

About this Role:

Data is key to Shogun for informing product decisions, optimizing operations and guiding company strategy. This team member will partner with all departments to inform and track strategic initiatives with data. A combination of data management and business sense is expected for this role. As the first member of a new team, you will get to set standards and processes for data within the organization.

Job Responsibilities:

Leverage data to understand users and their product usage, developing insights that apply to product, marketing, and business strategy.
Partner with executives, product managers, engineers, marketers, designers to translate data insights into smarter decisions and applications.
Establish and manage KPIs that measure the health of the business, product performance, and customer experience quality.
Build dashboards and reporting processes to monitor business and product trends.
Develop frameworks, tools, and best practices to apply data insights towards business questions.
Conduct analyses and build models that identify opportunities and drive growth.
Analyze experiment data, communicate results, and drive decisions.
Potential projects may include forecasting business performance, developing data personas, and modeling customer health.

Qualifications:

Undergraduate and/or graduate degree in Math, Economics, Statistics, Engineering, Computer Science, or other quantitative field.
Excellent SQL skills and some experience with either Python or R
Proven ability to wrangle large datasets, explore and utilize raw data feeds
Demonstrated aptitude toward Data Storytelling and Root Cause Analysis using data
Ability to deliver on tight timelines and prioritize multiple tasks while maintaining quality and detail
2+ years experience as a Data Scientist, or Data Analyst using advanced analytical methods
Familiarity with hypothesis testing or modeling/regressions
Ability to work in a self-guided manner
Excellent communication and organization skills

Location:

We are hiring for this position in our office in Austin, TX (currently remote).

More About Us

Shogun embraces diversity. We are proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and do not discriminate on the basis of sex, race, color, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, religion, national origin, citizenship, marital status, veteran status, or disability status. We consider employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.",5.0,"Shogun
5.0","Austin, TX",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
268,Data Scientist,$76k-$124k (Glassdoor Est.),"At CCRi, our clients look to us to solve their hardest problems, and we have a long history of exceeding their expectations. With clients in both the private sector and the US government, we provide a variety of advanced analytical techniques, and we render our solutions in software that our clients can apply immediately.

We are currently not expecting openings until after August 2020.

The Role

You'll help create machine learning analytics that will be integrated into streaming data processing pipelines and appealing user interfaces that provide real-time situational awareness and expose advanced analytics to end users. As a data scientist, your technical responsibilities will include design, research, and development. You will also be expected to contribute to the data science culture and ecosystem at CCRi through opportunities like design reviews and shared learning opportunities.

Who You Are
Curious: You enjoy peeling apart a problem and examining the interrelationships between data and how they can be used to form a solution.
Creative: You try new approaches to solving problems, looking for ways to apply techniques across domains and in new contexts.
Practical: You explore theories with an eye to their real world applications and their potential for improving performance for clients.
Collaborative: You work well on a team and can explain your work to your peers and source ideas and improvements from them.
Determined: You enjoy the challenge of finding solutions to difficult problems, testing them to discover what is successful and what should be optimized further, to develop industry-leading tools. You learn from failure and trying again.
Organized: You know how to keep track of both high-level goals and the tasks required to meet those goals. You take personal ownership of your team’s success.
Our Data Scientists have some combination of the following skills:
Understanding of structure and theory of common machine learning models
Familiarity with common machine learning libraries for implementation (sklearn, weka, tensorflow, torch, …)
Proficiency in one or more of: Python, Scala, Java, R, Julia, Matlab
Ability to understand and implement new models from the literature
Experience with distributed analytics and processing (Spark, Hadoop, …)
Experience with geospatial data and analytics
Requirements
US citizenship required
We DO NOT offer sponsorships or contracting work. This position is for Charlottesville only.
Prior Work experience in a related field and/or a working portfolio that clearly demonstrates your abilities
Benefits

The Company:

CCRi is a small engineering firm located in Charlottesville, Virginia. We develop and deploy novel machine-learning approaches to real problems at massive scale. Since 1992, we’ve been stopping bombs, predicting piracy, and guiding disaster relief.
Intellectually Challenging Work
Health Insurance
Short Term Disability Insurance
Generous Defined Benefit Retirement
Very Flexible Vacation Policy
Want to know more? Check out our recruitment video and blog.

The job description above is not intended to be comprehensive list. Responsibilities, activities, duties, and/or tasks may change or be assigned at any time.

CCRi is committed to a diverse and inclusive workforce because we know that our differences benefit our employees, our customers, and our community. We are proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, status as a an individual with a disability, status as a protected veteran, or any other applicable legally protected characteristics.",4.5,"CCRi
4.5","Charlottesville, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1989,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
269,Data Scientist,$65k-$108k (Glassdoor Est.),"HPOne, named CT Magazine's 2018 Great Places to Work, is looking for a Data Scientist to join our team.

The Data Scientist is responsible for collecting, cleaning, translating data to meet the company's needs. Every business collects data, whether it's sales figures, market research, logistics, or transportation costs. The Data Scientist will use that data and machine learning to help drive HPOne's business plans.

What you'll do:
Research and develop statistical learning models for data analysis
Develop insights and deliver recommendations based on data analyses
Work with business leaders to articulate business requirements for data analyses
Implement new statistical or other mathematical methodologies for specific models or analyses
Optimize joint development efforts through database use and project design
Create automated reports and dashboard products, in order to display results to internal teams
Develop end-customer segmentation schemes by analyzing customer behavior
Perform ad hoc analyses and deliver recommendations
Develop and implement predictive models like decision tree, regression using R or similar
Communicate results and ideas to key decision makers
Required Skills/Abilities:
Master's Degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math or related field
Five years' experience with SAS (or similar), ETL, data processing, database programming and data analytics
Experience in data mining and statistical analysis
Able to understand various data structures and common methods in data transformation
Excellent pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
Experience with programming languages such as Java / Python (or ""R"")
Experience conducting regression analyses
Understanding of relational databases and data management as well as experience with data aggregation and normalization
Advanced excel expertise (pivot tables, VLOOKUP, report filters, etc.)
Ability to approach tasks strategically, while owning and mastering the details
Exceptional problem solving, as well as analytical and strategic thinking skills
Initiative to own projects from start to finish
Strong oral and written communication skills, with ability to work well with people across the company at all levels


Preferred Skills/Abilities:
Coursework in at least one of the following: mathematics, business, analytical marketing, information systems, programming/databases, statistics/statistical modeling, finance, economics, or physics
Experience conducting analyses and building predictive models using SAS (or similar)
Experience with business intelligence and data visualization tools preferred (like Domo or Tableau)
Physical Requirements:
Prolonged periods of sitting at a desk and working on a computer, typically in an office or cubicle environment (constant noise, fluorescent overhead lighting)
HPOne is an Equal Opportunity Employer:

Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) is a fundamental principle at HPOne, where employment is based upon personal capabilities and qualifications. HPOne does not discriminate because of actual or perceived sex, sexual orientation or preference, gender identity, gender, transgender, race, color, religion, national origin, creed, citizenship status, ancestry, age, marital status, pregnancy, childbirth or related medical conditions, medical conditions including genetic characteristics, mental or physical disability, military and veteran status, or any other protected characteristic as established by law. HPOne requires the necessary drug testing and background checks as part of our pre-employment practices.",3.5,"HPOne
3.5","Trumbull, CT",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
270,Data Scientist,$54k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist

University Overview

The University of Pennsylvania, the largest private employer in Philadelphia, is a world-renowned leader in education, research, and innovation. This historic, Ivy League school consistently ranks among the top 10 universities in the annual U.S. News & World Report survey. Penn has 12 highly-regarded schools that provide opportunities for undergraduate, graduate and continuing education, all influenced by Penn's distinctive interdisciplinary approach to scholarship and learning.

Penn offers a unique working environment within the city of Philadelphia. The University is situated on a beautiful urban campus, with easy access to a range of educational, cultural, and recreational activities. With its historical significance and landmarks, lively cultural offerings, and wide variety of atmospheres, Philadelphia is the perfect place to call home for work and play.

The University offers a competitive benefits package that includes excellent healthcare and tuition benefits for employees and their families, generous retirement benefits, a wide variety of professional development opportunities, supportive work and family benefits, a wealth of health and wellness programs and resources, and much more.

Posted Job Title
Data Scientist

Job Profile Title
Data Analyst C

Job Description Summary
The Perelman School of Medicine at the University of Pennsylvania is the oldest and one of the finest medical schools in the United States. Penn is rich in tradition and heritage and at the same time consistently at the forefront of new developments and innovations in medical education and research. Since its founding in 1765 the School has been a strong presence in the community and prides itself on educating the leaders of tomorrow in patient care, biomedical research, and medical education. http://www.med.upenn.edu/

Job Description

This analyst will work under the guidance of investigator in the Center for Biomedical image Computing and Analytics ( http://www.cbica.upenn.edu/ , CBICA), Director, Christos Davatzikos, PhD. The work involves testing, validating and extending advanced image processing algorithms, preparing and extending processing pipelines, and applying these pipelines on magnetic resonance brain imaging datasets from various studies involving both structural and functional data. The data analyst will collect and organize final quantitative and imaging results, perform quality control on the results, and communicate with clinical collaborators for the dissemination and discussion of the results. This position offers the opportunity to gain experience using advanced neuroimaging processing techniques and to apply these methods in the study of normal and pathological brain function.

Qualifications
A Bachelor's Degree and 2 years to 3 years of experience or equivalent combination of education and experience is required. Experience with magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) analysis is required. Strong computer skills (knowledge of Python and/or Matlab, statistical analysis packages, basic shell scripting, experience in Unix platform) will be preferred.

The job pay range encompasses the full range of employees from new hires to the salaries of Penn employees with many years of experience and seniority and is not a precise indicator of salaries of new hires when looking at the top end. Based on what we pay employees coming into this position our pay range is 50,000-70,000 based on education and experience above the minimum qualifications .

Working Conditions
Office, Library, Computer Room

Physical Effort
Typically sitting at desk or table

Job Location - City, State
Philadelphia, Pennsylvania

Department / School
Perelman School of Medicine

Pay Range
$50,684.00 - $138,391.00

Affirmative Action Statement
Penn adheres to a policy that prohibits discrimination on the basis of race, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, religion, creed, national or ethnic origin, citizenship status, age, disability, veteran status, or any other legally protected class.

Special Requirements
Background check required after a conditional job offer is made. Consideration of the background check will be tailored to the requirements of the job.",4.3,"University of Pennsylvania
4.3","Philadelphia, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,1740,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
271,Data Scientist,$59k-$105k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist
Location: Boston, Massachusetts, United States
Full-time
Overview:

The Data Scientist will be an imperative member of Invicro’s growing AI Team. We are looking for well-organized, talented people with a deep knowledge in programming, data processing, automation, statistics and machine learning. The Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex imaging data into advanced, interpretable analytic solutions.

This role includes a few more targeted development areas, most prominently within oncology imaging and model development. Specific projects will include work in whole body PET/CT image processing algorithms and software development, in data curation around imaging and multi-modal data/metadata, and in model development for curated multi-modal oncology data sets.

Responsibilities:
Drive the collection, organization, coordination and governance around internal and external data resources.
Develops, maintains, and collects structured and unstructured data sets for analysis and reporting.
Creative thinking in reports, projections, models, and presentations to support Invicro’s Imaging Analysis strategy and AI initiative.
Provide influence on department strategy around data science and machine learning.
Maintain awareness of the resources and advances in artificial intelligence applied to biomedical problems, in particular resources relevant to pathology, neurology or drug development.
Develop and maintain unit and system-level regression testing.
Contribute to collaborative science incorporating machine learning / AI into clinical goals.
Develop and verify easy to use reference datasets that facilitate machine learning/AI research, testing and application deployment
Mentor junior data scientists.
Qualifications/Skills:
PhD in Mathematics, Engineering, Physics or related field with 0-3 years of industry or academic experience
Direct experience in an Engineering / Data Science environment preferred
Programming/scripting experience with a variety of languages including but not limited to python, R and C++ as well as the ability to program with keras and the low-level tensor flow API.
Deep, practical knowledge of using the training, testing and validation paradigm to drive progress
Demonstrated commitment to reusable/repurposable data organization and software
Strong intuitions about data modeling and testing and how to overcome common obstacles
In-depth knowledge of a biomedical or scientific application area and experience with applying deep learning to problems in this area
Invicro is an equal opportunities employer and positively encourages applications from suitably qualified and eligible candidates regardless of sex, race, disability, age, sexual orientation, gender reassignment, religion or belief, marital status, or pregnancy and maternity.",3.8,"inviCRO
3.8","Boston, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
272,"Senior Software Engineer, Data Infrastructure",$134k-$242k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior/Staff Software Engineer, Data Infrastructure

Every year, while Americans wait for their paychecks, more than $1 trillion of their hard-earned money is held up in the pay cycle. As a result, we accumulate over $50 billion in late and overdraft fees and turn to high-interest loans. Overdraft charges and bank fees often trap people in a cycle of debt that can lead to unhealthy decisions and falling victim to predatory businesses disguised as helpful services. We don't accept that.

Earnin is an app that creates products that help people gain control of their finances. Cash Out lets people get paid as soon as they leave work, with no fees, interest, or hidden costs. With Health Aid, Earnin negotiates on behalf of community members to lower their total unpaid medical bill and work out a budget-friendly payment plan. Cash Back Rewards is a way for members to earn up to 10% cash back on purchases from over a thousand local and national businesses without needing a credit card or having to reach spend thresholds to earn cash rewards — and they can withdraw the money at any time. We also offer free tools to help avoid overdrafts, to remind people when recurring bills are due, and we're working on more! There is never any required cost to use any of these products or services, users can choose to tip what they think is fair to support the service and pay it forward to keep the movement going.

Earnin is supported by funding partners including Andreessen Horowitz, Matrix Partners, Ribbit Capital, Felicis Venture, Thrive Capital, and others. Join us and help build a new financial system focused on fairness and people's needs.

You can help make a difference.

About the Team:

We are a data driven mobile financial tech company. The Data Infrastructure team builds the data services and data infrastructure that powers data science, analytics, and product development throughout Earnin. We are looking for a product-minded, self-driven Senior Software Engineer to own multiple large-scale projects that advance our mission of enabling people to gain access to their paycheck on demand.

What sets us apart:
High impact roles at a relatively small company that's aggressively growing our user base.
We are a collaborative team and genuinely enjoy working with each other.
We believe in empowering our people to be successful.
We're building a product that inspires fairness across the financial world and helps people not get taken advantage of.
As a Senior Engineer you will:
Break down complex problems into their bare essentials, translate this complexity into elegant design and create high quality, maintainable code.
Build massively scalable, production-grade data services.
Champion data quality and governance throughout the organization.
Build a world class data lake and data warehouse.
Design and develop new systems and tools to enable all of Earnin to consume and understand data faster.
Own the end to end design, build, and maintenance of platform services, data pipelines, and data products.
Implement comprehensive monitoring, logging, and alerting across our data infrastructure.
Work cross functionally with other teams (data science, design, product, marketing, and analytics) in high visibility roles as an engineering leader.
Build and deploy the data architecture that supports machine learning model development and actionable analytics.
Work with product engineering and data science teams to design scalable, performance model deployment architectures.
Communicate the tradeoffs of technical decisions to multiple stakeholders, including non-technical audiences.
Collaborate with and mentor other engineers and provide engineering direction to data scientists and analysts.
Actively engage and drive design reviews and code reviews.
Some skills we consider critical to being a Senior Engineer:
BS or MS degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or a related technical field.
8+ years of development experience in a fast-paced environment, especially startups.
5+ years of experience working with data systems.
Strong Python and SQL skills.
Strong programming and architecture skills.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills, including the ability to identify and communicate data driven insight.
Taking pride in your code quality and helping others elevate their own code quality.
Substantial experience with testing, data validation, and data quality assurance.
You can articulate the tradeoffs of different deployment architectures (e.g. streaming vs. batch vs. service-based).
Experience designing data platforms and services on cloud infrastructure, preferably AWS.
Hands-on experience designing and building large-scale solutions with the Hadoop stack and/or Spark.
Experience tuning and optimizing Spark-based applications.
Experience deploying and/or using query engines like AWS Athena, Presto, and Impala.
Experience with AWS analytical services like Redshift.
Hands-on experience working with a varied set of data storage technologies (e.g. Mysql, Postgres, DynamoDB, S3, etc.). You know where and when to use each.
Extensive experience with data modeling for multiple use cases and application styles, including NoSQL data modeling.
Experience working with data formats such as Avro and Parquet.
Experience working with alerting and monitoring tools like DataDog and PagerDuty.
Nice to haves:
You have experience building and deploying machine learning models.
You have experience using Terraform.
You have substantial experience working at a startup.
You have experience with data modeling in Redshift.
Experience with streaming infrastructure like Kafka.
Experience working with Kubernetes.
Experience building and deploying AWS Lambda applications.",3.7,"Earnin
3.7","Palo Alto, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
273,Data Scientist,-1,"The ideal fit is an engineer with some business sense and Data Science experience. However, the vast majority of the role will involve working with various aspects and levels of the business to identify business needs and predictive features. Then, through data extraction from the warehouse, work within the ML framework to develop and deploy predictive models.

Responsibilities
Work with key executives from multiple teams to understand problems, identify opportunities and present findings.
Identify predictive features for those problems/opportunities and run them through ML algorithms within a predictive analytics framework, Data Robot.
Extract the data required from the Data Warehouse (Snowflake) or other systems as needed, either through direct SQL extracts or other frameworks provided such as Looker, Tableau, SnapLogic, etc.
Deploy, deliver and monitor production level models.
Perform other tasks as needed within the broader Data and BI teams. Examples include, visualization tasks, BI meta data model development, data loading, data cleansing, etc.
Qualifications
BS or MS degree in Data Science.
A minimum of 2 years work experience within Data Science.
Highly proficient in SQL.
Comfortable working within a Predictive Analytics Framework.
Excellent communication skills.
Marketing or Advertising Technology background preferred.
Comfortable with shifting priorities and a fast pace work environment.
Powered by JazzHR",3.8,"Latitude, Inc.
3.8","Baltimore, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
274,Data Scientist,$65k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"Organizational Information

At Children’s Hospital of Wisconsin, we believe kids deserve the best.

Children’s Hospital is a nationally recognized health system dedicated solely to the health and well-being of children. We provide primary care, specialty care, urgent care, emergency care, community health services, foster and adoption services, child and family counseling, child advocacy services and family resource centers. Our reputation draws patients and families from around the country.

We offer a wide variety of rewarding career opportunities and are seeking individuals dedicated to helping us achieve our vision of the healthiest kids in the country. If you want to work for an organization that makes a difference for children and families, and encourages you to be at your best every day, please apply today.

Please follow this link for a closer look at what it’s like to work at Children’s Hospital of Wisconsin: https://www.instagram.com/lifeatchw/

Job Description

Position Summary:

The Data Scientist I is a multi-dimensional role responsible for solving complex analytic problems using quantitative methods. The scientist will use their analytic, mathematical, and technical skills to work independently with various cross-functional teams across the enterprise. The Data Scientist will be a key strategic contributor who applies rigorous analytical techniques to create impactful results that are visually appealing and leverage data from multiple sources.

Requirements:

Bachelor's Degree in a quantitative field preferred and minimum of 7 years related experience in data analysis.
Healthcare experience is highly preferred.
Certifications related to work area of focus, or Apprenticeship diploma preferred.
Comfortable discussing analytic approaches and the role of analytics in business processes.
Advanced analytics experience involving data mining and building models with a statistical understanding of underlying algorithms and processes.
Knowledge of statistical analysis and other data analysis concepts, including but not limited to confidence limits, statistical testing, data modeling and forecasting.
Exhibits the aptitude in the following Lominger Competencies: Business Acumen, Functional Technical Skills, Organizing, Intellectual Horsepower and Problem Solving.
Intermediate to advanced data manipulation and analysis skills using languages and tools such as SQL, R, SAS, or Python.
Knowledge of Epic reporting solutions including Clarity.
Strong analytical skills with experience in the evaluation of data integrity and its associated improvement work as well as senior executive reporting. Advanced communication skills and the ability to effectively work with physicians, nurses and administrators.
The ability to translate clinical requirements to data querying logic.
Excellent interpersonal skills and the ability to effectively work with multiple departments and external organizations.

Work Location:

Currently due to COVID-19 this position will be working remotely.

The office location for this position is located at the Summit Place office building at 6737 W Washington St, West Allis, WI 53214.

https://childrenswi.org/Location-Directory/Locations/Admin-Offices/summit-place",3.6,"Children's Hospital of Wisconsin
3.6","Milwaukee, WI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1985,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
275,Data Scientist,$93k-$151k (Glassdoor Est.),"Nintendo of America Inc.

The worldwide pioneer in the creation of interactive entertainment, Nintendo Co., Ltd., of Kyoto, Japan, manufactures and markets hardware and software for its Nintendo Switch™ system and the Nintendo 3DS™ family of portable systems. Since 1983, when it launched the Nintendo Entertainment System™, Nintendo has sold more than 4.7 billion video games and more than 740 million hardware units globally, including Nintendo Switch and the Nintendo 3DS family of systems, as well as the Game Boy™, Game Boy Advance, Nintendo DS™ family of systems, Super NES™, Nintendo 64™, Nintendo GameCube™, Wii™ and Wii U™ systems. It has also created industry icons that have become well-known, household names, such as Mario, Donkey Kong, Metroid, Zelda and Pokémon. A wholly owned subsidiary, Nintendo of America Inc., based in Redmond, Wash., serves as headquarters for Nintendo’s operations in the Americas. For more information about Nintendo, please visit the company’s website at http://www.nintendo.com .

DESCRIPTION OF DUTIES
Develop and refine models to predict consumer behavior and help prescribe actions to improve forecasting, personalization, customer engagement, and monetization
Continuously identify new data sources; explore, consolidate unstructured and diverse data, and incorporate into analyses and models. Work with engineering colleagues to onboard data as needed
Transition proof of concept models into scalable productionalized solutions for consumer facing experiences
Gain deep insight into player behavior and business impact; present findings to internal stakeholders
Support exploration of new technologies and analysis methods to identify growth / efficiency opportunities
Interacts with product, marketing, and service teams to identify questions and issues for data analysis and experiments.
Help educate, influence, and inspire adoption of data science best practices
SUMMARY OF REQUIREMENTS

2 - 4 years of experience working in an industry setting in a data-driven centric role
1+ year hands-on experience building predictive models on real-world data
Solid understanding in statistical modeling (regression, sampling, MLE, etc.)
Proficient with utilizing statistical learning algorithms from open source software (e.g. R, Python, etc.); should be able to write own code as needed to customize solutions
Comfortable getting and preparing data; this includes using SQL as well as dealing with unstructured data that might require calling APIs, or writing custom scripts
Take ownership of work and operate under minimal supervision
Experience working in digital marketing, CRM, or related domain is highly desirable
Passion and depth of knowledge for video games, technology, and entertainment market
Experience utilizing cloud computing platforms to handle Big Data preferred
Expertise in causal inference preferred
Ability to speak and write fluent Japanese a strong plus, but not required
Graduate degree (or equivalent knowledge) in a quantitative field required
Masters or PhD preferred
We are an equal opportunity employer of individuals with disabilities and protected veterans....valuing diversity…celebrating strengths.",4.2,"Nintendo of America Inc.
4.2","Redmond, WA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Video Games,Media,$10+ billion (USD),-1
276,Data Scientist,-1,"Join us in making roads safer by making drivers better!

At CMT, a Data Scientist has the opportunity to work on an extremely wide variety of technical areas. We collect high-volume, high-velocity data generated from smartphone and IoT sensors in vehicles. We clean, normalize and fuse multiple data sources using time series signal processing techniques, handing noise, censoring, and non-uniform sampling. Next, we determine which behaviors might indicate risky driving, using robust statistical analyses and feature engineering. We produce an estimate of aggregate driving risk using GLMs and ML regressors. Finally, given the risk estimate, we determine how we can most effectively help drivers modify and improve their driving by performing experiments and mining data.

Our Data Scientists are expected to read, write and test high quality Python code, and write technical requirements to facilitate productionalization in collaboration with software engineers.

Requirements
Minimum three years working as a data scientist
Awesome in Python and relevant libraries (scipy/numpy/pandas)
Experience with applying advanced statistical modeling and machine learning methodologies including optimization techniques in real-world settings
Agility to manage the data lifecycle (query, aggregate, feature creation, model, analyze, optimize, communicate)
Preferred Experience:
M.S., Ph.D in a relevant field, but real world experience is valued equally
Experience with AWS products
Experience with MLOps
Experience with full software lifecycle development (work with Product to gather and design requirements, implement, test, deploy, monitor)
Benefits

Cambridge Mobile Telematics' (CMT) mission is to make the world’s roads and drivers safer. Since its first product launch in 2012 that pioneered mobile usage-based insurance, CMT has become the world’s leading telematics and analytics provider for insurers, rideshares, and fleets. CMT’s DriveWell platform uses mobile sensing and behavioral science to measure driving risk and incentivize safer driving, while its Claims Studio reduces the claims cycle time with real-time crash detection, crash reconstruction, and damage assessment using telematics and artificial intelligence. CMT has over 50 active programs with insurers and other partners, improving safety for millions of drivers every day around the world. Started based on research at MIT and backed by the SoftBank Vision Fund to fuel its rapid growth, CMT is headquartered in Cambridge MA. To learn more, visit www.cmtelematics.com and follow CMT on Twitter @cmtelematics.

Our Benefits Include:
Health Care Plan (Medical, Dental & Vision)
Retirement Plan (401k match)
Life Insurance (Basic & AD&D)
Unlimited Paid Time Off (Vacation, Sick & Public Holidays)
Parental Leave
Short Term & Long Term Disability
Work From Home
Flexible Scheduling Options
Stock Option Plan",4.9,"Cambridge Mobile Telematics
4.9","Cambridge, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
277,University Grad Data Scientist,$131k-$209k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Pinterest: Millions of people across the world come to Pinterest to find new ideas every day. It’s where they get inspiration, dream about new possibilities and plan for what matters most. Our mission is to help those people find their inspiration and create a life they love. As a Pinterest employee, you’ll be challenged to take on work that upholds this mission and pushes Pinterest forward. You’ll grow as a person and leader in your field, all the while helping users make their lives better in the positive corner of the internet. We’re looking for a Data Scientist to help us connect Pinners to actionable content that improves the Pinner experience. You’ll apply quantitative analysis, modeling, and data mining to improve the relevance of Pins across our Ads, Search, and Feeds products. What you’ll do: Perform deep dive analysis to understand and optimize our product Design core metrics that serve as the North Stars for team efforts and model trade offs across product areas Explore alternative experimentation techniques to help internal teams evaluate their ideas faster Apply statistics, modeling, and ML to improve the efficiency of systems and relevance algorithms across Search, Home Feed, and Related Pins Work with product managers and engineers to design data products and debug A/B experiments What we're looking for: Expertise in at least one scripting language, and proficiency in SQL/Hive Knowledgeable about the machine learning trade-offs and model evaluation Experience applying scientific methods to solve-real-world problems on web scale data is a plus Excellent communication skills and the ability to tell a complete narrative using data to a variety of audiences Ability to connect data analysis to real business problems in order to impact business performance MS/PhD degree in Statistics, Industrial Engineering, CS, Math, Operations Research, Computational Biology, Computational Physics #LI-KR1",3.9,"Pinterest
3.9","San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2010,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
278,"Data Scientist, Charging Data & Modeling",$97k-$154k (Glassdoor Est.),"Role We are the team that uses data analytics to bridge the engineering, service, and deployment of Tesla’s charging infrastructure and to enhance the charging experience worldwide. With over 18,000 Superchargers and several thousand destination charging sites around the world, Tesla’s charging infrastructure aims to accelerate the world’s transition to sustainable transportation by enabling electric mobility without compromises. We use large-scale data analysis, machine learning, and modeling to retrieve actionable insights for enhancing the charging experience while minimizing the costs to Tesla. We also build the software tools and pipelines needed to maximize the leverage of these insights across our global operations. Responsibilities Include, but are not limited to: Use statistical modeling and machine learning to extract insights on fleet usage, trends, performance Leverage insights to inform planning and optimization of the EV infrastructure Build reliable, fast, and dynamic data tools, pipelines, and web services Develop visualization tools for geospatial and temporal datasets Develop monitoring KPI’s for tracking network performance Requirements Bachelor’s, Master’s or PhD in a related field (e.g., CS, Operations Research, Software Engineering, Statistics) Strong programming skills with a solid foundation in data structures and algorithms Proficiency in data analysis, modeling, and web services in Python Proficiency in SQL relational databases and/or NoSQL databases Experience with statistical data analysis and machine learning such as linear models, time-series forecasting, or neural networks Smart but humble, with a bias for action Preferred Background in statistical learning with experience in using both supervised and unsupervised models Experience with Spark, Hadoop and streaming data Experience in an agile working environment Experience working in a global team Quantitative projects available online (github, blog posts, etc.) Employee Benefits As a full time Tesla employee you will receive full benefits from day 1 for you and your dependents. Kaiser and UnitedHealthcare PPO and HSA plans (including infertility coverage) 3 medical plan choices with $0 paycheck contribution Vision & dental plans (including orthodontic coverage) Company paid Life, AD&D, short-term and long-term disability 401(k), Employee Stock Purchase Plans, and other financial benefits Employee Assistance Program, Paid Time Off, and Paid Holidays Back-up childcare and employee discounts Tesla participates in the E-Verify Program",3.6,"Tesla
3.6","Palo Alto, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2003,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
279,Data Scientist,-1,"Actively hiring a Data Scientist to devise modeling and measuring techniques; utilize mathematics, statistical methods, engineering methods, operational mathematics techniques. The employee will be responsible for Identifying and evaluating standardized methods, models and algorithms to address intelligence problems of limited scale as directed. Applicants must have demonstrated good oral and written communication skills. TS/SCI required.

PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIES:

Build predictive models and perform predictive analytics
Design experiments to solve sophisticated problems with code
Develop machine learning algorithms
Develop visualization strategies and capabilities to support mission and business objectives
Formulate and answer open-ended questions based on mission and business problem sets to glean insights
Interpret large and complex datasets and define appropriate applications to derive required outcomes
Perform data analysis
Perform unification of statistics
Working in a team-based agile work environment

QSL's Benefit Package

Because we believe our employees are our most valuable asset, offering a competitive comprehensive compensation package is very important to us. It is the goal of QSL to attract and retain the highest level of experience and technical talent necessary for successful performance. In order to accomplish this, we feel that it is necessary to provide satisfying work, an excellent work environment, and we continually monitor the marketplace to ensure that our total compensation/benefit package remains competitive.

Listed below are some of our standard benefits. We combine all traditional paid time off (Federal holidays, sick time, leave time personal days, jury duty, bereavement, etc.) into one category which allows employees flexibility in how they use their leave time and enables them to better balance their career with their personal needs.

Combined Paid Time Off (PTO)

Medical, Dental, Life Insurance

Disability (Short-Term and Long-Term)

Vision Insurance (CONUS-based employees)

Flexible Spending Account (FSA)

401(k) Retirement Plan

Employee Referral Bonus Program

Employee Discount Programs

Critical Illness and Accident Insurance

Employee Assistance Program

Our Mission

Stay in the fight and support the warfighter

Provide services, technology and products that contribute to the overall safety and security of the USA

Provide sustainable and meaningful work with fair compensation for our employees

Remain a positive and active influence in our communities

Our Values - The Essence of our Culture

Quick Services is an integrity-based small business, built upon a conservative culture of legal, moral and ethical principles. We put our people first, and through the relentless pursuit of excellence we establish and maintain true “partner” relationships with our customers by focusing on our client’s needs. We are actively involved in our communities.

About Us

QSL is a Wyoming-based DCAA-compliant company with offices and employees throughout the world. We focus on understanding the clients’ needs, establishing true partner relationships and exceeding performance expectations. QSL has proven performance in rapidly recruiting, screening, hiring, deploying, and supporting top quality personnel in a wide variety of high demand skills.

QSL is able to assemble a custom designed team of experts with the right skills and experience to meet our clients specialized needs. We take pride in our QUALITY people which are our strongest assets – customer feedback and QSL’s high retention rates reflect our ability recruit and retain mission focused top-tier professionals. QSL has the operational experience, staff, and infrastructure in place and stands ready to provide a wide array of services, technology, and products for our customers

all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin.

MINIMUM REQUIRED SKILLS:

The candidate must have a minimum of 2 - 4 years of experience; A Bachelor’s degree in a field related to the support services may count for up to four years of this experience.
Active TS/SCI Clearance is required.
Ability to achieve Polygraph a requirement.
Experience with Data Conditioning & Data Wrangling
Demonstrated experience with programming languages i.e. Java, Python or R
Understanding of Data Analytics
Demonstrated experience with statistics & statistical models
Demonstrated experience with SQL databases i.e. Oracle, PostgreS
Ability to identify, retrieve, manipulate, relate and/or exploit multiple structured and unstructured data sets from various sources, including building or generating new data sets as appropriate
Ability to interpret and evaluate the results of data science community’s methods models and/or algorithms, understanding the meaning, limitations and scope of the results, and translate them into insightful output for data science and/or mission and identifying other applications for use
Ability to initiate the efficient implementation of methods, tools, and algorithms using a comprehensive range of technologies

DESIRED SKILLS

Experience in visualization, communication & story-telling based on data and analytics findings
Data Analytics
Experience in Machine Learning",4.1,"QUICK SERVICES LLC
4.1","Saint Louis, MO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
280,Data Scientist,-1,"Do you want to build your personal brand with an industry-leading innovator that is always thinking outside the box? Does the box bore you? Do you want to leverage your analytic skills to tackle and solve difficult, seemingly impossible problems in a dynamic and growing industry? FourthWall Media is seeking junior to mid-level data analysts to expand its data analytics products and services.

This vital role works closely with data scientists and developers to discover insights within massive demographic, TV viewing, and advertising datasets and translate those insights into analytics products and business intelligence for FourthWall’s clients.

This non-traditional data analyst role requires inquisitiveness bound by pragmatism and cross-disciplinary skills to translate mathematical and statistical exploration into hands-on interaction with existing data systems. Perfectionism and attention to detail are required. Communication with co-workers, both to understand and to explain, is paramount.

Primary Goals
Exploration, analysis, modeling, mining, profiling and cleansing of large and interesting datasets
Searching for key insights, trends, flaws, and value in the data
Working with the data flow team to enhance quality and coverage
Working with R&D to develop new analytics processes and prototypes
Education and Experience
Excellent written and verbal communication skills are required
Self-motivating inquisitiveness, the ability to focus on complexity, and the tenacity to tackle seemingly impossible problems are required
Bachelor’s degree (B.S.) from four-year college or university with a preference in computer science, mathematics or statistics
Experience with Python is required
Experience with Hadoop, Hive, SQL, Theano, Tensorflow, Keras, Pandas, Scikit-Learn, R and Mathematica are preferred
Experience with television and/or advertising data ecosystems (DMPs, DSPs, media buying platforms, analytics platforms) is a plus
A minimum of 1 years experience in a professional, technical workplace",4.2,"FourthWall Media
4.2","Dulles, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
281,Data Scientist,$111k-$187k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Openings
Title: Data Scientist Job Code: SSDS7321 Job Description: The Data Scientist is responsible for the categorization and optimization technologies that are the foundational components of this company's data platform. As a member of the Data Services team, this role will focus on machine learning, enterprise search and data matching algorithms that enhance the performance of our systems and expose new data based capabilities to the organization. This role will work alongside research scientists, data architects and software engineers in the design and implementation of data-driven algorithms that enhance the performance of our systems Responsibilities:
Develop and support data matching, enterprise search, data mining and machine learning efforts as a member of the Data Services team.
Participate in the design and implementation of data-driven algorithms that enhance the performance of our system.
Responsible for building the long-term strategic architecture roadmap and related services, aligned to the company's enterprise architecture framework with a focus on data management and data integration.
Identify, evaluate, and recommend emerging technologies and technology service providers that will improve the business with a special focus dedicated to
Promote the use of a shared infrastructure and application/services roadmap to reduce costs and improve information flows.
Participate as a member of various design review boards as necessary to comply with enterprise architecture framework and data governance policies.
Provide subject matter expertise and hands on delivery of Big Data Modeling platforms
Works with the key business stakeholders to validate and flesh out use cases
Provide domain perspective on Big Data Analytics platforms
Experience standing up and using Big Data Hadoop platforms such as Cloudera / HortonWorks and using them to devise and execute analytics as a Data Scientist
Qualifications: Education: Masters or PhD in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics or Physics-or similar academic pedigree Experience:
4-7 years of relevant experience for Data Sc.
Big data/statistical technologies: Hadoop/MapReduce; Hive/Pig; R; SPSS; Matlab; etc.
Data mining/text mining/predictive analytics/AI: clustering; classification/regression; anomaly; detection; association rules; NLP; etc.
Data visualization/infographics: QlikView; JasperSoft; Tableau; D3; etc.
Experience with one or more programming languages: Java; Perl; Python; etc.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills",4.4,"Scalable Systems
4.4","Piscataway, NJ",-1,1 to 50 Employees,1981,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
282,Data Scientist,$62k-$104k (Glassdoor Est.),"Interested in Machine Learning techniques in the areas of Predictive Modeling, Time-Series Forecasting, and Survival Analysis? As a Data Scientist at GoHealth, you will work with team members to build end-to-end data science models throughout our diverse business. This includes projects for call-center traffic projection, agent-behavior modeling, and customer retention decay curves. You will report to the Lead Data Scientist.

Frequently cited statistics show that women and members of underrepresented groups apply to jobs only if they meet 100% of the qualifications. GoHealth encourages you to break that statistic and to apply. No one ever meets 100% of the qualifications. We look forward to your application.


Responsibilities:
Lead quantitative analyses with product management, your team, and data engineers in solving problems
Present information in front of large groups of users
Find new ways to combine data that do not naturally mesh together
Stay current with leading edge systems, methods, and best practices for data science and analytics; and introduce technology and process changes across the organization
Improve the collaboration around actual performance and forecasts to directly help our decisions and actions
Find ways to improve how the team operates and aligns with GoHealth's goals.
Skills and Experience:
Master's in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, or related quantitative field
2+ years of experience demonstrating trajectory of professional growth in software engineering, data science, or data engineering
Proficient in Python and related libraries, such as Pandas, Numpy, Scikit-Learn, TensorFlow, Pytorch
Expertise in applying common machine learning algorithms such as Linear Regression, Random Forests, XGBoost.
Experience deploying real-time prediction models.
Experience working with Scrum and other Agile methodologies, and Version control systems such as Git or Bitbucket
Benefits and Perks:
Open vacation policy because work life balance is important
401k program with company match
Employee Stock Purchase Program
Medical, dental, vision, and life insurance benefits
Paid maternity and paternity leave
Professional growth opportunities
Generous employee referral bonuses
Employee Resource Groups
Work from Home Stipend
GoHealth is an Equal Opportunity Employer
Due to the unprecedented situation of COVID-19, GoHealth has decided to protect our current and future employees by managing our business remotely. This is inclusive of interviewing, onboarding and each role day-to-day. Please consider that our roles will not be remote long-term and will return to an office setting once we're safe to do so following the guidance of local health authorities' and the CDC.

#LI-JC1",3.0,"GoHealth
3.0","Chicago, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Insurance Agencies & Brokerages,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
283,Data Scientist,$81k-$138k (Glassdoor Est.),Healthcare Risk Advisors has an exciting opportunity for a Lead Data Scientist in a newly formed Data Strategy Team creating novel analytics at the intersection of insurance and healthcare The Lead Data Scientist will work closely with the claims risk managementpatient safety and IT teams in developing analytics tools to support HRAs existing clients the sales effort and the development of new products The ideal candidate should have experience with using large and disparate data sets to uncover insights build machine learning algorithms and be familiar with natural language processing techniques They must be comfortable working with a wide range of stakeholders and operating in a small multi functional team ESSENTIAL RESPONSIBILITIES Work closely with the claims risk management patient safety and insurance teams in the design and creation of analytics tool to support the businessesParticipate in meetings with healthcare clients to understand design and deliver tools to better manage risks and reduce liability exposuresEvaluate aggregate and mine all internal data assets; research the best publicly available and third party datasets to perform analyticsPerform statistical analysis and build machine learning models for deployment in a cloud environmentDevelop algorithms to extract and classify unstructured data from claims files and medical filesCreate compelling visualization tools using human centered design principles to display; present data in a meaningful and easy to understand mannerBecome a champion of data science and innovation work with business units to implement models and perform regular training for the teams Attend and speak at webinars and conferences as neededAssist in writing abstract articles publications and reports of findings from analyses as well as study design and methodology and sections for publicationsPERFORMANCE METRICS Develop machine learning algorithms for interpretation of existing and new datasetsResearch data and literature to solve risk management and patient safety problems QUALIFICATIONS AND REQUIREMENTS EducationCertification Masters or PhD in Statistics Mathematics Computer Science or another quantitative fieldExperience Required 5 to 7 years of experience as a data scientist prior experience in the healthcare field preferredProficiency in R Python Spark SQL etcExperience creating machine learning algorithms to solve problems of classification regression forecasting and deep learning Experience with natural language processing techniques including text and sentiment analysisExperience with acquiring and organizing data in cloudExperience working with and creating data architecturesExperience with deploying and managing predictive models in a cloud environmentExperience with data science and machine learning platforms preferred H2O Databricks Alteryx etc SkillsAbilities Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts regression properties of distributions statistical tests and proper usage etcCapacity to visualizepresent data to stakeholders using Tableau Thoughtspot etcKnowledge of insurance and actuarial science preferredExcellent verbal and written communication skills; ability to speak clearly and concisely conveying complex or technical information in a manner that others can understandStrong analytical and problem solving skillsGood documentation skillsSelf starter; desire to take lead on projects and recognize when help is neededAbility to thrive in a multi functional teamHealthcare Risk Advisors Inc a subsidiary of the Doctors Company Group provides comprehensive insurance and risk management advisory services to leading academic hospitals long term care facilities and social services agencies in the metropolitan New York area,2.6,"FOJP
2.6","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1977,Nonprofit Organization,Insurance Agencies & Brokerages,Insurance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
284,Data Scientist,$81k-$133k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Motivate Lab is looking for a Data Scientist who can begin immediately. In order to achieve our mission of improving people’s lives, we are committed to rigorous evaluation and analysis of our data. The Data Scientist will contribute to various projects through ongoing data management and data analysis across multiple projects, and developing lab-wide data systems. This role is an exciting opportunity for a results-oriented, innovative professional within a fast-growing organization centered around applied work to support educational research and practice.

About Motivate Lab:
The mission of the Motivate Lab is to improve people's lives through rigorous motivation research. Led by two professors at the University of Virginia, Motivate Lab's annual operating budget of over $2.2M is completely supported through external grants and contracts. Our current five-year strategic plan has ambitious goals of growing the size, scope, and impact of our work in education and beyond, including sports and workforce settings. The majority of work in our organization focuses on research and development activities that develop tools to infuse learning-mindset supportive practices into educational and policy contexts, with a particular focus on supporting students from traditionally underrepresented backgrounds in higher education. We utilize our rigorous methods to design translational activities, including professional development, training, and dissemination, for both researchers and practitioners. We aim to change both the fields of practice and research through our innovative and agile methods of developing evidence-based practices.

Responsibilities:

Currently Motivate Lab is working on several major projects to help faculty and administrators across higher education build more motivationally-supportive learning contexts for students. Our data sets include both quantitative and qualitative data from a variety of sources, including randomized controlled trials, administrative data, student and faculty surveys, and faculty artifacts (e.g., syllabi). The Data Scientist will be responsible for management and analyses of these data.

Data Analysis

Development and utilization of data analysis protocols / frameworks.

Programming data analysis through code primarily using R (preferably) and SPSS.

Analysis of descriptive and correlational statistics by group.

Analysis of validity and reliability of quantitative measurement scales.

Regression modeling and other higher-level analytical techniques (e.g., hierarchical linear modeling, structural equation modeling, propensity-score matching, latent class analysis).

Using RMarkdown (or other reporting technology) to create analytic reports for stakeholders and internal lab personnel.

Participate in the generation and delivery of insight gleaned from analyses for multiple audiences (e.g., academics, practitioners, funders, etc.)

Provide recommendations to internal and external stakeholders based on research findings.

Collaborate on the creation of professional development programs and materials using data.

Data Management

Create and manage longitudinal datasets.

Build datasets by merging from various data sources, tables, files, etc.

Clean datasets in preparation for analysis.

Coordination of data management and analysis efforts with research coordinators and the lab’s data manager(s).

Creating Lab-Wide Data Systems

Direct the creation and consistent updating of data management protocols, data analysis protocols, and data translation protocols (i.e., moving from analysis to reporting and improvements in practice).

Supporting the ongoing skill development of Motivate Lab undergraduates and staff.

This role may require additional responsibilities, as necessary.

Qualifications and Skills/Experiences:

A Master's degree or terminal degree in Psychology, Public Policy, Education, Quantitative Methods, or related field is required. PhD preferred.

Basic knowledge of psychological constructs, including theories of motivation and intelligence is preferred.

At least 5 years of experience in a relevant, fast-paced professional setting (including graduate research labs); past data analysis experience in education is required.

Strong working knowledge of statistical research software, such as R (preferred), Stata, or SPSS.

Proficiency in analyzing, managing, and reporting complex quantitative and qualitative data, with specific ability to apply work in education.

Effective interpersonal communication skills.

Strategic thinker with advanced problem-solving skills.

Excellent organizational skills with a strong understanding of systems and procedures.

Fierce work ethic and sense of purpose, with the ability to work well as part of a dynamic team.

Physical Demands: This is primarily a sedentary job involving extensive use of desktop computers. The job does occasionally require traveling some distance to attend meetings, and programs.

Commitment to Justice, Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion:

Motivate Lab is committed to:

Recruiting talented and diverse staff.

Recruitment and retention of a diverse workforce, and providing an inclusive and supportive environment in which staff and faculty are recognized as integral to the success of our work.

Promoting a culture of integrity, mutual respect, excellence, collaboration and innovation.

Compensation:

Competitive salary is commensurate with individual’s experience and skills. All full-time employees receive a comprehensive benefits package .

Application:

Motivate Lab is an equal opportunity employer and encourages a diverse pool of candidates to apply. For questions about the position, please contact Alison Lubin , Motivate Lab Project Associate, and for questions about the application process please contact Bethany Case , Recruiter. Applicant review will begin October 5th, and new applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis and the posting will remain open until filled. This position will consider remote applicants. This role is restricted with a 1 year term limit, continuation is dependent upon the availability of funding, satisfactory performance, and the need for the role.

Please apply through Workday , and search for “ Data Scientist "". Complete an application online and attach:

Cover letter addressing 1) p revious experience with data management and analysis, 2) previous experience working in teams and training/managing others (if relevant), and 3) how you intend to bring a focus on diversity, equity, and inclusion to this role.

CV/resume.

Attach all materials into the resume submission field, multiple documents can be submitted into this one field. Alternatively, please combine all into one PDF. Internal applicants must apply through their UVA Workday profile by searching 'Find Jobs'. Applications missing materials will not be considered.

The University of Virginia, i ncluding the UVA Health System which represents the UVA Medical Center, Schools of Medicine and Nursing, UVA Physician’s Group and the Claude Moore Health Sciences Library, are fundamentally committed to the diversity of our faculty and staff. We believe diversity is excellence expressing itself through every person's perspectives and lived experiences. We are equal opportunity and affirmative action employers. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, color, disability, gender identity or expression, marital status, national or ethnic origin, political affiliation, race, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, veteran status, and family medical or genetic information.",4.4,"The Rector & Visitors of the University of Virginia
4.4","Charlottesville, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1819,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
285,Data Scientist,$68k-$115k (Glassdoor Est.),"What We Do:

Data Scientists at the SEI use advanced analytics, data science, artificial intelligence, and machine learning to help our government and industry clients research and solve cyber security challenges. In this role, you will work with our customers to identify areas where advanced statistical techniques can help tackle problems, plan and develop prototype solutions, and build out final products. You'll get a chance to work with elite cyber security professionals and university faculty to build new technologies that will influence national cyber security strategy for decades to come. You will co-author research proposals, execute studies, and present findings to DoD sponsors and at academic conferences.

Our team works on a wide range of projects. Some of our current work includes developing metrics and experimental designs for large-scale cyber security research programs, researching human-in-the-loop machine learning, and building classifiers to identify security vulnerabilities in code. Additionally, we have burgeoning work in deep fake video creation and detection, quantum computing, and natural language processing. We have access to a wide variety of cyber-related data, including malware samples, netflow data, cyber security training runs and tests, incident tickets, and more. If you are a data science or statistics expert with an interest in cyber security, we want to hear from you!

Requirements:
BS in data science, machine learning, computer science, statistics, or related highly-quantitative discipline with eight (8) years of experience or equivalent combination of training or experience; or MS in data science, machine learning, computer science, statistics, or related highly-quantitative discipline with five (5) years of experience; or PhD in data science, machine learning, computer science, statistics, or related highly-quantitative discipline with two (2) years of experience.
Willingness to complete modest travel to various locations to support the SEI’s overall mission.
You will be subject to a background check and will need to obtain and maintain a U.S. Department of Defense security clearance.
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:

Deep understanding of statistical modeling techniques and advanced data analytics
Proficient with at least one mathematical/statistical programming package (e.g., R, python numpy/scipy/pandas, MATLAB, etc.)
Expertise in one or more of the following: machine learning techniques (e.g., K-means, SVM, neural networks), quantum computing, deep fake videos, cryptography, data visualization, natural language processing
Innovative and inquisitive with ability to imagine novel analytical solutions to problems
Thrives in a multi-disciplinary environment
Strong communication skills
Desired Experience:
Experience in predictive modeling, data science, or machine learning
Experience applying software engineering techniques in solution development
Experience in cybersecurity and privacy is a plus
Demonstrated ability to learn new concepts and grow into new areas of work
Experience supporting test and evaluation for large-scale government research programs is a plus

More Information

Please visit “Why Carnegie Mellon” to learn more about becoming part of an institution inspiring innovations that change the world.
A listing of employee benefits is available at: www.cmu.edu/jobs/benefits-at-a-glance/.

Carnegie Mellon University is an Equal Opportunity Employer/Disability/Veteran.

Job Function: Cyber Security

Primary Location: United States-Pennsylvania-Pittsburgh

Time Type: Full Time

Minimum Education Level: Bachelor's Degree",4.5,"Carnegie Mellon University
4.5","Pittsburgh, PA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1900,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
286,"Associate Scientist, Analytical Development",-1,"Visterra is a clinical stage biotechnology company committed to developing innovative antibody-based therapies for the treatment of patients with kidney diseases and other hard-to-treat diseases. Our proprietary technology platform enables the design and engineering of precision antibody-based product candidates that specifically bind to, and modulate, key disease targets. Applying this technology to disease targets that are not adequately addressed by traditional therapeutic approaches, we are developing a robust pipeline of novel therapies for patients with unmet needs.

Visterra is a wholly owned subsidiary of Otsuka America, Inc., which is a U.S. holding company and a wholly owned subsidiary of Otsuka Pharmaceutical Co., Ltd. of Japan. Visterra has approximately 75 employees and is located in Waltham, Massachusetts.
Summary*
The Associate Scientist reports to the Associate Director of Pharmaceutical Sciences and Technology (PST) and supports analytical activities to progress molecules from early development through to clinical trials and product licensure. The Associate Scientist is accountable for analytical development and characterization of Visterra’s pipeline molecules. The Associate Scientist will work very closely with internal QA, QC, Manufacturing, and Clinical teams as well as with Contract Test and Manufacturing partners.

This is a full-time position based in Visterra’s facility in Waltham, MA.
Responsibilities*
Provide analytical support to research and development teams to support lead candidate identification and development.
Generate standard operating procedures for characterization of biologics for use at Visterra, train lab members and transfer analytical methods to CMOs.
Identify and stay current with new analytical technologies and methods for characterization of biologics.
Perform characterization and degradation studies on lead candidates and share results with cross-functional teams.
Develop protocols for assay qualification and validation, review and approve data.
Prepare presentations for external partners and internal meetings and represent analytical and CMC issues.
Provide analytical support for investigations at CTOs and CMOs, generate hypothesis, critically review results.
Maintain a contemporary knowledge of current industry trends, standards and methodologies.
Actively participate in program teams, as well as collaborate effectively across functions and external partners.
Other duties and responsibilities as required by departmental and business needs.
Requirements*
At least 5 years of industry or related professional analytical experience in an industrial setting.
A BS Degree in chemistry, biochemistry or a related analytical scientific discipline.
Hands-on experience with some of the following analytical methods; HPLC, UPLC, CE-SDS, SDS-Page, protein purification, CEX, icIEF, LC-MS, Glycan analysis, ELISAs, and cell-based potency assays.
Experience with analytical software Excel, Chemstation, SoftMax, PRISM, and Empower.
Strong interest in innovative strategies for analysis and control of new modalities of biologics.
Experience with trouble-shooting assays, creative problem-solving, and method transfer.
Ability to work in a fast-paced dynamic environment with changing priorities, forward thinking with flexibility to support multiple development programs simultaneously.
Skilled in managing cross functional relationships and collaboration as a team member.
Experience with writing reports, generating presentations, working with external teams and maintaining timelines.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
_Visterra provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws._

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Employee Discount
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Parental Leave
Professional Development Assistance
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
We have created robust and comprehensive policies, process, materials and infrastructure to minimize the risk of COVID-19.

Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
http://www.visterrainc.com/
Work Remotely:
No",4.6,"Visterra, Inc.
4.6","Waltham, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
287,Data Scientist,-1,"Streamlit is a company built on data science that creates tools for data science - and we need an amazing data scientist to come help us push our product even further! You will play an incredibly influential role in helping us better understand the community and product usage, as well as building out the tools we need for launching a successful commercial product. What you’ll be doing Use data to find opportunities and drive optimization for product development, marketing techniques and business strategies. Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques and drive implementation. Develop custom data models and algorithms to optimize the product experience. Develop an A/B testing framework we can use for various company experiments. Coordinate with the engineering team to implement models and monitor outcomes. Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy. ‍ What you bring 3+ years of experience in a data or statistics role. Experience working with and creating data architectures. Strong problem solving skills with an emphasis on product development. Experience using Python and another common data science toolset (R, SQL, etc.) to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets. Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications. Excellent written and verbal communication skills for coordinating across teams. ‍ Level up bonus points Streamlit skillz! We do a large part of our data analysis and presentation in Streamlit. B.S. or other advanced degree in Statistics, Mathematics, CS or other related field. Experience setting up data management services like: Redshift, S3, BigQuery, etc. Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks. ‍ We are an equal opportunity and family friendly employer and we highly value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status. Working at Streamlit We’re an early stage startup so we all wear a number of hats, including: helping guide the direction of the product, interacting with users, and helping optimize our internal processes. We love what we do, so we tend to work hard — but we also value life outside of work: many of us have young children, some of us block our calendars to go running every day, one person has a kickass punk band, and another has dance performances every month. We like to make sure everyone has time to do the things they value the most. Our product Streamlit is an end-to-end solution for creating and deploying data apps. Our multifaceted product is composed of (1) an open-source library that users run on their own computers/remote machines/containers, (2) a web app, and (3) a cloud service. We are built on Python, TypeScript, React, Protocol Buffers, GCP, Kubernetes, GitHub, and CircleCI.",4.5,"Streamlit
4.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Logistics & Supply Chain,Transportation & Logistics,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
288,Data Scientist,$70k-$115k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a Data Scientist you will help build advanced models that enable the business and functional teams be smart in serving the customers and building the new business models. This role provides an opportunity to work with world class digital transformation, manufacturing operations and R&D teams.

Key Responsibilities
Evaluate the AI/ML readiness of business units, processes and provide the related data acquisition recommendations to bridge the gaps
Build advanced machine learning models that help optimize the CRM, manufacturing and supply chain processes
Conduct rapid experiments using the latest technologies like auto ml and recommend the model that best fit the business requirement.
Provide clear direction to data engineers for model specific data transformation requirements
Collaborate with AI/ML engineers to establish the MLOPs for the models that are proven to be successful with early adopters to scale the benefits to larger set of end users
Partner with AI/ML product managers and support the related roadmap execution
Research advanced concepts and advocate the new techniques to advance the practice to next levels
Qualifications
Master’s degree in Data Science or applicable field of study required
Bachelor’s degree in Business, Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Management Science or Information Systems related fields required
Minimum of 5 years of experience using data analysis techniques to solve business problems regardless of industry
Minimum of 3 years of experience with RDBMS and SQL
Minimum of 2 years of experience with R, Python and/or other statistical programming languages applying the appropriate statistical procedures to problems
Minimum 2 years of experience with data storytelling and visualization technologies
Experience with agile development methodology
About us:

Here at PPG we make it happen, and we seek candidates of the highest integrity and professionalism who share our values, with the commitment and drive to strive today to do better than yesterday – everyday.

PPG: WE PROTECT AND BEAUTIFY THE WORLD™

Through leadership in innovation, sustainability and color, PPG helps customers in industrial, transportation, consumer products, and construction markets and aftermarkets to enhance more surfaces in more ways than does any other company.. To learn more, visit www.ppg.com and follow @ PPG on Twitter.

The PPG Way

Every single day at PPG:

We partner with customers to create mutual value.

We are insightful, dedicated and proactive. We have intimate knowledge of the market and our customers. We focus on practical solutions that make a difference.

We are “One PPG” to the world.

We are better and stronger together. We leverage our scale to reach new markets and introduce innovative technologies as we differentiate and disrupt our markets.

We trust our people every day, in every way.

We enable and empower our people to make the right decisions. We are inclusive, transparent and respectful. Our feedback is clear and actionable.

We make it happen.

We have a passion for winning. We achieve. We deliver with discipline and integrity. We bring our best energy to our work. We decide and act intelligently and quickly.

We run it like we own it.

We respect one another by being responsible and accountable. We always act in the best interest of our company, customers, shareholders and our communities.

We do better today than yesterday – everyday.

We continuously learn. We develop our people to grow our businesses.

PPG Way: (Click here to learn more about the PPG Way)

PPG vision: http://corporate.ppg.com/Our-Company/PPG-Vision.aspx

We are One PPG: http://one.ppg.com/

PPG provides equal opportunity to all candidates and employees. We offer an opportunity to grow and develop your career in an environment that provides a fulfilling workplace for employees, creates an environment for continuous learning, and embraces the ideas and diversity of others. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, pregnancy, race, color, creed, religion, national origin, age, disability status, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression. If you need assistance to complete your application due to a disability, please email recruiting@ppg.com.

PPG values your feedback on our recruiting process. We encourage you to visit Glassdoor.com and provide feedback on the process, so that we can do better today than yesterday.

Benefits will be discussed with you by your recruiter during the hiring process.",3.1,"PPG
3.1","Pittsburgh, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,1883,Company - Public,Chemical Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
289,Data Scientist,$145k-$225k (Employer Est.),"Role Description
As a data scientist at Triplebyte, you’ll have the opportunity to work on a variety of challenges to help us scale. You'll be part of a small team, who are leveraging data to fix technical hiring. Your day to day, will include a mix of dataset acquisition, statistical modeling, exploratory data analysis, and software engineering. You’ll report directly to Triplebytes' Head of Machine Learning and will work alongside a team of 6-8 machine learning engineers and data scientists.
Fields your work will touch on
Psychometrics
Recommender systems
Time series analysis
Survival analysis
Bayesian inference
Probabilistic programming
This is an ideal role for a data scientist who wants the scope and responsibility to own features/products from the inception and research phase through to measuring real-world results.

About Triplebyte
Triplebyte is a hiring marketplace used by companies like Apple, Dropbox, Stripe, and Instacart to hire the best technical talent. We are on a mission to build a meritocratic hiring process, and we do all our evaluation background blind. Our ultimate goal is to collect the largest dataset and use this to build the world's best technical hiring process. No other company has successfully done what we're doing in this field.
We are growing extremely quickly, working on a problem that is fundamental, sitting at the crossroads between the workforce and employers. Ten years from now, it'll look silly to use anything other than Triplebyte for technical hiring.
Company Culture
We have a laid-back, friendly office culture. Over lunch you'll often find us discussing the latest in technology, books, and pop culture, and then maybe getting in a quick game of chess or babyfoot (foosball).
Since we're an early-stage company, we move fast, and it's important that each member of our team is able to take ownership of projects by defining problems, brainstorming solutions, and running experiments.",3.2,"Triplebyte
3.2","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
290,Data Scientist,$73k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"ARGO is a leading provider of software and analytics solutions for both the financial services and healthcare industries. ARGO transforms business processes for financial service providers and healthcare organizations using proven business models and software innovation informed by real customer challenges, breakthrough technology, and rich analytics.

ARGO employs Data Science in order to deliver quantifiable value to customers, mostly as an outcome from optimization processes, or decisions from decision support analytics and machine learning. The business value of the ARGO products in the market place is directly linked to the accuracy of the analytics engines embedded in the ARGO products.

ARGO is looking for a candidate that has skills in each of the following broad buckets:
math/statistics/ML;
databases/programming; and
business
We are looking for extensive experience in various statistical models such as regression, and model building, and being able to explain different models used and the different type of problems that were resolved.

We are looking for an experienced data scientist who has technical knowledge on how to pull data from various sources, understand, manipulate and normalize data, and process data into an insight. Experience in working with structured and unstructured databases, including SQL and flat files is a must. Proven experience in using and manipulating data, data analysis, data engineering, feature extraction, creation and engineering, and data behavior are a must.

We are looking for a data scientist with proven work experience in creating features and models using various tools and packages, including mastering of various programming languages, such as Python and R, while having technical experience understanding model execution in production, in a variety of edge cases and building in risk analyses at the start of model development to mitigate risks.

ARGO solutions use data and process to create a valuable outcome. Working backwards, ARGO is looking for a candidate that:
understands the problems that our solutions try to solve for our customers
translate the problems into something that data science can solve
then solve it (using their math/statistics and database/programming skills);
convert that solution into value representative to the users of the ARGO solutions, using visualization tools to demonstrate value and performance
We are looking for a data scientist that is part of a team of software engineers and data scientists, aware of the deployment computational cost to the ecosystem, interpretability, maintainability, scalability, latency, bandwidth, and other system boundary conditions — as well as the maturity of the customer — itself, when they craft a solution. All these aspects need to be communicated effectively and demonstrated to financial auditors for our adherence to compliance standards and enterprise value.

Current ARGO Solutions in ML
ARGO has existing ML solutions across its line of applications. The candidate will need to engage in these solutions to understand, improve, and create new ML processes as needed. Some of these solutions include:
Banking
Check Fraud – determining fraudulent check activity such as invalid signature, bad check stock, check amounts and check numbers that are out of norm, kiting activities, other suspicious activity.
Money Laundering – looking for patterns that are typical in money laundering schemes.
Know Your Customer and ways to engage in better and more efficient with the customer in their journey and experience with the financial institution to improve customer relations and provide more a better services to the customer.
Potential customer attrition – monitoring patterns that indicate the relationship with the customer is deteriorating.
Healthcare
Locating duplicate patients in a hospital clinical system to prevent error in servicing the patient using techniques for finding duplicates based on the patient demographic information.
Providing post-hospital care to patients that are considered high risk, using risk analysis models, including determine comorbidities that are mostly like to be detrimental to the patient’s health. Providing a way to rank the most critical patients in need of extra care and attention.
Who you are and what you bring to ARGO
Math and Science; Machine Learning, Deep Learning, AI:
Proficient in mathematics, with hands-on work experience in probability and statistics; theoretical fundamentals: hypothesis testing; Bayes’ rule; randomization; and Simpson’s Paradox.
Solid knowledge of several of:
Determination of structure or distribution of data,
Common classification techniques
Common regression techniques
Predictive modeling
Bagging, boosting
Solid knowledge of Machine Learning:
Regression (linear, non-linear, etc.)
Supervised Learning – classification, random forests, neural network, etc.
Unsupervised learning – clustering, expectation maximization, k-means, etc.
Direct accountability in selecting and using math and models to resolve forecasting or predictive business solutions, along with demonstrable understanding of business correlation to the data sets and business objectives.
Working experience relating model execution in production environments, taking into account computational cost, interpretability of data and results, latency, bandwidth, and other execution and edge conditions.
Solid work experience with complex financial or operational models that are statistically relevant, directly accountable for generating insight or quantifiable outcome.
Staying current in latest research in ML, as well as understanding technologies, methodologies, and how and when to apply them.
Data Architecture:
Strong understanding of what happens to the data, from inception, to model, to business decisions, to production use, and the ability to discuss and explain this process.
Extensive work experience with large data models including sparse or skewed data sets.
Demonstrable experience in sample size inferences and assumptions, training data for ML models, data flow, data pipeline and overall good fact-based decision making based on data availability, characteristics, and manipulation in a decision system.
Workingexperience with data sets in SQL, NoSQL, flat files, data normalization, data sanitation, data quality, privacy and confidentiality
Coding:

Demonstrable expertise in coding in Python, R, SQL, Java. Knowledge of Scala, Closure, Octave, Spark, Tableau, C++, and MATHLAB are a bonus.
Capable and knowledgeable in how to write code and are comfortable handing a variety of programming tasks.
Have experience in dealing with large volumes of data, working with real-time data, batch data, cloud computing, unstructured data, as well as statistical aspects.
Have experience with using and coding statistical models, like regression, optimization, clustering, decision trees, random forests, neural networks.
Demonstrable experience in feature extraction, feature calculation, feature correlation
Demonstrable model building experience: training versus test data, different models of training like cross validation, bagging, boosting, ensemble and cascade classification, etc.
Demonstrable experience on how to mitigate risks associated with model performance, incorrect predictions, skewed machine learning, or insufficient capacity to detect patterns.
Communication:

Communicate effectively to business teams and stakeholders how the math in “black boxes” meet business objectives, and address edge cases, or describe behavior with shifting data trends.
Are able to describe the benefits of your work product, and how mathematical results of your work translate into actionable insight or intervention for all stakeholders.
Additional Experience
Experience in the financial risk and fraud field, or transferable skill set
Cross experience in multiple technologies: databases, scientific computing, predictive modeling and data analysis.
Ability to provide visualization insights
Education:
Extensive undergraduate/post graduate focus on topics of: Statistics, Data Science, Applied Math, Machine Learning, Physics, Econometrics or a similar quantitative field with focus and depth in mathematical algorithms, probability theory, statistical modeling, and machine learning.

ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS:
Applicants for U.S. or Canadian based positions with ARGO must be legally authorized to work in the United States or Canada. Verification of employment eligibility will be required at the time of hire. Visa sponsorship is not available for any ARGO positions.

PHYSICAL DEMANDS
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to stand; walk; sit; use hands to finger, handle, or feel; reach with hands and arms; talk or hear. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

Department: Product Management
This is a non-management position
This is a full time position",2.0,"Argo Data
2.0","Richardson, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1980,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
291,Data Scientist,-1,"We are looking for a Data Scientist who will support our product, sales, leadership and marketing teams with insights gained from analyzing company data. The ideal candidate will be intricately involved in running analytical experiments in a methodical manner and will regularly evaluate alternate models via theoretical approaches. They must have a proven ability to drive business results with their data-based insights. Primary Responsibilities: Understanding data flow in a large, distributed system. Designing, coding and executing data investigations. Performing robust statistical analyses. Producing internal presentations, customer reports and visualizations to summarize the conclusions. Handle a diverse set of problems ranging from probabilistic interference on phone trajectories, data fusion between noisy sensors, modeling and classification of driving behavior, and data visualization. All other duties as assigned. Qualifications: Masters or PhD in Computer Science, Mathematics, or related field. 3+ years performing data analysis on real world figures. Strong programming skills for constructing and understanding data pipelines, particularly in Python (scipy/numpy) and SQL. Experience with modern/emerging scalable computing platforms and languages (e.g.Spark). Strong computer skills including MS Office Suite, Google docs and other needed software platforms. Excellent oral, written and listening skills. Entrepreneurial spirit, desire to be part of an early stage startup. Bootstrapping mindset but obsessive about quality. Positive attitude with superior interpersonal skills. Honest and dependable. Comfortable working across every level of an organization including company executives. Team player with the ability to display sensitivity, tact and responsiveness with current and prospective employees. Self-starter who accomplishes major tasks and initiatives with little supervision. Business-to-business experience a plus. Organized proactive problem solver. Ability to handle confidential and sensitive information. If you want to fill this role, tell us why at jobs@driveway.ai",5.0,"Driveway
5.0","Aliso Viejo, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
292,Data Scientist,-1,"Work in tandem with our clients to understand their questions and needs, then dig into their data-rich environment to find the pieces of their information puzzle.Youll conduct data analysis and modeling, design data-driven solutions and approaches for clients, and use the right combination of tools and frameworks to turn that set of disparate data points into objective answers to help our clients make informed decisions.

Basic Qualifications:
3+ years of experience with data science, mathematics, statistics, CS, economics, or data-driven problem-solving
Experience with conducting analytics, data transformation, or visualization using tools, including Python, Java, JavaScript, or R
Experience in collaborating with multi-disciplinary teams
Experience with working in an Agile development environment, including providing analytics or CS support
Ability to operate independently and manage staff
Ability to travel extensively up to 75% of the time
BA or BS degree
Nice If You Have:
Experience in a consulting or client-facing environment
Possession of excellent oral and written communication skills, including using presentation expertise to convey complex ideas to client and internal staff
Possession of excellent problem-solving skills, including in a collaborative environment
MA or MS degree
This position is available remote with occasional travel to client location if required.

At Techstra we are experts in transformation, business strategy, technology, innovation, and human capital management. We deliver our expertise through client consulting, innovative staffing solutions and software development. From strategy through implementation, we are dedicated to bringing our clients world-class business and talent solutions that fit strategic requirements and most importantly, deliver results.

Equal Employment Opportunity Statement

Techstra Solutions maintains a strong policy of equal opportunity in employment. It is our objective to recruit, hire, and retain the most qualified individuals without regard to race, color, creed, religion, gender, national origin, age, pregnancy, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, veteran status, or any other characteristic or status protected by applicable federal, state, or local law. Our equal employment philosophy applies to all aspects of employment, including recruitment, compensation, benefits, training, promotions, transfers, job benefits, and terminations.

Powered by JazzHR",-1,Techstra Solutions,"Pittsburgh, PA",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
293,Data Scientist,$66k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who We Are!

At Maven Wave, an Atos Company, we are relentless in hiring the industry’s top talent. Each employee is hand-picked not only for their skills, but for their personality and broad expertise. We are looking for this rare combination of talent that sets us apart in the industry.

Maven Wave helps leading companies make the shift to digital and shorten the fuse to innovation. We combine the expertise of top-tier consulting with the agility of a cutting-edge technology firm. This multidisciplinary blend of skills allows us to create unique digital advantages for our clients. Maven Wave’s digital solutions are agile, mobile, rooted in analytics, and built in the cloud.

Maven Wave, Google, and YOU: Drive and deliver business results with data-based insights.

We are looking for a Data Scientist who will utilize their analytical, statistical, and programming skills to develop data-driven solutions to complex business challenges.

Your Life As a Maven:

Leverage data to drive business solutions for enterprise clients.
Assist clients in building Data Science ML/AI Capabilities in the Cloud (GCP, AWS, Azure)
Handle the life cycle of Machine Learning including: Data Transformation, EDA, Feature Engineering, Model Trial Pipelines, Measuring Performance, Retraining, and Deploying models for Inference hosting.
Develop custom or improve existing data science models Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, revenue generation, ad targeting, and other business outcomes.
Work on hybrid Engineering, Data Science, Cloud Architecture teams to delivery business value.

Your Expertise:

3-5 years of experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models.
Cloud experience in a major platform, such as AWS, GCP, or Azure.
Experience using Data Science languages (Python) to manipulate data and draw insights.
Knowledge of a variety of Machine Learning and advanced analytical techniques and their real world advantages/drawbacks.
Familiarity with the following software/tools: Python, C, Java, Jupyter Notebooks, SQL, ML platforms (GCP AI Platform, AWS Sagemaker, H2O, DataRobot), Data Pipelines and orchestration (Spark, Airflow, CI/CD), and visualization (Looker, Tableau, qlikview)
Must have a Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Technology, Computer Information Systems, Computer Applications, Engineering, or a related field.

Your X-Factor:

Aptitude - You have an innate capacity to transition from project to project without skipping a beat.
Communication - You have strong communication skills for coordination across projects and teams.
Impact - You are a critical problem solver with an emphasis on creativity and innovation.
Passion - You have the drive to succeed paired with a continuous hunger to learn.
Leadership - You are trusted, empathetic, accountable, and empower others around you.

Why We’re Proud To Be Mavens!

Google Cloud North America Services Partner of the Year 2019, 2018, 2017
#21 Best Workplaces in Chicago, FORTUNE
Great Place To Work Certification, Great Place to Work
Fast Fifty, Crain's Chicago Business
101 Best and Brightest Companies to Work For, National Association for Business Resources (NABR)
Top Google Cloud Partner, Clutch
Fastest Growing Consulting Firms in North America (#11, #37), Consulting Magazine
Top IT Services Companies, Clutch
Google Global Rising Star Partner of the Year

Ready to Learn More?

Digital Transformation at Atos
Check out the Data Team
See what Glassdoor has to say
Real Customer Stories",4.4,"Maven Wave Partners
4.4","Denver, CO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
294,Data Scientist,$63k-$104k (Glassdoor Est.),"ARGO is a leading provider of software and analytics solutions for both the financial services and healthcare industries. ARGO transforms business processes for financial service providers and healthcare organizations using proven business models and software innovation informed by real customer challenges, breakthrough technology, and rich analytics.

ARGO employs Data Science in order to deliver quantifiable value to customers, mostly as an outcome from optimization processes, or decisions from decision support analytics and machine learning. The business value of the ARGO products in the market place is directly linked to the accuracy of the analytics engines embedded in the ARGO products.

ARGO is looking for a candidate that has skills in each of the following broad buckets:
math/statistics/ML;
databases/programming; and
business
We are looking for extensive experience in various statistical models such as regression, and model building, and being able to explain different models used and the different type of problems that were resolved.

We are looking for an experienced data scientist who has technical knowledge on how to pull data from various sources, understand, manipulate and normalize data, and process data into an insight. Experience in working with structured and unstructured databases, including SQL and flat files is a must. Proven experience in using and manipulating data, data analysis, data engineering, feature extraction, creation and engineering, and data behavior are a must.

We are looking for a data scientist with proven work experience in creating features and models using various tools and packages, including mastering of various programming languages, such as Python and R, while having technical experience understanding model execution in production, in a variety of edge cases and building in risk analyses at the start of model development to mitigate risks.

ARGO solutions use data and process to create a valuable outcome. Working backwards, ARGO is looking for a candidate that:
understands the problems that our solutions try to solve for our customers
translate the problems into something that data science can solve
then solve it (using their math/statistics and database/programming skills);
convert that solution into value representative to the users of the ARGO solutions, using visualization tools to demonstrate value and performance
We are looking for a data scientist that is part of a team of software engineers and data scientists, aware of the deployment computational cost to the ecosystem, interpretability, maintainability, scalability, latency, bandwidth, and other system boundary conditions — as well as the maturity of the customer — itself, when they craft a solution. All these aspects need to be communicated effectively and demonstrated to financial auditors for our adherence to compliance standards and enterprise value.

Current ARGO Solutions in ML
ARGO has existing ML solutions across its line of applications. The candidate will need to engage in these solutions to understand, improve, and create new ML processes as needed. Some of these solutions include:
Banking
Check Fraud – determining fraudulent check activity such as invalid signature, bad check stock, check amounts and check numbers that are out of norm, kiting activities, other suspicious activity.
Money Laundering – looking for patterns that are typical in money laundering schemes.
Know Your Customer and ways to engage in better and more efficient with the customer in their journey and experience with the financial institution to improve customer relations and provide more a better services to the customer.
Potential customer attrition – monitoring patterns that indicate the relationship with the customer is deteriorating.
Healthcare
Locating duplicate patients in a hospital clinical system to prevent error in servicing the patient using techniques for finding duplicates based on the patient demographic information.
Providing post-hospital care to patients that are considered high risk, using risk analysis models, including determine comorbidities that are mostly like to be detrimental to the patient’s health. Providing a way to rank the most critical patients in need of extra care and attention.
Who you are and what you bring to ARGO
Math and Science; Machine Learning, Deep Learning, AI:
Proficient in mathematics, with hands-on work experience in probability and statistics; theoretical fundamentals: hypothesis testing; Bayes’ rule; randomization; and Simpson’s Paradox.
Solid knowledge of several of:
Determination of structure or distribution of data,
Common classification techniques
Common regression techniques
Predictive modeling
Bagging, boosting
Solid knowledge of Machine Learning:
Regression (linear, non-linear, etc.)
Supervised Learning – classification, random forests, neural network, etc.
Unsupervised learning – clustering, expectation maximization, k-means, etc.
Direct accountability in selecting and using math and models to resolve forecasting or predictive business solutions, along with demonstrable understanding of business correlation to the data sets and business objectives.
Working experience relating model execution in production environments, taking into account computational cost, interpretability of data and results, latency, bandwidth, and other execution and edge conditions.
Solid work experience with complex financial or operational models that are statistically relevant, directly accountable for generating insight or quantifiable outcome.
Staying current in latest research in ML, as well as understanding technologies, methodologies, and how and when to apply them.
Data Architecture:
Strong understanding of what happens to the data, from inception, to model, to business decisions, to production use, and the ability to discuss and explain this process.
Extensive work experience with large data models including sparse or skewed data sets.
Demonstrable experience in sample size inferences and assumptions, training data for ML models, data flow, data pipeline and overall good fact-based decision making based on data availability, characteristics, and manipulation in a decision system.
Working experience with data sets in SQL, NoSQL, flat files, data normalization, data sanitation, data quality, privacy and confidentiality
Coding:
Demonstrable expertise in coding in Python, R, SQL, Java. Knowledge of Scala, Closure, Octave, Spark, Tableau, C++, and MATHLAB are a bonus.
Capable and knowledgeable in how to write code and are comfortable handing a variety of programming tasks.
Have experience in dealing with large volumes of data, working with real-time data, batch data, cloud computing, unstructured data, as well as statistical aspects.
Have experience with using and coding statistical models, like regression, optimization, clustering, decision trees, random forests, neural networks.
Demonstrable experience in feature extraction, feature calculation, feature correlation
Demonstrable model building experience: training versus test data, different models of training like cross validation, bagging, boosting, ensemble and cascade classification, etc.
Demonstrable experience on how to mitigate risks associated with model performance, incorrect predictions, skewed machine learning, or insufficient capacity to detect patterns.
Communication:
Communicate effectively to business teams and stakeholders how the math in “black boxes” meet business objectives, and address edge cases, or describe behavior with shifting data trends.
Are able to describe the benefits of your work product, and how mathematical results of your work translate into actionable insight or intervention for all stakeholders.
Additional Experience
Experience in the financial risk and fraud field, or transferable skill set
Cross experience in multiple technologies: :databases, scientific computing, predictive modeling and data analysis.: :
Ability to provide visualization insights:

Education:
Extensive undergraduate/post graduate focus on topics of: Statistics, Data Science, Applied Math, Machine Learning, Physics, Econometrics or a similar quantitative field with focus and depth in mathematical algorithms, probability theory, statistical modeling, and machine learning.

ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS:
Applicants for U.S. or Canadian based positions with ARGO must be legally authorized to work in the United States or Canada. Verification of employment eligibility will be required at the time of hire. Visa sponsorship is not available for any ARGO positions.

PHYSICAL DEMANDS:
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to stand; walk; sit; use hands to finger, handle, or feel; reach with hands and arms; talk or hear. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.",3.6,"ARGO
3.6","Richardson, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
295,Data Scientist,-1,"RESPONSIBILITIES:

Kforce has a client seeking a Data Scientist in Boston, MA.

Summary:
At our Artificial Intelligence Center of Excellence (COE), you won't be just tinkering around the edges, you'll be building critical solutions that will benefit our clients for years to come. We work closely with business partners, collect requirements and deliver high value AI/ML solutions that drive customer and business value. Those of us who love to work with data see this as the pinnacle of opportunities that you cannot find anywhere else in the industry

The AIML (Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning) team contributes to the vitality and growth of the organization through researching and building complex, cutting edge and scalable AI algorithms, models, platforms and technologies to significantly improve customer experience and drive business results. Our team of high caliber scientists, mathematicians and statisticians use rigorous quantitative approaches to ensure that we are efficiently building algorithms and technology relevant to the business or customer experience issue at hand.

REQUIREMENTS:
Minimum Master's degree in Engineering, Computer Science, Mathematics, Computational Statistics, Operations Research, Machine Learning or related technical fields
Advanced knowledge in model evaluation, tuning and performance, operationalization and scalability of scientific techniques and establishing decision strategies
Hands on experience developing supervised and unsupervised machine learning algorithms (regression, decision trees/random forest, neural networks, feature selection/reduction, clustering, parameter tuning, etc.),
Experience in evaluating and making decisions around the use of new or existing tools for a project
Experience in projects involving large scale-multi dimensional databases, complex business infrastructure, and cross-functional teams. Three to five successfully launched ML projects would be ideal
Programming skills in Python, Spark, Scala, R or MatLab
Kforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",4.0,"Kforce
4.0","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1966,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
296,Data Scientist,-1,"Location: Santa Clara, CA, USA Employment Type: Regular full time Company: Big Data Federation, Inc. is one of a new breed of asset managers on a quest to reinvent the investment process. We are unburdening humans of the manual job of making sense of endlessly growing volumes of data, and passing this responsibility onto machines. We believe our automated processes bring significant efficiencies in uncovering company fundamentals and driving fund outperformance. We live by the motto “Nothing is random”. Our home grown, scalable, and smart data platform continuously processes and interconnects tens of billions of data records daily from a diverse and growing number of publicly-available data sources. We are a team of technologists, mathematicians, economists, data scientists, and programmers backed up by one of the world’s largest and most visionary venture capital firms. Job Profile: Reporting to the Chief Data Scientist you will join an experienced and diverse team of software engineers and data scientists as a key contributor to our predictive analytics platform. You will work on a variety of data science projects. This will include designing and implementing machine-learning algorithms and micro-services as well as creating application pipelines which pull data from a universe of ingested data sets, refine them to extract information, and make predictions and generate signals to inform investments. We seek scientists/mathematicians with an aptitude for computer science and excellent coding skills. We particularly welcome passionate, data-oriented candidates eager to learn new skills, and mentor their colleagues in areas where they themselves excel. Experience: Strong background in classical machine learning and deep knowledge in a variety of techniques in feature selection, regression, classification, and clustering, and their real-world advantages and drawbacks Hands-on experience with applied mathematics, e.g., linear algebra, probability, and statistics Proficient with R (preferred), or Python, and their respective library ecosystems Experience with large data sets and distributed computing tools is a plus Ability to multitask with attention to details Familiarity with financial analytics and time series econometrics is a plus Self-motivated and able to recognize long term needs and proactively address them Able to mentor junior data scientists through code reviews and best practices Passion for transforming an organization Strong verbal and written communication skills Education: PhD/Master’s degree in an engineering/math/statistics/science discipline with 2+ years of data science/machine learning experience Compensation: Competitive salary; stock options; health benefits; paid time off; short- and long-term disability life insurance;",-1,Big Data Federation,"Santa Clara, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Financial Analytics & Research,Finance,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
297,Data Scientist,$64k-$109k (Glassdoor Est.),"Title: Data Scientist
Location: Denver, CO
Duration: 5 Months Contract (potential to go PERM eventually)
Client is seeking an experienced Data Scientist to join our team.
The role will be a member of our Machine Learning Operations Team (Client Ops), working on all aspects of platform development for data science work.
Qualified candidates will have demonstrated success in data engineering, software engineering and advanced experience developing machine learning models through experimentation.
Client aims to transform dialysis care and clinical operations through use of artificial intelligence.
Candidate will join a large data science team with access to large data sets , an incredibly robust AI platform, and be surrounded by top talent.
Skills:
Building production-grade models on large-scale datasets to identify new insights by utilizing advanced statistical modeling, machine learning, or data mining techniques
Deploying model training and inference
Developing and maintaining machine learning infrastructure that powers clinical and operations decision-making
Conducting Proofs of Concepts relating to AI pipeline development, rapid Client modeling, and improving the data science experience from model ideation to post-deployment maintenance and support.

Education:
Bachelor of Science (Com Sci, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics) Mandatory
Master's preferred
Demonstrable experience in software development including testing (unit tests, integration tests), advanced programming concepts (types, OOP, FP)
Worked with Docker extensively and container centric frameworks (Kubernetes, Helm)
Candidate should have coding experience, specifically wrangling (such as with Python, SQL, Java, and/or Scala) and analyzing (such as with Pandas or R) large datasets
Candidate should have worked extensively with machine learning (such as Tensorflow, PyTorch, or Ray), natural language processing, and advanced analytics (e.g. time series, regression, neural networks, mathematical optimization)
Candidate should have experience with workflow orchestration tools such as Airflow, Kubeflow, MLFlow, CI/CD
Required Skills:
Data Science",3.8,"iSpace Inc.
3.8","Denver, CO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
298,Data Scientist,$54k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Number: R0083303

Data Scientist, Mid

The Challenge:

Are you excited at the prospect of unlocking the secrets held by a data set? Are you fascinated by the possibilities presented by the IoT, machine learning, and artificial intelligence advances? In an increasingly connected world, massive amounts of structured and unstructured data open up new opportunities. As a data scientist, you can turn these complex data sets into useful information to solve global challenges. Across private and public sectors — from fraud detection to cancer research, to national intelligence — you know the answers are in the data.

We have an opportunity for you to use your analytical skills to improve aerospace mission solutions. You’ll work closely with your customer to understand their questions and needs, and then dig into their data-rich environment to find the pieces of their information puzzle. You’ll develop algorithms, write scripts, build predictive analytics, apply machine learning, and use the right combination of tools and frameworks to turn that set of disparate data points into objective answers to help military leaders make informed decisions. You’ll provide your customer with a deep understanding of their data, what it all means, and how they can use it. Join us as we use data science for good in aerospace mission solutions.

Empower change with us.

You Have:
2+ years of experience with one or more scripting or scientific languages, including Python, R, C++ or Java
2+ years of experience in working with a wide range of predictive and decision models, and tools for developing models
2+ years of experience with Big Data programming technologies, including Hadoop, Spark, MapReduce, Accumulo, Cassandra, HBase, R, Mahout, Pig, and Hive
2+ years of experience with applying machine learning techniques, and the key parameters that affect their performance
Experience with Microsoft Excel and Access
Knowledge of statistical measures such as confidence intervals, the significance of error measurements, development and evaluation data sets
Ability to obtain a security clearance
BA or BS degree in Data Science, Applied Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, Physics, Computer Networks, or Operations Research
Nice If You Have:
Experience with using statistical software applications, including SAS, R, Matlab, SPSS, or Stata
Experience with developing statistical and simulation models
Experience in one or more natural language processing topics: tagging, syntactic parsing, word sense disambiguation, topic modeling; contextual text mining, and application of deep learning to NLP
Experience with developing experimental and analytic plans for data modeling processes, using strong baselines, and accurately determining cause and effect relationships
Secret clearance
MA or MS degree in Data Science, Applied Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, Physics, Computer Networks, or Operations Research
Clearance:

Applicants selected will be subject to a security investigation and may need to meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.

Build Your Career:

At Booz Allen, we know the power of analytics, and we’re dedicated to helping you grow as a data analysis professional. When you join Booz Allen, you’ll have the chance to:
access online and onsite training in data analysis and presentation methodologies, and tools like Hortonworks, Docker, Tableau, and Splunk
change the world with the Data Science Bowl—the world’s premier data science for social good competition
participate in partnerships with data science leaders, like our partnership with NVIDIA to deliver Deep Learning Institute (DLI) training to the federal government
You’ll have access to a wealth of training resources through our Analytics University, an online learning portal specifically geared towards data science and analytics skills, where you can access more than 5000 functional and technical courses, certifications, and books. Build your technical skills through hands-on training on the latest tools and state-of-the-art tech from our in-house experts. Pursuing certifications that directly impact your role? You may be able to take advantage of our tuition assistance, on-site bootcamps, certification training, academic programs, vendor relationships, and a network of professionals who can give you helpful tips. We’ll help you develop the career you want as you chart your own course for success.

We’re an EOE that empowers our people—no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other protected characteristic—to fearlessly drive change.",4.0,"Booz Allen Hamilton Inc.
4.0","Arlington, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1914,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
299,Data Scientist,$101k-$169k (Glassdoor Est.),"ICR has opportunities available for experienced and motivated Data Scientists. If you are interested in talking with us to find out more about this position and how you can take your career to the next level, send us an email at contact@icr-team.com today.

Required Skills and Qualifications

Active Top Secret Security Clearance with SSBI.
Bachelors Degree in Mathematics, Physics, Statistics or related field.
Minimum five (5) years of professional software / algorithm development.
Experience with software development lifecycle and use of associated tools.
Proficient in Python, R, Matlab, Lua, or other data science-centric programming language.
Mathematical knowledge of optimization, multi-variate calculus, probability & statistics, linear algebra, and numerical methods.
Knowledge of supervised and unsupervised machine learning concepts, such as Artificial Neural Networks, SVMs, Random Forests, Gaussian Processes, and other techniques.
Knowledge of common data visualization technologies, such as matplotlib, bokeh, d3, or matlab.
Exceptional analytical skills and problem solving skills.
Willingness to learn new skills and technologies and exit “comfort zone”.
Good organization, decision making, and verbal and written communication skills.
High level of self-initiative and self-motivation with the ability to work under minimal supervision.
Ability to work effectively in small team settings to solve complex problems.

Preferred Skills and Qualifications

Experience with Deep Learning technologies such as Caffe, Theano, TensorFlow, or Neon.
Bayesian Statistics.
Proficient C/C++.
Big Data technologies such as Hadoop MapReduce, HDFS, Apache Spark, Apache Storm, ELK Stack.
Masters Degree or PhD in Mathematics, Physics, Statistics, Computer Science, or Data Science.

Employee Benefits

ICR is an employee-owned company that is proud to offer a comprehensive benefits package designed to meet the needs of our employees and their families. In addition to the industry’s most competitive salaries, we offer each employee equity in their company, a generous retirement plan, company-paid health care benefits and a flexible paid time off policy.

ICR funds a Profit Sharing Plan (PSP) for every employee at an additional 25% of your base salary. These funds are deposited in a tax-deferred account, with no vesting period, that allows you to decide on the investment strategy best for you.

ICR also funds an Individual Benefits Account (IBA) for every employee at an additional 25% of your base salary. These funds are available immediately and can be used to reimburse expenses such as health insurance, medical expenses, paid time off, elected training and an array of other qualified pre-tax expenses.

Who We Are

ICR was founded with the mission to be the first to identify and solve the Intelligence and Defense Communities’ toughest engineering and operational problems by establishing a true partnership with our Customers. Despite our advanced degrees and heavy R&D focus, it is our hands-on experience and scars from the field that will enable us to create very practical and reliable solutions.

Our purpose at ICR is to establish an employee-owned company where the best minds in their career field want to work. Our Customer’s problems will become our own and our employees will wake up each day wanting to solve them. Through a culture of stewardship and calculated risk-taking, we hope to mentor, develop and ultimately transition ICR’s ownership and leadership from our earliest employees to our future generation of employees.",3.8,"ICR
3.8","Denver, CO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Financial Analytics & Research,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
300,Data Scientist,$87k-$145k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Data team at Ordergroove is looking to hire a Data Scientist to join our growing lineup. Our team impacts the lives of millions of consumers through Ordergroove's AI platform which powers the retail experience of some of world's largest brands. On this platform the data science team is creating the foundational infrastructure for a new collection of data and AI driven products to enable frictionless commerce. If you're interested in a crucial role designing and building insights that feed highly visible products, then this role might be for you.

What you will do:
Devise, research, test and develop new ways that use our data to build long lasting relationships for some of the biggest brands in the world, impacting the lives of millions of users.
Build and improve resilient and scalable models for both batch and real-time services.
Evaluate and test the tradeoffs between competing machine learning models, methodologies and architectures.
Work alongside awesome engineers in an agile environment, constantly striving to be more innovative and efficient.
About you:


You have an innate curiosity to find and explore business problems using data and understand best ways to extract real world value from your insights.
You are self driven and prepared to work in a fast paced startup environment.
You are passionate about leveraging the best of breed technology/methodologies and eager to learn new skills.
You write professional level Python on a daily basis (R additionally a plus).
You are skilled at writing and optimizing SQL (core application DBs use MySQL Google BigQuery).
You have a degree in statistics, mathematics, computer science, economics, or another quantitative field and 2+ years experience in a data science role.
Bonus points for:


Startup and SaaS experience strongly preferred
Previous experience building models for subscription products
Previous e-commerce experience a bonus
You ideally have experience with Apache Airflow
You understand at least one Python-based web framework (Django, Flask etc)
You have hands-on experience with Google Cloud Platform
If you don't meet 100% of the qualifications outlined above - that's okay, nobody's perfect! We encourage you to apply if you think this is a role that would make you excited to come into work every day.

About Ordergroove:
Raised $40M from top notch investors
Headquartered in the heart of NYC (with offices in Austin and Denver)
Over 100 clients including The Honest Company, L'Oreal, Home Depot, Bed Bath & Beyond, Walmart, PetSmart, GNC and illy
Meet some of the team you'll be working with: Rob O'Callaghan & Eugene Kozhukalo
We're a close-knit team of passionate engineers, marketers and innovators whose mission is to help our clients become an indispensable part of their customers' lives through Relationship Commerce. We've raised over $40M in venture capital and are planning to grow our team to 100 people this year!

Recently named one of the 2020 Best Companies to Work For in New York, our collaborative culture celebrates independent thinking and curiosity. We demand the best of ourselves and each other and never miss an opportunity to celebrate our success. Company events include hackathons, wine tours, summer BBQs, trips to baseball games and game nights.

We compete hard for the industry's best talent by offering great employee benefits including one of the most flexible PTO policies you'll find, highly competitive compensation and meaningful stock option grants. Our New York HQ is minutes from all of the major subways and boasts a 6,000 square foot private outdoor terrace overlooking beautiful downtown Manhattan.

When you join the Ordergroove team you'll be surrounded by smart, fun people working to transform the business of commerce! If you're ready for a high-impact role at a company creating groundbreaking solutions, we invite you to learn more and apply!

At Ordergroove we are committed to creating a welcoming and supportive environment for all people. We do not discriminate against anyone for any reason. We encourage people with different backgrounds and experiences to join our growing team.",3.6,"Ordergroove
3.6","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
301,Data Scientist,$59k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"About JLG, an Oshkosh company

JLG began in 1969, when our founder, John L. Grove set out to resolve growing safety concerns in the construction industry. Since then we have been committed to understanding the challenges and delivering innovative solutions to the access market. We partner with customers to provide quality equipment, training opportunities and trusted support within the access industry. We are a global company, and our products—including mobile elevating work platforms, telehandlers, utility vehicles and accessories—can be found all over the world.

Overview

The successful candidate will form part of a new data science team that is being put together within JLG to apply data science and AI technologies across the company. In this role, the data scientist will use techniques from statistical analysis, optimization, machine learning and advanced visualization to develop data driven insights and predictive capabilities for JLG’s machine data. This is an exciting and challenging role, and the successful candidate will have the opportunity to be part of a new team, as well as influence decision making for both internal and external customers.

Responsibilities
Apply data science and machine learning techniques to analyze and derive insights from a wide range of datasets collected across JLG’s business.
Develop advanced diagnostic and custom predictive models for data collected from JLG’s connected machines.
Prepare datasets from application engineering, telematics systems, and internal product testing for ingestion into the Oshkosh cluster.
Apply advanced visualization techniques to communicate data insights to both technical and non-technical audiences in a clear and concise manner.
Conduct independent research on new technologies and establish requirements (resources, equipment, estimates, test plans, and milestones) and roadmaps according to the needs of the project.
Work with stakeholders throughout the organization to identify opportunities for leveraging company data to drive business solutions.
Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes.
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy.
Requirements
Strong understanding of modern data science techniques, including statistical analysis, machine learning and visualization.
Strong problem-solving skills with an emphasis on product development.
Strong programming skills, including good knowledge of Python and associated libraries for data analysis (e.g. Pandas, matplotlib) to manipulate data and draw insights from large datasets.
Experience working with and creating data architectures.
Good practical data analysis skills, including a basic working knowledge of SQL and familiarity with the Unix command line.
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests, and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications.
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
Strong time management, communication, and critical thinking skills.
Strong presentation skills and ability to interface with internal or external customers.
Self-starter with a desire to learn and master new technologies and techniques, and who can contribute to the strategic vision for data science within JLG.
Education and Experience
2+ years of experience in a Data Science role manipulating data sets and building statistical models.
Bachelor’s degree (minimum) in Computer Science, Statistics, Informatics, Mathematics, Information Systems, or another quantitative field.
Oshkosh is committed to working with and offering reasonable accommodation to job applicants with disabilities. If you need assistance or an accommodation due to disability for any part of the employment process, please contact us at: 920-502-3009 or corporatetalentacquisition@oshkoshcorp.com.

Oshkosh Corporation is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. This company will provide equal opportunity to all individuals without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status. Information collected regarding categories as provided by law will in no way affect the decision regarding an employment application.

Oshkosh Corporation will not discharge or in any manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with Oshkosh Corporation's legal duty to furnish information.

Certain positions with Oshkosh Corporation require access to controlled goods and technologies subject to the International Traffic in Arms Regulations or the Export Administration Regulations. Applicants for these positions may need to be ""U.S. Persons,"" as defined in these regulations. Generally, a ""U.S. Person"" is a U.S. citizen, lawful permanent resident, or an individual who has been admitted as a refugee or granted asylum.",3.7,"JLG Industries Inc
3.7","Hagerstown, MD",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1969,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
302,Data Scientist,-1,Experiment engineers will be expected to help define and develop our core software for designing and deploying advanced experiments.,-1,Gayathri's Sandbox,"Menlo Park, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
303,Data Scientist,$94k-$152k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist

Apply

Located in Newark, DE.

Job title

Data Scientist

Contract Type

Regular

Publication date

2020-09-10

Country

United States

Company presentation


World leader in gases, technologies and services for Industry and Health, Air Liquide is present in 80 countries with approximately 66,000 employees and serves more than 3,6 million customers and patients. Oxygen, nitrogen and hydrogen have been at the core of the company’s activities since its creation in 1902. Air Liquide’s ambition is to be the leader in its industry, delivering long-term performance and acting responsibly.

Entity and activity description


Air Liquide R&D centers, hosting a wide range of competencies, support the Group in achieving the highest level of excellence in the technologies it provides to its customers. The Delaware Research and Technology Center (DRTC) in Newark, DE provides innovation and technical support to Air Liquide’s businesses and markets in the Americas and worldwide.

Our Delaware Innovation Campus, inaugurated in 2007, leads research and technology initiatives in 8 scientific and engineering disciplines. With researchers from 21 different countries, the Center had the distinction of being named to the 2015 Philly Top Workplaces by the Philadelphia Inquirer and philly.com and cited in 2016 by the Delaware Business Times as one of “13 Cool Companies in Delaware.” In 2017 we celebrated our 10th anniversary in Delaware and over 3,600 days without a recordable accident! In 2018 we celebrated 10 years of accident-free operations.

Job Responsibilities


The R&D Data Science group at Air Liquide has an opening for a Data Scientist. The researcher will have the opportunity to work on challenging problems focusing on customers, patients and operations.The researcher will also interact with multi-disciplinary teams composed of Business, IT and Digital resources that define operating models, and build digital solutions.

Duties and Responsibilities
Collaborate with the business to define needs and challenges, translate them into functional specifications, and develop solutions to address them.
Work with IT and external organizations to obtain online/offline data. Clean, and analyze the data.
Develop solutions relying on machine learning methods such as clustering, regression, classification, time series and deep learning.
Test and verify the performance of solutions with prototypes developed in R, Python, or similar development environments.
Support the development of industrial tools and their deployment in the business units.
Train team members and the business, thus ensuring sustainability of the solutions for Air Liquide.
Publish research in internal reports, at conferences and peer-reviewed journals
Qualifications & Competencies


Required
Phd in Computer Science or related field or MS with 5+ years of industrial experience
A strong background and experience in statistics and machine learning
Strong programming skills in R and Python
Demonstrates strong process and operational safety behavior at all times
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills (written and oral).
Ability to work in a multi-disciplinary and international team.
Preferred
Knowledge of Java, Javascript
Experience in Adobe marketing cloud and SQL",3.2,"Air Liquide
3.2","Newark, DE",-1,10000+ Employees,1902,Company - Public,Chemical Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
304,Data Scientist,-1,"Data Scientist

PhysIQ is a transformational leader in applying highly sophisticated technology to solve some of the most pressing problems in healthcare. More specifically, we are forging the frontier of healthcare delivery at the intersection of mobile technology and artificial intelligence. Our team is comprised of veteran technologists and world-class data scientists and our solutions set the market standard for scalability and sophistication. Furthermore, we are implementers with a proven track record of transforming an audacious technological vision into mission-critical solutions for our customers.

· Our core values are simple and are defined by integrity, passion and relentless drive toward solving the impossible.

· We are a team in its purest definition. We all pull on the rope together, in the same direction, with the same intensity.

· Our customers and their patients depend on us to deliver technology that will forever change healthcare. We are literally keeping people out of the hospital. We are changing lives.

In our world, amazing things only happen when people make them happen. If you want to make things happen and do it with a world-class of team of visionaries and doers, we encourage you to apply.

Job Description

The person in this job is responsible for all functions expected of an experienced data scientist in PhysIQ’s research group, namely to develop, advance and validate the analytical technologies of the company; implement, test and deliver production code into the product to generate analytics; implement, test and evaluate competitive and prior art analytics technologies; support statistical analyses of the company’s clinical studies and trials; develop patentable inventions; develop and implement software tools for algorithmic research and clinical statistical analysis; and document analyses, algorithms and related product features. This position is heavily involved in advancing the core analytical capabilities of the company’s products. The mission of the person in this position is to deliver robust analytical methods for productization and to expose and explain phenomena of interest in clinical physiological data.

Responsibilities

· Algorithm Development and Testing. This position develops new algorithms or improves existing algorithms for a variety of health assessments, activity and behavior recognition, diagnoses, device performance metrics and any other automated signal processing or machine learning technique that might be used on the company’s human subject data. An example is development of a new index for orthopneic breathing based on physiology telemetry measured by sensors. This responsibility includes testing.

· Clinical Data Analysis. This involves analysis of (typically continuous ambulatory) data collected in clinical studies or available from customer de-identified datasets on human subjects accessible to PhysIQ, for any kind of evaluation of results or for any kind of analytics troubleshooting. An example would be analyzing clinical outcomes in a study versus analytical predictions.

· Generate Specifications and Deliver Production Analytics. This position writes and delivers production code relating to analytical methods in PhysIQ’s products, primarily in Python language; and writes associated documentation. This position is involved in writing, evaluating, critiquing, meeting about, tracking in online systems and updating product specifications about algorithms and on occasion other functionality in the product. Examples include: Writing a formal specification and code for a new algorithm; participating in meetings to review product specifications; contributing ideas for new product features that may become specifications; and updating specifications with approved changes.

· Evaluate Competitive Algorithms. This position implements, evaluates and characterizes the efficacy and weaknesses of competitors’ algorithms. These activities often involve formal written reports on the findings and presentations to other PhysIQ staff.

· Research Tool Development. This position is involved in developing tools and infrastructure for at-scale and repeatable analytics research, particularly using cloud and web resources.

· Publish and Patent. This position should generate publishable research papers and patentable inventions as opportunities arise. This position will also be involved in analyzing the existing patent landscape and developing strategies for staking out patent positions on company technology and avoiding infringement of 3rd party IP.

· Conduct and Report on Data Studies. To advance the analytics, this position is involved in aspects of conducting bench data collection activities and data studies, including developing protocols, conducting data collection from subjects, analyzing collected data and writing reports. An example of this is doing an activity study on treadmills with sensor devices using volunteers.

· Analytics Platform Troubleshooting. When challenging bugs show up in the performance of the analytics platform product or associated sensor hardware, that require evaluating and analyzing clinical data, the person in this position performs all necessary steps to conduct troubleshooting when assigned to do so.

· Quality Systems and FDA Validation Work. This position is responsible for participating in the quality management systems of the company and conducting validation testing of algorithms in support of FDA 510(k) or De Novo submissions

· Mentoring Less Experienced Hires. This position is responsible to mentor new hires and interns as needed with respect to tools, procedures, and technology.

· Other. The company may reasonably ask this person to contribute to any other business activity of the company for which the person has sufficient capability and which does not impose an unreasonable burden or unreasonable safety risk.

Required Skills

· Bachelor’s degree from 4-year college program in science, engineering, math or related quantitative program

· Minimum of 5 years of experience in a similar role

· Advanced literacy to code in at least one of the programming languages of: Python, MATLAB, R

· Written English fluency

· 4 or more years of work experience in positions relating to data science or analytics

Nice to Have

· Familiarity with deep learning tools (e.g. PyTorch, TensorFlow, MATLAB NN Toolbox, etc.)

· Google cloud computing and cloud storage familiarity

· Experience with wearable sensor data biosignal processing/analysis experience

· Experience with biostatistical/clinical trials analysis approaches

· Experience with version control software

Powered by JazzHR

Y8Zc4nSkBE",5.0,"PhysIQ, Inc.
5.0","Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
305,Data Scientist,$88k-$146k (Glassdoor Est.),"Actively seeking one highly ambitious and career focused Data Scientist to work in the Huntsville, AL Frontier Technology Inc. (FTI) Office. The project that would consume your time is cutting-edge, dynamic and still developing. Must be able to fully explain requirements to Network Traffic Analysts, SW Developers, leaders and peers; many times, via Teams or conference calls. Our Client is assigned to the Federal Government so you must have a TS clearance or can immediately gain a TS clearance. You should have a small understanding of logical networks. The Data Scientist will use big data sets to support efforts relating to Model-based Systems Engineering (MBSE), data modeling, data mining, data standardization, network behavioral patterns and using enterprise tools to expose internal/external movement.
Career-development professional within field. Requires moderate skill set, proficiency in discipline with a desire for continued development. Conducts work assignments of increasing complexity, under moderate supervision with latitude for independent judgment. Typically requires a bachelor's degree and 4+ years of relevant experience.

Produce innovative solutions driven by exploratory data analysis from complex and high-dimensional datasets. Apply knowledge of statistics, machine learning, programming, data modeling, simulation, and advanced mathematics to recognize patterns, identify opportunities, pose business questions, and make valuable discoveries leading to prototype development and product improvement. Use a flexible, analytical approach to design, develop, and evaluate predictive models and advanced algorithms that lead to optimal value extraction from the data. Generate and test hypotheses and analyze and interpret the results of product experiments. Work with product engineers to translate prototypes into new products, services, and features and provide guidelines for large-scale implementation.

Recognized as subject matter expert and advanced individual contributor professional. Requires specialized skill set. Conducts highly complex work, unsupervised and with extensive latitude for independent judgment. Typically requires a bachelor's or master's degree (or international equivalent) and 10+ years of relevant experience.",4.1,"Frontier Technology Inc.
4.1","Huntsville, AL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1985,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
306,Data Scientist,-1,"The Opportunity


In an effort to better serve our 47 million registered hourly workers and over 450,000 employer locations, Snagajob is looking for a Data Scientist to collaborate with key business stakeholders throughout the organization and help fulfill our mission of helping people find their best fit job. The Data Science role at Snagajob includes a heavy emphasis on search, information retrieval, matching, and recommendation, as well as experimental design and measurement of data science impact in the customer-facing product. This role provides an excellent opportunity to make a direct impact in a customer facing product.

Our tech stack includes Python (pandas, numpy, sklearn, pytorch, flask), AWS (EC2/ECS, S3, EMR, Sagemaker), Elasticsearch, Mongo, CircleCi, Docker, Terraform, and other technologies. You might not have experience in every area but if you have a drive to learn and grow, we encourage you to apply.

This role may be based remotely or in our Arlington or Richmond, VA or Charleston, SC office.

What Snagajob Can Promise You


When you join the Snagajob Engineering team, you'll be working on a high-volume, high-traffic site that gets over 50 million visits a month! But that's just the start of it. You get to contribute more than just code; we have a highly collaborative environment, so you'll influence what we build and how we build it. Expand your skills with our weekly tech talks. Learn about, and experiment with, new technologies/ideas in our monthly hack days and chapter meetings. Engineering at Snagajob isn't just about keeping the lights on and the site running. It's a place for you to learn and grow in a supportive team environment.

What You'll Get to Do
Develop new data science models and pipelines that are highly available, scalable, and reliable
Collaborate with data scientists, developers, and product managers to integrate and validate machine learning solutions end to end
Partner with product teams to analyze key business problems
Support and improve existing data science pipelines and systems in production
Test and implement algorithms in scalable, product-ready code
Research and investigate academic and industrial machine learning, natural language processing and modeling techniques to apply to our specific business cases
What You'll Bring
Advanced degree in computer science or a closely related field, with a concentration in machine learning, or equivalent experience
Experience in advanced analytics and Applied Machine Learning
Experience building and deploying models using common machine learning frameworks such as scikit-learn, PyTorch
Experience working with relational and/or NoSQL data stores
Familiarity working in Linux-based systems and/or cloud computing resources
Experience in knowledge graphs and/or recommendation systems
Ability to work with ambiguous problem definitions
Ability to communicate technical knowledge to a business audience
The ability to live by Snagajob's core values - solidarity, candor, unconvention, fire - by being an ally, speaking hard truths, questioning the status quo, and always doing whatever it takes to meet our mission of putting people in the right-fit positions so they can maximize their potential and live more fulfilling lives
Bonus Points
Experience with A/B testing and analysis of engagement with online marketplaces
Experience working with search and information retrieval systems such as SolR/Elasticsearch, as well as experience with information retrieval success metrics
At Snagajob, we celebrate our differences in an inclusive workplace designed to support the things that make us individuals. Snagajob is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and we strongly encourage candidates from all different backgrounds and identities to apply. Each new hire gives us the opportunity to bring in a fresh new perspective to further diversify our company for the benefit of our employees, products and our community.

Why Snagajob


Snagajob offers a highly competitive compensation and benefits package including medical, dental, vision, life insurance, a 401k plan, health and fitness incentives, PTO, paid community service time, and a casual fun work environment with an award-winning culture. What Snaggers love most is our commitment to work-life blend and the amazing leaders who are dedicated to helping their teams grow personally and professionally. Snagajob promotes a culture of community and support, so once a Snagger, always a Snagger. We pride ourselves on keeping it real and not being afraid to challenge the status quo.

About Snagajob


Snagajob, the country's largest and fastest-growing platform for hourly work, connects more than 47 million active job seekers with employment opportunities at 450,000 employer locations in the US and Canada. Snagajob's mission is to put people in the right fit positions so they can maximize their potential and live more fulfilling lives. Through Snagajob, workers gain the flexibility of working when and where they choose while employers are assured every shift stays filled. For more information, visit www.Snagajob.com or connect with us on LinkedIn, Instagram, Facebook and Twitter.",3.8,"Snagajob
3.8",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
307,Data Scientist,-1,"You have

Bachelor’s Degree and 4+ years of analytics experience or Master’s Degree in a quantitative discipline and 2+ years of analytics experience
Expertise in applied machine learning with Python or Scala
Ability to apply open source big data / analytic tools
Knowledge of statistics, mathematics, and computer science topics
Understanding of Natural Language Processing (NLP) techniques to machine learning problems
Experience using data mining methods, such as clustering and anomaly detection, to understand data patterns and select appropriate predictive techniques
Proficient understanding and usage of relational SQL (e.g. Oracle, SQL Server, PostgreSQL) databases and data structures
Expertise with visualization tools and the ability to “tell a story” with the data
Excellent communication/interpersonal skills including both written and verbal skills
BS/MS in Computer Science or related field

Additional Experience/Skills:

Experience with Big Data / Advanced Analytic Healthcare product solutions
Experience specifically with deep learning
Experience with Spark
Experience with building predictive models using text data (NLP)",-1,MetiStream,"Vienna, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
308,"Educator, Data Scientist",-1,"Educator, Data Scientist

BrainStation is a global leader in digital skills training and development, offering a 12-week Diploma program in Data Science. BrainStation is currently seeking a Data Science professional to lead the delivery of our program through online and in-person teaching. BrainStation Educators are given the unique opportunity to teach, research, and work on real analysis problems, while simultaneously building the future of higher education.

Responsibilities
Lead our 12-week Data Science Diploma program
Help build a world class technical team
Deliver lectures and mentor the next wave of Data Science talent
Co-create BrainStation's full-time Data Science Program that will positively impact the lives and careers of hundreds of individuals across our campuses
Actively work on writing and researching new content to teach the most up to date skills in data science to our students
Apply BrainStation's ""Agile Education"" methodologies to the program to continuously improve the educational experience for students
Constantly improve your own skills, and apply these skills in collaboration with other BrainStation Educators in order to build the digital platform and tools needed to effectively deliver educational material
Define the education experience of the future
Successful candidates will have
3+ years experience as a Data Scientist or Analytics professional and a Bachelor's degree relevant to the subject matter OR 8+ years experience as a Data Scientist or Analytics professional
Experience building and leading teams
Strong command of querying and programming languages (SQL, Python, R), and visualization tools (Tableau, Python packages, etc.), as well as experience applying various methods of numerical and categorical modeling and machine learning principles
Practical experience designing and conducting experiments using a variety of tools and methods, and can speak to their complexities in a simple and logical manner
Experience in a teaching role, and be comfortable speaking to large groups and mentoring others on the job
An empathetic, friendly, and approachable demeanor
A proven ability to work under pressure and meet deadlines
About BrainStation

BrainStation is the global leader in digital skills training and development, with courses, workshops, events, and corporate training offered online and in state-of-the-art campuses in New York, London, Toronto, and Vancouver. Founded in 2012, BrainStation has worked with over 400 instructors from the most innovative companies, developing cutting-edge, real-world digital training for more than 100,000 professionals and some of the largest corporations in the world. By 2025, BrainStation will have innovation hubs around the world and will be empowering young minds, powerful politicians, fortune 500 CEOs, and the newest wave of disruptive innovators, on campuses and online.

*Have you been to a campus or joined an online learning opportunity? We are actively seeking individuals that believe in lifelong learning and that have taken part in our On Campus or Online offerings.

NOTE: Only those applicants under consideration will be contacted. Please accept our utmost appreciation for your interest.

BrainStation is committed to maintaining a diverse work environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants, regardless of race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status will receive consideration for employment. If you have any accessibility requirements or concerns regarding the hiring process or employment with us, please notify us so we can provide suitable accommodation.",4.2,"BrainStation
4.2","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Education Training Services,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
309,Data Scientist,$94k-$130k (Glassdoor Est.),"Our entertainment company is seeking a Data Scientist to join our team! This is a critical role specializing in the application of machine learning methods to meet optimization and efficiency. The Data Scientist will work closely with engineering and business partners and collaborate across teams to resolve issues and provide automated solutions for our products.

We utilize and develop cutting-edge technology to deliver high-end and creative content on a global scale. We work across multiple platforms to transform how we see media. The ideal candidate will possess all of the required skills listed below and more! They will demonstrate excellent interpersonal and communication skills and adhere to the standards of quality and excellence at our company's core.

Please, only apply if you are able to work directly for a U.S. company for the next three years. We are not currently able to work with C2C, H1, or OPT for this position.

Duties & Responsibilities:
Reframe objectives as machine learning tasks.
Productively implement and execute machine learning.
Demonstrate how models and systems work for stakeholders.
Collaborate with other teams to create data-based products.
Process and verify data used for analysis.
Improve data collection procedures to develop better ML models.
Create automated anomaly detection systems and track performance.
Develop prototype solutions, mathematical models, algorithms, machine learning techniques, and analytics to support analytic visualization of complex data sets.
Provide recommendations to drive KPIs established by product, marketing, operations, PR teams, etc.
Explore new experimental methods and statistical techniques that will sharpen the product decision-making process.
Develop and deploy testing hypotheses and analyze test results.
Provide necessary analytical rigor to ensure date quality, consistency, and accuracy of insights.
Participate in an Open Source learning environment.
Qualifications:
5+ years of experience in Data Science.
Bachelors degree in Computer or Data Science.
Experience with ML frameworks (TensorFlow, SparkMLlib, Apache Mahout, PySpark, Torch, Caffe, H2o, etc.).
Ability to deliver machine learning techniques in real-time applications.
Expertise in modern statistics, data science, and machine learning.
Expertise in a statistical programming language (Python and R) and data access tools (SQL).
Knowledge and experience with classic statistical modeling techniques (ogistic regression, CART, K-means clustering) and machine learning algorithms (gradient boosting, neural networks, random forest).
Able to handle large, ambiguous streams of data across different formats and entry points.
Experience processing large datasets and cloud environments (AWS, Snowflake and Big Data technologies (Hadoop, Spark).
Ability to develop high value features.
Experience deploying models in real-time environments.
Able to present data science results to clients.
Experience with Apache Spark MLlib, Apache Spark GraphX, and Scala/Java, preferred.
Powered by JazzHR",4.0,"Evolvinc
4.0","Burbank, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2005,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
310,Data Scientist,-1,"Quest Analytics is one of the fastest growing companies n the Healthcare software space in the US. Healthcare providers and insurance companies rely on our software. We do the important work of providing access to healthcare for all Americans!

We are growing and looking for a Data Scientist to join our team in either Overland Park, KS or on a remote basis. This Data Scientist will provide support to the team that is responsible for managing and mastering the healthcare provider data used to measure the accuracy, adequacy, and accessibility of health plan networks.  The right candidate will help Quest discover high value insights and information hidden in vast, complex data that can be applied to solving business problems and building better products. Your primary focus will be in applying data mining techniques, doing statistical analysis, and building high quality prediction systems integrated with our products.
In this role you will:
Selecting features, building and optimizing classifiers using machine learning techniques
Data mining using state-of-the-art methods
Extending company’s data with third party sources of information when needed
Enhancing data collection procedures to include information that is relevant for building analytic systems
Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis
Doing ad-hoc analysis and presenting results in a clear manner
Creating automated anomaly detection systems and constant tracking of its performance
Evaluate existing algorithms using various technique such as intrusion detection
Develop metrics for evaluating internal and external data sources
What we are looking for:
Master’s degree in data science
A minimum of 2 years’ experience in a data science position required
Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms, such as k-NN, Naive Bayes, SVM, Decision Forests, regression, classification, natural language processing, association rule learning, intrusion detection models, etc.
Intermediate to advanced Python (knowledge of data frames)
Intermediate to advanced experience with Spark and Scala
Intermediate SQL
Great communication skills
Good applied statistics skills, such as statistical testing, distribution estimation, regression, etc.
Good scripting and programming skills
Data-oriented personality
Experience with healthcare data a plus
Excellent troubleshooting, listening and problem-solving skills
We are not currently engaging with outside agencies on this role.

Ready to Evolve?

We want smart, driven individuals to help us create Quest Analytics future. If you invest yourself in your work, live with enthusiasm, and thrive on results, we want to know you.

What's In It For You
Great benefit package with:

100% paid HDHP Health plan, Dental, Vision for Employee tier and cost sharing for all other tiers
Company matching on 401(k) and HSA contributions
Generous PTO and 9 Paid Holidays
Life, Short and Long Term Disability
Paid maternity / paternity and much more
Flexible work arrangements so you can balance work/life
Competitive salary and success sharing bonus
Opportunity to get in on ground floor and grow & learn as the company grows
Work in a fun, flexible, casual environment
Ability to telecommute when needed
Plus, the free gourmet coffee to fuel the brainpower necessary to conquer your goals
Free drinks & snacks
Apply TODAY!

Visa sponsorship is not available at this time.

Quest Analytics provides equal employment opportunities to all people without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, marital status, veteran status, age, disability, sexual orientation or gender identity or expression or any other legally protected category.

Applicants must be legally authorized to work in the United States. Verification of employment eligibility will be required at the time of hire.",3.9,"Quest Analytics
3.9","Overland Park, KS",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
311,Data Scientist,-1,"Fidelity TalentSource is your destination for discovering your next temporary role at Fidelity Investments. We are currently sourcing for a Data Scientist to work at Fidelity in Boston, MA.

At Fidelity’s Artificial Intelligence Center of Excellence (COE), you won’t be just tinkering around the edges, you’ll be building critical solutions that will benefit our clients for years to come. We work closely with business partners, collect requirements and deliver high value AI/ML solutions that drive customer and business value. Those of us who love to work with data see this as the pinnacle of opportunities that you cannot find anywhere else in the industry.

These positions are all located in Boston, MA.

The Team


The AIML (Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning) team contributes to the vitality and growth of the organization through researching and building complex, cutting edge and scalable AI algorithms, models, platforms and technologies to significantly improve customer experience and drive business results. Our team of high caliber scientists, mathematicians and statisticians use rigorous quantitative approaches to ensure that we are efficiently building algorithms and technology relevant to the business or customer experience issue at hand.

The Expertise You Have
Minimum Master’s Degree in Engineering, Computer Science, Mathematics, Computational Statistics, Operations Research, Machine Learning or related technical fields.
Advanced knowledge in model evaluation, tuning and performance, operationalization and scalability of scientific techniques and establishing decision strategies.
Hands on experience developing supervised and unsupervised machine learning algorithms (regression, decision trees/random forest, neural networks, feature selection/reduction, clustering, parameter tuning, etc.),
Experience in evaluating and making decisions around the use of new or existing tools for a project.
Experience in projects involving large scale-multi dimensional databases, complex business infrastructure, and cross-functional teams. Three to five successfully launched ML projects would be ideal.
Programming skills in Python, Spark, Scala, R or MatLab
The Skills You Bring
Your solid skills in algorithm development and predictive modeling
You have deep knowledge of some combination of the following:
Natural Language Processing (NLP)
Deep Learning, Neural Networks
Real Time Event Detection and Scoring
Time series analysis, Econometrics
Robotic Process Automation
Cloud ML
The Value You Deliver


You will partner with business stakeholders to identify/prioritize top AI opportunities, create business/technical requirements, transform large volumes of data into AI-driven solutions using creative, cutting edge open source methods/technologies, lead ML strategy and road map planning, work across teams and influence the direction of external teams. The ideal candidate will combine experienced AI/ML/Open Source/Tech knowledge with hands on experience building algorithms/models/programming and outstanding business skills (revenue/cost drivers, customer experience, customer journey, communication, etc.) to manage and deliver complex/critical projects driving significant value to Fidelity.

Company Culture


At Fidelity, we are focused on making our financial expertise broadly accessible and effective in helping people live the lives they want. We are a privately held company that places a high degree of value in creating and furthering a work environment that attracts the best talent and reflects our commitment to our associates.

Company Overview


We recruit individuals from a variety of backgrounds, including technology and customer service, to fill assignments across Fidelity’s U.S.-based regional and investor center locations. If you would like to experience Fidelity’s diverse and inclusive workplace while expanding your skillset and developing your professional network, consider a role with Fidelity TalentSource.

For information about working at Fidelity TalentSource, visit FTSJobs.com.

Company Overview


Fidelity TalentSource, formerly Veritude, is the in-house temporary staffing provider for Fidelity Investments, one of the largest and most diversified global financial services firms in the industry. We recruit individuals from a variety of backgrounds, including technology and customer service, to fill assignments across Fidelity’s U.S.-based regional and investor center locations. If you would like to experience Fidelity’s diverse and inclusive workplace while expanding your skill set and developing your professional network, consider a role with Fidelity TalentSource. For information about working at Fidelity TalentSource, visit FTSJobs.com.

Information about Fidelity Investments


At Fidelity, we are focused on making our financial expertise broadly accessible and effective in helping people live the lives they want. We are a privately held company that places a high degree of value in creating and nurturing a work environment that attracts the best talent and reflects our commitment to our associates. We are proud of our diverse and inclusive workplace where we respect and value our associates for their unique perspectives and experiences. For information about working at Fidelity, visit FidelityCareers.com.

Fidelity Investments and Fidelity TalentSource are equal opportunity employers.",3.9,"Fidelity TalentSource
3.9","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
312,"Full Stack Data Scientist, Supply DS",$115k-$184k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description

Wish is a mobile e-commerce platform that flips traditional shopping on its head. We connect hundreds of millions of people with the widest selection of delightful, surprising, and—most importantly—affordable products delivered directly to their doors. Each day on Wish, millions of customers in more than 160 countries around the world discover new products. For our over 1 million merchant partners, anyone with a good idea and a mobile phone can instantly tap into a global market.

We're fueled by creating unique products and experiences that give people access to a new type of commerce, where all are welcome. If you’ve been searching for a supportive environment to chase your curiosity and use data to investigate the questions that matter most to you, this is the place.

Job Description

We have an awesome opportunity for a full stack data scientist to work on the supply data science team. If you love organizing, visualizing, and analyzing data, you’re a great fit for Wish. Wish is data driven from the ground up. As a full stack data scientist on supply, you will build pipelines for easy access of data, drive informed decisions on supply areas, and build insights to guide the direction of the team. We’re looking for smart and scrappy data scientists to help accelerate the rate of development.

Responsibilities
Apply your expertise in data pipelines to help clean data and present data in an easily consumable way.
Apply your expertise in quantitative analysis, modeling, visualization to see beyond the numbers and understand how our users interact with our core/business products
Partner with engineering, product and business development teams to solve problems and identify trends and opportunities
Inform, influence, support, and execute our product decisions and product launches
Qualifications
2+ years experience doing data related work, including analytics, modeling, or data engineering.
BA/BS in Math, Statistics, Economics, Computer Science, or other quantitative field. Advanced degrees preferred but not required
Fluency in SQL and at least one other programming language. Some development experience in at least one scripting language (Python, R)
Experience with large data sets and distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop) a plus
Ability to initiate and drive projects to completion with minimal guidance
Have good business sense with the ability to partner with business stake holders
Good communication skills
Additional Information

Wish values diversity and is committed to creating an inclusive work environment. We provide equal employment opportunity for all applicants and employees. We do not discriminate based on any legally-protected class or characteristic. Employment decisions are made based on qualifications, merit, and business needs. If you need assistance or accommodation due to a disability, please let your recruiter know. For job positions in San Francisco, CA, and other locations where required, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Individuals applying for positions at Wish, including California residents, can see our privacy policy here.",3.5,"Wish
3.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Other Retail Stores,Retail,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
313,Data Scientist,$81k-$132k (Glassdoor Est.),"Waystar modernizes the healthcare revenue cycle through innovative, cloud-based technology. We provide the highest-rated client experience to more than 450,000 providers, 22,000 healthcare organizations and 750 health systems and hospitals around the country. Together, our technology, data and client support streamline workflows and improve financials for our clients, so that they can focus on their patients. We are deeply committed to living out our organizational values: honesty; passion; curiosity; fanatical focus; best work, always; making it happen; and joyful, optimistic and fun.

What is the purpose of this position?
We are looking for an experienced Data Scientist, who has previously supported Healthcare software applications. The data scientist role involves solving technical, data-driven Healthcare problems using computer science, mathematical, predictive modeling and statistical methods, & knowledge. This person will interact with teams from Account Management to Application Engineering and R&D, to conduct detailed analysis and experimentation to maximize the utility of predictive modeling, analytic and machine learning across Waystar's product line. The role will focus on extending machine learning, predictive modeling, and analytic components to provide up-to-date intelligence to Healthcare providers maximizing outcomes. An ideal candidate for this position can approach problem-solving challenges independently, has a strong attention to detail, and enjoys working in a fast-paced, collaborative, and team-based environment.

Looking for some details?
Works closely with Application Engineering, Product Management, and Operational teams in designing, experimenting-with, and implementing machine learning and analytical systems applied to design information and user behavior
Works closely with Application Engineering teams to gather and process data, as well as in surfacing various analytically-based features in core products
Works on groundbreaking new applications of machine learning and analytic technology to Healthcare, producing quantitative, justifiable results to guide feature planning
Translates real-world Healthcare problems to mathematical frameworks
Works with Product Management, Marketing, and Sales as needed to promote sales and to incorporate market and customer feedback
Data exploration, hypothesis creation (from business and product goals), testing algorithms, scaling to large data-sets and validating results will be common tasks for this role
Understands, organizes, and communicates root causes of problems and successes succinctly
Do you fit our team?
Complete familiarity with various statistical and machine learning techniques including: classification, regression, dimension reduction, clustering, and various multivariate methods
Complete familiarity with empirical approaches to estimate performance of machine learning models including: hold-out sets, cross-validation, leave-one-out testing
Understanding of orders of algorithms and how they scale
Demonstrated competency in R/Python predictive modeling
Demonstrated competency in RDBMS (e.g. SQL Server)
Ability to code in 1+ general purpose programming language (C#, Java, etc.)
Must be a quick-learner with the ability to multi-task in a fast-paced environment
Outstanding presentation abilities and the ability to communicate with all levels of the Business
Comfortable working in newly-forming, ambiguous areas where learning and adaptability are key skills
Outstanding communication and interpersonal skills
Must possess strong analytical, problem-solving, and writing skills
Proficient in Microsoft Office applications
Detail-oriented
Preferred Skills:
Master of Science degree or higher in the fields of Computer Science, Statistics, or Mathematics is preferred
An aptitude for medical informatics is preferred
In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire.",4.0,"Waystar
4.0","Chicago, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
314,Data Scientist,-1,"• Be one of the first to join our rapidly growing, well-funded startup in Downtown Seattle
• Apply Data Science best-practices to reducing the cost and ecological impact of food waste
• Make a big contribution across our entire product in this small, passionate team

At Shelf Engine, we’re harnessing the power of AI to provide real-time, intelligent forecasting for food retailers like grocery stores, food service, and cafes across the United States. We’re able to drastically reduce the amount of shrink (food waste) which in turn drives profit for retailers, lowers costs for consumers, and reduces the ecological impact of waste. We’re using technology to solve a globally-relevant problem that both creates a positive environmental impact and an exciting (and potentially massive) commercial opportunity.

We are hiring a Data Scientist to join our growing Engineering and Data team. You will be spearheading projects across the organization to determine what data we collect and how, and which other sources we passively utilize to improve our day to day business processes. Your background in mathematics, statistics, and business logic will directly impact the accuracy of our forecasting, striking a fine balance between reducing customers food waste, and avoiding understocking situations. Help us solve critical problems related to the following areas: time-series analysis, demand forecasting, predictive modeling and machine learning, feature identification & pattern recognition, model segmentation & aggregation, constrained optimization.
As a Data Scientist at Shelf Engine, you will:
Work cross-functionally (e.g. Product, Engineering, Operations, etc) to frame problems, both mathematically and within the business context; to measure and optimize products and business processes; to identify opportunities, assess risk potentials and explain trends; to drive customer adoption and revenue growth
Own the end-to-end experience with data, including querying, aggregation, deep analysis, visualization and models; presenting findings/actionable insights to internal and external stakeholders
Design, analyze, and run both simulated and live experiments (A/B and multivariate tests) to drive KPI improvement
Continuously improve the quality and accessibility of our analytical capabilities and framework as well as data reporting infrastructure
Assist in data requirements gathering and data validations to improve data platforms
And we think you would make a great Data Scientist if you:
Have a Masters degree in a related quantitative field (Computer Science, Math, Statistics, Engineering, Physics, Economics)
Bring 4+ years of relevant working experience in a similar role, preferably with specific experience in the domain of time series demand or other forecasting
Have production-level experience with data querying languages (e.g. SQL), scripting languages (e.g. Python), and statistical/mathematical programming languages (e.g. R, Matlab)
Expertise with statistical analysis, applying various machine learning techniques, especially predictive modeling, to solve business problems
Bring a proven ability to think creatively, solve problems, learn quickly, work independently, handle ambiguity, and adapt to change in a fast-paced environment
Excellent written, verbal, and interpersonal communication and presentation skills
About Us:
At Shelf Engine, you will join a small, powerful Product team that’s hungry for change in an untapped industry. Our founders are well versed in the food industry, and have successfully built Product and Engineering teams. We’re not only solving complex technical problems at scale, but tackling key initiatives with large environmental impacts a well. We're a tight-knit and passionate team, determined to disrupt an industry with wide-ranging impact, and creating a significant commercial opportunity.

We’re looking to add you - a Data Scientist who is passionate about marketplaces, demand forecasting, and reducing waste! APPLY NOW and get in early on a team that's changing food distribution for the better, or learn more about us at http://shelfengine.com

Shelf Engine is an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",4.7,"Shelf Engine
4.7","Seattle, WA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
315,Data Scientist,-1,"Our client in Mountain View is looking
for driven individuals to join their team of passionate data
engineers and data
scientists in creating their generation of data products and
capabilities.
Candidates should possess deep knowledge of machine learning
algorithms along
with modern data processing technology stacks and have a strong
problem solving
skills.

They are a small and efficient team offering
equity to help them build scalable data pipelines on a cloud
platform for data
analysis and reporting process and providing a solution with
machine learning
and data mining techniques.

Responsibilities

·
Implement machine learning
based predictive models such as churn prediction

·
Write production worthy code,
ensuring it runs efficiently on the target system

·
Apply data analytics and
statistical techniques to identify relevant ML features

·
Overcome common ML problems
such as overfitting, cold start, and logging

·
Detect flaws in the existing
machine learning systems and suggest improvements

·
Collaborate with management
to align developed models with stakeholders needs

·
Develop, deploy, and maintain
the data products and systems with documentations

Qualifications

·
Bachelors degree or Masters
degree from Computer Science, Data Science, or equivalent
practical experience.
Masters degree preferred.

·
Strong knowledge of machine
Learning algorithms.

·
Strong understanding of
programming and computer science fundamentals.

·
Experience in producing
algorithms and improving their efficiency and runtime.

·
Fluent in Python and SQL.

·
Experience with cloud
platform is a plus.

·
Knowledge of Big Data
technologies such as Spark or Hadoop is a plus.

·
Ability to learn modern data
technologies.",-1,"nexus IT group, Inc.","Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
316,Data Scientist,$46k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

Role

Data
Scientist

The
Position
The Data Scientist
position is a hands-on role responsible for the end-to-end design, testing and
development of machine learning models for Service Operations. As a Data
Scientist you will work closely with other team members and business
stakeholders to apply machine learning, deep learning, NLP and other advanced
analytic techniques to solve business problems. You will research and prepare
data for analysis, perform data exploration, apply machine learning and
statistical techniques to draw conclusions and build innovative analytic
solutions to improve operational effectiveness and efficiency.

Responsibilities

· Work
individually and/or with team members to design and develop machine learning
models for prototyping or ad-hoc analyses.
·Apply
data mining techniques and perform statistical analysis as needed.
·Collect
and organize information from a variety of data sources. Write queries to
underlying Microsoft SQL Server and Oracle databases.
·Work
with business partners to learn and understand the specific domain (i.e. Claim
Ops, Call/Contact Center, Client Services…).
·Interview
stakeholders in order to understand pain points.
·Clearly
present findings to leadership and be able to articulate and influence the
Business Case for change.

Qualifications
·Expertise
in machine learning algorithms and statistical modeling techniques such as
clustering, classification, regression, decision trees, neural nets, support
vector machines, ensemble modeling and text mining techniques such as sentiment
analysis, topic modeling and entity extraction.
·

Job Function

CONSULTANCY

Role

Developer

Job Id

165688

Desired Skills

Data scientist

Desired Candidate Profile

Qualifications :
BACHELOR OF COMPUTER SCIENCE",3.7,"Tata Consultancy Services (North America)
3.7","Bloomfield, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1968,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
317,Data Scientist,$63k-$106k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Motivate Lab is looking for a Data Scientist who can begin immediately. In order to achieve our mission of improving people’s lives, we are committed to rigorous evaluation and analysis of our data. The Data Scientist will contribute to various projects through ongoing data management and data analysis across multiple projects, and developing lab-wide data systems. This role is an exciting opportunity for a results-oriented, innovative professional within a fast-growing organization centered around applied work to support educational research and practice.

About Motivate Lab:
The mission of the Motivate Lab is to improve people's lives through rigorous motivation research. Led by two professors at the University of Virginia, Motivate Lab's annual operating budget of over $2.2M is completely supported through external grants and contracts. Our current five-year strategic plan has ambitious goals of growing the size, scope, and impact of our work in education and beyond, including sports and workforce settings. The majority of work in our organization focuses on research and development activities that develop tools to infuse learning-mindset supportive practices into educational and policy contexts, with a particular focus on supporting students from traditionally underrepresented backgrounds in higher education. We utilize our rigorous methods to design translational activities, including professional development, training, and dissemination, for both researchers and practitioners. We aim to change both the fields of practice and research through our innovative and agile methods of developing evidence-based practices.

Responsibilities:

Currently Motivate Lab is working on several major projects to help faculty and administrators across higher education build more motivationally-supportive learning contexts for students. Our data sets include both quantitative and qualitative data from a variety of sources, including randomized controlled trials, administrative data, student and faculty surveys, and faculty artifacts (e.g., syllabi). The Data Scientist will be responsible for management and analyses of these data.
Data Analysis
Development and utilization of data analysis protocols / frameworks.
Programming data analysis through code primarily using R (preferably) and SPSS.
Analysis of descriptive and correlational statistics by group.
Analysis of validity and reliability of quantitative measurement scales.
Regression modeling and other higher-level analytical techniques (e.g., hierarchical linear modeling, structural equation modeling, propensity-score matching, latent class analysis).
Using RMarkdown (or other reporting technology) to create analytic reports for stakeholders and internal lab personnel.
Participate in the generation and delivery of insight gleaned from analyses for multiple audiences (e.g., academics, practitioners, funders, etc.)
Provide recommendations to internal and external stakeholders based on research findings.
Collaborate on the creation of professional development programs and materials using data.
Data Management
Create and manage longitudinal datasets.
Build datasets by merging from various data sources, tables, files, etc.
Clean datasets in preparation for analysis.
Coordination of data management and analysis efforts with research coordinators and the lab’s data manager(s).
Creating Lab-Wide Data Systems
Direct the creation and consistent updating of data management protocols, data analysis protocols, and data translation protocols (i.e., moving from analysis to reporting and improvements in practice).
Supporting the ongoing skill development of Motivate Lab undergraduates and staff.
This role may require additional responsibilities, as necessary.

Qualifications and Skills/Experiences:
A Master's degree or terminal degree in Psychology, Public Policy, Education, Quantitative Methods, or related field is required. PhD preferred.
Basic knowledge of psychological constructs, including theories of motivation and intelligence is preferred.
At least 5 years of experience in a relevant, fast-paced professional setting (including graduate research labs); past data analysis experience in education is required.
Strong working knowledge of statistical research software, such as R (preferred), Stata, or SPSS.
Proficiency in analyzing, managing, and reporting complex quantitative and qualitative data, with specific ability to apply work in education.
Effective interpersonal communication skills.
Strategic thinker with advanced problem-solving skills.
Excellent organizational skills with a strong understanding of systems and procedures.
Fierce work ethic and sense of purpose, with the ability to work well as part of a dynamic team.
Physical Demands: This is primarily a sedentary job involving extensive use of desktop computers. The job does occasionally require traveling some distance to attend meetings, and programs.
Commitment to Justice, Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion:

Motivate Lab is committed to:
Recruiting talented and diverse staff.
Recruitment and retention of a diverse workforce, and providing an inclusive and supportive environment in which staff and faculty are recognized as integral to the success of our work.
Promoting a culture of integrity, mutual respect, excellence, collaboration and innovation.
Compensation:

Competitive salary is commensurate with individual’s experience and skills. All full-time employees receive a comprehensive benefits package.

Application:

Motivate Lab is an equal opportunity employer and encourages a diverse pool of candidates to apply. For questions about the position, please contact Alison Lubin, Motivate Lab Project Associate, and for questions about the application process please contact Bethany Case, Recruiter. Applicant review will begin October 5th, and new applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis and the posting will remain open until filled. This position will consider remote applicants. This role is restricted with a 1 year term limit, continuation is dependent upon the availability of funding, satisfactory performance, and the need for the role.

Please apply through Workday, and search for “Data Scientist"". Complete an application online and attach:
Cover letter addressing 1) previous experience with data management and analysis, 2) previous experience working in teams and training/managing others (if relevant), and 3) how you intend to bring a focus on diversity, equity, and inclusion to this role.
CV/resume.
Attach all materials into the resume submission field, multiple documents can be submitted into this one field. Alternatively, please combine all into one PDF. Internal applicants must apply through their UVA Workday profile by searching 'Find Jobs'. Applications missing materials will not be considered.

The University of Virginia, including the UVA Health System which represents the UVA Medical Center, Schools of Medicine and Nursing, UVA Physician’s Group and the Claude Moore Health Sciences Library, are fundamentally committed to the diversity of our faculty and staff. We believe diversity is excellence expressing itself through every person's perspectives and lived experiences. We are equal opportunity and affirmative action employers. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, color, disability, gender identity or expression, marital status, national or ethnic origin, political affiliation, race, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, veteran status, and family medical or genetic information.",3.8,"University of Virginia Health System
3.8","Charlottesville, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1825,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
318,Data Scientist,$66k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"Type of Requisition:

Regular

Clearance Level Must Currently Possess:

Top Secret/SCI

Clearance Level Must Be Able to Obtain:

Top Secret/SCI

Suitability:

No Suitability Required

Public Trust/Other Required:

None

Job Family:

Data Science

Job Description:

★This position is NOT yet funded★ Our Intelligence & Homeland Security team has a exciting new opportunity for a Mid-Level Data Scientist to provide on-site data science support to advance Latin America and Global drug trend analyses in support of the Consolidated Counterdrug Database (CCDB).

Additional responsibilities will include:
Data entry into the digital foundation in counter-narcotics data Artificial Intelligence ( AI), Machine Learning (ML), data mining algorithms, probability modeling, and other scientific techniques to correlate complex, technical findings into graphical, written, visual and verbal narrative products on trends of intelligence information
Apply technical expertise to leverage in-house tools such as Rand Python scripts to generate insights into existing data stores, to include CCDB
Employ deep knowledge of existing and emerging "" big data"" processing tools and techniques useful in delivering strategic insights to policy makers in the counterdrug mission
Identify new classified and unclassified data stores of massive size and relevance to the counter-narcotics mission to enhance CCDB data enrichment efforts or provide unique analytic insights into counterdrug issues
Engage in exploratory analysis and rapid iteration techniques of large volumes of data to quickly derive intelligence. Prepares products to describe and document findings and activities
Identify and evaluate a wide range of existing methods, models, and algorithms to develop more accurate and/or objective quantitative analysis approaches for CCDB data completeness, accuracy and consistency. Clearly articulate opportunities, risks and assumptions with applied methodologies. Communicate findings to a wide variety of customers, in both written and verbal formats; ability to communicate complex information in laymen's terms
Participate in special projects / surge support as required
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree with a minimum of 8 years of related experience, with at least a portion of the experience in the past 2 years
TS/SCI with Poly. Or, the ability to obtain a Poly.
Scheduled Weekly Hours:

40

Travel Required:

Less than 10%

Telecommuting Options:

Telecommuting Not Allowed

Work Location:

USA DC Washington

Additional Work Locations:

We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.

GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",3.6,"General Dynamics Information Technology
3.6","Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
319,Data Scientist,$82k-$142k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Cubist
Cubist Systematic Strategies is one of the world’s premier investment firms. The firm deploys systematic, computer-driven trading strategies across multiple liquid asset classes, including equities, futures and foreign exchange. The core of our effort is rigorous research into a wide range of market anomalies, fueled by our unparalleled access to a wide range of publicly available data sources.
Job Description
We are passionate about data. We collaborate to build elegant, effective, scalable and highly reliable solutions to empower predictive modelling in finance.
Cubist’s data services group is looking for a Data Scientist to join our dedicated team. Our group is responsible for the timely delivery of comprehensive and error-free data to some of the most demanding and successful systematic Portfolio Managers in the world.
This exceptional individual will be a member of a small team of Data Scientists who play a vital role in ensuring the smooth day-to-day implementation of a large research infrastructure, and the live production trading of billions of dollars of capital across global capital markets, including equities, futures, options and other financial instruments.
Job Responsibilities
Identification of new data sets
Engaging with vendors to understand characteristics of datasets
Building processes and technology tools to ingest, tag and clean datasets
Analysis of datasets to generate descriptive statistics and propose potential applications of data
Research of potential “alpha signals” for presentation to Portfolio Managers
Monitoring and enhancing the automated data collection and cleansing infrastructure
Research on new technologies for improved data management and efficient retrieval
Desirable Candidates
Ph.D. in computer science, mathematics, physics, statistics or another disciplines involving rigorous quantitative analysis techniques
At least 1 year of experience as a Data Scientist, quantitative researcher or in a similar role
Experience working with large data sets, including classification, regression, distribution analysis, and predictive modeling
Experience applying statistical tests to large data sets
Programming skills in SQL, TSQL, SQL Server or PL-SQL
Programming skills in Python and at least one of C#, C++, or Java
Financial industry experience preferred but not required
Experience dealing with intraday, tick and order book data a plus
Strong problem solving skills
Intellectual curiosity and a love of learning
Attention to detail and a love of process
Strong oral and written communication skills",3.9,"Point72
3.9","New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
320,Data Scientist,-1,"Invent Collaborative Machine Learning

Comet is doing for Machine Learning what GitHub did for software. We allow data science teams to automagically track their datasets, code changes, experimentation history and production models creating efficiency, transparency, and reproducibility. Ever wondered how Linus felt when he invented GIT? How about the brains behind JIRA? Machine Learning teams operate like software teams 15 years ago and we started Comet.ml to write the rules of ML workflows and teams.

You’re welcome here

Working in a fast dynamic startup is challenging and lots of fun. We are looking for people who want to make an impact with their roles and decisions. If you are excited about pushing code that will change the way data scientists work all over the world, this is the right place for you. Comet.ml is backed by major VCs and we’re looking to expand our team. This role can be based in our NYC SoHo office or remote.

Comet.ml is an equal opportunity employer without regard to race, religion, color, sex, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, uniform service member status, marital status, pregnancy, age, medical condition, physical or mental disability, genetic information/characteristics and any other characteristic protected by State or Federal law.

Motivation

Comet has an opening for a motivated data scientist to tackle technical content, community building, and help manage our social media channels. This role will provide support for the marketing and data science teams, using deep, technical knowledge of data science, machine learning, and AI to develop compelling content.

This role is ideal for someone with a few years of data science experience looking to join a hot startup in the machine learning space.

Responsibilities:
Craft deep, technical content on data science, machine learning, and AI, including developing code and video tutorials where appropriate
Proactively contribute to and develop the Comet Community, including hosting Meetups, Hackathons, events, and driving online programs
Publish and syndicate content across multiple platforms, including WordPress, Medium, Reddit, and HackerNews
Proactively engage with the community via Comet social media channels, such as LinkedIn, Twitter, and Reddit
Requirements:
Self starter
Strong organizational and communication skills
Desire and drive to help others, especially within the Comet Community
Driven, creative and coachable
Team oriented
Desire to do what it takes to make and exceed targeted goals
Experience/Minimum Qualifications:
1+ years of experience in a technical data science, machine learning, or AI role
Clear and demonstrable knowledge of Python and ML frameworks such as Keras, PyTorch, Tensorflow
High standards for writing quality and a passion for data science
How To Apply

Please send your resume to hiring@comet.ml, use the subject Data Scientist.",5.0,"Comet.ml
5.0","New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
321,Data Scientist,-1,"POSITION: DATA SCIENTIST

LEVEL: MID-LEVEL

YEARS OF EXPERIENCE: 3+ YEARS

ABOUT US:

At M.Y.N. Group, MYNGroup.com, we invite creative, ambitious, and talented people with a strong commitment to teamwork and growth.

Our global digital agencies specialize in capture and analyzing consumer behavior data (CRM, CDP, DMP), customer journeys, KPI growth roadmaps, multi-channel ideation strategies, creating high converting innovative digital experiences at every stage of the funnel.

We believe in creating an environment for success. M.Y.N. Group invests in a range of training, development, and growth processes to prepare our Herd to create solutions to any challenge.

Each candidate is treated with equality, kindness, and respect. M.Y.N. Group upholds the principles of equal opportunity and compassionate employment.

LOCATION: Our M.Y.N North America office located in New York City, USA

TYPE:

Part-Time 3 days per week

Full-time 5 days per week

COMPENSATION:

Based on experience

CANDIDATE OVERVIEW:

We are looking for a Part-Time and Full Time Data Scientist to support our team in strategy, creative work, and management in our New York office. This person looks at complex sets of data and research information to reach conclusions, and may also lead the process of collecting and reporting on new data.

RESPONSIBILITIES:

On a day-to-day basis, the data scientist will have the following responsibilities but not limited to:
Putting together data and statistics based on topics
Collecting data
Analyzing data
Transferring data into a new format to make more appropriate for analysis
Creating new experimental frameworks to collect data
Building tools to automate data collection
Searching through large data sets for usable information
Creating reports and presentations for business uses
REQUIREMENTS:
Good working knowledge of programming languages
Good working knowledge of data platforms. Example: Tableu, data studio, etc
Strong mathematics skills
Experience with common data science tool kits
Good in statistics and technical writing skills
Familiarity with data management tools
Ability to communicate complex data in a simple actionable way
Analytical and problem solving skills
Knowledge of G Suite
All interested candidates please send your resume and cover letter with the name of the position and your full name.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per hour

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.2,"MYN North America
4.2","New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2010,Private Practice / Firm,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
322,Data Scientist,-1,"WHO WE ARE

Kinship, Mars Petcare's newest division, is a hotbed for future innovation, data science and analytics, and at the forefront of emerging technology for pets, pet owners and veterinarians. At Kinship, we move quickly to shape the future of pet care. We are Optimistic, Purposefully Inquisitive, Open to all, and passionate about what's possible. We're a coalition of bright minds, big ideas, and bold businesses united by our love of pets..

Part of Mars, Incorporated, a family-owned business with more than a century of history making diverse products and offering services for people and the pets people love, the 85,000 Associates in Mars Petcare are dedicated to one purpose: A BETTER WORLD FOR PETS. With 75 years of experience, our portfolio of almost 50 brands serves the health and nutrition needs of the world's pets and The WALTHAM Centre for Pet Nutrition has advanced research in the nutrition and health of pets for over 50 years. Mars Petcare is also a leading veterinary health provider through a network of over 2,000 pets. We're also active in innovation and technology for pets, with WISDOM PANEL™ genetic health screening and DNA testing for dogs, the WHISTLE™ GPS dog tracker, and LEAP VENTURE STUDIO accelerator and COMPANION FUND™ programs that drive innovation and disruption in the pet care industry.

A BIT ABOUT OUR TEAM

Pet Insight is a team of data scientists, technologists, and vets that has partnered with Whistle Labs, Banfield Pet Hospital, and pet-owner citizen scientists to conduct the largest population health study in pet care. We focus on research and development, building state-of-the-art technologies (see FilterNet https://www.mdpi.com/1424-8220/20/9/2498) and leveraging our unique data to create solutions that improve the lives of pets.

HOW YOU'LL CREATE A BETTER WORLD FOR PETS
Design and conduct experiments comparing data from different device prototypes in order to bring a new device to market within the current application framework.
Propose and implement solutions for improving existing models to meet new demands.
Collaborate with the product team to understand requirements, craft and test solutions, and meet product deadlines.
Contribute to the creation, deployment, and scaling of customer-facing machine learning and predictive algorithms in a production environment
WHO WE NEED TO CHART THE FUTURE OF PET CARE

We strive to hire people who are passionate about our purpose. For all of our Kinship roles, we look for candidates who will add to our culture and grow with us. We believe what we do is just as important as how we do it, and we aim to hire people who are:
Optimistic. Those who are Courageous. Who's boundlessly energy and enthusiasm for what's next shines through in everything they do. We seek to work with people who are intrinsically happy, and who will drive our vision and purpose while managing the complexities of our businesses.
Purposefully Inquisitive. Those who Learn at Pace and use their deep business insights to cultivate innovation. We want the trailblazers in tech. Those who are entrepreneurs at heart, ask the tough questions, adapt quickly to new situations, and analyze data in new ways to push our big ideas forward.
Open to All. Those who Value Difference. People who are inclusive leaders and believe that our differences make us better. We hire people who are naturally collaborative, thrive in a flat and flexible organization, and seek broad perspectives in their work.
And for this role, we hope you have the following skills we require:
Technical degree (BS/MS in Engineering, Computer Science, Math, Physics, or other quantitative discipline).
3+ years experience in data science.
Highly proficient with Python tools (pandas, numpy, scikit-learn, jupyter notebooks, etc.)
Familiarity with AWS and cloud infrastructure
Adept at researching, developing, and deploying new models.
Skilled in statistical modeling, hypothesis testing, and experimental design.
Strong experience writing and maintaining production level code.
If you also had these experiences, you'd knock it out of the dog park:
Wearable technologies
Accelerometer data
WHY JOIN US?

We offer our Associates:
Unique opportunities for a customizable career within pet care
A super collaborative, flat work environment with direct access to our senior leadership team
Multiple hubs to work from: NYC, San Francisco, Portland, London, Shanghai, and Moscow
A dog-friendly workplace at most hubs, or right from your couch when you work from home
Exceptional health, dental, vision, and pet benefits for you and your family
Unlimited paid time off
Flexible work opportunities
Support for pet-related appointments and leaves
Parental leave for the birth or adoption of your new child
Discounts on pet products, services, nutrition and veterinary wellness plans
Welcome kits with pet merch & Kinship swag
An extensive onboarding program with a chance to meet all of our leaders across Kinship
Mars, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. If you need assistance or an accommodation during the application process because of a disability, it is available upon request. The company is pleased to provide such assistance, and no applicant will be penalized as a result of such a request.

Copyright ® 2020",-1,Kinship,"San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
323,Data Scientist,$113k-$115k (Glassdoor Est.),"Solve important and challenging problems


We're looking for someone that can help us to solve the data challenges that we know we have, as well as help to identify new opportunities to leverage our data. You'll be working with a variety of teams across the company: engineering, business development, sales, and design to explore exciting and meaningful problems.

Strong candidates can leverage a wide array of machine learning and statistical techniques at scale, to address challenges with semi-structured and multilingual international trade data. Responsibilities will include helping us develop the next generation of our product, as well as analysis of our internal metrics to assist the company in making a wide variety of data-driven decisions. Our team uses a range of tools including python, R, Ruby, and SQL to communicate and visualize results.

At Panjiva, you'll work on:
Fuzzy matching and clustering of data, at scale
Natural language processing, robust to messy text and multiple languages
Imputation of missing data
Network analysis
Inference of company structures
Anomaly detection
Shipment trend prediction and modeling
Optimization of search weightings
Predictive modeling of customer acquisition and retention
Requirements
B.S, M.S, or Ph.D. in a quantitative field, or equivalent experience
Deep statistical knowledge and a broad understanding of analytical and machine-learning techniques
Track record of providing valuable insights into large, highly multidimensional datasets
Experience with a scripting language, such as Python with NumPy / SciPy or R, and the ability to use it to perform complex analyses of large data sets
Basic understanding of relational databases
Strong ability to communicate and visualize findings
Nice-to-Haves
Solid understanding of relational databases, including advanced query techniques
Background in text analysis / information retrieval algorithms
Experience building production software
Familiarity with Ruby, Postgres
Familiarity with libsvm
Experience with C++ or a similar highly performant language
Familiarity with large-scale, distributed data processing techniques (Hadoop, Pig, Hive, etc.)
Startup experience
Perks and Benefits
Competitive salary
Build or buy your dream computer
Harvard Square office 1 minute walk from the Red Line T stop
15 days vacation (rising to 25 days with longer tenure), 3 floating holidays / personal days, and 10-12 paid holidays annually, with unlimited sick leave
Weekly tech talks
Health, dental, and vision insurance as well as many other benefits
401(k) plan, with company matching
Hacker Continuing Education Wednesdays i.e., craft beer tasting, ping pong lessons
Work with a talented, focused, driven team in a growing company with opportunity for advancement and career development
How to apply


To apply, email jobs+datascience at panjiva.com with:
Your resume (and, if you have it, your blog, GitHub, etc. handles)
A description of an exciting project you've tackled in the past, with, if possible, an example of code from that project
A paper you think is exciting, with an explanation of what makes you excited about it
About Panjiva


Panjiva's technology creates insight from messy global trade data to provide powerful search, analysis, and visualizations of more than a billion shipping records from nearly every country in the world. More than 3,000 customers in over 100 countries, ranging from Fortune 500 companies and startups to government agencies and hedge funds, rely on our platform for supply chain intelligence. In global trade, better insight means better decision making and stronger connections between companies and governments across the globe.

Recognizing Panjiva's cutting-edge technology, S&P Global's Market Intelligence division acquired Panjiva in 2018. This acquisition has grown our resources, dramatically expanded our access to data, and accelerated our growth plans. Join our team as we revolutionize a key and fascinating part of the world economy!

NOTE: Panjiva is an EOAA. Panjiva takes affirmative action to employ and advance in employment qualified individuals with disabilities. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or physical or mental disabilities.",4.2,"Panjiva
4.2","Cambridge, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
324,Data Engineer - Azure,$93k-$165k (Glassdoor Est.),"sdg is a high performance software community. sdg consultants build and deliver custom software for some of the largest and most recognizable local and national brands. In this role you will be asked to leverage your current skills and learn new ones. Working in over 400 different technologies and continually learning together, you can expect a one-of-a-kind and award winning work experience.

If you have proven enterprise experience working with Microsoft Azure in a handful of the following, we want to hear from you.

•Design and development of relational and non-relational databases, data warehouses and data lakes
oAzure SQL DB, Azure DB for MySQL, Azure DB for PostgresSQL
oAzure Cosmos DB
oAzure Data Lake Storage, Azure Synapse Analytics
oAzure DB Migration Service
•Development, monitoring and maintenance of data integration and processing tools and pipelines
oAzure Data Factory
•Design and testing of machine learning and data science tools, including the building and deployment of data models
oAzure Databricks, Azure HDInsight
•Implementation of high-capacity, real-time data streaming technologies
oAzure Stream Analytics, Azure Data Lake Analytics
•Data analysis and visualization tools
oAzure PowerBI
oAzure Data Lake Analytics
•Leveraging non-database data storage alternatives to maximize performance, costs and data quality
oAzure Blob Storage
oAzure Cache for Redis
oAzure Search
•Familiarity with security and security policies within Azure

bonus experience

Bachelor's Degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes

what's in it for you?

Full-time salaried position with sdg, a 10-time Best Place to Work
Engaged teammates who care about quality solutions
Challenging and rewarding work with great customers
Abundant opportunities to give back to the community
A company proven to make decisions based on its core values
A true stake in success as sdg is an ESOP, 100% employee owned
Year-round technology and social events to stay sharp and have fun
Membership in the best technology community in the Twin Cities",4.9,"Solution Design Group
4.9","Golden Valley, MN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
325,Data Scientist,$83k-$137k (Glassdoor Est.),"SURVICE Engineering is nationally recognized as a single-source provider for Government and industry organizations involved in all phases of the systems engineering process. We're proud to have supported the development, testing, and analysis of many of the major U.S. combat systems in the field today. Join us in making a difference in the lives of those defending our nation.

SURVICE is currently seeking cleared Data Scientists, at various levels, to support our customer at the Naval Air Systems Command located at the Naval Air Station Patuxent River, MD. The Data Scientist will support the analysis of F-35 data, simulation data, and the statistical comparison of the two data sets. The ideal candidate is adept at manipulating data in a tactical or operational context to gain insight into installed sensor and system performance. They must have strong experience using a variety of data analysis methods and data munging tools. They must have a proven ability to support technical decisions with data. They must be comfortable working with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams across government and contractor organizations.

Primary Duties & Responsibilities
Work with data analysis team members across the enterprise to accomplish the verification and validation of the Joint Simulation Environment.
Write tools to assist in mining data from flight tests and simulation runs
Write tools to assist in comparative analysis of flight tests and simulation runs
Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques
Implement performance analysis and visualization of flight test and simulation data sets
Desired Experience
Strong problem-solving skills with an emphasis on producing data to drive decisions
Experience using statistical computer languages (R, Python, MATLAB, or similar etc.) to manipulate data and draw insights from medium and large data sets
Experience working with and creating data architectures
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications
Must have DoD/military systems experience
Excellent written and verbal communication skills for coordinating across teams
Qualifications

We are looking for multiple Data Scientists for this effort. The mid to senior level candidate should have a minimum of at least 5-7 years of relevant experience. BS or MS in Engineering, Operations Research, Computer Science, Math or other relevant technical degree. Junior to mid-level candidates should have 2-5 years of experience and relevant education.

Security Clearance Requirement
MUST be a U.S. citizen and have an active DoD issued government security clearance in order to be considered
Relocation Assistance may be available

SURVICE Engineering is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. VEVRAA Federal Contractor.

Job Posted by ApplicantPro",3.7,"SURVICE Engineering Company
3.7","Lexington Park, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1981,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
326,Data Scientist,-1,"We are looking for a data scientist that will help us
discover the information hidden in vast amounts of data, and help us make
smarter decisions to deliver even better products. Your primary focus will be
in applying data mining techniques, doing statistical analysis, and building
high quality prediction systems integrated with our products.

Essential Functions

Selecting features, building and optimizing classifiers using machine learning techniques

Data mining using state-of-the-art methods

Extending company’s data with third party sources of information when needed

Enhancing data collection procedures to include information that is relevant for building analytic systems

Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis

Doing ad-hoc analysis and presenting results in a clear manner

Creating automated anomaly detection systems and constant tracking of its performance

Implement new statistical or other mathematical methodologies as needed for specific models or analysis

Optimize joint development efforts through appropriate database use and project design

Competencies

Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms, such as k-NN, Naive Bayes, SVM, Decision Forests,etc.

Experience with common data science toolkits, such as R, Weka, NumPy, MatLab, etc.

Great communication skills

Experience with data visualization tools, such as D3.js, GGplot, etc.

Proficiency in using query languages such as SQL, Hive, Pig

Experience with NoSQL databases, such as MongoDB, Cassandra, HBase

Good applied statistics skills, such as distributions, statistical testing, regression, etc.

Good scripting and programming skills

Data-oriented personality

Work Environment

This job operates in a professional office environment. This role routinely uses standard office equipment such as laptop computers, photocopiers and smartphones.

Physical Demands

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to talk or hear. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision and ability to adjust focus. This would require the ability to lift files, open filing cabinets and bend or stand on a stool as necessary.

Position Type/Expected Hours of Work

This is a full-time position. Days and hours of work are
Monday through Friday, 8:30 a.m. to 5 p.m. Occasional evening work may be required as job duties demand.

Travel

Little to no travel is expected for this position.

Required Education and Experience

Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math or related field

3+ years’ practical experience with SAS, ETL, data
processing, database programming and data analytics

Extensive background in data mining and statistical analysis
Advanced knowledge of database structure and theory

Basic understanding of disaster recovery and database backup
procedures

Familiarity with reporting tools

Ability to work independently with minimal supervision and
assistance

Work Authorization/Security Clearance (if applicable)

Ability to obtain a TS/SCI Security Clearance and potentially
operate sustainment and fielding activities in a secured facility.

AAP/EEO Statement

The Company is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe it is our moral and legal
obligation to meet the responsibility of ensuring that all management practices
regarding employees are conducted in a nondiscriminatory manner.

In compliance with Title VII of the 1964 Civil Rights Act, and other applicable
federal and state statutes, all recruiting, hiring, training, and promoting for
all job classifications will be administered without regard to race, color,
religion, ancestry, age, sex, national origin, disability, military veteran
status or other status protected by law, including state of employment
protected classes.

All personnel related activities such as compensation, benefits, transfers, job
classification, assignments, working conditions, terminations, layoffs, and return from layoffs, and all other terms, conditions and privileges of employment will be administered without regard to race, color, religion, ancestry, age, sex, national origin, disability, military veteran status or other status protected by law, including state of employment
protected classes.

The success of the Company depends heavily on the employment and effective utilization
of qualified persons regardless of race, color, religion, ancestry, age, sex,
national origin, disability, military veteran status or other status protected
by law, including state of employment protected classes. It is, therefore, our
policy and intention to evaluate all employees and prospective employees
strictly according to the requirements of the job.

Other Duties

Please note this job description is not designed to cover or
contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that
are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities and
activities may change at any time with or without notice.",5.0,"Reveal Global Consulting LLC
5.0","Fulton, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
327,Senior Data Engineer,$58k-$111k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Data Engineer 10879 New York, NY 8/10/2020 3:18:00 PM
Enterprise architecture
FTE - Client
Job Description
What You'll Do:
● Strategize and execute a data architecture and infrastructure to meet business objectives
● Work closely with Solutions Architects and Product Managers to make sure that the technical infrastructure can support client requirements
● Act as a strong technical leader who can mentor and guide less experienced engineer gain a solid intuition on how to solve technical challenges related to data products
● Design and develop ETL and data pipeline solutions to load data warehouse
● Create a data integration plan and build data integration between systems
● Advise team throughout the engineering department on best practices vis-a-vis data
infrastructure
● Maintain, monitor, and test internal data pipelines for reliability and performance
● Provide the leadership team with achievable deadlines and successfully execute
Job Requirements
What's Required:
● At least 6-8 years of experience as a Data Engineer in which you set up data pipelines
● Experience using and building solutions to support various reporting and data user tools
(Chartio, Tableau, Looker, etc)
● Experience with modern programming languages such as Ruby, Scala, Go, Python, etc.
● Experience working with data warehouses, data lakes and ETL pipelines (Snowflake,
Redshift, Postgres, SQL, etc)
● Experience setting up an maintaining databases within AWS
● Technical Leadership experience
● Experience working on applications serving large enterprise clients
● Experience working on healthcare and/or social determinants of health data products
● A focus on building performant systems
● Ability to think forward and build a scalable solution that satisfies various needs of
enterprise clients with dedicated data teams",3.8,"IntraEdge
3.8","New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
328,Data Scientist,$76k-$111k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Varen, our performance is measured by the success of our clients, and our reputation for service, superior quality, objectivity, integrity and results. Our reputation is everything to us as we are committed to being a trusted adviser to our nations decision makers in a day in age that demands acute attention to detail in a fast-paced environment. Varen is seeking to add the sharpest technical professionals who share our passion for ensuring the mission success of our customers at all times.

Data Scientist

Description:


A data scientist will develop machine learning, data mining, statistical and graph-based algorithms to analyze and make sense of data sets; prototype or consider several algorithms and decide upon final model based on suitable performance metrics; build models or develop experiments to generate data when training or example data sets are unavailable; generate reports and visualizations that summarize data sets and provide data-driven insights to customers; partner with subject matter experts to translate manual data analysis into automated analytics; implement prototype algorithms within production frameworks for integration into analyst workflows.

Data Scientist shall possess the following capabilities:
Produce data visualizations that provide insight into data set structure and meaning
Work with subject matters experts (SMEs) to identify important information in raw data and develop scripts that extract this information from a variety of data formats (e.g., SQL tables, structured metadata, network logs)
Incorporate SME input into feature vectors suitable for analytic development and testing
Translate customer qualitative analysis process and goals into quantitative formulations that are coded into software prototypes
Develop and implement statistical, machine learning, and heuristic techniques to create descriptive, predictive, and prescriptive analytics
Develop statistical tests to make data-driven recommendations and decisions
Develop experiments to collect data or models to simulate data when required data are unavailable
Develop feature vectors for input into machine learning algorithms
Identify the most appropriate algorithm for a given data set and tune input and model parameters
Evaluate and validate the performance of analytics using standard techniques and metrics (e.g. cross validation, ROC curves, confusion matrices)
Oversee the development of individual analytic efforts and guide team in analytic development process
Guide analytic development toward solutions that can scale to large data sets
Partner with software engineers and cloud developers to develop production analytics
Develop and train machine learning systems based on statistical analysis of data characteristics to support mission automation
Clearance Requirement:


TS/SCI w/poly

Varen Technologies, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer and applicants receive lawful consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, gender, age, national origin, disability, or veteran status.",4.2,"Varen Technologies
4.2","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
329,Data Scientist,$87k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"Jacobs is looking for a Data Scientist in McLean with an active TS/SCI with Poly. This role is responsible for improving analyst's collaborative workflow by developing tools and capabilities that enhance the ability to use and produce identity intelligence data.

Responsibilities:
Working independently and collaboratively in a team, on strategic projects to develop complex data models and solutions.
Analyzing, interpreting, and extracting data to support decision-making, engaging with customers to understand changing requirements, and recommending solutions based on quantitative analysis.
Independently compiles and reviews often disparate and inconsistent data to address complex intelligence issues or problems for internal/external customers.
May require constructing and performing complex statistical, mathematical, and data analysis independently, or in partnership with other data scientists or analysts.
Provides recommendations for the development of tools and applications that improve process effectiveness and efficiency.
#CJPOST
Qualifications:
Experience supporting complex data science and analytic projects
Proficiency with Python or R
Experience using SQL to query large relational databases
Experience/knowledge of computer science concepts including programming/algorithm development, statistics, data architecture, data analytics, data science including visualization techniques
Experience with quantitative and qualitative analytics
Experience constructing and performing complex database search queries across multiple databases
Ability to effectively communicate complex technical findings to non-technical audiences in both written and verbal formats
Experience identifying, recommending, and implementing continuous improvement approaches
Overall 3 to 10 years of experience
Degree in BA/BS or MA/MS degree in a technical field such as mathematics, engineering, economics, or computer science
TS/SCI with Polygraph security clearance

Desired Skills:
Experience in modern machine learning, biometrics, social network analysis, or geospatial analysis
Experience/knowledge of link analysis tools ( e.g. Palantir, i2 Analyst’s Notebook)
Experience with cloud architectures including AWS
Experience with distributed computing and storage technologies

Essential Functions

Physical Requirements:
Most work will be done at a desk or computer.

Work Environment:
General Office environment. The work environment is fast-paced and sometimes involves extreme deadline pressures. The nature of the work requires a high degree of teamwork and cooperation with other members of the staff as well as individuals across the Company and Customers.

Equipment & Machines:
General office equipment including PC/laptop, Fax, Copiers, Shredder, Printers, Telephone, and other miscellaneous office equipment.

Attendance:
Attendance is critical at all times. Must be able to work a 40-hour workweek, normally Monday through Friday. However, times and days may vary depending on business requirements. Needs to be available to work overtime during critical peaks and be available to meet last minute requests for overtime should the situation occur.

Other Essential Functions:
Must be able to communicate effectively both verbally and in writing
Grooming and dress must be appropriate for the position and must not impose a safety risk/hazard to the employee or others. Must put forward a professional behavior that enhances productivity and promotes teamwork and cooperation.
Must be able to interface with individuals at all levels of the organization both verbally and in writing. Must be well-organized with the ability to coordinate and prioritize multiple tasks simultaneously. Must work well under pressure to meet deadline requirements. Must be willing to travel as needed. Must take and pass a drug test and background check as well as a motor vehicle records check. Must be a US citizen.",3.7,"Jacobs
3.7","McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1947,Company - Public,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$10+ billion (USD),-1
330,Data Scientist,-1,"Dataiku allows enterprises to create value with their data in a human-centered way while breaking down silos and encouraging collaboration. One of the most unique characteristics of our product, Data Science Studio (DSS), is the breadth of its scope and the fact that it caters both to technical and non-technical users. Through DSS, we aim to empower people through data and democratize data science.

Dataiku’s promise to our customers is to provide them with the software and support needed to accelerate their data science and machine learning maturity. Dataiku’s Data Science team is responsible for delivering on that promise. Internally, we call the team the DataFab — ask us about it!

The role of a Data Scientist at Dataiku is quite unique; our Data Scientists not only code up solutions to real-world problems, but also participate in client-facing endeavors throughout the customer journey: supporting their discovery of the platform, helping integrate DSS with other tools and technologies, training users, and co-developing data science projects from design to deployment.

Just as the non-technical skills are important, so too are the technical. Our Data Scientists work in the DSS platform every day. Aside from the visual tools of DSS, our team uses mostly python, with occasional work in other languages (e.g., R, SQL, pyspark, JavaScript, etc.). An ideal candidate is comfortable learning complex new technologies and modeling techniques while being able to explain their work to other data scientists and clients.
In this role, you'll help the team:
Co-develop production-level data science projects with our customers
Analyze and investigate various kinds of data and machine learning applications across industries and use cases
Help users discover and master the Dataiku platform, DSS, via user trainings, office hours, and ongoing consultative support
Provide data science expertise to customers and internally to Dataiku’s sales, marketing teams
Develop custom python or R-based “plugins” in collaboration with R&D and product teams, to enhance DSS’s functionality.
You may be a good fit for the role if you have:
Curiosity and a desire to learn new topics and skills
Empathy for others and an eagerness to share your knowledge and expertise with your colleagues, Dataiku’s customers, and the general public
The ability to clearly explain complex topics to technical as well as non-technical audiences
1-3 years of experience with python or R
1-3 years of experience with machine learning
Familiarity with data visualization in python, R, and/or JavaScript
Familiarity with relational data structures and/or SQL.
Technical skills that may help you in the role:
Experience with PySpark, SparkR, or Scala
Experience developing WebApps in Javascript, RShiny, or Dash
Experience building APIs
Experience using cloud products and services from AWS, GCP, Azure, and/or Kubernetes
Experience with or passion for teaching and/or public speaking.
Benefits:
Exposure to a wide range of enterprise customers across industries. Examples of Dataiku’s hundreds of customers include GE, Unilever, Comcast, Ubisoft, OVH, Santander, and Capgemini
A wide diversity of projects and tasks ensures that no two days will be alike
Opportunity to contribute to the core vision of our company and product: simplify and democratize the way people work with data and use Artificial Intelligence
Exposure to the latest, open source technologies that Dataiku integrates
See our release notes for our latest developments: https://doc.dataiku.com/dss/latest/release_notes/index.html
Competitive compensation package, equity, health benefits, and paid vacation
Trips to Paris (our European HQ) and other locations worldwide for company-wide and team summits
Opportunity to work with a smart, passionate and driven team in hypergrowth mode
Dataiku has a strong culture based on key values: Transparency, Ambition, Excellence, Humility, and Empathy.
To fulfill its mission, Dataiku is growing fast! In 2019, we achieved unicorn status, went from 200 to 400 people and opened new offices across the globe. Spanning from Sydney to Frankfurt, Denver to London, geography doesn’t stop Dataikers from working closely together and sharing experiences. Collaboration is key within our product and culture. We strive to create a sense of belonging and community while fostering diverse thinking by encouraging cross-team, cross-office interactions like our annual company offsite or Paris onboarding. Fly over to Twitter, LinkedIn, and Instagram to read stories about our culture, people, and success.

Our practices are rooted in the idea that everyone should be treated with dignity, decency and fairness. Dataiku also believes that a diverse identity is a source of strength and allows us to optimize across the many dimensions that are needed for our success. Therefore, we are proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All employment practices are based on business needs, without regard to race, ethnicity, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, religion, age, neurodiversity, disability status, citizenship, veteran status or any other aspect which makes an individual unique or protected by laws and regulations in the locations where we operate. This applies to all policies and procedures related to recruitment and hiring, compensation, benefits, performance, promotion and termination and all other conditions and terms of employment.",4.9,"Dataiku
4.9","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
331,"Scientist / Senior Scientist, Analytical Methods",$67k-$147k (Glassdoor Est.),"Function in the analytical group of Process and Manufacturing Sciences to support process and product development and characterization.

Process LC/MS data for:
Intact and protein analysis
Peptide mapping
Host cell protein analysis
Implementation of new data processing techniques
Development and qualification of analytical methodologies for the support and evaluation of antibodies and ADCs.
Assist with sample preparation and analysis for a variety of analytical techniques
Authoring and reviewing technical reports summarizing results
Reviewing and writing SOPs
It is each employee’s responsibility to perform their work properly and ensure a product or service meets the current Good Manufacturing Practice (cGMP) requirements for Safety, Identity, Strength, Purity, and Quality. It is each employee’s responsibility to immediately report observations regarding anything that deviates from established standards to their supervisor and to the Quality function.

PhD in Analytical Chemistry or related fields, Masters with 2+ years, BS with at least 5 years in Pharmaceutical/Biotech
Core competencies:
Protein Chemistry
HPLC/UPLC
Mass spectrometry (preferred High Resolution Accurate Mass)
Ability to learn new computer software quickly
Additional competencies (preferred):
Waters Empower and other analytical software
Peptide mapping
Intact analysis
MALS
CAD
Bioassays/Cell-based assays
Proficient in CE-SDS and icIEF
Experience in GMP or GLP
ELISA",2.8,"Immunomedics, Inc.
2.8","Morris Plains, NJ",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1982,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
332,Data Scientist,-1,"General Summary

Global Fishing Watch (GFW) is an independent, international non-profit organization that advances the sustainability and stewardship of the ocean by offering, for free, data and near real-time tracking of commercial fishing activity.

GFW processes a global database of vessel GPS positions, several terabytes in size, and applies machine learning models that infer each vessel's type and size as well as when they are likely fishing. GFW is now developing new models, both on these GPS positions and on satellite imagery, to fully reveal activity in the world's oceans. These models include object detection from global feeds of satellite radar and optical imagery, and models that infer, based on vessel behavior, illegal activity and unreported catch. We believe that these new models have the potential to dramatically change the way we monitor and manage the world's oceans.

The Position

Forced labor in fisheries is increasingly recognized as a human rights crisis. Until recently, its extent was poorly understood and no tools existed for systematically detecting forced labor risk on individual fishing vessels on a global scale. Working closely with the GFW technical teams and GFW's research partners, the data scientist will refine our current vessel-level behavioral model to predict fishing vessels that have a higher risk of using forced labor and will develop new models. The position represents an exciting opportunity to apply modern ML to big data problems in a field where it has been little used to date. Unlike traditional supervised learning this problem is an example of ""positive-unlabeled (PU)"" learning (because we don't know which vessels do not use forced labor), requiring less straightforward approaches and presenting interesting challenges. The existing model has been applied to a small training set, and working with global partners we are currently identifying additional labeled data. The successful candidate will refine the models as new data are acquired and subsequent model predictions will be tested in the field through our network of partners.

Skilled use of R or Python (current model is implemented in R) is needed, as is some experience with SQL and knowledge of machine learning techniques. A successful candidate does not need to demonstrate all of the skills required for this job, but does have to show an aptitude for learning such skills on the job. We have many successful data scientists who started with limited modeling experience. The ideal candidate will be excited about working with global data and will have a high aptitude for learning new techniques. Global Fishing Watch values working quickly, innovating, and working collaboratively. Our entire team works remotely, so the ideal candidate will be able to manage their own time and be effective with limited daily oversight. Finally, we are passionate about producing research and datasets that will make a difference in how we manage the world's oceans.

Job Requirements

Technical skills
Demonstrated skills with Python or R (with preference for R based on current model implementation)
SQL experience
Demonstrated abilities to process and interpret large datasets
Knowledge of machine learning concepts and basic modeling
The Required team and communication skills
Team player, willing to work, teach, learn with/to/from the GFW team
Proactive mindset enjoys and exhibits a high-degree of ownership of tasks and projects
Comfortable working in a small but fast growing organization
Excellent communication skills in person, phone, and, most important, written
Comfortable communicating with a wide range of individuals, including peers, juniors and senior level people, and government officials from multiple countries
Intellectually curious, forward thinking, willing to suggest / try new technologies and creative approaches to problems
Ability to work in a remote-only distributed team (in more than 5 different time zones)
Helpful skills, but can be learned on the job
Knowledge about marine science and human impacts on the ocean
Location: GFW has a distributed workforce, with employees all over the world. This position will require the successful candidate to work closely with team members based in California and Buenos Aires. Working from Asian or European time zones can be acceptable if the candidate is willing to work outside of normal business hours.

Responsible to: Research & Innovation Director

Salary or Compensation: Commensurate with experience. GFW offers pension/retirement, health and other benefits commensurate with similar level GFW employees in the country of employment.

Working Hours: GFW supports flexible working, so the pattern of hours may vary according to operational and personal needs. GFW works across different time zones and weekend work may be required on occasion. Periodic domestic and international travel will be required to meet with team members and for workshops. No overtime is payable.

Travel: Currently suspended due to COVID-19. In person team meetings may occur once every few months.

Holiday: Paid holiday/vacation commensurate with other, similar-level Global Fishing Watch employees/contracts in the country of employment.

Equal opportunities: GFW is an equal opportunities employer and commitment to this process is expected.",-1,Global Fishing Watch,Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
333,Data Scientist,$77k-$131k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why work at MGIC?

Are you someone who wants to play a critical role in our company’s success? Do you enjoy solving puzzles and finding a better way to get things done? Are you someone who likes to Take The Lead and make an impact? If so, then imagine yourself at MGIC. At MGIC we are a team of dedicated professionals on a fearless mission. A team that fosters a culture of career development and continuous learning opportunities to help you rise to new heights. We are passionate about providing outstanding customer service and making a difference in our community. #WeAreMGIC

How will you make an impact?

As a Data Scientist you will be working to build and continually refine a strategy for a state-of-the-art data and analytics solution while working across the business to deliver a new level of analytics capabilities using new advanced tools, data and technologies. Additional responsibilities include:
Conduct and design quantitative analytics utilizing advanced data models, both structured and unstructured
Participate in the continuous development and refinement of analytical vision, processes and system approaches
Participate in the planning of complex data and analytics strategy. Establish scope and objectives and develop the strategy for completion
Conduct independent assessments of data and analytics framework identifying strengths and limitations from both a computing, scalability and quantitative perspective
Collaborate with business decision makers and computing staff to develop and/or deploy computational approaches to business processes
Work to standardize development and use of computational services while providing communication and education for those services to the end user communities
Do you have what it takes?
Completion of Master’s Degree. Open to various education backgrounds and experience, preference in Computer Science, Quantitative Analytics, Statistics, Data Science or STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering and Math).A Bachelor’s degree in these subject areas with 2+ years of relevant experience may be considered in lieu of a Master’s Degree.
Advanced interdisciplinary knowledge, including mathematics, statistics, and programming
Proficiency in data and statistical tools/languages such as R, Python, Spark, Java, C++, NoSQL
Advanced statistical and machine learning methods and tools such as R, TensorFlow, H2O, scikit-learn, etc.
Probability and simulation methods
Familiarity with basics of object-oriented programming
Ability to evaluate alternate advanced technologies and new approaches to problem solving
Experience working with and creating data architectures
Experience with streaming data
Experience with distributed computing tools such has YARN, Hive, Spark, etc.
Experience with visualization tools such as Shiny, D3, ggplot, plotly etc
Additionally:
For analysis of moderate complexity requires general direction, defines necessary tasks to achieve outcomes
Performs analysis of high complexity/advanced nature with limited oversight
High level of business knowledge; project work involves several layers of thinking and impacts multiple areas within department
Enjoy these benefits from day one:

• Competitive Salary & pay-for-performance bonus
• Financial Benefits (401k with company match, pension plan, profit sharing, HSA, wellness rewards program)
• On-site Fitness Center and classes (corporate office)
• Paid-time off and paid company holidays
• Business casual dress

For additional information about MGIC and to apply, please visit our website at www.mgic.com/careers.",3.7,"MGIC Investment
3.7","Milwaukee, WI",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1957,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
334,Data Scientist,$90k-$144k (Glassdoor Est.),"Type: Full Time
Clearance: TS/ w Polygraph
Experience: All Levels of Experience Acceptable
Location: Columbia, MD

JOB SUMMARY:


Visionist, Inc. has opportunities for Data Scientists with interest in data analytics support across a variety of areas, from the development of advanced data analytics to understanding, evaluating, and implementing customer requirements. Visionist can offer opportunities to stay current with the latest trends, technologies, and future industry movement in relation to data analytics. You will be able to develop, design, maintain, and enhance data analytic solutions for our customers.

SAMPLING OF DESIRED SKILLS:
Experience with Python, R, Scala, or Julia. Java experience is preferred. Large dataset experience (Map/Reduce, Hadoop, Spark, Flink).
Strong familiarity with data science applications such as association analysis, graph/network analytics, clustering, text analytics, classification and regression (multivariate and logistic).
Training in the design and implementation of static and dynamic visualizations in R, Python, Tableau, or similar visualization software.
Knowledge of machine learning methods (neural networks & deep learning) and platforms (TensorFlow, H20).
Experience or exposure to Natural Language Processing (NLP).
QUALIFICATIONS:


Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field preferred.
Ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear, precise, and actionable manner.
Capable of building conceptual, knowledgeable, and physical data models.
Produce innovative and creative solutions to analytic problems.
Comfortable with various data structures and common methods in data transformation.
Interested in this position? Send us a resume today.
Due to government contract and security clearance requirements, US citizenship is required.

Visionist, Inc. is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity for all employees and to providing employees with a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. All employment decisions are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to race, religion, color, sex (including pregnancy and gender identity), sexual orientation, parental status, national origin, age, disability, family medical history or genetic information, political affiliation, military service, or any other non-merit based factor. These protections extend to all management practices and decisions, including recruitment and hiring practices, appraisal systems, promotions, and training and career development programs. Visionist, Inc. will not tolerate discrimination or harassment based on any of these characteristics.",4.9,"Visionist, Inc.
4.9","Columbia, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
335,Data Scientist,-1,"Job Description: Data Scientist

XOR Security is currently seeking a talented Data Scientist to support an agency-level team. This program provides targeted threat monitoring and response capabilities requiring analysts to have advanced levels of experience in intelligence, insider threat, and fusion analysis. The selected Data Scientist will employ mathematical and statistical modeling approaches to a wide range of problems within the intelligence domain. Data analysis is aimed at allowing analyst and senior leaders to make actionable decisions. The ideal candidate will need to define problems, build models, and perform analysis to identify alternatives and recommendations to maximize operational efficiency. Create visualizations that tell a story to clearly explain results of analysis describing complex mathematical methods, applications, and results to the client and teammates from technical and non-technical disciplines.

Location: Washington DC

Required Qualifications:
Active TS/SCI
BS or MS degree in a Mathematics, IT or related Engineering related field
Individuals must have a minimum of five (5) years' experience data mining, descriptive and predictive modeling, risk analysis, streaming analytics, anomaly detection, exploratory data analysis, ETL, event log processing, mathematical modeling, graph/network analysis, data visualization, text mining, data access, storage and retrieval
Individuals must have experience with machine learning, applied probability, and statistical methods and experience with Neural Networks
Ability to mine and analyze data from a range of sources, including customer transactions, click streams, sensors, social media, log files and GPS plots.
Ability to unlock valuable and predictive insights that will influence business decisions and spur a competitive advantage.
Individuals must have experience in pattern recognition and the ability to identify relationships between features.
Experience with designing and deploying Big Data systems, implementing cloud based architectures
Experience using applying advanced com­­pute resources (super computers, gpgpu etc) computers to improve efficiency and effectiveness of algorithms
Experience with Python, Scala, MongoDB, noSQL, ELK, Hadoop (or similar)
Ability to collaborate and share initiatives in developing & innovating solutions
Must be inquisitive and do ""what if"" analysis on data, questioning existing assumptions and processes.
Have the ability to handle multiple competing priorities in a fast-paced environment where priorities change rapidly.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Security+ certification or have the ability to obtain this certification within the 120 days of employment.
Ability to identify and determine software, services, and process necessary to exact into sustainable cyber solutions.
Analyzes operational requirements, business needs, and operational data to support the development of applications and high-performance data processing systems
Performs process and data modeling in support of the planning and analysis efforts using both manual and automated tools
Strong logical/critical thinking abilities, especially analyzing existing application architectures, and developing a good understanding of data models
Strong desire to learn new and emerging techniques and technologies to solve complex cybersecurity related tasks
Experience working within an Agile and/or Dev/Ops development framework
Familiar with concepts of big data, big data processing - AWS Cloud Services, Kafka, Storm
Deploying and managing large-scale Elasticsearch clusters on cloud (AWS) which are highly scalable and reliable including performing Elasticsearch performance and configuration tuning
Elasticsearch Indexing & Lucene queries
Ingestion Pipelines, Integration APIs, and provide Elasticsearch tuning/optimizing based on application needs
Designing and developing highly scalable Data Pipelines that incorporate complex transformations and efficient code
Docker and deploying all aspects of the ElasticStack in containers
Monitoring solutions for the ElasticStack Including building and deploying visualizations in Kibana and Grafana
Experience with Configuration Management and automation technologies preferably AWS
Familiarity with streaming analytics
A solid understanding of modern HTML, JavaScript, and CSS.
Desired Qualifications:
Practical cyber security experience is highly sought after, but not required
Experience in Data Science relative to data processing, data analysis, and data interpretation
Experience in Dev/Ops and Dev/SecOps - Docker, Vagrant, Jenkins, Puppet, Chef
Relevant Security Certifications: Security +, CISSP, SANS Certifications, Network +, OSCP etc.
Support the operational planning and development of cyber threat emulation, cyber hunt, and tactical operations.
Closing Statement:

XOR Security offers a very competitive benefits package including health insurance coverage from the first day of employment, 401k with a vested company match, vacation and supplemental insurance benefits.

XOR Security is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE). M/F/D/V.

Citizenship Clearance Requirement
Applicants selected may be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements - US CITIZENSHIP and TOP SECRET CLEARANCE REQUIRED.",4.5,"XOR Security
4.5","Washington, DC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
336,Data Scientist,-1,"*All employees are working remotely due to Covid-19 and we have committed to not require a return to the office until September 2021 at the earliest. Many positions throughout the company will remain fully remote.*

Our Mission:

To actively connect people to their next great opportunity.

Who We Are:

ZipRecruiter is a leading online employment marketplace. Powered by AI-driven smart matching technology, the company actively connects millions of all-sized businesses and job seekers through innovative mobile, web, and email services, as well as partnerships with the best job boards on the web. ZipRecruiter has the #1 rated job search app on iOS & Android.

Summary of Job:

We use statistical science to understand how to construct an efficient and optimized market, understand causality, and drive our future investment. We use machine learning techniques to solve challenging problems so that we optimally match candidates and jobs. This includes NLP and deep learning along with pragmatic use of simpler machine learning approaches and heuristics.

We're looking for an experienced Data Scientist with a passion for problem-solving to join our team of data scientists and help solve new and existing challenges. Coming up with new analysis and understanding, building models, developing high quality, high-performance code and constantly improving the solution and expanding its scope.

Key focuses:
You'll be joining a team of software engineers, data scientists, and ML engineers working on interesting problems in the fields of recommendations, search, and NLP.
Develop production-level code that runs, trains, and maintains ML models.
Minimum Requirements:
Master's degree or higher in Computer Science / Mathematics / Statistics or equivalent
3+ years of experience as a Data Scientist
Proficiency in Python
Strong background in machine learning, preferably in NLP related fields
Familiarity with Deep Learning
Experience with Linux environment and AWS Team player with excellent communication skills
Acting and thinking as an owner, building code that will run in production
As part of our team you'll enjoy:
Competitive salary
Exceptional benefits package
Flexible Vacation & Paid Time Off
Employer-matched 401(k) plan
Privacy Notice Language:
""For information about ZipRecruiter's processing of California job applicant personal data, please see our Privacy Notice at: https://www.ziprecruiter.com/careers/california-job-applicant-privacy-notice""
ZipRecruiter is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or genetics.

Category: Computer/Software",3.3,"ZipRecruiter
3.3",Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
337,Data Scientist,-1,"Would you like to work at one of the largest electronic broker companies while growing your knowledge and skills as a junior Data Scientist? If you are a determined, passionate junior data scientist who possesses the required skills, we are looking for you! The ideal candidate will possess the ability to execute analytical tasks on large data sets to support decision makers and provide insight and reports about our platforms. The junior data scientist role will use data to help us better understand who our clients are, how they engage with our products and services and how we can better serve them by identifying interesting and useful trends in our data. This also requires the ability to:

Produce daily metrics and reports
Clean and prepare data for Machine Learning and AI
Collect and analyze various telemetry and behavioral data
Work closely with software engineers and architects to extract, transform and standardize data for optimal use for analytic too
Assist with designing and running A/B tests
Automate frequently used reporting and data analysis workflows

Qualifications

Experience using statistical programming languages, machine learning and other toolkits and techniques for analyzing large, complex datasets
2+ years' experience in a data science or data analysis role
2+ years of Java coding experience
Technical proficiency with transforming structured and unstructured data sets
2+ years mining and analyzing data sets to extract meaningful trends, producing meaningful and actionable reports
Bachelors in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics; Masters strongly preferred",-1,ZUNA,"Greenwich, CT",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
338,Data Scientist,$72k-$119k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist: Responsible for the development and deployment of analytics solutions using various data science techniques including statistics, econometrics, machine learning, mathematical optimization, visualization, and geospatial mapping. Acquire deep understanding of business opportunities and face the challenge of addressing them with analytics solutions. Identify data sources and process and clean data. Develop algorithms and analytics solutions such as clustering, regression, econometric forecasting, optimization, visualization, and mapping. Deploy analytics solutions in business systems or analytics platforms for business use. Primary worksite is Plymouth MI, but relocation is possible. Req: Master degree in Statistics or Economics or Mathematics or related with 6 months experience as Statistician or Scientist. Related exp must include developing algorithms.

Apply Now!",3.1,"Optimal
3.1","Plymouth, MI",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
339,Data Scientist,-1,"Data Scientist

Downtown Seattle

OUR COMPANY

red violet (NASDAQ: RDVT) is a software and services company specializing in big data analysis, providing cloud-based, mission critical analytics and information solutions to enterprises in a variety of industries. We believe that time is your most valuable asset. Through powerful analytics, we transform data into intelligence, in a fast and efficient manner, so that our clients can spend their time on what matters most – running their organizations with confidence. Our corporate headquarters is located in Boca Raton, Florida and our brands include IDI and FOREWARN, www.redviolet.com.

JOB SUMMARY

We’re looking for a Data Scientist to join our Seattle team. You’ll use your programming, mathematics and analytics experience to write scalable, production facing code and develop creative solutions to challenging problems. Together we’ll be working in highly distributed, Linux-based environments that leverage our proprietary search and computing platform.

red violet (NASDAQ: RDVT) is the team behind idiCORE, the next generation of highly-distributed data fusion and search technologies. Our proprietary technology uncovers the relevance of disparate data sets to bring out comprehensive insights into people, businesses, assets, and their interrelationships.

As a Data Scientist at red violet, you’ll:
Design, develop, and maintain complex data fusion and entity resolution algorithms sitting at the core of our risk management offerings.
Create novel search capabilities that leverage inverted indices, Bayesian inference and higher order clustering techniques.
Develop ETL systems and data pipelines to interface new data assets with our proprietary distributed data processing platform
Work closely with our engineers to integrate your innovations into our production systems.
Support business decisions with ad hoc analysis as needed.
Our ideal Data Scientist will have:
Degree in Computer Science, Machine Learning, Math, Statistics, Physics, or related field.
Strong background in C++ or another compiled, strongly typed, object oriented language.
Experience working with large data sets for data mining, analytics, modeling.
Experience with Bash scripting in a Linux environment.
BONUS POINTS: experience with geospatial analytics and the ability to beat us at table tennis or pool

red violet’s idiDATA (ididata.com) data fusion and search technology is being used by Financial Services, Big Corporate, Government, and Law Enforcement to solve complex, real-world problems. Our platform solves important problems like identity validation and fraud detection and prevention and is very likely under the hood of your favorite apps. We’re a small but highly successful and publicly-traded company backed by an elite team, including the preeminent experts in data fusion. Red Violet has the flexibility of a small team with the opportunities offered by an established company.

At red violet, you’ll work with great people at a modern downtown Seattle location with stunning waterfront views. We offer highly competitive benefits include leading compensation with a generous RSU package, health, dental, vision, 401k match, onsite bike parking, lockers, and a fitness center. We strive to foster an innovative, creative, and challenging work environment that encourages employee growth and promotes from within.

red violet is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.",5.0,"Red Violet Inc.
5.0","Seattle, WA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
340,Data Scientist,$76k-$133k (Glassdoor Est.),"Posting Title
Data Scientist

10/20/2020

Job Description
The Data Science Analyst is responsible for using strong analytical and technical skills to build data systems and present data in report form to various levels of management. The position requires maintenance of the central database to ensure it is up to date. Continuous improvement is a must on all central systems. Essential Duties and Responsibilities Applying statistical analysis to business operations data to provide business insight and enterprise performance analysis. Building of database tools using SQL and Python. Able to apply and implement machine learning Algorithms and concepts On-going document current processes and procedures. Maintain close working relationship with other departments in and out of inventory for the purposes of collaboration on new projects or process improvement through support and leadership. Ability to manage multiple projects simultaneously. Train temporary and permanent resources added to the team in current programs and business organization. Train other departments on new tools and procedures. Hold a weekly meeting to summarize system improvements, security concerns, glitches and performance with leaders from other departments. Additional duties as assigned by manager Requirements :

Auto req ID
80559BR

State
CA

City
Calabasas

Requirements
Job Qualifications – Education and Experience 2-5 years Inventory, or retail management experience preferred 4-year BA/BS degree in Economics, Finance, Business, Computer Science. Math, Statistics or related field a plus. Experience analyzing and profiling data, data modeling and performing report testing Solid foundation in VBA, SQL, Machine Learning and Python a plus Technical writing Understanding of retail forecasting Confident problem solver Excellent oral and written communication skills Manage and prioritize workload to meet deadlines Proficient in Microsoft Applications Physical Requirements General office environment requiring ability to: stand, walk, sit for extended periods of time speak and listen to others in person and over the phone use keyboard and read from computer screen and reports Lift up to 15 lbs.

About Harbor Freight Tools
In 1977, Harbor Freight Tools was started as a small family-owned business. We made a commitment to provide working people with great quality tools at the lowest prices. And for over 43 years, Harbor Freight Tools has done just that. From hand tools and generators, to air and power tools, from shop equipment to automotive tools, Harbor Freight offers more than 5,000 tools and accessories at quality levels that match or exceed competing brands, but at prices that are up to 80% less. All while developing and launching over 1,000 new tools each year.

We're not your typical retailer. We're a team of high-achievers, who have a passion for excellence and continuous improvement and obsess about getting things done. We're also equally committed to doing the right thing and giving back to our community. And for us, collaboration is the golden rule. We're a 43 year-old, $5 billion company with over 1,100 stores, opening 2-3 new stores a week with over 40 million loyal customers and growing. If you are looking for a not so ordinary and highly rewarding career opportunity, we would love to talk with you.

Delivering Value to the Hardworking Since 1977.",3.6,"Harbor Freight Tools
3.6","Calabasas, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1977,Company - Private,Home Centers & Hardware Stores,Retail,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
341,Data Scientist,-1,"COMPANY OVERVIEW:

This is a data analytics company founded with a mission of making
profitable use of the millions of data points that clients
capture every day. Their expertise lies in an ability to uncover
hidden patterns, trends and inconsistencies in data from all
sources allowing them to build predictive models that can then be
used to improve profit and operational effectiveness across an
organization.

POSITION OVERVIEW:

Are you passionate about leveraging data to deliver actionable
insights that impact daily business decisions? Does the prospect
of dealing with massive volumes of data excite you? Do you like
digging into data to answer challenging operations and customer
behavior questions? Then this job is for you.

We are seeking an outstanding Data Scientist. This company is
committed to showcasing the power of data and delivering value
back to clients by answering the most difficult questions. The
insights they develop will enable clients to build the next
generation of services and strategies that will give their
business a competitive edge. They need your help to create and
curate data assets, apply the statistical analysis necessary to
derive insights from those assets and develop and effectively
communicate recommended strategies for turning those insights
into data-driven actions.

The ideal candidate thrives in a fast-paced environment, relishes
working with large, varied data sets, enjoys the challenge of
highly complex business contexts (that are typically being
defined in real-time), and, above all else, is passionate about
data, analytics and delivering measurable results. In this role
you will be expected to work with business leaders to understand
the problems they need to solve and design the appropriate
solution. You will work closely with your peers to leverage the
teams expansive expertise in analytics and data-driven decision
making to guide the client deliverables. Often, the ideal set of
data will not be available, and you'll have to think creatively
about what is available to drive results.

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Analyze and solve problems at their root, while also stepping
back to understand the broader context.
Learn and understand a broad range of data resources and know
when, how, and which to use and which not to use.
Interface with and lead (where appropriate) internal resources
to deliver analytics projects.
Continually improve ongoing reporting, query performance,
scoring and analysis processes. - Report results in a manner
which is both statistically rigorous and compellingly relevant.
Provide data manipulation, exploratory data analysis, modeling,
scoring, dashboard and report development.
Apply advanced statistical analysis and modeling techniques
using both standard and non-standard methods including machine
learning techniques.
Value and contribute to a culture of learning, knowledge
sharing, teamwork, delivering excellence, exceeding expectations,
being respectful of others and having fun.
TECHNICAL QUALIFICATIONS:
Bachelor's degree in Analytics, Statistics, Economics, Math or
other related fields from an accredited university (Masters
degree preferred).
At least 3 years experience leveraging quantitative analytics
to provide operational or marketing performance analysis.
Experience performing statistical analysis, regression
modeling, time series analysis, data mining, and financial
analysis.
Experience utilizing statistical software packages such as R,
SAS or SPSS and data visualization tools such as Tableau, Qlik,
Shiny or Power BI.
Ability to write SQL scripts for analysis and data manipulation
a plus.
Experience assimilating, cleansing, validating and presenting
large quantities of complex data.
PROFESSIONAL QUALIFICATIONS:
Passionate about data and discovering new trends, tools, and
techniques to leverage for the betterment of our clients and to
expand the capabilities of our team.
Proactively seeks to gain understanding and buy-in from all
parties involved and to ensure the delivery of commitments.
Excellent communication (verbal and written) and interpersonal
skills and an ability to effectively converse with both business
and technical teams.
Experience translating analysis results into business
recommendations.
LOCATION: Remote USA

Job ID# 464392

Artemis Referral Bonus $500! If you know someone for this job,
please join our Referral Bonus Program
( https://www.artemisconsultants.net/referral/ ) and submit them.

Artemis invites you to subscribe to our free Job Alerts
( https://www.artemisconsultants.net/job-alerts/ ) to be notified
about career advancement opportunities. You can also join our
monthly Talent Connection
( https://www.artemisconsultants.net/talent-connection-newsletter/ )
newsletter to receive free resources designed to help progress
your career.",4.4,"Artemis Consultants
4.4",Remote,-1,1 to 50 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
342,Data Scientist,$89k-$144k (Glassdoor Est.),"We're on a mission to disrupt the logistics industry and take our technology to new heights with data science. Our established data science team is looking to add team members that can combine expert statistical modeling knowledge with machine learning plus other AI to drive business impact.

From designing systems that monitor data streams to send signals and alerts to business users, to adding machine learning pipelines that enhance existing algorithms embedded into our industry leading platform products, everything you work on will have an impact. In this role, you will help to improve the world's supply chains, and develop a deep expertise in cutting edge statistical and mathematical techniques, while partnering with our team of technologists to bring it to life on a cutting edge technology stack.

Responsibilities:
Evaluate and understand current & nascent modelling methods in the Data Science space
Design and engineer high performance computing platforms and algorithms for a wide variety of data
Develop new features for existing algorithms through statistical and machine learning methodologies
Validate and implement modelling improvements to increase accuracy of data science Algorithms
Embrace an R&D mindset through Rapid Prototyping & Iterative Experimentation
Work closely with IT delivery teams to productionize successful models in an on demand environment
Required Qualifications:

2+ years of experience in advanced analytics, machine learning and/or data science or one year of professional experience with an advanced degree (Masters or PhD)
Bachelor’s degree or higher in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, or a related quantitative discipline
Experience with dashboarding: Rshiny, Dash and React/Javascript
Experience with Statistical Algorithms, especially Boosting, Classification and Regression
Experience in programming: R and Python
Familiarity with data fundamentals including SQL
Preferred Qualifications:

Experience with Spark/Hive Ecosystems and other noSQL data environments
Experience working with Data Mining & Network Models
Proficiency with Linux Operating Systems & Containerization
Experience with deep learning including Tensorflow & PyTorch
Experience building and working with APIs
Proven ability to work with a high degree of autonomy and out-of-the-box thinking
Values a diverse and inclusive work environment
Demonstrated having conducted deep research into a targeted subject area
Strong sense of urgency and an ability to prioritize work effectively to maximize output and productivity
#LI-177524106_DG1

Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer

C.H. Robinson is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We believe in equality for all and celebrate the diversity of our employees, customers and communities. We believe this increases creativity and innovation, drives business growth and enables engaged and thriving teams. We’re committed to providing an inclusive environment, free from harassment and discrimination, where all employees feel welcomed, valued and respected.

Affirmative Action Employer/EOE/M/F/Disabled/Veteran

Benefits
We are proud to offer a top-tier benefits package, including medical, dental, vision, life and disability insurance, prescription drug coverage, paid parental leave, paid holidays and paid time off (PTO), 401K, employee stock purchase plan, as well as a broad range of career development opportunities.",3.5,"C.H. Robinson
3.5","Eden Prairie, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,1905,Company - Public,Logistics & Supply Chain,Transportation & Logistics,$10+ billion (USD),-1
343,Data Scientist,$73k-$126k (Glassdoor Est.),"Sr. Data Scientist Required Technical Skills: Analytics & Insights: § Develop the following inspection models using Object detection,Condition detection.A quick turn around on building these AI/ML models and putting into production § Knowledge of Platforms & tools: Python, Tensor Flow Must have: · Utility domain experience. · Analytical model building experience in classification./regression/forecasting. · Exploratory data analysis with time series and non-time series data. · Deep Learning using Tensorflow, Keras, MXNet, Theano, CNTK and Caffe 2. · Working with cloud-based infrastructure, especially AWS Familiarity with Python, Scala, Java, Blockly or C++ will be an asset Good to have: Strong NLP background with ability to execute project on its own Job Function CONSULTANCY Role Analyst Job Id 162662 Desired Skills Data scientist Desired Candidate Profile Qualifications : BACHELOR OF COMPUTER SCIENCE",3.9,"TCS
3.9","Los Angeles, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,1947,Company - Private,Telecommunications Services,Telecommunications,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
344,Data Scientist,$62k-$104k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you looking for a new and exciting career opportunity?
Join our award-winning organization and work with some of the most talented minds within our Enterprise Technology and Innovation teams. As a Salient CRGT employee, you get to be part of a best performing team supporting our nation’s most critical missions.
Why Salient CRGT?
We’re passionate about the inspirational missions of our customers and we entrust our employees and teams to deliver exceptional performance to enable the safety, security, health and well-being of our nation. We provide the tools and resources to help you be successful, and our culture fosters an environment in which idea sharing and collaboration is essential. Are you ready to make a difference?
The ideal candidate will be responsible for improving the NCTC analyst's workflow by developing tools and capabilities that enhance the ability to use and produce identity intelligence data.
This role is responsible for analyzing, interpreting, and extracting data using IT techniques to support decision-making. This role works with customers to understand changing requirements and recommends solutions based on quantitative analysis. Responsibilities include working independently and collaboratively in a team to develop data models and solutions. This role compiles and reviews data, often disparate and inconsistent, to address complex intelligence issues or problems for customers. This role requires constructing and performing complex statistical, mathematical, and data analysis independently, or in partnership with other data scientists or analysts. This role provides recommendations for the development of tools and applications that improve process effectiveness and efficiency.
#CJPOST

Strong experience working with Python or R programming languages
Experience working with data manipulation, analytic/business insight tools, and data visualization experience
Experience with SciPy stack or Tidyverse packages
Experience constructing and performing complex database search queries
Experience/ knowledge of computer science concepts, data architecture, and experience/knowledge of statistics
Experience /familiarity with statistics and probability including predicative modeling
Experience with visualizing data using popular packages including Tableau, ggplot or Matplotlib
Ability to communicate technical findings to non-technical audiences
Bachelor’s degree in a highly quantitative subject or related field (for example, statistics, mathematics, economics, or related field)
TS/SCI clearance with polygraph required
Position requires a BS degree + 3 years of applicable experience OR a Master's degree + 1 year of applicable experience
#muncyreqs
#super6
#aneumer

Desired Optional Skills:
• Experience in modern machine learning, AI, biometrics, social network analysis, or geospatial analysis
• Experience/knowledge of link analysis tools (e.g. Palantir, i2 Analyst’s Notebook)
• Experience with cloud architectures including AWS
• Experience with distributed computing and storage technologies
#cjpost
#pathf
#ysreqs
#dcjobs
#super6
#aneumer
Salient CRGT is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran status, disability, genetic information, or any other factor prohibited by applicable anti-discrimination laws.",3.6,"Salient CRGT
3.6","Arlington, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
345,Data Scientist,$81k-$133k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist

About US

At Vyaire, we help the world breathe easier. As a global leader in respiratory care, we know what we do enables, improves and extends lives. We are a young company with a long history of revolutionary products. We devise extraordinary solutions that allow patients to lead ordinary lives. We believe the best way to create value for our customers, is to become invaluable. We know a dynamic culture with diversity of thought makes this possible. Our colleagues are people who specialize in exceeding expectations, building lasting relationships and making it a priority to listen. We are dedicated to anticipating what’s next and get it done. We thrive on contributing and making a difference.

To learn more, visit our website: www.vyaire.com

Watch our video: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZDrQoMbMRrI&feature=youtu.be

About this role

Vyaire teams are dedicated to connecting clinicians and patients with the highest quality respiratory healthcare solutions in the market. At Vyaire, you will find a company that puts the customer at the center of all we do. Our culture is one that rewards performance and each interaction we have with a customer furthers our mission to be the global leader in respiratory care.

We have an exciting opportunity for a Biostatistician with demonstrated expertise in clinical study design and analysis, who specializes in statistical methodologies used to support analytical and clinical validation of medical technology. Working in collaboration with scientists and physicians, you will provide advanced statistical and analytical expertise to Vyaire. You will use your knowledge of clinical study design and biostatistics to provides technical leadership, knowledge, experience and expertise by planning, conducting and supervising clinical development and evidence management projects. You will contribute to the clinical development strategy and ensure statistical integrity, optimal study designs and data and evidence needs are reflected and fulfilled within that strategy. To achieve Vyaire’s objectives, you provide out-of-the-box thinking to develop innovative clinical study designs, quantitative decision making and the incorporation of evidence from disparate sources of big data.

Critical deliverables include the design and formulation of statistical methodologies and input that ensure quality and consistency of key data deliverables across studies. You will analyze data and prepare and review study protocols, statistical analysis plans, interim study reports, manuscripts, abstracts and other technical documents and procedures pertaining to statistical methods.

Essential Functions:
Be an integral member of product development team responsible for supporting claims development, and data management in clinical studies.
Possess data management expertise and advanced knowledge in biostatistical concepts and practical application of such concepts to the assessment of medical device technology.
Serve as a subject matter expert in biostatistics, epidemiology, data mining, data analytics, and data management.
Provide study design and biostatistical guidance to Offering Management, Marketing and Development teams.
Provide functional excellence in the areas of statistics, data analysis and data processing for the department.
Apply extensive fundamental and specialized knowledge to the development of clinical protocols for device validation, respond to FDA questions, implementing new approaches to automated data processing for clinical trials.
Propose new ideas and recommend implementation plans leading to enhanced efficiencies and faster review and analysis of data.
Provide statistical input and advice to clinical teams for the design of studies and sample size/power estimations, including the design, writing and review of study protocols, development of statistical analysis plans and development of analyses requiring advanced statistical methodologies.
Design and lead the preparation of statistical components of protocols which meet project objectives, health authority guidelines, and clinical trial methodology standards.
Lead the analysis, evaluation and planning for methods of approach, and organizes means to achieve the solution to highly complex problems.
Interpret and evaluate statistical data and results of the most complex investigations and develop appropriate recommendations.
Lead the development of reports, charts, graphs, and other documents which support claims recommendations.
Lead building the data and evidence for Vyaire offerings.
Support develop the standards for clinical conduct, data collection, management and/or reporting.
Provide clear and regular technical and administrative input to professional, technical and administrative personnel assigned to a project.
Recognize and address issues which may impact the statistical integrity of the evidence development program or recognition of datasets for which different statistical tools may add value.
Qualifications:
PhD or MS degree with 5+ years of experience in a Healthcare medical device or Life sciences pharmaceutical regulated process mature environment
Experience with clinical decision support systems and/or software as a medical device is critical.
Demonstrated experience of applying statistical methods in biomedical research, pharmaceutical, medical device or CRO experience is required.
Good knowledge of ICH GCP guidelines, FDA regulations and demonstrated experience with pharma and/or medical device clinical trials and FDA/NDA submissions is required.
Experience with study design methodology such as adaptive design or pragmatic clinical trials, state-of-the-art modeling approaches, incorporation of real word evidence or experience analyzing big data.
Ability to understand scientific questions and formulate statistical and data-analytic methods to provide solutions to novel problems.
Sound knowledge of statistical methodologies such as analysis of variance, regression, experimental designs, contingency tables.
Expertise with SAS and R.
Ability to work independently and in project teams.
Excellent communication skills (written and spoken).
Atlanta, GA, Dallas, TX, Irvine, CA, Mettawa, IL, New York City, NY, Orlando, FLFull time",3.1,"Vyaire Medical
3.1","Irvine, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
346,Environmental Scientist,$27k-$43k (Glassdoor Est.),"Coneco Engineers & Scientists is a consulting firm specializing in environmental management, civil engineering, ecological permitting, land surveying, and renewable energy systems. Coneco’s environmental division maintains contracts with diverse and well-known local and national companies to provide a wide range of services in Massachusetts, Rhode Island, New Hampshire, Maine, and Connecticut. Environmental Scientists at Coneco are an essential part of the project team and work both in the field and in the office to provide services such as environmental assessment, oversight of remedial actions (including emergency response) and construction activities, comprehensive site characterization, and the implementation of remedial alternatives.
Responsibilities: *
· Perform ASTM-compliant Phase I Environmental Site Assessments & Phase II Investigations

· Conduct sampling activities (including soil, air, groundwater, surface water, building materials)

· Oversee field work including drilling, remediation, air/dust monitoring, and underground storage tank removals

· Preparation and implementation of health and safety plans

· Data compilation, analysis, and visualization

· Prepare technical and regulatory reports for submittal to clients and state/federal agencies

· Draft site plans, sampling plans, and other figures in ArcGIS and AutoCAD

· Provide emergency response services, requiring flexibility in schedule and ability to work in adverse weather conditions
Qualifications: *
· 0 to 2 years experience

· B.S. in Geology, Environmental Science, Chemistry, Biology, or a related course of study

· Familiarity and/or coursework in ArcGIS and AutoCAD

· OSHA 40-Hour HAZWOPER (training provided if necessary)

· Excellent verbal and written communication skills

· Attention to detail and ability to observe, document, and communicate field conditions

· This position involves field work in all types of terrain and weather at various times of the day. Flexibility and preparedness are a must.

· Valid driver’s license

Coneco offers a competitive benefits package which includes health/dental/vision insurance, a 401(K) retirement savings plan, and profit sharing. *Please include a cover letter with your resume to be considered for this position.*

Offices located in Bridgewater and Westford, Massachusetts. Seeking applicants for the Westford location.

Visit our website at www.coneco.com.

Job Type: Full-time

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $18.00 - $20.00 per hour

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Education:
Associate (Preferred)
Work Location:
Multiple locations
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
www.coneco.com",2.8,"Coneco Engineers & Scientists
2.8","Westford, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
347,Data Scientist,$71k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Details
Description

The Data Scientist position will assist in completing projects related to health insurance, long term care insurance for the Minneapolis Health and Life practice using predictive modeling and other powerful analyses to support any of our clients’ needs.

Independent for over 70 years, Milliman delivers market-leading services and solutions to clients worldwide. Today, we are helping companies take on some of the world’s most critical and complex issues, including retirement funding and healthcare financing, risk management and regulatory compliance, data analytics and business transformation.

Through a team of professionals ranging from actuaries to clinicians, technology specialists to plan administrators, we offer unparalleled expertise in employee benefits, investment consulting, healthcare, life insurance and financial services, and property and casualty insurance.

Who We Are

The Minneapolis Health and Life practice is composed of healthcare and long-term care insurance professionals who provide our clients with industry-leading consulting services. We also develop and maintain innovative products that complement our consulting services. We are an expanding group with experience leading the way in industries that continuously change and evolve. Our office encourages an open and collaborative work environment to help our professionals grow and thrive.

The Department/Team

The data analytics and machine learning team is an emerging group involved in work that supports all areas of the practice. The analysis and techniques used are cutting edge while providing clients with accurate and easily interpreted business results. Employees balance working independently and collaborating with other team members on a variety of projects concurrently. Data scientists and subject matter experts work closely together to ensure solutions are both statistically rigorous and solving the correct problem for the client.

Role

You will:

Process data for predictive models and visualization,
Develop data visualizations,
Develop tools and code to be used by others with limited programing experience,
Create models for analyzing and predicting various risks,
Evaluate candidate models based on predictive power, ease of implementation, and other criteria,
Assist in R&D and marketing efforts to grow the business, and
Check other’s work for technical accuracy.
Qualifications

Required:

A college degree in a STEM related discipline such as actuarial science, mathematics, data science, statistics, computer science, or other quantitative field,
Fluency in R, Python, or other querying languages like SAS and SQL,
Demonstrated ability to summarize, explore, and manipulate large data sets,
Able to employ a variety of supervised and unsupervised machine learning methods, and
GPA 3.5+.

Desired:

0-2 years of experience in healthcare, insurance, or a related field,
Master’s or PhD,
Excellent communication skills,
Curiosity and self-direction,
Good understanding of statistics,
Good Data Wrangling skills,
Experience with state management and version control tools such as Docker and Git
Knowledge of large-scale machine learning tools/platforms such as Databricks, and
Experience with cloud computing.
Milliman Benefits

At Milliman, we focus on creating an environment that recognizes – and meets – the personal and professional needs of the individual. We offer a competitive benefits package which includes:

Medical, dental and vision coverage for employees and their families, including eligible domestic partners.
A 401(k) plan with matching program
Paid Parental Leave up to 12 weeks
Profit sharing as a discretionary contribution to employees’ retirement accounts
Paid Time Off (PTO) starts accruing on the first day of work and can be used for any reason.
Adoption assistance
Milliman covers 100% of the premiums for life insurance, AD&D, and both short term and long term disability coverage
Flexible spending accounts allow employees to set aside pre-tax dollars to pay for dependent care, transportation and applicable medical needs
Competitive starting salary
Opportunity to earn end-of-year bonus
Business casual work environment with free covered parking
Sponsorship/Location

Applicants must be presently authorized to work in the United States. Milliman will not sponsor applicants for this position for the following work visas/statuses: F-1 STEM OPT, H-1B, J-1, TN, O-1, L-1, or E-1/2.

This position will be based out of the Milliman office in Minneapolis, MN. Applicants must be willing to work onsite in the Milliman office.

Milliman is an Equal Opportunity Employer

Milliman is fully committed to the maximum utilization of all human resources and the goals of Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action. We recruit, hire, train, promote, and consider qualified applicants for employment, in all job titles without regard to age, ancestry, citizenship status, color, creed, familial status, genetic information, marital status, national origin, political ideology, race, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as an individual with a disability, or veteran status, including qualified disabled veterans, Armed Forces service medal veterans, recently separated veterans, and active duty wartime or campaign badge veterans; and shall not discriminate against any individual, or any other characteristic protected by law. Federal law requires employers to provide reasonable accommodation to qualified individuals with disabilities. Please tell us if you require a reasonable accommodation to apply for a job or to perform your job. Examples of reasonable accommodation include making a change to the application process or work procedures, providing documents in an alternate format, using a sign language interpreter, or using specialized equipment.

Qualifications
Education

Required

Bachelors or better in Mathematics.

Preferred

Masters or better in Mathematics or related field.

Experience

Preferred

Less than 2 years: Healthcare, insurance, or a related field. Experience with state management and version control tools such as Docker and Git. Knowledge of large-scale machine learning tools/platforms such as Databricks. Experience with cloud computing. Good understanding of statistics and good Data Wrangling skills.

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",4.0,"Milliman
4.0","Minneapolis, MN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
348,Data Scientist,$77k-$128k (Glassdoor Est.),"Praescient Analytics, LLC (Praescient) is a Veteran-led, certified Woman-Owned Small Business (WOSB) founded in 2011 that specializes in implementing advanced analytics solutions across the defense, intelligence, and law enforcement communities. With over 40 contracts across 6 continents, over 70% of our employees are veterans and or have intel/law enforcement experience. We fully understand the unique challenges of our clients and work to identify, vet, implement, and enhance commercial and proprietary technologies to provide full scope solutions, because we have been there. Praescient has extensive experience designing, developing, and integrating solutions for customers including the US Army, Special Operations Command (SOCOM), US Navy (USN), US Marine Corps (USMC), US Coast Guard (USCG), Department of Justice (DOJ), Drug Enforcement Administration (DEA), and Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI), Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE), intelligence community, and local law enforcement agencies, among others.

Praescient Analytics is in search of a Data Scientist who has the ability to apply expert knowledge in statistical analysis, complex data mining, and artificial intelligence to make value out of data. Under little or no supervision, the Data Scientist will be able to provide consultations related to the data mining and analysis of data from a range of sources to transform raw data into concise and actionable insights.

Primary Responsibilities:

• Designs and implements data-driven solutions, with specific focus on advanced analytical methods, data models, and visualizations.
• Develop quantitative simulations and models to provide descriptive and predictive analytics solution recommendations.
• Identifies trends and problems through complex big data analysis. Maintains current in emerging tools and techniques in machine learning, statistical modeling, and analytics.

Required Qualifications:

• Advanced Degree (Masters or PhD) in Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Data Science, Computer Science, Operations Research or other closely related other quantitative or mathematical disciplines. A PhD degree may be substituted for up to three (3) years of experience.
• Eight (8) years relevant experience in applied data science research or big data analytics.
• Demonstrates knowledge of data mining methods, databases, data visualization and machine learning.
• Ability to communicate analysis techniques, concepts, and products.
• Ability to develop data-driven solutions, data models, and visualizations.

What you can expect from us:

• Real opportunity for career growth in an environment where your achievements will be celebrated
• Constant collaboration with numerous teams to ensure client success
• A team that respects and embraces your ideas and expertise
• Coworkers that are motivated by pursuing excellence, rather than the prospect of personal gain
• A workplace dedicated to supporting and bettering public safety and government agencies

Benefits:

• Very competitive salary based on qualifications and experience
• Comprehensive, Company paid United Health Care Medical for you and your family (We pay your premiums and deductibles)
• 401(k) & 4% matching
• Travel & performance incentives
• 3 weeks paid time off (plus Federal Holidays)
• $5K annual training allowance
• $500 book allowance
• Tuition reimbursement program

Praescient Analytics is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for all. Employees and applicants without regard to race, color, age, religion, sex, sexual orientation, marital status, gender identity, national origin, legally protected physical or mental disability, genetic information, citizenship status, or status in the uniformed services of the United States, status as a disabled veteran or veteran of the Vietnam era, or on any other basis which is protected under applicable law. This includes a commitment to provide a work environment that is free from all forms of illegal harassment including sexual harassment.

This covers all terms and conditions of employment including (but not limited to):

• Hiring, placement, promotion, transfer, or demotion of all job classifications;
• Recruiting, advertising or solicitation for employment;
• Treatment during employment;
• Rates of pay or other forms of compensation;
• Benefits;
• Selection for training;
• Company sponsored social and recreational activities; and
• Layoff or termination

Applicants selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.
US Citizenship Required
Praescient Analytics is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
Interested Candidates: Please forward your resume to recruiting@praescientanalytics.com and please visit our website to apply online at www.praescientanalytics.applicantstack.com/x/opening",3.2,"Praescient Analytics
3.2","Arlington, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
349,Data Scientist,$86k-$100k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

Amsted Rail has an immediate opening for the position of Data Scientist. The suitable candidate will function as the lead in projects related to data science and advanced analytics from the shop floor to the back office space. The Data Scientist will work with domain experts and operators in the plants to understand products and processes.

Position Responsibilities:

The suitable candidate will be part of a cross-functional team of Data Scientists that will be responsible for:
Communicating highly technical concepts to both technical and non-technical individuals
Providing new insight into existing data using predictive analytics and machine learning
Recommending new data streams and ensuring data integrity
Identifying new projects and opportunities, and the associated data requirements
Delivering a range of reports suggesting improvements, data visualization and processing tools that can be used by floor workers, technicians, and engineers
Leveraging the solutions implemented at various locations and sharing across other business units
Working with domain and subject matter experts
Assist in implementing tools and processes to sustain data collection and reporting
Create dashboards and visualizations to communicate insights in the form of storytelling.
Partner with Data Engineer to design and build new data set processes for modeling, data mining, and production purposes.
Determine new ways to improve data quality and predictive capabilities.
Perform and interpret data studies and experiments concerning data sources or new uses for existing data sources.
Fostering a data culture
The position requires willingness to visit plants and foundries to observe the processes, and requires proper use of personal protective equipment (PPE).

Professional skills:
Willingness and ability to lead and take data science projects end-to-end
Must be able to work with all relevant technical and non-technical parties to ensure that quality results are obtained, and that proper action is taken throughout the organization to improve products and processes
The ability to identify questions independently and recognize new projects and new applications. This requires understanding of data requirements (sources, rates, storage, processing, etc.)
Deep theoretical and practical understanding of predictive analytics, machine learning, and artificial intelligence algorithms, including, but not limited to: Bayesian classifiers and techniques, support vector machines, neural networks, decision trees, regression methods, unsupervised learning and clustering
Skilled in math: calculus, linear algebra, numerical methods, optimization
Skilled in statistics: statistical/ inference-based models, data visualizations
Skilled in programming: Python, R, Tableau
Database management and query languages: SQL, etc.
Basic knowledge of instrumentation, sensors, and data acquisition systems
Ability to understand a variety of applications and domains (embedded sensors, plant processes, etc.)

Skills and Qualifications:
Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Ability to work with others who do not possess a background in data science
Desire to work in a dynamic environment and have a continuous improvement and development mindset
Willingness to travel as much as 25% of the time. The Data Scientist will have exposure to all business units, plants, processes, and products in order to work with local experts and technician engineers
B.S. in Computer Science, Statistics, Math, Engineering
All interested applicants please apply online at www.amstedrail.com.

EOC M/F/D/V

All interested applicants please apply online at www.amstedrail.com.

Amsted Rail is an equal opportunity employer. Applicants are considered for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, sex, age, disability, genetic information, or any other basis prohibited by applicable federal, state, or local law. Federal law requires that there be no discrimination against any applicant for employment because of the individual's

disability, with respect to hiring, compensation, or other terms, conditions or privileges of employment. Title I of the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (ADA), prohibits private employers from discriminating against qualified individuals with disabilities in job application procedures, including pre-employment, post-offer medical exams, hiring, compensation, and other terms, conditions, and privileges of employment. Amsted Rail is committed to compliance with the ADA in all respects and does not base employment decisions upon an applicant’s or an employee’s disability, record of a disability and/or perceived disability. Should you feel as though you have been discriminated against while employed by or applying for employment with Amsted Rail, you may seek assistance from Chris Dockery, Amsted Rail Company, Inc., 1700 Walnut St., Granite City, IL 62040, (618) 452-2111, cdd@amstedrail.com.",3.4,"Amsted Rail
3.4","Granite City, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Rail,Transportation & Logistics,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
350,Data Scientist,$79k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Title: Data Scientists

Job Description
Join an elite group dedicated to continuous personal improvement as GCT is currently seeking Data Scientists of all levels to support an intelligence agency with insights gained from analyzing voluminous sensor data. The ideal candidate is adept at using large data sets to find opportunities for process optimization and using models to test the effectiveness of different courses of action. Candidates must have strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations. The right candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes.

Clearance: TS/SCI w/Full scope polygraph (or used within the past 24 months)

Education/Experience Requirements

Senior Positions:
Masters degree in Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or another quantitative field, or extensive comparable experience
10+ years of relevant experience
Junior/Intermediate Positions
Completed B.S. in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or a closely related technical field
3-9 years of relevant experience
Qualifications
Experience using statistical computer languages (SAS, SPSS, R, Python, SLQ, etc.) to manipulate data and draw insights fromlarge data sets
Experience working with and creating data architectures
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Strong problem solving skills
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques
Desired Skills
Experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models
Coding knowledge and experience with several languages: C, C++, Java, JavaScript, etc.
Knowledge and experience in statistical and data mining techniques: GLM/Regression, Random Forest, Boosting, Trees, text mining, social network analysis, Bayes, etc.
Experience querying databases and using statistical computer languages: R, Python, SLQ, etc.
Experience using web services: Redshift, S3, Spark, DigitalOcean, AWS, etc.
Experience creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms and statistics: regression, simulation, scenario analysis, modeling, clustering, decision trees, neural networks, etc.
Experience analyzing data from 3rd party providers: Google Analytics, Site Catalyst, Coremetrics, Adwords, Crimson Hexagon, Facebook Insights, etc.
Experience with distributed data/computing tools: Map/Reduce, Hadoop, Hive, Spark, Gurobi, MySQL, etc.
Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders using: Periscope, Business Objects, D3, ggplot, etc.
The success of Great-Circle Technologies depends on the success and well-being of its employees. GCT promotes work/life balance and encourages the overall well-being of each of its contributors. A comprehensive benefits package is provided, which currently includes company paid single medical, dental, life, disability, and long-term care insurances (with contributions to family premiums,) matching 401k plan, 34 days off per year including 10 Federal holidays plus the day after Thanksgiving, Christmas and New Year’s eves!

Join us at Great-Circle Technologies, where innovation is the shortest distance between two points.

Great-Circle Technologies is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Great-Circle Technologies ensures all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to gender, race, ethnic background, religion, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, or protected veteran status.",2.2,"Great-Circle Technologies
2.2","Chantilly, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
351,Data Scientist,$114k-$189k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Purpose: *
The Data Scientist reporting to the Chief Information Officer will be responsible for driving the scientific use of Global Supply Chain Data to accelerate speed to market as well as provide dashboards and predictive analytics to clients. Additionally, this role will assist in advancing and shaping Ancillare’s supply chain data strategy through the due diligence on new data providers/vendors and informational support for data surrounding a range of Therapeutic Areas.
Duties and Responsibilities: *
Work as the lead data strategist, identifying and integrating new datasets that can be leveraged through our product capabilities.
Work collaboratively with the engineering team to strategize and execute the development of data products.
Execute analytical experiments methodically to help solve various problems and make a true impact across various domains.
Identify relevant data sources and sets to mine for client business needs and collect large structured and unstructured datasets and variables.
Devise and utilize algorithms and models to mine big data stores, perform data and error analysis to improve models, and clean and validate data for uniformity and accuracy.
Analyze data for trends and patterns and interpret data with a clear objective in mind.
Implement analytical models into production by collaborating with software developers and machine learning engineers.
Create expert data visualization applications.
Communicate analytic solutions to stakeholders and implement improvements as needed to operational systems
Ability and desire to work a project to completion meeting and or exceeding timeline deliverables.
Demonstrate and drive the Ancillare mission, values, and strategy.
Participate and contribute positively to process improvement initiatives.
Travel as may be required.
Perform other duties as assigned.
Qualifications: *
Bachelor’s degree in statistics, applied mathematics, or related discipline required. Advanced degree preferred.
7+ years’ experience in data science required.
2+ years of project management experience and/or professional certifications preferred.
Experience working with pharmaceutical and supply chain data
Minimum Requirements: *
Ability to effectively communicate in English both written and verbal.
Ability to partner and successfully gain collaboration across all levels of the organization.
Demonstrated proficiency with data mining, mathematics, and statistical analysis.
Advanced pattern recognition and predictive modeling experience required.
Working experience with Excel, PowerPoint, PowerBI, SQL, and programming languages (i.e., Java/Python, SAS).
Knowledge of Hadoop and or Big Data environments a plus.
Working knowledge and experience with building and maintaining Data Warehousing, Datalakes etc.
Comfort working in a dynamic, research-oriented group with several ongoing concurrent projects.
Knowledge in the use of AI a plus.
Knowledge of BlockChain processes and implementations a big plus.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Data Science: 7 years (Required)
Power BI: 5 years (Required)
Leadership: 3 years (Preferred)
Project Management: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Doctorate (Preferred)
Location:
Horsham, PA 19044 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.ancillare.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.1,"Ancillare
2.1","Horsham, PA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
352,Data Scientist,$102k-$162k (Glassdoor Est.),"Date: Oct 22, 2020

Ericsson Inc. does not sponsor US work authorization for this job position including H-1B, O-1, L-1 and TN. Ericsson also does not hire F-1’s working on EAD for this position.

As the tech firm that created the mobile world, and with more than 54,000 patents to our name, we’ve made it our business to make a mark. When joining our team at Ericsson you are empowered to learn, lead and perform at your best, shaping the future of technology. This is a place where you're welcomed as your own perfectly unique self, and celebrated for the skills, talent, and perspective you bring to the team. Are you in?

Come, and be where it begins.

Our Exciting Opportunity!


— You get to work with an outstanding local and international team, while interacting closely with our customers

— You have the ability to influence and drive exciting, complicated projects

— You can remove barriers and address sophisticated situations with regards to technical challenges in applications development

You will


—Define how we instrument, prioritize, and store data that powers AI/ML solutions

—Design and implement scalable and durable data models for our data

—Evolve and optimize our data and data pipeline architecture, as well as, optimizing data flow and collection for multi-functional teams. You will also be responsible for integrating them with the architecture used across the company

— Support our Data Science teams, partners on data initiatives and ensure efficient data and model architecture is crafted and implemented optimally

—Develop the end-to-end automation of data pipelines, making datasets readily-consumable by the data science teams or downstream AI/ML applications

— Empower junior team members and lead by example

To be successful in the role you must have


— Have Advanced degree in Computer Science, Math, Statistics or a related discipline

— Have 2-3 years hands on experiences on building data pipeline, data models, data solutions from scratch, industry experience preferred

— Have expertise in Data Engineering and relevant technologies (e.g. Spark, Python, Kubernetes)

— Comfortable with complex SQL

— Balance the practical considerations on resources, efficiency, footprint requirement when designing a solution or architecture

— Have experience in batch and streaming data architectures like Kafka, Kinesis, Flink, Storm, Beam

— Have expertise in various types of data base structures (object storage, document or key-value stores, graph databases, column-family databases)

— Have excellent coding skills (python, Java, C++ or Scala)

— Ability to work in different time zones supporting cross geographical teams

— Understand the Data Lifecycle and concepts such as lineage, governance, privacy, retention, anonymity, etc

— Expertise in production support and troubleshooting

— Be self-directed and comfortable supporting the data engineering needs of multiple teams, systems and products.

— Excel at taking vague requirements and crystallizing them into scalable data solutions

What´s in it for you?


Here at Ericsson, our culture is built on over a century of courageous decisions. With us, you will no longer be dreaming of what the future holds – you will be redefining it. You won’t develop for the status quo, but will build what replaces it. Joining us is a way to move your career in any direction you want; with hundreds of career opportunities in locations all over the world, in a place where co-creation and collaboration are embedded into the walls. You will find yourself in a speak-up environment where empathy and humanness serve as cornerstones for how we work, and where work-life balance is a priority. Welcome to an inclusive, global company where your opportunity to make an impact is endless.

**LI-SP1


Do you believe that an organization fostering an environment of cooperation and collaboration to execute with speed creates better business value? Do you value a culture of humanness, where fact based decisions are important and our people are encouraged to speak up? Do you believe that diverse, inclusive teams drive performance and innovation? At Ericsson, we do.

DISCLAIMER: The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by employees assigned to this classification. They are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required of employees assigned to this position. Therefore employees assigned may be required to perform additional job tasks required by the manager.

We are proud to be an EEO/AA employer M/F/Disabled/Veterans. We maintain a drug-free workplace and perform pre-employment substance abuse testing.

Ericsson provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, pregnancy, parental status, national origin, ethnic background, age, disability, political opinion, social status, protected veteran status, union membership or genetics information. Ericsson complies with applicable country, state and all local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location across the world in which the company has facilities. In addition, Ericsson supports the UN Guiding Principles for Business and Human Rights and the United Nations Global Compact.

This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, training and development.

Ericsson expressly prohibits any form of workplace harassment based on race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, pregnancy, parental status, national origin, ethnic background, age, disability, political opinion, social status, protected veteran status, union membership or genetic information.

Ericsson will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by Ericsson or (c) consistent with Ericssons legal duty to furnish information.

Employee Polygraph Protection Act Notice - Employers are generally prohibited from requiring or requesting any employee or job applicant to take a lie detector test, and from discharging, disciplining, or discriminating against an employee or prospective employee for refusing to take a test or for exercising other rights under the Act. For more information, visit https://www.dol.gov/whd/regs/compliance/posters/eppac.pdf.

Ericsson is an equal opportunity employer and is committed to providing reasonable accommodation for qualified disabled individuals during the application and hiring process. Ericsson will make modifications or adjustments to the job application or interview process that will enable a qualified applicant to be considered for a position. If you require an accommodation due to a disability, please contact Ericsson at hr.direct.dallas@ericsson.com or (866) 374-2272 (US) or (877) 338-9966 (Canada) for further assistance.

Primary country and city: United States (US) || || Santa Clara || ProdMgt",3.7,"Ericsson-Worldwide
3.7","Santa Clara, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1876,Company - Public,Telecommunications Services,Telecommunications,$10+ billion (USD),-1
353,Data Scientist,$79k-$130k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description:

Position Purpose

Support our sales, product management, marketing and leadership teams with insights gained from analyzing and mining company data.

Organizational Relationships

• Supervisor: Head of Data Analytics (HF)

Accountabilities and Responsibilities

• Work with stakeholders throughout the organization to identify opportunities for leveraging company data to drive business solutions.

• Mine and analyze data from company databases to drive optimization and improvement of product development, marketing techniques and business strategies.

• Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques.

• Develop mathematical models to apply to data sets.

• Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize revenue generation and other business outcomes.

• Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes.

Quantitative Data/Job Dimensions

• Annual sales of $600 million

• Number of customers = 350

. Requirements:

• Bachelor’s Degree in a quantitative field required with minimum of 2 years’ experience; Master’s degree preferred.

• Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.

• Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts and experience with applications.

• Ability to write clean and concise code, especially in R or Python.

• Keen eye for detail and thoughtful investigation of data before relying upon it.

• Ability to work in a professional, confident manner.

• Sound prioritization and time management skills.

• Intuition for data science best practices, stemming from proven experience.

Exempt Position",3.6,"Naturipe Farms LLC
3.6","Estero, FL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Farm Support Services,Agriculture & Forestry,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
354,Data Scientist,$77k-$125k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist

Seattle, WA

About the Role. . .

This role requires an in-depth understanding of statistics, as well as basic programming and data management skills. Success will require strong statistical problem-solving skills and the ability to leverage cutting-edge big data technologies.

You like to . . .
Create frameworks to predict a variety of outcomes in different scenarios
Create models of customer satisfaction that provide detailed insight into what causes a customer to take different actions
Collaborate with other data scientists and stakeholders on projects
You’re Good At
Researching and designing statistical models to answer target questions, optimizing processes and outcomes, and informed decision-making
Developing solutions in R orPython
Developing production grade solution is a huge plus
Working in Hadoop, Redshift, or Spark
Translating business and product questions into analytics projects
Communicating clearly over written and oral channels while translating complex methodologies and analytical results into high-level insights
Qualifications. . .
Good Knowledge of SQL (3+ years) creating advanced queries in a high impact role.
Must have experience with Web Analytics.
Knowledge of Statistics and Machine Learning techniques.
3+ years building statistical models/evaluating/Feature selection in a high impact role.
Knowledge of the latest NLP techniques
Masters in Stats, computer science or related field
Knowledge of R or Python (3+ years)
Knowledge of C# (at least 1 year)
Experience building data pipelines
A portfolio of NLP projects to showcase and discuss
Experience in marketing analytics, attribution modeling, or click-stream data analysis
MS / PhD in Machine Learning, Statistics, Computer Science, Data Mining, Math or any quantitative discipline

About Logic20/20. . .

Logic20/20 is one of Seattle’s fastest growing full-service consulting firms. Our core competency is creating simplicity and efficiency in complex solutions. Although we make it look like magic, we succeed by combining methodical and structured approaches with our substantial experience to design elegant solutions for even the most intricate challenges. Our rapid growth is in response to our ability to deliver consistently for our clients, which is directly related to the quality of the people we hire.

The past four years, we’ve been in the top 10 “Best Companies to Work For” ….. why? Our team members are highly self-motivated, comfortable conceiving strategies on the fly, and enjoy working both individually and as part of a team. Our environment is very high-energy and demanding, and individuals with remarkable enthusiasm and a can-do attitude are joining our team. We have lots of fun, focus on our employees and our clients, and work to bring our best to every opportunity.",3.5,"Logic20/20
3.5","Seattle, WA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
355,Data Scientist,$92k-$151k (Glassdoor Est.),"WHO WE ARE

NCSOFT is a premiere digital entertainment company and global publisher with worldwide locations and more than 4,000 employees focused on bringing extraordinary games to life for millions of fans around the world. Established in 1997 and headquartered in Seoul, South Korea, we quickly became a key leader in online games. Best known for critically acclaimed franchises including Lineage, Aion, Guild Wars, and Blade & Soul, NCSOFT is also one of the world's top mobile developers with Lineage 2M occupying the #1 grossing revenue slot on Google Play. Our core goal is making people in this world happier by delivering games that entertain a globally connected audience has remained the same.

We are looking for a talented data scientist to uncover hidden insights and predict what will delight our players. You feel comfortable working with all types of data, both big and small. This role will help the game team create novel models to understand player behavior, predict what will happen next, refine our A/B testing practices and visualize what is going on in game. Expect to learn a lot and to teach us new skills as well!

WHY JOIN THE ANALYTICS TEAM?
You have a burning curiosity. Being a successful data analyst or data scientist is all about having a question and going digging for the answer. A good analyst has an innate need to explore and understand the world around them.
You're fascinated by all the different ways people play games. Millions of people play our games in all sorts of different ways, and they all need to be able to have fun. Our job is understanding all those different playstyles so we can make the game work for everyone.
You want to be our players' champion. Once we understand what's going on in the data, the next step is using that knowledge to make the game better for our players. We want analysts who can be passionate advocates for the data and the player experience it represents.
WHAT YOU'LL DO
Create standardized models to explain player behavior that can scale across games
Define experiments to test your hypotheses
Build models that predict future player behavior and game success and work with game teams to validate the models
Assist designers and product managers by using data to evaluate design hypotheses
Use data to optimize pricing and game economy strategies
Build tools to leverage data and enable the studio to make more data-driven decisions
WHAT YOU'LL NEED TO BE SUCCESSFUL
Bachelor's degree in quantitative field including mathematics, statistics, economics, physics, etc.
3-5 years of experience as a data scientist or similar
Strong SQL programming skills
Proficient scripting with at least one data processing/statistical language (eg. R, Python, MATLAB)
Knowledge of statistical techniques and concepts (eg. regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.)
Strong communication skills
Strong product-focused problem-solving ability
PLUSES!
Graduate degree or above
Previous game industry experience
Experience with data visualization tools (eg. Tableau) or coding (Shiny or D3)
Machine learning experience and knowledge",3.0,"NCSOFT
3.0","Bellevue, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Public,Video Games,Media,$10+ billion (USD),-1
356,Data Scientist,-1,"What you'll need:

Education
Master's/PhD (preferred) or Bachelor's (required) in CS/ML/AI or relevant computational/engineering discipline

Machine Learning/Data Science:
Solid theoretical understanding of ML fundamentals: linear algebra, probability, statistics (as relevant to ML), optimization
Knowledge of different ML techniques and when/how to use them: classification, regression, clustering, outlier detection, dimensionality reduction, etc.
Comfortable manipulating and analyzing complex, high-volume, high-dimensionality data from varying, heterogeneous sources
Experience with messy real-world data -- handling missing/incomplete/inaccurate data
Proficient in the Python ML ecosystem: NumPy, Pandas, SciPy, Scikit-Learn
Strong understanding of relational databases like PostgreSQL is a plus

Programming experience:
At least 2+ years of experience writing production-quality Python code
Version control: Git, GitHub/Bitbucket
Experience delivering large-scale deployable projects

Great to have
We deal with large volumes of geospatial data, so experience working with geospatial data at scale is a big plus
Knowledge of Python (Shapely, GeoPandas, Fiona, CartoPy, etc) and/or database (PostGIS) geometry/geospatial tools
Domain experience in building models for location-based services, transportation, scheduling, vehicle routing",1.8,"Miles
1.8","Redwood City, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
357,Data Scientist,-1,"About Shift:


We believe car buying should be fun, fair, and accessible to everyone. We've set out to transform an industry, using technology to bring transparency and convenience to the car buying process.

And we aren't stopping there. We seek to bring that same openness and simplicity to car ownership too, with payments, maintenance, and insurance in one easy app. At Shift, we're building the tools that empower people to buy, own, and sell the cars that make life go.

About the role:


Data is core to this transformation, from building best-in-class pricing, to loan decisioning, to logistics optimization, to in-product recommendations. If you're passionate about using data to fix an enormous, antiquated industry, you'll fit right in.

The data

Millions of cars are bought and sold in the US every year, but knowing exactly how much your car is worth is a challenge. We believe that fixing the used car industry requires providing customers with fair, detailed pricing reports in beautiful, easy-to-understand interfaces. By combining as much data as we can get our hands on, from the millions of listings available online, to car auction sales, to every vehicle's specific repair history, we're building the most accurate, transparent pricing tool in the industry.

The impact

As a two-sided marketplace, serving both car buyers and sellers, our vehicle data and pricing models are core to the business. This allows you to have direct and immediate impact on the success of the company. Initial projects will include exploring data, building models, informing product decisions, overseeing experiments, and collaborating closely with engineers on our pricing team and beyond. You'll have a crucial role alongside our team of data scientists involved in nearly every initiative at Shift, including lead scoring, user acquisition, optimal resource allocation, vehicle routing, and more.

What you'll do:
Build models from the ground up - from data exploration to feature engineering, to model development + optimization, and deployment into production
Design rigorous experiments and interpret results to draw actionable conclusions
Work cross-functionally with team leaders (in Engineering, Product, Operations, Marketing, etc.) to explain your analysis and make recommendations
Facilitate objective decision making across the company by democratizing data through dashboards and other analytical tools
What we ask for:


Bachelor's Degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Mathematics, or other quantitative field; advanced degree a plus
2+ years of industry experience in a quantitative analysis role
Knowledge of machine learning techniques, especially deep understanding for their benefits and drawbacks in real-world applications
Excellent statistical intuition derived from practical, hands-on experience
Proficiency in Python
Experience writing efficient SQL
Excellent communication skills that you've leveraged to influence product and leadership teams
Curiosity, desire to learn, passion for providing a great product to customers
On diversity


Our company depends on balance and equality between buyers and sellers, among employees, and in our relationships with customers.

Our mission to evolve car ownership and transform an industry is a challenging one. It can only be achieved by a team of diverse problem-solvers engineers, designers, business people from the same broad demographics as our customers.

Why join now?


We've built a small but highly talented team backed by >$275 million in funding from investors like DFJ, Goldman Sachs, BMW, and Nissan. In October 2018 we announced a deep partnership and a $140m round led by the third largest auto retailer in the US, Lithia Motors. With strong product-market fit and a great business in California, the next two years will be focused on scaling the business nationally.

Shift is the Bay Area's #1 seller of used cars with $150 million in cars sold per year. We're serving most of California and are gearing up to scale to new markets. With a solid business model and no clear winner in our space yet, this is a hugely exciting time to join the team.

Shift is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer


All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability and protected veterans status or any other characteristic protected by law.",3.4,"Shift
3.4",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
358,Data Scientist,$53k-$90k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tuknik Government Services (TGS) is looking for an experienced individual to perform the duties of a Data Scientist to support our government client in Fort Belvoir, VA.

We offer competitive compensation and an extraordinary benefits package including health, dental and vision insurance, 401K with company matching, flexible spending accounts, paid holidays, three weeks paid time off, and more.

Essential Functions, Responsibilities & Duties may include, but are not limited to:
Apply statistics, machine learning and analytic approaches to answer key intelligence questions, producing results and re-usable products that provide real value to Intelligence Analysts
Apply machine learning techniques to identify and transform data features, find hidden patterns and trends, build and optimize classifiers, create automated anomaly detection systems, and automate steps of the intelligence process
Evaluate statistical models to determine the validity of analyses, implement evaluated models into production by collaborating with software developers, periodically re-evaluate and refine machine learning models being used in production
Develop and refine date sets to achieve stakeholder goals and objectives as requested
Work with analysts to interpret analytic results and refine analysis as needed
Coordinate with Data Analysts to refine and implement models and monitor outcomes
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy
Communicate results and ideas to key decision makers, analysts and other stakeholders
Advise on the interpretation and use of data intelligence products, quality assessments and applications
Collaborate with Intelligence Analysts to understand needs and devise possible solutions
Assess training requirements based on current system and functional baseline
Develop training artifacts in support of operations including Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs), and Tactics, Techniques and Procedures (TTPs)
Required Qualifications:
Top Secret clearance with SCI eligibility
MS in Data Science, Statistics, Applied Math, or related field
Two years of experience leading data science projects is desired
Five years of intelligence analysis experience is desired
Demonstrated proficiency with R or Python, and SQL to manipulate data and draw insights from large and small data sets
Demonstrated proficiency in a variety of supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks
Demonstrated proficiency in advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications
Demonstrated proficiency with common data science libraries
Demonstrated proficiency visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders
Demonstrated proficiency with MS Office tools including Excel, PowerPoint, and Word
Demonstrated proficiency with AWS, in particular products related to analytics, compute, database, developer tools, and machine learning
Experience with database solutions including SQL, NoSQL (e.g. MongoDB) and graph (e.g. Neo4j)
Experience with data visualization tools, such as D3.js, ggplot, Bokeh, etc.
Capability to recognize when Data Science can add value to an intelligence problem, and when it cannot
Ability to translate an intelligence problem into a Data Science problem, and to work with the Intelligence Analysts and ACE Chief to refine the understanding of the problem
Comfortable working in a dynamic environment with several ongoing concurrent projects; able to multitask, prioritize, and manage time effectively
Interpersonal skills and communication with all levels of leadership
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques; desire to maintain currency on latest industry trends including completing additional training; able to articulate trends and potential clearly and confidently
Creative problem solver who thrives when presented with a challenge; able to analyze problems and strategize for better solutions; strong problem-solving skills with an emphasis on production for re-use
Goal-oriented, encouraging to team and staff; comfortable as a team-player, leader and mentor
Working Environment & Conditions

This position is primarily indoors, consistent with a standard office position and has a noise level of mostly low to moderate. The incumbent is required to stand; walk; sit; use hands to finger, handle, or feel objects, tools, or controls; reach with hands and arms; talk and hear. The work load may require the incumbent to sit for extended periods of time. The incumbent must be able to read, do simple math calculations and withstand moderate amounts of stress. The incumbent must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 lbs. Specific vision abilities required by the job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust focus.

Our Equal Employment Opportunity Policy

The company is an equal opportunity employer. The company shall not discriminate against any employee or applicant because of race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender or gender identity (except where gender is a bona fide occupational qualification), national origin, age, disability, military/veteran status, marital status, genetic information or any other factor protected by law. We are committed to equal employment opportunity in all decisions related to employment, promotion, wages, benefits and all other privileges, terms and conditions of employment.

The company is dedicated to seeking all qualified applicants. If you require an accommodation to navigate or to apply to a position on our website, please contact Heaven Wood via e-mail at accommodations@koniag.com or by calling 703-488-9377 to request accommodations. This contact information is used for accommodation requests only and cannot be used to inquire on a status of your application.",3.4,"Koniag, Inc.
3.4","Columbia, MO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
359,"Data Scientist, Analytics - Instagram Ecosystems",$103k-$168k (Glassdoor Est.),"Facebook's mission is to give people the power to build community and bring the world closer together. Through our family of apps and services, we're building a different kind of company that connects billions of people around the world, gives them ways to share what matters most to them, and helps bring people closer together. Whether we're creating new products or helping a small business expand its reach, people at Facebook are builders at heart. Our global teams are constantly iterating, solving problems, and working together to empower people around the world to build community and connect in meaningful ways. Together, we can help people build stronger communities - we're just getting started.

The Mission of the Instagram Ecosystems team is to make sure that Instagram thinks holistically about the user experience and that the company optimizes for the long term success of the app. While Data Scientists across Instagram are focused on making sure that the products they support are successful, there are important questions that fall out of the scope of a single product group or that simply fall through the cracks. These are the questions that the Ecosystems team is tasked with answering. The projects this team tackles are extremely horizontal, cross functional, and of strategic nature. If you enjoy working on ambiguous, 0 to 1 projects, you’ll enjoy working on this team.

Develop a framework to establish budgets across product groups so that they make optimal tradeoffs.
Set north star metric goals for the Instagram app.
Present results and recommendations to Instagram leadership.
Ability to communicate the results of analyses with product and leadership teams to influence the strategy of the product.
Define problems and opportunities in a complex or ambiguous area.

MS, PhD or advanced degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Math, Statistics, Physics, Economics, or equivalent practical experience.
6 plus years of experience working in the analytics field.
Experience working independently and as a member of a cross functional team.
Communications experience and experience explaining technical concepts and analysis implications to varied audiences and translate business objectives into actionable analysis.
Experience in querying and manipulating raw datasets for analysis.
Experience in SQL or other programming languages.
Understanding of statistics (hypothesis testing, regressions, etc.).

Facebook is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law.

Facebook is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.",4.5,"Facebook
4.5","New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,2004,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
360,Data Scientist,$90k-$147k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

What Youll Get to Do

Be part of a high-performing, multi-disciplinary team supporting rapid and innovative prototype development of warfighting capabilities that increase lethality, survivability, and warfighter effectiveness in support of the Air Force Tactical Exploitation of National Capabilities (AF TENCAP) mission to exploit national systems, educate warfighters, and influence development of future requirements. As a member of the team you will integrate with cross-functional teams to conduct research, design, development, prototyping, systems engineering, integration, testing and evaluation, transitioning, and training across multiple technology areas to include: Geolocation and Tagging, Tracking, Locating; Sensor, Data Fusion, and Dissemination; Unconventional / Asymmetric Warfare / Support to Special Operations; Situational Awareness; Cyberspace and Spectrum Warfare Operations; Air Superiority; Command, Control and Spectrum Utilization; Real-Time/Near Real Time Large Data Analytics and Virtualization. Projects in the portfolio will range in quantity, scope, duration, and complexity. Projects are designed to transition to warfighters and/or national intelligence agencies for operational use, sustainment and appropriate acquisition Programs of Record for further development.
More About this Role
Identify and develop actionable insights through problem definition, application of statistical models, and analysis against existing and future data.
Assists in identification of important data sets for exploitation and analysis, and prepare briefings, analyses, and visualizations in support of leadership.
Apply data mining, data modeling, and machine learning to extract and analyze information from large structured and unstructured datasets.
Assists in the visualize, interpret, and report data findings.
Youll bring these Qualifications
Top Secret Clearance
Possess a bachelors or masters degree.
Hands-on experience creating algorithms and engineering tools for data processing and modeling and simulation.
Understanding in modeling and simulation with a focus on optimization, including theoretical and numerical methods for analysis of current and future systems.
Knowledge in applying ML and AI to image processing and information discovery Software development experience using C++, Python, Scala, Java or equivalent.
Experience supporting DoD / IC Big Data Analytics platforms.
Desired Qualifications
Experience performing real-time data analytics.
Eligibility for TS/SCI clearance with Polygraph (U.S. Citizenship required for clearance).
What We Can Offer You:

BITS, a CACI Company, offers very rewarding and unique benefits, which equates to 50% of compensation on TOP of your base salary! The first part is a tax-qualified profit-sharing retirement plan, to which BITS annually contributes up to 25% of your base salary (not in excess of applicable IRS limits) to your retirement account. The second component consists of BITS' Individual Benefit Account (IBA), which is used for premiums, medical reimbursements, dependent care, education and Paid Time Off (PTO) policy. Both components of the BITS benefit package are paid for by BITS, in addition to your base salary and potential performance bonuses. We believe in a healthy home/work balance and both of our locations offer a wide variety of activities to balance with your work life. Learn more at BITS
Weve been named a Best Place to Work by the Washington Post and the Denver Post.
Our employees value the flexibility at CACI that allows them to balance quality work and their personal lives.
We offer competitive benefits and learning and development opportunities.
We are mission-oriented and ever vigilant in aligning our solutions with the nations highest priorities.
For over 55 years, the principles of CACIs unique, character-based culture have been the driving force behind our success

Job Location

US-Washington-DC-AUSTIN

CACI employs a diverse range of talent to create an environment that fuels innovation and fosters continuous improvement and success. At CACI, you will have the opportunity to make an immediate impact by providing information solutions and services in support of national security missions and government transformation for Intelligence, Defense, and Federal Civilian customers. CACI is proud to provide dynamic careers for employees worldwide. CACI is an Equal Opportunity Employer - Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.",3.8,"CACI International
3.8","Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,1962,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
361,Data Scientist,$50k-$70k (Glassdoor Est.),"** Elutions will be unable to sponsor or transfer any additional H-1B visas during the next 5 years**

Elutions is a global Enterprise AI & Automation company, empowering clients to drive continuous efficiency, cost and quality improvements. As the top leader in our industry, world-wide, we are constantly on the lookout for go-getters, people who aren't afraid to work hard, but have fun at the same time. Those who join our team aren't just bright, but are willing to develop and hone their skills every day, all while making a significant difference in the world.

Data Scientist Responsibilities:
Perform exploratory data analysis and statistical modelling with high quality data handling techniques
Create meaningful data visualizations to communicate findings using python, PowerBI, etc.
Expand and improve current models and algorithms using research skills and previous experience
Perform feasibility, impact, technical risks and gap analysis.
Apply new mathematical methodologies to achieve specific models or analysis.
Create scalable model applicable to real time problems overcoming data barriers.
Incorporate process of continuous improvements into day-to-day tasks, aiming for quality refinements in statistics and data handling methods.
Troubleshoot problems and quality assurance in the processes with timely quality/ maintenance checks.
Update existing code to support ongoing analytic applications. Update, maintain and document existing work.
Collaborate with Research & Insights, Product Development, IT and other teams to conceptualize and implement analytic software from start to finish.
Design and deploy highly scalable ML architectures as solutions in Oil & Gas, Manufacturing, Retails industries.
Integrate ML software into Maestro, our AI Platform, with a professional software engineering team.
Perform other duties and projects as directed.
Required Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities:
Ability to leverage computing frameworks to mine, process, and present the value from unstructured data.
Previous experience working on Machine Learning projects and problems in the classroom/industry
Solid understanding of data structures, algorithms, computability and complexity, and computer architecture.
Solid understanding of probability, statistics, distributions, and analysis methods.
Knowledge of programming languages such as Python, R, Perl, SQL and Java.
Knowledge of Machine Learning tools, libraries, and APIs such as scikit-learn, Theano, Spark, or TensorFlow and apply them to effectively choose a proper model.
Ability to work with unstructured data.
Ability to model and evaluate data sets to determine useful patterns.
Interface effectively with customers, other departments and managers to resolve industries customer problems and issues.
Educational Requirements:
Minimum of Bachelor’s degree in one of the following disciplines (or similar): Computer Science, Statistics, Data Science, Advanced Mathematics, Machine Learning
Master’s degree preferred
Certifications preferred",4.0,"Elutions
4.0","Tampa, FL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
362,Data Scientist,$77k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"What you can expect with our interview process:

We take our time. We want you to be sure about us, and we want to make sure you're the right fit for our team. We try to make the interview process simple with as little burden as possible. But we'll probably ask you to meet with a lot of people. We're a collaborative work environment and we want to hear from as many of our Team Members as possible. But we also understand you're busy and your time is valuable so we'll do everything possible to ease the burden on you.

Who we are:
Collective Medical is a fast-growing Utah-based company determined to prove that exceptionally crafted software and passionate healthcare providers and health plans, together, can improve the health of some of the most vulnerable members of our community.
Our software closes the communication gaps that undermine patient care. We help healthcare professionals work together more seamlessly so that they can deliver a better care experience to their patients. Our network is nationwide. We serve every national health plan, hundreds of hospitals and health systems, tens of thousands of providers, and tens of millions of patients.
The result? Our software is proven to reduce the cost of care, streamline coordination across provider teams, and reduce medically-unnecessary hospital visits.
Our mission:
Eliminate avoidable risk and friction from care delivery. In other words, we work to catch people before they fall through the cracks of our very complicated healthcare system.
Why we love working here, in the words of our own team:
· “We have good, smart, humble, caring people. The people here are good and they care about our mission and the difference we're making in health Care.”
· “I see the benefits my work provides. The people here are amazing. I feel empowered to succeed.”
· “I feel like what we do matters and the employees are working together not against each other!”
Other reasons we love working here:

· It’s all. about. the. MISSION. Seriously, we are a highly mission-driven company.
· The cause is noble and pure. We’re obsessed with culture, people, and opportunity.
· At or above-market compensation.
· Unlimited PTO.
· Generous benefit package including company-sponsored healthcare, dental, vision, disability, life-insurance, 401K.
· Health and Learning reimbursement.
· Loaded break room, Monday lunches, and lots of other meals throughout.
· Quarterly team and company events
The Role:
Collective Medical is looking for a Data Scientist to support internal and external customer’s analytic and data consulting needs. The Data Scientist will be responsible for visualizing data to drive data driven decision-making with external customers in tracking and monitoring ROI, along with internal customers through tracking and monitoring KPIs.

The Data Scientist will prepare, analyze, and review health care data, interpret results and provide recommendations, and manage relationships with our internal and external partners.

Responsibilities include:

- Respond to ad hoc analytic requests from internal and external customers
- Visualize data to develop a better understanding of the value our customers receive through usages of our software products
- Create and maintain dashboards and other reporting tools to identify trends using data to drive the business to action
- Understand and use the data warehouse and relational databases
- Ensure accurate quality for deliverables by working with peers for appropriate levels of quality assurance
Who you'll work with:
The Data Scientist will work closely with the many teams through the organization including Marketing, Product, Strategy, Account Management, and Sales, along with the rest of the Data Science team in visualizing and tracking data an analytics to ultimately help our customers improve care coordination.
What you’ll be doing day to day:
- Building metrics and Tableau dashboards to track the success towards companywide and department level KPIs
- Sharing insights with the company regarding drivers of success and/or areas of opportunity
- Researching impact of new ideas to help prioritize areas of focus
- Consulting with product and account management regarding success and ROI metrics for each customer
What we’re looking for:
- Bachelor’s degree (or equivalent experience) in data science, analytics, mathematics, statistics, public health, economics, social, social science, or actuarial science. Master’s degree or PhD preferred, but not required.
- 3 to 5 years of related analytics work experience or equivalent combination of education and experience
- Excitement in tackling a broad range of projects supporting varied audiences for a growing organization
- Previous healthcare related industry experience a plus
- Experience with data mining and visualization tools such Python, R, SAS, Java, Tableau, as well as querying languages (SQL, etc.)
- Knowledge of all Microsoft Office applications, including Word, Excel, and PowerPoint
- Ability to meet deadlines, work with tight schedules, and manage multiple priorities under minimum supervision
- Excellent verbal and written communication skills
- Strong analysis skills
- Strong attention to detail
- Experience with cleaning, aggregating, and pre-processing data from varied sources. Experience creating complex SQL queries for standard as well as ad hoc data mining purposes.
Find out more about us:
https://www.forbes.com/sites/zinamoukheiber/2017/11/29/how-collective-medical-technologies-conquered-emergency-rooms-on-a-bootstrap/#123715c16824
https://www.collectivemedicaltech.com/news/press-releases/collective-medical-secures-47-5-million-in-series-a-funding/
Collective Medical empowers care teams to improve patient outcomes by closing the communication gaps that undermine patient care through seamless collaboration. With a nationwide network covering every national health plan in the country, hundreds of hospitals and health systems and tens of thousands of providers—including hospitals, emergency departments, skilled nursing facilities, primary care providers, mental and behavioral health clinics, and others—Collective Medical’s system-agnostic platform is trusted by healthcare organizations and payers to identify at-risk and complex patients and facilitate actionable collaboration to make better care decisions and improve outcomes. Based in Salt Lake City, Collective Medical is proven to streamline transitions of care, improve coordination across diverse care teams, and reduce unnecessary hospital admissions. We are interested in every qualified candidate who is eligible to work in the United States. However, we are not able to sponsor visas. Learn more at www.collectivemedicaltech.com and follow us on Twitter, Facebook, and LinkedIn.",4.8,"Collective Medical
4.8","Salt Lake City, UT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
363,Data Scientist,$74k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"HMS makes the healthcare system work better for everyone. We fight fraud, waste, and abuse so people have access to healthcare—now and in the future. Using innovative technology and powerful data analytics, we help government and commercial payers reduce costs, increase quality, and achieve regulatory compliance. We also help consumers take a more active role in their own health. Each year, we save our clients billions of dollars while helping people live healthier lives. At HMS, you will develop new skills and build your career in a dynamic industry while making a difference in the lives of others.

We are seeking a talented individual for a Data Scientist position. The successful candidate will have 1-2 years of experience in working with data science, machine learning, and big data, have an interest in data wrangling and analytical modeling, and a desire to become a subject matter expert in health care data. This role will be responsible for developing, testing, and validating Predictive/Machine Learning models in support of business objectives.

Essential Responsibilities:
Design, develop, test, validate, and deploy Predictive Analytics/Machine Learning (ML) /Statistical models as part of new product development and/or projects.
Work with stakeholders to identify the business requirements and the expected outcome
Collaborate with subject matter experts to select the relevant sources of information and perform necessary data cleansing and ETL
Work closely with senior data scientists and engineers to deploy models to production both in batch and real-time.
Build data sets from multiple data sources and write data flows using Python and R, SQL/Spark.
Use data visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Kibana, Zeppelin) to share ongoing insights.
Present findings to technical audiences.
Stay up-to-date on ML, Big Data technologies sharing learnings with the teams.
Non-Essential Responsibilities:
Performs other functions as assigned
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
Ability to translate business customer problems and questions into clear requirements for analysis
Ability to write complex and efficient SQL code freehand from scratch
Ability to wrangle and analyze data using Python or R
Strong understanding of statistics and probability
Proficient in Microsoft Power Point, Outlook and Word
Ability to work under pressure while managing competing demands and deadlines
Well organized with meticulous attention to detail
Good understanding of Agile methodology
Strong sense of ownership, urgency, and drive
Experience with machine learning is a plus
Work Conditions and Physical Demands
Primarily sedentary work in a general office environment
Ability to communicate and exchange information
Ability to comprehend and interpret documents and data
Requires occasional standing, walking, lifting, and moving objects (up to 10 lbs.)
Requires manual dexterity to use computer, telephone and peripherals
May be required to work extended hours for special business needs
May be required to travel at least 10% of time based on business needs
Minimum Education:
Bachelor’s Degree in CS, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, EE or relevant major required; M.S. in Stats, CS, Math, Physics, Economics, EE , or other quantitative field preferred
Minimum Related Work Experience:
1-2 years of industry experience in Data Science/Machine Learning developing, testing, validating, and/or deploying ML models with business impact
1-2 year’s hands-on, industry experience with big data and programming languages such as e.g. Python, R, Scala
1-2 years’ experience in data analysis using databases languages (e.g. SQL and Hive)
Experience identifying data quality issues and working with data engineer to resolve issues
Experience working with healthcare data a strong plus
Experience with one or more deep learning libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, Keras, PyTorch) is a plus.
Experience with Hadoop and familiarity with Apache Spark is a plus
Experience implementing solutions in a cloud environment (AWS or Azure) is a plus.
Working experience with BI and visualization tools is a plus.
Nothing in this job description restricts management’s right to assign or reassign duties and responsibilities to this job at any time.
EOE including disability/veteran",3.9,"HMS Holdings
3.9","Irving, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1974,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
364,Data Scientist,$71k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"RAPP Dallas is looking for a Data Scientist

to join our award-winning Marketing Sciences team.


ABOUT RAPP

Our purpose

We are the agency absolutely, utterly, fiercely focused on the individual. We use our data, technology and creative smarts to make meaningful, connections with every single person a brand knows.

As a guiding ethos, RAPP stands up for Individuality. So much as, that's in our agency value proposition. We're committed to racial justice, equality, representation, and unbiased economic opportunity, because we know that the strength of our diversity helps us create our best best. And we believe in harnessing the strength of all our Fiercely Individual people, and the differences among us, because that's the surest way to positively impact our business and network culture.

Our family

We are a member of Omnicom’s Precision Marketing Group (OPMG) focused on digital and CRM marketing.

Our home

We are 5 minutes from DFW Airport and a quick Uber to one of the fastest growing metro areas in Texas. 7850 N Beltline Rd. Irving.

Our clients

Like a broad mix of resume-building categories to apply your talents to? Then, you’ll like how we roll with great brands like Toyota, AAA, Xoom, University of Phoenix, and more.

ABOUT YOU

You have 1-3 years of experience in a data science, data engineering, software engineering and/or statistics, and a bachelor’s degree is required. You should also have strong proficiency in Python, some SQL experience, and ideally familiarity with the AWS stack (Sagemaker, S3, EC2, Redshift, Glue, Athena).

You should have experience with unstructured data and APIs, expertise in machine language/machine learning, and experience analyzing large and small internal and external datasets to extract actionable insights and know how to develop statistical models to drive targeting, messaging and strategic decision-making.

Ideally, you have some experience with disparate data sets (customer database, marketing behavior, social data, qualitative research data, macro-economic data, etc.) to expose brand realities, market opportunities, and potential marketing strategies.

In your career, you have provided actionable insights, algorithms and computational solutions to real-world marketing challenges through the application of technology-based mathematical methods. Working with automotive & financial services clients is a plus.

What else? Maybe you're a movie aficionado. Or maybe you have an impressively large vinyl collection? We’d love to know what makes you, you.",3.4,"RAPP
3.4","Dallas, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1965,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
365,Data Scientist - Leading Quant Hedge Fund,$72k-$126k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you a Data Scientist that is interested in working with one of world's leading Quantitative Hedge Funds? Are you a Data Scientist that would enjoy working with a cutting-edge financial and engineering teams and to expand their data science and machine learning capabilities?

This New York City based leading Quantitative Hedge Fund seeks a talented Data Scientist that will work closely with the finance, operations, as well as other investment teams across the firm.

As the Data Scientist, you will:
• Manage large amounts of complex data in R or Python and running quantitative queries.
• Identify timely and unique data sets, diving deep into a diverse set of data domains as well as visualizing and exploring underlying data drivers
• Build statistical analysis and financial modeling techniques to large data sets.
What you need:
Master's or PhD degree from a competitive university in a quantitative field such as statistics, mathematics, operational research, computer science, finance or economics.
Quantitative and Developer experience (Python and/or object oriented programming)
Prior experience working or Internship at a Financial firm or leading technology (Google, Facebook, Amazon, etc...) firm is helpful
Proficiency with statistical and data analysis and programming tools such as R, SAS, Stata, SQL or Matlab.
What you get:
• Work with one of the leading Quantitative Hedge Funds
• Work in not your typical hedge fund. Very collaborative and casual work environment as compared to most Wall St. Firms
• Incredible work perks (too many to name!)",-1,Edward Daniels Group,"New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2007,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
366,Data Scientist,$87k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"We're a fast-growing healthcare tech company that develops software that increases patient access to medical care by optimizing how health systems use expensive, constrained resources. More than 300 hospitals, health systems, and cancer centers – including Stanford Health, Duke University Health System, MultiCare Health, UCSF Health, Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Center, the University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center, UCHealth, OhioHealth, NewYork-Presbyterian, Johns Hopkins Medicine, and others – rely on our products to improve patient access, decrease wait times, and lower the cost of healthcare delivery. We've raised $110+ million dollars from prominent investors in healthcare, including $40 million from Goldman Sachs. Our team includes veteran executives and the brightest minds backed by industry leaders in the healthcare space. CBInsights recently named us among the top 100 AI companies in the world. Healthcare Innovation selected LeanTaaS as the 2019 winner in the Data Analytics category.

We welcome mission-driven data scientists across all experience levels. If our mission of improving patient access to healthcare and their experience is exciting to you, come talk to us!

This role is based in Santa Clara, CA and is not a remote position.
Responsibilities
Work in a small data science team imbedded into one of our product verticals.
Make sense of complex electronic health record (EHR) data related to surgeries, doctors, patients, etc. and help us derive greater value from our data.
Enhance our simulation, optimization, and prediction capabilities.
Own your projects end-to-end including a technology stack, data consumption, modeling, algorithm development and evaluation, and production deployment.
Wear a product hat to ideate and iterate on features and experiences that allow your users to run hospitals like a clock.
Requirements
Advanced degree in operations research, machine learning, or a related field and 2+ years of related industry or academic experience.
Strong analytical and problem solving skills and a deep understanding in at least one sub-area of operations research or machine learning.
Proven command on Python and SQL and are passionate about writing readable code.
Excellent collaboration skills with cross-functional species like product managers, data engineers, and data analysts.
Ability to communicate complex quantitative matters in a clear, precise, and actionable manner.
Great sense of ownership and attention to detail.
LeanTaaS is an equal opportunity employer. We are committed to providing reasonable accommodations and will work with you to meet your needs. If you are a person with a disability and require assistance during the application process, please don’t hesitate to reach out.

Please note: LeanTaaS is not accepting agency resumes at this time, and we are not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes. Thank you.",3.9,"LeanTaaS
3.9","Santa Clara, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
367,Data Scientist,$75k-$122k (Glassdoor Est.),"TransVoyant is seeking a Data Scientist to drive live and predictive data analytics and development for our patented Continuous Decision Intelligence Platform. The ideal candidate will structure data and create the analytics needed to provide insights into our customer domainsranging from predicting customer demand to forecasting port disruptions to getting in front of risks to national security. This position will do data discovery, interpret, craft models and build streams for Insights in TransVoyant CDI.

RESPONSIBILITIES
Become an expert on TransVoyant CDI Platform solutions and how they solve pressing customer challenges within Supply Chain and National Security arenas
Identify, retrieve, manipulate, relate and exploit multiple TransVoyant structured and unstructured data sets from thousands of various sources (ex. tweets, live aircraft, forecast weather), including building or generating new data sets as appropriate
Create methods, models and algorithms to understand the meaning of streaming live data, translating it into insightful predictive output for customer applications and data products
Educate internal staff (ex. development, sales, marketing) on how data science and resulting predictions can be productized for key industry verticals
Represent TransVoyant and our solutions to customers and prospects at industry networking events and tradeshows
Keep up to date on competitive solutions, products and services
May need to travel up to 10% of time
DESIRED SKILLS & EXPERIENCE
2+ years of cloud-based data parsing and analysis, data manipulation and transformation, and visualization experience
Understanding of Hadoop and Apache based tools to exploit massive sets of TransVoyant data
Programming and scripting experience with Scala or Java is considered a plus
Experience with Spark considered a plus
Experience with Kafka or other streaming architecture frameworks considered a plus
Ability to explain technical and statistical findings to non-technical users and decision makers
Experience in technical consulting and conceptual solution design
Domain knowledge in Supply Chain, and/or transportation management and visibility technologies is a plus
Bachelors degree is required
ABOUT TRANSVOYANT

TransVoyant delivers our customers continuous insights to increase revenues, reduce costs and manage risks by combining the current and future behavior of their enterprises, their ecosystems and they dynamic world around them. We are innovative, creative, focused on customer success and love what we do. Team members enjoy highly competitive compensation, a fast-growing and flexible work environment, comprehensive benefits, 100% 401k matches, unlimited vacation days and professional development opportunities.

We respect your personal information. Please review our Privacy Policy to find out more.

Powered by JazzHR",3.1,"TransVoyant
3.1","Alexandria, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
368,Data Scientist,$69k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job no: 495858 Work type: Regular Full-Time Location: Chicago – 55 East Monroe Street, IL Capability Area: Data Enclave, Health Care, Data Services

JOB DESCRIPTION:

NORC at the University of Chicago is seeking a talented Data Scientist excited about data to join the Advanced Data Services team. The ideal candidate for this role will be someone with experience health care analytics (claims data, cost reporting) and will work closely with world-class Senior Fellows, Researchers, Architects, and subject matter experts who are all on the same team dedicated to delivering the best solutions and products for our clients.

Launched in 2006 by NORC at the University of Chicago, the NORC Data Enclave® provides a confidential, protected environment within which authorized researchers can access sensitive micro-data remotely. While public-use data can be disseminated in a variety of ways, fewer options exist for sharing sensitive micro-data that have not been fully de-identified for public use. The Data Enclave provides our partner organizations with a secure platform where they can both host and build a research community around their data. The Data Enclave currently serves more than 1000 researchers and hosts confidential data for federal and state agencies, non-profit research organizations foundations, and commercial entities.

Alternative work locations will be considered. During COVID, NORC staff are working remotely.

DEPARTMENT: Advanced Data Solutions

The Advanced Data Solutions Centers (ADS Center) comprises NORC’s growing array of data management, computational science, and informatics solutions. From short-term consulting projects to large-scale, enterprise-wide, big data initiatives, the ADS Center has the tools and expertise to meet the needs of researchers and decision-makers in a wide variety of sectors and industries.

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Work with health administrative data, and create analytic data products to support various healthcare research and technical assistance projects.
Implement specifications for rigorous study designs, and measures of performance such as cost and quality, to evaluate the impact of healthcare programs and policies.
Participate in and contribute to internal discussions and strategic thinking concerning future research opportunities and the implications of ongoing policy-making for NORC.
Contribute to multiple project teams of senior, mid-level, and junior staff, to meet client expectations and contractual requirements.
Interpreting data from multiple sources using SAS or Tableau.
Working with our client to provide ad hoc reports and any deliverables they may need.
Respond to external and internal client requests.

REQUIRED SKILLS:
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree or higher in social sciences, math, statistics, or computer science or a related field.
At least 5 years of SAS programming experience in an academic or professional environment in positions of increasing responsibility working with large health data sets.
Experience and familiarity with health care or hospital data is a plus.
Experience with policy analysis in a government or professional services environment.
Quantitative analysis proficiency with SAS and preferably Tableau, RShiny or other business intelligence applications.
Strong skills in problem solving and quantitative/qualitative analysis
Ability to organize and prioritize work assignments to meet project needs
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Excellent interpersonal skills
An individual who enjoys “finding answers” to detailed data problems
Interest in digging into complex data issues using various sources of information and resources
Preference will be given to candidates with face-to-face experience with clients who not only have strong communication skills but also enjoy working with clients.
Qualified applicants must be eligible to work in the U.S. We regret that we are unable to offer visa sponsorship for this position.

WHAT WE DO:

NORC at the University of Chicago is an objective, non-partisan research institution that delivers reliable data and rigorous analysis to guide critical programmatic, business, and policy decisions. Since 1941, our teams have conducted groundbreaking studies, created and applied innovative methods and tools, and advanced principles of scientific integrity and collaboration. Today, government, corporate, and nonprofit clients around the world partner with us to transform increasingly complex information into useful knowledge.

WHO WE ARE:

For over 75 years, NORC has evolved in many ways, moving the needle with research methods, technical applications and groundbreaking research findings. But our tradition of excellence, passion for innovation, and commitment to collegiality have remained constant components of who we are as a brand, and who each of us is as a member of the NORC team. With world-class benefits, a business casual environment, and an emphasis on continuous learning, NORC is a place where people join for the stellar research and analysis work for which we’re known, and stay for the relationships they form with their colleagues who take pride in the impact their work is making on a global scale.

EEO STATEMENT:

NORC is an affirmative action, equal opportunity employer that values and actively seeks diversity in the workforce. NORC evaluates qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other legally- protected characteristics.

Advertised: October 16, 2020 Central Daylight Time Applications close:",3.0,"NORC at the University of Chicago
3.0","Chicago, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1941,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
369,Marketing Data Scientist,$87k-$139k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who we are: SoFi is a digital personal finance company whose mission is to help its members achieve financial independence to realize their ambitions, whether that be to buy a house one day, start a family on their own terms or be debt free. We aim to be at the center of our members’ financial lives, and to help every member Get Their Money Right®. By joining SoFi, you’ll become part of a forward-thinking company that is transforming financial services by embracing technology to build innovative loan products, investment tools, and more. One of the fastest growing fintech companies, we’ve grown from 250 employees in 2015 to over 1,500 employees today, and are well on our way to reaching 1 million members. With offices across the US, we offer the excitement of a rapidly growing startup with the stability of a seasoned management team and some of the best talent around. As an employer, we strive to hire employees who are committed to both our company’s mission and our desire to build the best culture in the world. If you are driven, passionate about what you do, and excited about the SoFi mission, we would love to hear from you. The role: As a Marketing Data Scientist @ SoFi, you will be subject matter expert on the user journeys and flows as part of the onboarding experience in becoming a SoFi member, our internal data pipelines as well as our marketing datasets. You will also contribute to building machine learning (ML) models and solutions that touch on attribution, forecasting, and budget allocation across our marketing channels such as Programmatic, Social, Search, Lifecycle, Television and Out of Home that enable SoFi to grow at scale efficiently. What you’ll do: The key goal for this person will be to apply modeling techniques relevant to media mix modeling (MMM) optimization and multi-touch attribution (MTA) to our marketing efforts to connect the impact of marketing activities on business outcomes. Build and deploy models that enable marketers to allocate budgets to various channels in order to drive cross-channel optimization by product and by business objectives. Continue to enhance models as additional data points become available through iterative improvements to instrumentation and Martech initiatives. Develop models that drive personalization for member interactions on owned and paid marketing channels. Contribute to defining a set of SoFi attributes that will enable marketers to create and activate audiences through paid and owned channels. Establish processes and champion tool development to enable building ML models at scale. What you’ll need: At least 3 years of experience with a proven track record of end-to-end experience in model development, testing, implementation, and performance tracking Experience with machine learning and statistical modeling methods for supervised and unsupervised learning. These methods include (but not limited to) regression analysis, clustering, outlier detection, novelty detection, decision trees, collaborative filtering, nearest neighbors, support vector machines, ensemble methods and boosting, neural networks and deep learning, feature selection, and factorization methods and NLP. Write production-quality code in Python, Scala and/or R Strong knowledge of databases and related languages/tools such as SQL, NoSQL, Hive, etc Experience in deploying and operating machine-learned models on low latency, high-throughput systems such as DataBricks, AWS Sagemaker, Azure and GCP. Ability to work in a dynamic, cross-functional environment, with strong attention to detail Effective communication skills and ability to explain complex models to a diverse audience with varying technical backgrounds. Experience building models to optimize advertising performance and lifecycle marketing is preferred Familiarity with Google Marketing Platform (Adwords, Search Ads 360, DV360, Analytics), Facebook as well as other Social Media and Programmatic advertising platforms. Preferred Qualifications: Master’ Degree or Ph.D. in Computer Science, Statistics, Operations Research, Engineering, Mathematics, or a related quantitative field. Why you’ll love working here: Competitive salary packages and bonuses Comprehensive medical, dental, vision and life insurance benefits Generous vacation and holidays Paid parental leave for eligible employees 401(k) and education on retirement planning Tuition reimbursement on approved programs Monthly contribution up to $200 to help you pay off your student loans Great health & well-being benefits including: telehealth parental support, subsidized gym program Employer paid lunch program (except for remote employees) Fully stocked kitchen (snacks and drinks) SoFi provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion (including religious dress and grooming practices), sex (including pregnancy, childbirth and related medical conditions, breastfeeding, and conditions related to breastfeeding), gender, gender identity, gender expression, national origin, ancestry, age (40 or over), physical or medical disability, medical condition, marital status, registered domestic partner status, sexual orientation, genetic information, military and/or veteran status, or any other basis prohibited by applicable state or federal law. Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records",3.1,"SoFi
3.1","San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
370,Data Scientist,-1,"Title: Data Scientist
Job ID: AD23656917

Our client has opened an opportunity for a Data Scientist to be part of their engineering team and build the best AI tech possible. You will develop top tier models from unique and diverse data sources to provide strong insights and maximize the impact of their company efforts; and develop computer vision algorithms that extract insights from aerial imagery and geospatial data.

Joining the company has its rewards: You will get to enjoy competitive compensation and equity incentives to give you a stake in their future. You will be provided with a comprehensive healthcare plan and flexible time off. Work in an upbeat and collaborative work culture and much more.

The Opportunity:
Exploring data sets and developing new InsureTech models with data science (Machine learning, Deep learning).
Develop computer vision algorithms that extract insights from aerial imagery and geospatial data
Research and model aspects of the built environment utilizing satellite imagery, LiDAR and other datasets
Help develop training and cross­-validation data sets for machine learning algorithms
Translate product management, engineering, and business constraints and queries into tractable data science questions
Qualifications:
BA / BS degree in Math, Physics, Computer Science, and Economics. MS or Ph.D. (bonus)
1+ years of experience working with computer vision and building and testing computer vision systems
2+ years of experience deploying machine learning models in production environments
2+ years of experience working with deep learning / neural network models (using TensorFlow, PyTorch, Keras, Caffe)
Experience working with large image datasets (great if you’ve already worked with satellite imagery) and related tools OpenCV, Pillow, etc.)
Experience working with cloud platforms (AWS, Google Cloud, etc)
Ability to develop new models based on physics and AI sciences
Proficient in SQL

For more information about TEEMA and to consider other career opportunities, please visit our website at www.teemagroup.com

By applying to TEEMA on any job portal implies you are entering into a business relationship with us and therefore grants TEEMA consent to send you further job updates or industry and company-related information.",4.6,"TEEMA
4.6","Oakland, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
371,Marketing Data Scientist,$118k-$193k (Glassdoor Est.),"Note: By applying to this position your application is automatically submitted to the following locations: Mountain View, CA, USA; New York, NY, USA

Minimum qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Engineering, or Mathematics, related quantitative discipline, or equivalent practical experience.
5 years of experience in data science with a focus on marketing analytics, statistical modeling, machine learning, forecasting and optimization.
Experience in Python and/or R.
Experience in data management systems.
Preferred qualifications:
PhD in Statistics, Computer Science, Engineering, or Mathematics.
Experience with big data and cloud platforms to deploy large-scale data science solutions.
Experience working in industries such as retail, financial services, telecommunications and automotive (including in a client-facing consulting or advisory capacity), and the ability to navigate complex business organizations and manage multiple cross-functional stakeholders.
Understanding of media and the statistical algorithms typically used in marketing analytics.
About the job


gTech’s Professional Services team takes a creative, collaborative, and customer-centric approach to provide foundational services and forward-looking business solutions to top advertiser and publisher customers. Through technical implementation, optimization, and key solutions, gTech Professional Services helps customers attain their business goals while building long-term capabilities.

gTech Data Scientists work with Google’s Sales, Product, and Engineering teams to develop services and improve our products based on the evolving needs of users. You will ask the right business questions of Google’s internal stakeholders and larger clients to deliver innovative and actionable quantitative models and analyses. You will have an impact on marketing effectiveness and return on investment for Google’s clients.

Google creates products and services that make the world a better place, and gTech’s role is to help bring them to life. Our teams of trusted advisors support customers globally. Our solutions are rooted in our technical skill, product expertise, and a thorough understanding of our customers’ complex needs. Whether the answer is a bespoke solution to solve a unique problem, or a new tool that can scale across Google, everything we do aims to ensure our customers benefit from the full potential of Google products.

To learn more about gTech, check out our video.
Responsibilities
Support complex client engagements in marketing effectiveness and portfolio management with high quality data science solutions, augmenting product results where appropriate (such as Google Analytics 360, YouTube, Search).
Design new methodologies, pulling necessary data, building statistical and machine-learned models with accuracy, and analyzing experiments, applying critical thinking throughout.
Collaborate across internal teams and clients, and manage opportunities and challenges in ways that improve processes and help clients become more data savvy.
Communicate and visualize insights to multiple levels of stakeholders with clarity, informing decision-making.

Google is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. We also consider qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. See also Google's EEO Policy and EEO is the Law. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know by completing this form.",4.5,"Google
4.5","Mountain View, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1998,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
372,Data Scientist,-1,"To maintain our lead in using cutting-edge analytics to detect payments fraud, Vesta is expanding our Data Science team and we are looking for Data Scientists who will be responsible for developing high quality machine learning models to prevent payment fraud. As a Data Scientist, you will become part of the team to provide ideas, conduct proof of concepts, and develop production models to achieve Vesta strategic and operational objectives. As such, you will bring excellent analytic skills and a thorough knowledge of machine learning and help us solve toughest business problems.

Vesta is a SaaS-based, global leader in fraud detection and guaranteed e-commerce payment solutions. We are headquartered in Portland, Oregon with flagship offices in Atlanta, Ireland, Singapore and Mexico City and we are looking for energetic new talent to help us execute on our plans for innovation, growth and expansion.

Core Responsibilities:
Analyze large sets of transactional data to understand consumer behavior, explore and extract features and patterns to improve model performance.
Research state-of-the-art machine learning technologies to build world-class fraud detection models
Prototype modeling strategies to optimize model performance
Perform link analysis and fraud analytics in an enterprise environment.
Acquire and apply knowledge relevant to consumer behavior, risk management, and payment processing.
Work with interdepartmental teams to maintain and improve risk policies and procedures.
Identify possible problems with data or processes and takes action to resolve issues.
Education & Experience Required:
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, or other quantitative fields.
Bilingual in Spanish/English
2+ years' working experience in machine learning.
Competencies Required:
Proficient in advanced machine learning algorithms
Solid knowledge on statistics and applied mathematics
Solid knowledge on both supervised learning and unsupervised learning. Experience in time series and adversarial modeling preferred
Fluency in Scikit-learn, PyTorch or similar machine learning frameworks
Expertise in SQL and Python and proven comfort and intellectual curiosity for working with large data sets
Experience in Hadoop/Spark or other distributed parallel computing paradigms is a plus
Experience with data visualization tools, such as Matplotlib/Seaborn, ggplot, D3.js, or Tableau is a plus.
Able to rapidly learn new subjects and process
Passionate about solving the toughest analytical problems
Have innovative mindset and take initiatives to work independently and collaboratively as needed to tackle projects
Organizational skills and ability to prioritize tasks and deliver on time
Can write clean and well documented code. Has good technical writing and verbal communication skills.
Strong communication skills and ability to articulate and share findings with the team
Other:

On occasion this role may require off-hours work in order to address escalations or urgent concerns.

*Visa Sponsorship

Please note, this position is not eligible for visa sponsorship.

About Vesta

Vesta is a Software-as-a-Service (SaaS) company that specializes in managing payments in the ""card-not-present"" (CNP) arena. We use next-level technologies and cutting-edge data science methodologies to bring unparalleled accuracy to fraud detection. Our zero liability solutions let merchants step fearlessly into the world of online commerce, so they can stop chargebackswithout stopping business.

We are a company reinventing ourselves for the future in an industry that is growing and changing at the same time. We are looking for talented people to join us who resonate with our Vesta Values: trust, partner, empower, passion and courage -- and who love to tackle new challenges every day.

We are also a casual, fun and flexible workplace that also offers highly competitive benefits including a selection of medical, dental and vision care options, paid parental leave, generous paid-time-off and a paid sabbatical program.

Vesta is an equal opportunity employer and considers qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, ancestry, age, veteran status, or disability.

If you are an individual with a disability and require a reasonable accommodation to complete any part of the application process or are limited in the ability or unable to access or use this online application process and need an alternative method for applying, you may contact Careers@trustvesta.com for assistance.",3.7,"Vesta Corporation
3.7",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,1995,Company - Private,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
373,Data Scientist,-1,"You will integrate disparate EHR, clinical, claims, and other medical data sources, extracting consistent information across ontologies, and deriving insights from disparate data sources to allow experts to rapidly understand the meaning, applicability, and extensibility of results from observational and randomized clinical experimentation. You will build ML tools for anomaly-tracking to enable rapid, more effective clinical trialing and the integration of data sources throughout the life sciences. You will model the trajectory of disease across patient populations to identify key opportunities and indications and to rapidly test and develop candidate medicines.
You will map and optimize the complex interrelationships of pharma companies, drug manufacturers, pharmacy benefit managers, payors, and patients to drive EQRx’s strategy to dramatically lower drug prices while promoting equity and access. You will use novel computational techniques to design, refine, and select novel drug candidates. Using the tools of modern data science and machine learning, you will help to build a data driven, end-to-end digital native life sciences company, enabling our core mission of rapid, equal, and equitable access to medicines.
The Impact You'll Have
You will help to radically lower drug prices and expand access, by identifying novel opportunities for partnerships and delivery across the complex web of interrelationships that bring drugs from pharma companies to patients. You will speed the development and trialing of novel medicines through the unification, comprehension, and modelling of human health and disease across data sources. You will drive the adoption of machine learning for the improvement of human health in building a radically different, digital-native and data-first life sciences company, where we bootstrap our way to rapid increases in scale and efficacy across functions. You will enable experts across EQRx to see further, connecting data from biology and chemistry, to the clinic and patients, to drug pricing and delivery, powering a novel, modern paradigm in drug development.
Your Superpowers
You have significant experience in the data science in industry.
You have a PhD (preferred) or Masters (with 3+ additional years exp) in a quantitative scientific field such as physics, computational biology, chemistry, engineering, etc.
You are fluent in python (strongly preferred) or R and cloud native data science.
You thrive working with messy and complex data, understanding key nuances behind its generation and able to model them with quantitative and machine learning tools to achieve understanding.
You are an excellent communicator, able to translate complex analyses into insightful visuals and presentations for audiences with a wide range of technical backgrounds.
You are empathetic with end users; proficient at turning business and scientific questions into testable, clean, and reproducible data scientific workflows.
You have a quick, flexible mind, able to rapidly learn new fields and use data science and machine learning to improve decision making and workflows.
You are an avid reader of the literature; excited to try novel tools and techniques to solve problems.
Job Code: #LI-JR1
EQRx is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",5.0,"EQRx
5.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2019,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
374,Data Scientist,-1,"Title: Data Scientist @ Springfield, VA
Terms of Hire: Full time.
Salary: $ 175,000–$190,000 / YR + Benefits

Job description
**Active TS/SCI Security Clearance Required***
Our client is looking for an energetic and experienced data scientist and or modeling expert with experience working within a Multi-Int environment.
Responsibilities:
Works with large structured / unstructured data sets, various rest/wms data services, multiple database programs and collection systems, in a modeling and analytical environment, solving hard intelligence problems and issues.
Uses exploratory data analysis techniques to identify meaningful relationships, patterns, or trends from complex data
Combines applied mathematics, programming skills, analytical techniques, and data to provide impactful insights for decision makers
Researches and implement optimization models, strategies, and methods to inform data management activities and analyses
Applies big data analytics tools to large, diverse sets of collection data to assess risk of adverse threat activities
Qualifications:
10 years of experience as an intelligence analyst (single-INT or all-source) utilizing data from multiple intelligence disciplines (HUMINT, SIGINT, GEOINT, OSINT, MASINT) required
Experience using spatial and statistical analysis techniques for performing problem solving against disparate datasets required
Scripting knowledge (JS, Python) is a huge plus and any experience using model based analytics programs like JEMA, NODE RED, etc. and software packages like SAS is beneficial
Active TS/SCI Clearance REQUIRED
Desired exp:
Keyhole Markup Language (KML) and GIS software such as Google Earth, ArcGIS
Experience using Joint Enterprise Modeling and Analytics software (JEMA), FADE/ MIST
Database administration and query languages (predominantly SQL Select statements),
Python expressions or other related scripting languages
HTTP, HTML, CSS and programming languages such as Java, JavaScript, Python and various web service frameworks
You Will Enjoy:
An opportunity to be a part of a great culture, an awesome team, a challenging work environment, and some fun along the way!
Apply today to learn more and be part of our Growth story.
All applications will be kept strictly confidential and once shortlisted, our team will be in touch with you for further discussions.",-1,CEDENT,"Springfield, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Contract,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
375,Data Scientist,-1,"At VRAI, we believe in creating diamond jewelry that inspires beauty, optimism and possibility through the human lens of innovation, the power of continually moving forward and embracing change, and in the beauty of evolution. We’re bringing unique, sustainably created diamond shapes and customizable designs to conscientious consumers. Our exceptional fine jewelry and engagement rings feature created diamonds from our foundry, which is the only certified diamond producer in the world with zero carbon footprint. Innovation, quality craftsmanship and sustainability is at the core of our products and our everyday values. We are committed to raising the standard in the jewelry industry towards a sustainable future. We pride ourselves in our ethical partnerships working with organizations that are creating an impact in environmental and equality initiatives. Responsibilities Build the infrastructure required to extract, transform and load data from a variety of sources to a centralized 3rd party vendor Investigate and manage data integrations with 3rd party vendor (e.g Heap, Looker, Freshpaint) Apply your expertise in quantitative analysis, data mining, and data visualization to see beyond the numbers, understand how our users interact and engage with VRAI, and draw actionable insights Partner with Product, Marketing and Engineering teams to solve problems and identify trends and opportunities Help set up experiments, analyze and interpret results Build analytics to measure program impact, identify trends and anomalies, and influence marketing program investments Manage pixel and tag implementation Build funnel and custom event analysis to gain insights into the user journey Ensure robust and accurate data capture and continuous improvement of data available for both analytics and the wider business Coordinate with business unit analysts to understand business reporting requirements and translate needs into data integration, extraction, and transformation processes between operational systems and the data warehouse. Experience Previous experience at an ecommerce company using customer, traffic and other relevant data to improve and scale business performance and processes. Minimum of 5 years of related work experience. Bachelor’s degree or higher in an analytical area such as Computer Science, Management information Systems, Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering or similar field. Master’s degree preferred. Demonstrated ability to manage own projects or programs including work prioritization, planning, and coordination Strong communication and data presentation skills, experience analyzing data and communicating the results to senior business leaders Ability to work cross-functionally, building and maintaining trust with internal stakeholders Experience in querying and manipulating large data sets using data querying languages (e.g. SQL), scripting languages (e.g. Python), or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R, SAS, Matlab)Google analytics knowledge, a bonus Experience with designing and deploying compelling dashboards using business intelligence tools (e.g. Tableau, Glew, Looker, Mixpanel) Knowledge in applied statistics (e.g. hypothesis testing, regressions, predictive modelings) or experimentation (e.g. A/B testing) in an industry setting Solid understanding of online marketing, preferably in a past or current roleKnowledge of UTM parameters and campaign tracking Proven ability to solve complex quantitative business challenges; experience in the development and measurement of multi-variant testing is a plus. To find out more about VRAI check out: vrai.com facebook.com/vrai",3.3,"Diamond Foundry
3.3","Los Angeles, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
376,Data Scientist,$70k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job description:
Data Scientist positions offered by Ford Motor Company (Dearborn, MI). Utilize analytical applications and languages to identify patterns, trends and relationships between different pieces of data, draw appropriate conclusions, and translate analytical findings into actionable business insight. Collaborate with software development teams to full leverage analytics-driven decision making.

Minimum Requirements:

Requires master’s or foreign equivalent degree in statistics, economics or a related quantitative field
2 years of experience in the position offered or 2 years of experience performing analytics consulting from business problem formulation to analytics framework conceptualization to data-sourcing to analytics solution development to visualization and mapping to story-telling.
2 years of experience applying advanced analytical methods and tools to identify service areas, design routes, evaluate service performance, perform customer analysis, and develop prototype solutions with mapping and visualization in the microtransit services area
2 years of experience using Hadoop, Spark, Python, R, Alteryx, QlikView, R Shiny, Tableau, and QGIS
Experience may be, but need not be, acquired concurrently
Join our team as we create tomorrow! We believe in putting people first, working together, and facing challenges head-on, because we’re Built Ford Tough. We’re one team striving to make people’s lives better while creating value, delivering excellence and ultimately going for the win.

Ford Motor Company is an equal opportunity employer committed to a culturally diverse workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, age, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability status or protected veteran status.

Visa sponsorship may be available for this position.",4.0,"Ford Motor Company
4.0","Dearborn, MI",-1,10000+ Employees,1903,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
377,Data Scientist,-1,"The Role

Jellyfish delivers digital marketing solutions across the world for a host of impressive brands from offices across five continents. Our award-winning combination of technology and talent help us deliver paid media, UX, SEO, social media, analytics, optimization, creative, and development solutions

We have an exceptional opportunity for an ambitious and talented Data Scientist to join our team and assist in the Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence applications that Jellyfish uses to drive thought leadership, innovate, and transform solutions and services for our clients.

As a data scientist, you will work in a fast-paced cross-functional team interacting with a wide range of stakeholders. You will wrangle large and messy datasets of structured and unstructured data, build and implement models and algorithms, and design and run experiments to optimize media and customer experience. The ideal candidate will have a relentless curiosity about various business problems and a passion for inventing data-based solutions to those challenges.

Responsibilities
Analyze data to discover hidden trends; deliver insights and analysis with clear recommendations
Design, build, and implement predictive models and algorithms to improve and optimize media performance, customer experiences, revenue generation, and other business outcomes
Build well-managed data solutions, tools, and innovative prototypes to enable self-service frameworks
Deliver effective presentations of findings and recommendations to technical and non-technical stakeholders
Document analytics projects in a manner that ensures specific processes can be replicated and scaled across an organization
Collaborate with multiple teams and stakeholders in an agile, fast-paced, dynamic, and entrepreneurial environment
Requirements

Knowledge and Experience
BS in Science, Technology, Engineering, Mathematics discipline
Experience in data science and machine learning
Demonstrated experience and knowledge of Machine Learning, e.g.: linear/logistics regression, random forest, and neural networks, etc.
Hands-on experience in one of the machine learning frameworks, such as Scikit-Learn, TensorFlow, or Spark MLlib.
Programming proficiency in Python or R
Proficiency in manipulating large relational databases using SQL
Experience with big data technologies and cloud platforms, such as GCP, AWS, or Azure, etc.
Experience in analyzing media and web data, such as Google Ads, Campaign Manager, Facebook, and Google Analytics
Experience with visualizing data using: Matplotlib, ggplot, D3JS, Looker, or Tableau
Exhibit a drive to learn and master new knowledge and technologies
Demonstrable skills in creative problem solving with strong attention to detail",3.6,"Jellyfish Group Ltd
3.6","Baltimore, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Motion Picture Production & Distribution,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
378,Data Scientist,-1,"Who We Are:
OptTek Systems is the leading provider of optimization technology to the simulation software industry. Founded in 1992, the OptTek team includes internationally recognized leaders in optimization and has a strong history of creating world class applications combining simulation, optimization, and analytics.

But OptTek is much more than a leading provider of optimization technology. We have a truly unique culture that promotes positive attitudes, mutual respect across our team, and a fun, friendly working environment. We work hard but value work/life balance, generally enjoying a 36-hour, 4-day work week. To learn more, visit www.OptTek.com.

OptTek is experiencing rapid growth and is seeking a talented Data Scientist/Analytics Engineer. If you want to be part of a talented, highly collaborative team and work in an amazing environment, get in on the ground floor of an amazing opportunity, AND help make the world a better place by eliminating waste and inefficiency, read on.

What You Will Do:
This is a position for a data scientist/analytics engineer. The position requires a highly motivated, detail-oriented professional capable of both independent and small team performance on a variety of data science and advanced analytics projects spanning both commercial and government work.

Who You Are:
Qualifications

Essential Requirements include:
A bachelor’s degree or equivalent practical work experience in data science/machine learning or related fields
Minimum of two years of professional data science (AI/machine learning/data mining), computer simulation and/or optimization experience; however, more senior candidates also encouraged to apply
A portfolio demonstrating experience in effective and imaginative problem solving
Experience using tools for statistical analysis, predictive analytics, machine learning
Excellent communication and presentation skills
Experience in translating customer requirements into effective data analytics and clear data visualizations
The ability to interact with customers and fellow engineers to understand their requests, but know when to dig deeper to uncover the truly desired analytics
Expertise in any of the following areas is a plus:
The ability to code software to run optimization, algorithms, simulation, mathematics, or data analytics
Experience with R, Python, Tableau and/or other tools for scripting and data analysis and manipulation
Java coding experience is a big plus
An active DOD security clearance is a big plus.
Additional information:


Here's what's in it for you:
Competitive compensation including annual bonus plans
Comprehensive benefits package which includes health insurance, disability benefits, a matched 401(k) and more
36-hour, 4-day work week (yes, you read that correctly)
Flexible, remote work options
Interesting, changing work centered around your capabilities, interests, and work style
Open Paid Time Off Policy (yes, you read that correctly, too)
Free parking at our amazing historic Boulder location and provided Ecopass
Catered lunches - every day
A host of company events including a wide range of community service, team, and family-friendly activities throughout the year
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines. OptTek is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be a dog-friendly, Equal Opportunity Employer.",5.0,"Creative Alignments
5.0","Boulder, CO",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
379,Data Scientist,$67k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Harmonia Holdings Group, LLC, an award-winning federal government contractor, has an exciting opportunity for a Data Scientistto join our team. To perform this job successfully, an individual must possess the knowledge, skills, and abilities listed; meet the education and work experience required; and must be able to perform each essential duty and responsibility satisfactorily. Other duties, in addition to the below, may be assigned as necessary to meet business needs.

Essential Job Functions:
Apply Machine Learning in large data environments
Complete data mining, predictive modeling, clustering, and classification
Minimum Required Qualifications:
Top Secret/ SCI Clearance
Five (5) years of related experience
Harmonia has been on the Inc. 5000 list of fastest growing companies in the United States for 10 years and has been named a Virginia Chamber of Commerce Fantastic 50 company for the last two years. We are a Northern Virginia Technology Council Tech 100 company and a Great Place to Work Certified organization! Every bit of our success is the result of a team of incredibly talented, dedicated, and hard-working professionals who are the heart and soul of Harmonia!

At Harmonia, we are pleased to offer competitive compensation and a dynamic, productive work environment. Benefits include employer-paid medical, dental, vision, and life insurance options; gym/wellness reimbursement; 401(k) matching; 501(c)(3) donation matching; paid holidays; generous paid time off; training reimbursement; and an Employee Assistance Program.

Harmonia is an Equal Opportunity Employer providing equal employment opportunity to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, age, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, disability, or genetics. Harmonia does and will take affirmative action to employ and advance in employment individuals with disabilities and protected veterans. Reasonable accommodation will be made to enable an applicant with a disability to successfully apply for and/or perform the essential duties of the job.",3.6,"Harmonia Holdings Group
3.6","Charlottesville, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
380,Data Scientist,$86k-$140k (Glassdoor Est.),"Bring YOUR energy to Alliant Energy!

If you enjoy challenges, have the drive to learn, and are passionate about the work you do we invite you to consider Alliant Energy!

What sets us apart?
Excellent pay and benefits
A commitment to career growth and development
A culture that embraces our core values of live safety, do the right thing, care for others, make things better, act for tomorrow, and think beyond – be bold.
The opportunity to make a positive impact on our local communities

Alliant Energy is seeking a Data Scientist to join our team! You will begin working on a remote basis and eventually will report to our office in either Madison, WI or Cedar Rapids, IA. In this position, you will be accountable for modeling complex problems, discovering actionable insights and identifying opportunities hidden in vast amounts of data through use of statistical, algorithmic, mining and visualization techniques to enable better decision making. You will be responsible for integrating and preparing large, varied datasets, architecting specialized databases and clearly communicating results. At Alliant Energy, we have a great story to tell as we move toward a smarter energy future for our communities and customers. Interested? Come join our team!

Alliant Energy will not provide sponsorship for an employment visa (e.g., H-1B visa) now or in the future for this position.

Job Responsibilities

Designs experiments, tests hypotheses and builds models to solve analytics problems and communicates results and methodologies to the customer.
Works with the key stakeholders to define use case requirements to ensure that results are meaningful and enable improved decision making.
Works with the business to assess the validity of the data and achieve minimum levels of quality.
Combines multiple data sources (both internal and external)
Leads change and applies change management principles to promote cultural transformation and improve the adoption of analytics.
Collaborates with others responsible for analytics.
Assures the creation and maintenance of measurement systems for analytics including the tracking of results.
Works with technology teams to develop and implement analytical solutions in a production environment

Job Qualifications

Education

Bachelor's Degree with an emphasis in math, statistics, analytics, operations research, computer science, or related area field is required
Master's Degree peferred
Required Experience
Experience working with big data environments such as Hadoop, Cloudera, etc.
Preferred Experience
6 years of direct experience in a related field (statistics, performance management, analytics, research)
2 years prior experience as a Data Scientist

Knowledge, Skill and Abilities

Demonstrated Proficiency in programming languages such as Python and SQL.
Proficiency in Visualization Tools such as Tableau, Power BI.
Demonstrated knowledge with pattern recognition, machine learning, predictive modeling, and descriptive inferential statistics preferred.
Demonstrated effective leadership skills.
Works in a diverse and inclusive environment.

ALLIANT ENERGY VALUES

It's not just what we do; it's how we do it.

Live safety. Everyone. Always - Our first priority is that nobody gets hurt.
Do the right thing - We keep our promises and conduct our business openly and honestly.
Care for others - Together we create a workplace where people feel like they belong and can use their unique backgrounds, talents and perspectives to their fullest potential.
Make things better - We partner with our customers and communities to solve problems, create opportunities and help make life better.
Act for tomorrow - We use resources wisely, care for the environment and continuously improve ourselves and our company.
Think beyond. Be bold - We create and embrace change, innovate beyond current practices and use our curiosity to find new solutions.
NOTE: All candidates selected for employment with Alliant Energy will be required to successfully complete a drug screen and background check.
We are committed to providing an inclusive work environment for all and are proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/Disability/Protected Veteran.

Disclaimer: The above information on this description has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.

To apply for this challenging opportunity, please complete our online application at www.alliantenergy.com/careers.

Applications will be accepted until a qualified pool of candidates is received.

Job Expires

11/14/2020",3.1,"Alliant Energy
3.1","Madison, WI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1917,Company - Public,Utilities,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
381,Data Scientist,$62k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"JOB DESCRIPTION
Sogeti is a leading provider of professional technology services, specializing in Application Management, Infrastructure Management and High-Tech Engineering. Sogeti offers cutting-edge solutions around Testing, Business Intelligence, Mobility, Cloud and Security, combining world class methodologies and the global delivery model, Rightshore®. Sogeti brings together more than 20,000 professionals in 15 countries and is present in over 100 locations in Europe, the US and India. Sogeti is a wholly-owned subsidiary of Cap Gemini S.A., listed on the Paris Stock Exchange.

At Sogeti USA, we are committed to building a long and enduring relationship with our employees and to creating an environment that rewards and empowers. Our mission is to constantly exceed our employees' expectations in the same way that we strive to exceed our clients' expectations. We offer an environment that celebrates innovation and helps you to achieve a good balance between your professional and personal life. We strive to be an employer of choice!

Responsibilities:
Develop and scale approaches for extracting
patterns and correlations from both internal and external data sources
using machine learning toolkits.
Work in an Agile, collaborative environment,
partnering with other scientists, engineers, consultants and database
administrators of all backgrounds and disciplines to bring analytical
rigor and statistical methods to the challenges of predicting behaviours.
Distil insights from complex data, communicating
findings to technical and non-technical audiences.
Develop, improve, or expand in-house
computational pipelines, algorithms, models, and services used in crop
product development.
Constantly document and communicate results of
research on data mining, analysis, and modelling approaches.
Must have:

·
Advanced
Degree in Mathematics, Physics, Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, or
an equivalent discipline required

·
7 +
years of Experience in developing models and algorithms in a commercial
environment

·
Expertise
in multivariate statistical modelling (e.g. clustering, regression, principal
components and factor analysis, time-series forecasting, Bayesian methods) and

·
Experience
with cloud computing platforms (AWS, GCP or other), or equivalent on-premise
platform

·
Expertise
in Big data framework like Hive / SPARK / Hadoop.

·
Experience
in Version Control software (bit bucket/ GitHub)
Proficient with relational databases and SQL
Demonstrated experience developing and executing
machine learning, deep learning, data mining and classification models.
·
Ability
to simultaneously coordinate and track multiple deliverables, tasks and
dependencies across multiple stakeholders / business areas
Creative, innovative, and strategic thinking;
willingness to be bold and take risks on new ideas.
Experience with Forecasting/Prediction modelling
and Recommender System.
The benefits our employees enjoy:
401(k) Savings Plan- Matched 150% up to 6%. (Our 401k is in the top 1% of 401(k) plans offered in the US!)
Medical/Prescription/Dental/Vision Coverage!
Low-premium and deductible. Plan with free preventive care.
$12,000 in Tuition Reimbursement
100% Company-paid mobile phone plan
Personal Time Off (PTO)- Ensuring a balance of work and home life",3.1,"Sogeti
3.1","Bridgewater, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1967,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
382,Data Scientist,$105k-$172k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a full spectrum AWS integrator, we assist hundreds of companies to realize the value, efficiency, and productivity of the cloud. We take customers on their journey to enable, operate, and innovate using cloud technologies – from migration strategy to operational excellence and immersive transformation.

If you like a challenge, you’ll love it here, because we’re solving complex business problems every day, building and promoting great technology solutions that impact our customers’ success. The best part is, we’re committed to you and your growth, both professionally and personally.
Overview

Our Data Scientists are experienced technologists with technical depth and breadth, along with strong interpersonal skills. In this role, you will work directly with customers and our team to help enable innovation through continuous, hands-on, deployment across technology stacks. You will work to build data science pipelines that include building models, A/B testing, natural language processing, computer vision and AR/VR visualizations.

If you get a thrill working with cutting-edge technology and love to help solve customers’ problems, we’d love to hear from you. It’s time to rethink the possible. Are you ready?
What You’ll Be Doing:
Confidence with manipulating complex, large and dense datasets with big data tools; must be comfortable with SQL and large database systems
Ability to Build complex data transformation code
Build complex SQL queries using MongoDB, Oracle, SQL Server, MariaDB, MySQL
Excellent ability to work with structured and unstructured data sets
Deep experience with R or Python, SQL and running ETL jobs
Ability to apply supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques
Strong understanding of continuous learning and model training
Knowledge of data labeling, categorization, and structuring techniques
Expert ability to break down and clearly define problems
Strong ability to communicate highly technical results to a diverse audience
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills

Qualifications & Experience:

3-5 years of hands-on experience in data mining and predictive analytics with statistical modeling techniques
3-5+ years of experience in networking, infrastructure, or database architectures
Experience working with data in the AWS ecosystem
Experience with advanced data science tools
Experience applying computational algorithms and statistical methods to structured and unstructured data
MS or PhD in Applied Mathematics, Physics, Computer Science, Statistics or related technical field
Experience in the cyber security domain
AWS certifications
SQL
Kubernetes is a plus
Artificial Intelligence
Predictive Analytics
Tableau or other visualization tools
Kafka / Confluent
CI / CD and Cloud Native Computing (Docker, Kubernetes, Consul, Vault)
#Onica

About Rackspace Technology
We are the multicloud solutions experts. We combine our expertise with the world’s leading technologies — across applications, data and security — to deliver end-to-end solutions. We have a proven record of advising customers based on their business challenges, designing solutions that scale, building and managing those solutions, and optimizing returns into the future. Named a best place to work, year after year according to Fortune, Forbes and Glassdoor, we attract and develop world-class talent. Join us on our mission to embrace technology, empower customers and deliver the future.
More on Rackspace Technology
Though we’re all different, Rackers thrive through our connection to a central goal: to be a valued member of a winning team on an inspiring mission. We bring our whole selves to work every day. And we embrace the notion that unique perspectives fuel innovation and enable us to best serve our customers and communities around the globe. We welcome you to apply today and want you to know that we are committed to offering equal employment opportunity without regard to age, color, disability, gender reassignment or identity or expression, genetic information, marital or civil partner status, pregnancy or maternity status, military or veteran status, nationality, ethnic or national origin, race, religion or belief, sexual orientation, or any legally protected characteristic. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know.",4.2,"Onica
4.2","Dallas, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2017,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
383,Data Scientist,$58k-$95k (Glassdoor Est.),"General information


Department:

IM Architecture


Date:

Thursday, October 1, 2020


Working time:

Full-time


Ref#:

20009573


Job Level:

Individual Contributor


Job Type:

Experienced


Job Field:

IM Architecture


Description & Requirements

Xerox (NYSE: XRX) makes every day work better. We are a workplace technology company, building and integrating software and hardware for enterprises large and small. As customers seek to manage information across digital and physical platforms, Xerox delivers a seamless, secure and sustainable experience. Whether inventing the copier, the ethernet, the laser printer or more, Xerox has long defined the modern work experience. Learn how that innovation continues at xerox.com

Purpose:

To turn raw data into valuable insights which will be needed in order to grow and compete. This will mean to interpret and analyze data from multiple sources to come up with imaginative solutions to problems. Will use their analytical, statistical and programming skills to collect, analyze and interpret large data sets, and then use this information to develop data driven solutions to different challenges. Has strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations. Demonstrates a proven ability to drive business results with their data-based insights. Must be comfortable working with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams. The right candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes.

Main Responsibilities:
Work with stakeholders throughout the organization to identify opportunities for leveraging company data to drive business solutions.
Use strong business acumen, as well as an ability to communicate findings, and mine vast amounts of data for useful insights
Use these insights to influence how an organization approaches business challenges.
Use a combined knowledge of computer science and applications, modelling, statistics, analytics and math to solve problems.
Data exploration, mathematical/ statistical modelling, data analysis, and hypothesis testing
Design, development, and deployment of Machine Learning models and frameworks.
Use predictive modelling to increase and optimize customer experiences, revenue generations, and other business outcomes.
Sift and analyze data from multiple angles, looking for trends that highlight problems or opportunities
Communicate important information and insights to business and IT leaders
Make recommendations to adapt existing business strategies
Required Qualifications:
5-7 years of experience manipulating data sets and building statistical and Machine Learning models
Minimum Bachelors/Masters’ in Computer Science, MIS or another quantitative field.
Candidate Background: Skills, Knowledge and Abilities:
Experience in developing Python scripts to wrangle data and develop ML models using Python libraries or using Python as a wrapper.
Extensive experience in developing and deploying ML models to support critical business functions.
Experience in SQL to explore data and identify business insights.
Experience using statistical computer languages (SLQ etc.) to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets
Exposure with and in creating data architectures
Knowledge of variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks) and their real world advantages / drawbacks
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage etc.)And experience with applications
Min Well-versed in quantitative analysis, research, data mining, trend analysis, customer profiling, clustering, segmentation and predictive modeling.
Min Executing the data-driven planning process by building models and frameworks that connect business unit drivers to company financials and forecast to take the correct decision as per the business need.
The right candidate will also be proficient and experienced with the following tools/programs:
Strong programming skills with querying languages: SQL and Python.
Experience with Could architecture: Azure, AWS
Experience with data visualization tools: Tableau, Raw, chart.js, etc.
Experience with Adobe Analytics and other analytics tools
Experience with Excel, Word, and PowerPoint.
Knowledge and experience in statistical and data mining techniques: GLM/Regression, Random Forest, Boosting, Trees, text mining, social network analysis, etc.
Xerox is an Equal Opportunity Employer and considers applicants for all positions without regard to race, color, creed, religion, ancestry, national origin, age, gender identity, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, physical or mental disability, use of a guide dog or service animal, military/veteran status, citizenship status, basis of genetic information, or any other group protected by law. Learn more at www.xerox.com and explore our commitment to diversity and inclusion! People with disabilities who need a reasonable accommodation to apply or compete for employment with Xerox may request such accommodation(s) by sending an e-mail to XeroxStaffingAdminCenter@xerox.com. Be sure to include your name, the job you are interested in, and the accommodation you are seeking.

© 2020 Xerox Corporation. All rights reserved. Xerox® and Xerox and Design® are trademarks of Xerox Corporation in the United States and/or other countries.",3.1,"Xerox
3.1","Cary, NC",-1,10000+ Employees,1906,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
384,Data Scientist,-1,"Role Responsibilities:
• Work with game developers and producers to design the in-game telemetry events used for gameplay analysis
• Maintain and organize in-game telemetry specs, adhering to NGP compliance and other corporate PII policies
• Provide forecasting support on event fire rates and data retention needs to developers
• Establish core measurements and methods that can be used across multiple games, game services, and hardware
• Deliver progression modeling, balance analysis, multiplayer performance, cheat detection, and social impact analysis
• Provide regular, timely reporting and performance monitoring to studio teams and key business stakeholders
• Recommend new architectural designs and enhancements to existing data systems to optimize for high speed, low latency reporting and self-service analytics for stakeholder clients
• Provide actionable insights for future release and DLC development using standard business KPIs along with in-game telemetry events

- 0-2 years of experience
- Apply knowledge of machine learning techniques and concepts, including the design and implementation of advanced artificial intelligence, computational algorithms, and data science techniques.
- Participate in and lead the running of experiments and documentation of results in technical or research whitepapers.
- Communicates data findings to both business and IT leaders to influence how an organization approaches and meets business challenges of an evolving customer base and changing marketplace, using strong business acumen.
- Collaborates with database engineers and other scientists to develop, refine, and scale data management and analytics procedures, systems, workflows, best practices, and other issues.
- Conduct statistical modeling and experiment design, test and validate predictive models.
- Conducts scalable data research, on and off the cloud.
- Develop custom algorithms to solve analytical problems with data sets.
- Implement automated processes for scaling models.
- Build and maintain data pipelines.",3.7,"Brickred
3.7","Redmond, WA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
385,"Data Scientist, Analytics-Remote Presence",$108k-$173k (Glassdoor Est.),"Facebook's mission is to give people the power to build community and bring the world closer together. Through our family of apps and services, we're building a different kind of company that connects billions of people around the world, gives them ways to share what matters most to them, and helps bring people closer together. Whether we're creating new products or helping a small business expand its reach, people at Facebook are builders at heart. Our global teams are constantly iterating, solving problems, and working together to empower people around the world to build community and connect in meaningful ways. Together, we can help people build stronger communities - we're just getting started.

Messenger remote presence infra team powers audio and video calling for millions of users. This is a real time calling infrastructure for Messenger, Instagram, Workchat and Portal. We are looking for Data Scientists with deep knowledge in infrastructure systems to join us.Some of the key questions you will be working on: Systematic understanding of media stack of infrastructure with data, quantify media quality and explore how media quality affect user engagement; improving networking stack and working on cutting edge technology to make remote experience more real time and fun. With this role, you can learn a lot of skills to make you an awesome DS: dive deep into tech stack of infra, experimentation (A/B testing), operational support. There is a good balance between diving deep on technical side as well as influencing engineering leaders on this role - data scientists are the key partner to deliver insights and uncover opportunities and drive engineering roadmap on the team. Team is based in Bellevue.
Build long term product vision and strategy and scope out the area for the team
Generate product ideas that affects millions of users to connect real time
Understand the complex E2E real time infrastructure system and identify the bottlenecks and opportunities
Build and validate the hypothesis of product ideas and infrastructure improvements
Leverage data to inform the right business decision, such as designing how to evaluate the product performance and whether they should be launched
5+ years of hands-on data science experience, Data analysis skill, willing to get your hands dirty with data
Expert knowledge of SQL, Python, R
Experience on working with multiple cross functional partners and influence decision making based on data
Experience initiating and drive projects to completion with minimal guidance
Experimentation- AB testing
Educational background in Computer Science, Math, Physics, Engineering, or related quantitative field
Expert in experimentation
Experience with large data sets and distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop)
Exposure to large scale infrastructure systems, comfortable with technical discussions
Facebook is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law.Facebook is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.",4.5,"Facebook
4.5","Bellevue, WA",-1,10000+ Employees,2004,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
386,Data Scientist,$68k-$112k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description

At Optiv, we’re on a mission to help our clients make their businesses more secure. We’re one of the fastest growing companies in a truly essential industry.

In your role at Optiv, you’ll be inspired by a team of the brightest business and technical minds in cyber security. We are passionate champions for our clients, and know from experience that the best solutions for our clients’ needs come from working hard together. As part of our team, your voice matters, and you will do important work that has impact, on people, businesses and nations. Our industry and our company move fast, and you can be sure that you will always have room to learn and grow. We’re proud of our team and the important work we do to build confidence for a more connected world.

Job Description

The primary goal of the Data Scientist will be to help drive Optiv’s data analytics further into predictive and prescriptive realms. This role will work closely with the business intelligence team, providing expertise in data science concepts to improve overall company predictability.

Key Responsibilities:
Analyze large amounts of data and develop statistical models to find patterns and solve problems that will help drive strategic business decisions including but not limited to:
Predicting financial outcomes leveraging a predictive model
Developing nuanced customer segmentation that will inform go-to-market strategies
Analyzing purchase patterns to predict cross-sell / up-sell opportunities
Analyzing customer data to predict indicators for churn and growth opportunities
Quantifying customer lifetime value to inform risk/reward decisions
Identifying and leveraging internal signals in the data to help inform services capacity decisions
Identify and lead data integrity projects
Train members of the business intelligence team in data science tools and techniques
~10% of time free to experiment with the data and test hypotheses
Qualifications

Required Qualifications
Highly analytical mind with a passion for conducting complex data analysis
Strong quantitative skills and ability to translate analysis to insight
Bachelor’s Degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering or similar
Expertise in common data science toolkits and programming languages, including R & Python
Proficiency in using query languages such as SQL
Demonstrated experience applying data science methods to real-world data problems
Demonstrated analytical aptitude and mastery of data analysis & visualization tools
Ability to prioritize and manage through ambiguity with limited supervision
Preferred Qualifications
Master’s degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering or similar
2+ years’ recent experience applying data science methods in B2B setting
Experience with Domo, Tableau or similar BI tool
Experience in the cyber security industry
#LI-BL1

Additional Information

Why you'll love it here:

If you are seeking a culture that supports growth, fosters success and moves the industry forward, find your place at Optiv! As a market-leading provider of cyber security solutions, Optiv has the most comprehensive ecosystem of security products and partners to deliver unparalleled services. Our rich and successful history with our clients is based on trust, serving more than 12,000 clients of varying sizes and industries, including commercial, government and education. We have the proven expertise to plan, build, and run successful security programs across Risk Management, Cyber Digital Transformation, Threat Management, Security Operations ? Managed Services and Identity and Data Management. Optiv remains committed to championing Diversity, Equality and Inclusion within our organization and throughout the industry.

With Optiv you can expect:

• Work/life balance. We offer ""Recharge"", a flexible, time-off program that encourages eligible employees to take the time they need to recharge

• Professional training resources, including tuition reimbursement

• Creative problem-solving and the ability to tackle unique, complex projects

• Volunteer Opportunities. ""Optiv Chips In"" encourages employees to volunteer and engage with their teams and communities.

• The ability and technology necessary to productively work remote/from home (where applicable).

Optiv is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants for employment will be considered without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, status as an individual with a disability, veteran status, or any other basis protected by federal, state, or local law.",2.8,"Optiv
2.8","Overland Park, KS",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2015,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
387,Data Scientist,-1,"Join a thriving company that is changing the way cancer care is delivered for millions of patients around the country. Recently spun off from an internationally renowned research and treatment hospital, AccessHope understands that cancer doesn’t play by the rules, so we don’t either. We are an agile innovative brand that’s backed by a founding member of the National Cancer Center Network. Now, we’re joining forces with employers to bring state-of-the-art cancer expertise to their employees and give patients access to the latest developments in precision medicine, genetic risk assessment and clinical trials, regardless of where they live. The goal? To dramatically improve care, outcomes and value during cancer treatment.

It’s a revolutionary new model – and we’re looking for revolutionary thinkers to join us.

A data scientist is someone who knows how to extract meaning from and interpret data, which requires both tools and methods from statistics and machine learning, as well as being human.

Role & Responsibility

The Data Scientist is responsible for advising the business on the potential of data, to provide new insights into the business's mission, and through the use of advanced statistical analysis, data mining, and data visualization techniques, to create solutions that enable enhanced business performance.

The Data Scientist functions include:
Undertaking data collection, pre-processing and analysis
Building models to address business problems
Presenting information using data visualization techniques
Identify valuable data sources and automate collection processes
Analyze large amounts of information to discover trends and patterns
Skills
Programming
Statistics
Data Wrangling
Data Visualization & Communication
Data Intuition
Machine Learning (algorithms
Requirements
Minimum 3 years’ experience as a Data Scientist or Data Analyst
Experience in data mining
Understanding of machine-learning and operations research
Knowledge of R, SQL and Python; familiarity with Scala, Java or C++ is an asset
Experience with in-depth rate development templates, risk score analyses, trend analyses, cost management/financial initiatives, back-end technical development and programming
Experience using business intelligence tools (e.g. Tableau, Power BI) and data frameworks (e.g. Hadoop)
Analytical mind and business acumen
Problem-solving aptitude
Excellent communication and presentation skills
BSc/BA in Computer Science, Engineering or relevant field; graduate degree in Data Science or other quantitative field is preferred
Healthcare experience a plus, but not required.
Education
BSc/BA in Computer Science, Engineering or relevant field; graduate degree in Data Science or other quantitative field is preferred
Healthcare experience a plus, but not required.",1.0,"AccessHope
1.0","Irwindale, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
388,Data Scientist,-1,"dv01 is the world's first end-to-end data management, reporting and analytics platform offering loan level transparency and insight into lending markets, making them more efficient for institutional investors and safer for the world. In a nutshell, we're doing our part to prevent a repeat of 2008.

As the technological hub between lenders and capital markets, dv01 provides all parties with unprecedented data transparency, insight, and analytics. dv01 has integrated data from 16 marketplace lending platforms, including LendingClub, Prosper, and SoFi, and multiple mortgage servicers. To date, dv01 has provided reporting and analytics on $3.4 trillion in notional across 54 million loans and over 560 securitizations spanning consumer unsecured, mortgages, point of sales, small business, and student loans.

To get a better idea of what a year at dv01 looks like, check out our 2019 Year in Review page here: https://dv01.co/2019-year-in-review/. If that looks like fun to you, get in touch because we'd love to hear from you.

YOU WILL:
Develop and improve upon the human-in-the-loop machine learning algorithms that drive our products and tools
Work to understand our business at scale, partnering with teams across dv01 to generate insights and build tools to improve dv01 products
Identify, create, and drive solutions to inefficiencies at dv01
Partner with Infrastructure to automate and scale up processes in structured manner
YOU ARE:

An experienced data scientist. You have 3-6+ years of professional industry experience, where algorithms and large datasets have been your best friend. You are an expert in R and experienced in SQL. Prior experience with a programming language like Scala or Java and a good understanding of finance are both a plus.

Someone who likes tackling complex and amorphous problems. You enjoy diving head first into a pool of data and surfacing only after determining as many insights and solutions you can derive from it.

A strong communicator. You are passionate about sharing your analyses with others. You have the ability to clearly and effectively communicate an intricate problem or solution to anyone in the room.

Passionate about data and statistics. You studied math, finance or engineering at the graduate or undergraduate level and have a solid grasp of applied statistics. Prior experience in data science, software engineering, data engineering, consulting or research is a plus.

BENEFITS & PERKS:


Almost 100% paid benefits (medical/dental/vision)

Weekly $100 lunch allowance

Free premium Equinox membership

Unlimited PTO and remote days

Company outings (virtual activities, physically safe/local picnics, Team Qi Gong, Book Club, etc.)

Casual, collaborative culture

dv01 is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants and employees will receive consideration for employment opportunities without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, national origin or ancestry, citizenship, veteran status, membership in the uniformed services, disability, genetic information or any other basis protected by applicable law.",5.0,"dv01
5.0",Remote,-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
389,Statistician (Data Scientist) *12 month Roster* *Direct Hire*,$69k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"The U.S. Department of the Treasury has a distinguished history dating back to the founding of our nation. As the steward of U.S. economic and financial systems, Treasury is a major and influential leader in today's global economy. We have over 100,000 employees across the country and around the world. Come Join the Department of the Treasury and Invest in Tomorrow.
See Other Information for Locations
Positions are to be filled in the Large Business & International (LB&I), Data Solutions division.
Eight (8) positions are to be filled in any of the following locations:
Birmingham, AL
Fayetteville, AR
Little Rock, AR
Phoenix, AZ
El Monte, CA
Glendale, CA
Laguna Niguel, CA
Los Angeles, CA
Long Beach, CA
Oakland, CA
Sacramento, CA
San Diego, CA
San Francisco, CA
San Jose, CA
Santa Ana, CA
Lakewood, CO
Hartford, CT
New Haven, CT
Norwalk, CT
Washington, DC
Newark, DE
Miami, FL
Ft. Myers, FL
Jacksonville, FL
Maitland, FL
Plantation, FL
Tampa, FL
West Palm Beach, FL
Atlanta, GA
Honolulu, HI
Des Moines, IA
Chicago, IL
Downers Grove, IL
Schiller Park, IL
Springfield, IL
Indianapolis, IN
Wichita, KS
Louisville, KY
New Orleans, LA
Boston, MA
Brockton, MA
Stoneham, MA
Southborough, MA
Baltimore, MD
Lanham-Seabrook, MD
Rockville, MD
Ann Arbor, MI
Clinton Township, MI
Detroit, MI
Farmington Hills, MI
Flint, MI
Grand Rapids, MI
Pontiac, MI
Bloomington, MN
Chesterfield, MO
Lee's Summit, MO
Charlotte, NC
Greensboro, NC
Raleigh, NC
Omaha, NE
Edison, NJ
Iselin, NJ
Mountainside, NJ
Paterson, NJ
Las Vegas, NV
Albany, NY
Bethpage, NY
Buffalo, NY
New York, NY
Rochester, NY
Cincinnati, OH
Columbus, OH
Independence, OH
Oklahoma City, OK
Tulsa, OK
Portland, OR
Philadelphia, PA
Pittsburgh, PA
King Of Prussia, PA
Guaynabo, PR
Warwick, RI
Franklin, TN
Memphis, TN
Nashville, TN
Austin, TX
Farmers Branch, TX
Fort Worth, TX
Houston, TX
San Antonio, TX
Ogden, UT
Salt Lake City, UT
Norfolk, VA
Richmond, VA
Vienna, VA
Seattle, WA
Milwaukee, WI
Waukesha, WI
Kearneysville, WV
Martinsburg, WV
WHAT DOES A DATA SCIENTIST DO? The Data Scientist utilizes advanced analytical, statistical, and computer programming skills to develop data- driven solutions to difficult business challenges. As a data scientist, you are responsible for conducting data-centric projects to provide insight and informed decisions for mission- oriented programs of the Internal Revenue Service (IRS), which may impact multiple program segments, divisions, the Service, or segments of the taxpayer population. This is accomplished by utilizing a wide range of technical competencies such as statistics and machine learning, coding languages, data wrangling, and reporting and visualization techniques. The Data Scientist may lead team or cross functional projects, and will apply critical thinking, problem solving and ability to communicate complex analysis to advance the use of data-driven decision making in IRS operations.

WHAT IS THE LARGE BUSINESS AND INTERNATIONAL (LB&I) DIVISION OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE? The Large Business and International (LB&I) business unit provides service and enforcement activities to support tax compliance of businesses and related entities with assets of $10 million or more, as well as small U.S. businesses engaged in international, U.S. citizens abroad, and foreign persons and businesses with a U.S. tax requirement.
As a Data Scientist, you will:
Serve as a technical expert with responsibility for the initiation, planning, implementation, controlling, modifying and executing of all or part of an entire project, including such tasks as formulation of workload estimates for program segments, specification of the methodology to be used, preparation of appropriate specifications and procedures, and review of computer systems specifications and materials and instructions needed for assuring the adequacy of the project’s design and objectives.
Explore novel methods of retrieving data and develop innovative recommendations to management and senior leadership as a means for making data driven decisions such as modification of processes and policies. Review, evaluate, validate, and document the results of the findings.
Assist the supervisor in determining the scope, goals and schedules for future programs in the Office. Collaborate with business or technology partners to understand business needs, identify opportunities, and develop and implement analytical solutions.
Identify and assess relevant data sources’ validity and reliability to meet project needs. Collate, clean, transform, analyze, and integrate structured and unstructured data from various sources in preparation for analysis.
Apply statistical methods and concepts including data mining, statistical theory and research procedures to test hypotheses using structured and unstructured data. Develop data product solutions to improve customer experiences, anomaly detection, and business outcomes. Develop proofs of concept or demonstrations to evaluate feasibility of project solutions and recommend visualization strategies.
Document project work and review deliverables for validity, reliability and timeliness. Communicate analytic solutions to technical and non-technical stakeholders, including during executive- level and/or cross-agency meetings, in a clear and effective manner using oral and written communications.
Maintain knowledge of state-of-the-art innovations in data science from both academic and industry sources and identify opportunities for implementation. Engage in general professional development to improve knowledge of IRS processes/programs.
Apply computer based mathematical/statistical techniques using software. Lead or participate in statistical projects or studies in survey sampling (design and estimation), modeling, or statistical research. Apply knowledge of programming/coding language (i.e., SQL, SAS, SPSS, RStudio) to develop scripts or applications.
Act as a troubleshooter in resolving bottlenecks at any step in a project by identifying and proposing solutions; this may include coordination with other project team members or stakeholders to mitigate issues.

WHERE CAN I FIND OUT MORE ABOUT OTHER IRS CAREERS? If you want to find out more about IRS careers, visit us on the web at www.jobs.irs.gov
#LI-POST
You must meet the following requirements by the closing date of this announcement
BASIC QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS:

GS-1530 Statistician All Grades:
You must have a Bachelor's degree that included 15 semester hours in statistics (or in mathematics and statistics, provided at least 6 semester hours were in statistics), and 9 additional semester hours in one or more of the following: physical or biological sciences, medicine, education, or engineering; or in the social sciences including demography, history, economics, social welfare, geography, international relations, social or cultural anthropology, health sociology, political science, public administration, psychology, etc. Credit toward meeting statistical course requirements should be given for courses in which 50 percent of the course content appears to be statistical methods, e.g., courses that included studies in research methods in psychology or economics such as tests and measurements or business cycles, or courses in methods of processing mass statistical data such as tabulating methods or electronic data processing. OR
Combination of education and experience -- courses as shown above, plus appropriate experience or additional education. The experience should have included a full range of professional statistical work such as (a) sampling, (b) collecting, computing, and analyzing statistical data, and (c) applying statistical techniques such as measurement of central tendency, dispersion, skewness, sampling error, simple and multiple correlation, analysis of variance, and tests of significance.
GS-13 LEVEL: You must have one year of specialized experience at a level of difficulty and responsibility equivalent to the GS-12 grade level in the Federal service. Specialized experience for this position includes all of the following:
Experience applying project management principles on a data science project
Experience planning and executing a variety of data science and/or analytics projects.
Experience using data mining process models (such as CRISP-DM, SEMMA, etc.,) to design and execute data science project.
Experience preparing and analyzing structured and unstructured datasets to explorations and evaluating data science centric models.
Experience working with multiple data types and formats as a part of a data science project.
Experience applying a range of analytic approaches, including (but not limited to) machine learning, text analytics, and natural language processing; graph theory, link analysis and optimization models; complex adaptive systems; and/or deep learning neural networks that are part of the exploration.
Experience coding in various programming languages (such as R, Python, SQL, or JAVA) to conduct various phases of data science projects.
Experience creating and querying different datastores and architectures (such as Sybase, Oracle, and open-source databases) to work with various types of data as part of the data science project.
Experience using tools for data visualization (graphs, tables, charts, etc.,) and end-user business intelligence.
-The experience may have been gained in the public sector, private sector or Volunteer Service. One year of experience refers to full-time work; part-time work is considered on a prorated basis.
-To ensure full credit for your work experience, please indicate dates of employment by month/year, and indicate number of hours worked per week, on your resume.",3.6,"Internal Revenue Service
3.6","Farmers Branch, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1862,Government,Federal Agencies,Government,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
390,Data Scientist,-1,"Philadelphia, Pennsylvania
Skills : Oracle,research, ETL, SQL,queries
Description :

Industry: IT - Data & Analytics

Job title: Data Scientist

Location: Philadelphia PA

Duration: 8 months

Qualification and Required Skills:

Provides advanced professional input to complex Data Science and ETL assignments/projects.
Responsible for the research, extraction and analysis of data. Evaluates and writes reports. May research and analyze algorithms.
Provides statistical data trends to business partners such as medical management and underwriting. May also assist in the designing and implementation of systems to analyze and report findings.
Combines IT capabilities with advanced clinical knowledge to determine trends, cost/benefit ratios, and forecasting of costs, management, and economics. Supports and provides direction to more junior professionals.
Works autonomously, only requiring “expert” level technical support from others. Exercises judgment in the evaluation, selection, and adaptation of both standard and complex techniques and procedures.
Utilizes in-depth professional knowledge and acumen to develop models and procedures, and monitor trends, within Data Science. Builds and maintains ETL processes. Monitors running processes and recommends continual improvements.
Oracle,research, ETL, SQL,queries",4.1,"Collabera
4.1","Philadelphia, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,1991,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
391,Data Scientist,$63k-$107k (Glassdoor Est.),"Secure our Nation, Ignite your Future

ManTech is seeking a well-qualified data analyst to help support our current SED contract with the Marine Corps System Command. ManTech is responsible for assisting our Government customer ensure that material solutions developed or acquired by Marine Corps Systems Command are system engineered, integrated, interoperable, and certified to provide the warfighter with equipment required to accomplish their mission.

The role of a Data Analyst (DA) is to provide direct, specific support to the Chief Data Officer (CDO) in the definition, development, and implementation of a data management plan (DMP). A DMP provides a unified approach for modernizing management of acquisition data and the DA directly supports this intent. Acquisition data is not unified so the acquisition data landscape is not understood. A DA will help the CDO manage baselines at the enterprise, design resiliency and confidence in our equipment, and engage in efficient engineering and acquisition practices, especially related information technology (IT). The DA will elevate interest in and begin using artificial intelligence (AI) to unify data, which will enable data-enriched force projection, optimizes technology insertion and, ultimately, increase warfighting readiness in the combined physical and information domain. The DA will also focus analysis on the Defense Industrial supply chain. This job involves assisting the organization adhere to new policy, regulations, and processes to ensure the fidelity of acquisition.

Job Duties:

Responsibilities include, but are not limited to:

· Design and maintain data systems and databases, including fixing coding errors and other data-related problems

· Use statistical tools to interpret data sets, paying particular attention to trends and patterns that could be valuable for diagnostic and predictive analytics efforts

· Establish processes for data mining, reorganizing mined data, and preserving nuggets mined from the data

· Develop processes and practices for organizing new data into a format readable by either human or machine

· Develop processes and practices for reorganizing legacy data into a format readable by either human or machine

· Create documentation that allows stakeholders to understand the data analysis process to enable duplication

· Collaborate with technical partners and organizational leaders to identify opportunities for process improvements, recommend system modifications, and develop policies for data governance

· Provide research and reporting support to customer Senior Leadership, supporting staff, and stakeholders

· Communicate, coordinate, share information, and work closely with customer components

· Report on underlying patterns of behavior by conducting detailed analysis of incidents, threats and risks and

· Facilitate establishing and maintaining a data repository of analyses and assessments

· Communicate, coordinate, share information, and work closely with customer components and stakeholders

· Track and manage internal and external requests for information (RFIs) and requests for analysis (RFAs) for the organization and produce weekly, monthly, quarterly, and annual performance metrics reports

Security Clearance Requirements:

Must possess an active SECRET clearance.

Degrees:
Requires Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math or equivalent. 5-7 years of relevant work experience.

Desired Skills:

· Previous experience using R, Matlab, Python Scikit-learn or other statistical modeling packages, with a focus on machine learning; experience with NLP a plus.

· Previous experience developing production systems for processing large volumes of structured and unstructured data in Java, Python or similar technology stack.

· Previous experience with Hadoop technology stack (Map reduce, HIVE/PIG, etc. Excellent verbal and written communication skills.

· Strong team player, capable of working collaboratively in customer teams.

ManTech International Corporation, as well as its subsidiaries proactively fulfills its role as an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, national origin, marital status, physical or mental disability, status as a Disabled Veteran, Recently Separated Veteran, Active Duty Wartime or Campaign Badge Veteran, Armed Forces Services Medal, or any other characteristic protected by law.

If you require a reasonable accommodation to apply for a position with ManTech through its online applicant system, please contact ManTech's Corporate EEO Department at (703) 218-6000. ManTech is an affirmative action/equal opportunity employer - minorities, females, disabled and protected veterans are urged to apply. ManTech's utilization of any external recruitment or job placement agency is predicated upon its full compliance with our equal opportunity/affirmative action policies. ManTech does not accept resumes from unsolicited recruiting firms. We pay no fees for unsolicited services.

If you are a qualified individual with a disability or a disabled veteran, you have the right to request an accommodation if you are unable or limited in your ability to use or access http://www.mantech.com/careers/Pages/careers.aspx as a result of your disability. To request an accommodation please click careers@mantech.com and provide your name and contact information.",4.2,"ManTech International Corporation
4.2","Stafford, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1968,Company - Public,Research & Development,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
392,Content Contributor : Statistics/Data Science,-1,"**At this time, we can only accept applicants that are over the age of 18 and are currently located in one of the following states: CA, FL, GA, IL, MD, MA, MI, NJ, NY, OH, OR, PA, TN, TX, VA and WA.**

Hello, World! Codecademy has helped over 45 million people from around the world upgrade their careers with engaging, accessible, and flexible education on programming and data skills. We provide over 200 hands-on interactive lessons ranging from Python to R to Javascript and everything in between. Our learners have gone on to start companies, new jobs, and new lives thanks to what they've learned with Codecademy, and we're thrilled to be working to take that impact to the next level.

Codecademy was started in 2011 by two college students in a dorm room at Columbia that were frustrated by the huge gap between education and employment. A few years later, we are a rapidly growing, diverse team of 100+ in SoHo, NYC. We've raised over $40m in venture capital funding from top investors including Union Square Ventures, Kleiner Perkins, Naspers, Y Combinator, and more.

If you want to help build a business that impacts tens of millions of people each year and helps them lead better lives, join us!

Codecademy is looking for a knowledgeable programmer or instructor to help write content for the statistics and hypothesis testing sections of our Data Science Career path, which is primarily taught in Python. The Catalog Content Contributor works directly with the Codecademy Curriculum team to author interactive lessons, quizzes, and projects to help turn a high-level syllabus into reality. This is a paid, remote, part-time position.

WHAT YOU'LL DO
Apply educational techniques and philosophies to design and author interactive lessons, quizzes, and projects.
Think pedagogically to break down technical concepts into digestible exercises.
Collaborate with Codecademy's Curriculum team to craft learning outcomes and build a compelling learner experience.
WHAT YOU'LL NEED
A strong understanding of Statistics and statistical theory relating to summary statistics, data transformations, and hypothesis testing
Experience in Python and common Python frameworks for Data Science, such as Pandas, NumPy, Matplotlib, and Scikit-learn
Professional or academic experience as a Data Scientist or Statistician
Experience with formal or informal teaching
A strong command of the English language
WHAT WILL MAKE YOU STAND OUT
Experience with statistical programming
Experience using the Codecademy platform
Experience writing educational content that reaches a wide audience in a digital format
Equal Employment Opportunity

Codecademy is committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants regardless of race, color, religion, creed, age, national origin or ancestry, ethnicity, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, military or veteran status, or any other category protected by federal, state, or local law. As an equal opportunities employer, we recognize that diversity is a positive attribute and we welcome the differences and benefits that a diverse culture brings.

This is a part-time, remote position. You can expect anywhere from ~10-30 hours of work per week, with the freedom to work wherever and at whatever times you want. You will be compensated (paid) bi-weekly.

**At this time, we can only accept applicants that are over the age of 18 and are currently located in one of the following states: CA, FL, GA, IL, MD, MA, MI, NJ, NY, OH, OR, PA, TN, TX, VA and WA.**

At Codecademy, we are committed to teaching people the skills they need to upgrade their careers. Codecademy aims to educate a richly diverse demographic of learners with our product and in order to accomplish this, we believe our team should reflect that rich diversity. Our company celebrates diversity in all of its forms-- race, gender, color, national origin, marital status, sexuality, religion, veteran status, age, ability, disability status-- and works to create an inclusive workplace where people of all backgrounds and beliefs are empowered to better their futures.",3.5,"Codecademy
3.5",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Education Training Services,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
393,Data Scientist I,$52k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"LOC_ROBERTS-Roberts Ctr Pediatric Research Req ID: 67961

Shift: Days

Employment Status: Regular - Full Time
Job Summary
The Tsui Laboratory at the Children’s Hospital of Philadelphia is seeking a data scientist to conduct research on natural language processing (NLP) and machine learning (ML). The Tsui Laboratory studies methods of biomedical informatics, predictive modeling, machine learning, natural language processing, signal processing, mobile Heath (mHealth), and real-time learning production decision-support systems. We translate research to practice by applying our models to domains of clinical informatics, population informatics and precision medicine through comprehensive data-driven approach using electronic health record (EHR) data, including structured (e.g., diagnosis, meds, etc.), unstructured (narrative notes), high-frequency waveform data (e.g., ECG, EEG), time-series data, genomic data, and environmental/community data. The mission at Tsui Lab is to integrate various data types and develop end-to-end real-time clinical decision support for direct impact to hospital staff, patients and public health by decreasing costs, mortality and morbidity and increasing efficiency and quality of care.

The position of Data Scientist 1 will be responsible for developing innovative NLP methods (e.g., deep neural networks) applied to narrative clinical notes, social media, and published articles, and for conducting independent research. The Data Scientist 1 will report to Dr. Rich Tsui who is the Director of Tsui Lab.
Job Responsibilities
1. Implement/Develop NLP and/ML algorithms
Retrieve clinical data from Epic EHR system and relevant databases
Identify clinical findings and social factors through NLP and ML
Attend routine lab meetings and ad-hoc hospital IT meetings
Provide code and corresponding documents on a regular basis
Required Education and Experience
Required Education: Bachelors in Analytics, Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or a related field.
Preferred Education, Experience & Cert/Lic
Preferred Education: Masters in Analytics, Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or a related field. Non-degree graduate coursework such as a graduate certificate in Analytics, Statistics, or Data Science preferred.

Preferred Experience: At least one (1) year of experience with progressively more complex data science, applied statistics, machine learning, or mathematical modeling projects
Additional Technical Requirements
• Innovative thinking • Strong communication and organizational skills
• Experience with relational SQL (and NoSQL) databases: Oracle, Postgres (and/or MongoDB).
• Experience with open-sourced tools.
• Experience with programming languages: Java, Python, R, etc.

Preferred:

o Experience database management and queries
o Experience developing NLP and/or ML tools.

All CHOP employees who work in a patient building or who provide patient care are required to receive an annual influenza vaccine unless they are granted a medical or religious exemption.

Children's Hospital of Philadelphia is committed to providing a safe and healthy environment for its patients, family members, visitors and employees. In an effort to achieve this goal, employment at Children's Hospital of Philadelphia, other than for positions with regularly scheduled hours in New Jersey, is contingent upon an attestation that the job applicant does not use tobacco products.

Children's Hospital of Philadelphia is an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, religion, national or ethnic origin, disability or protected veteran status.

VEVRAA Federal Contractor/Seeking priority referrals for protected veterans. Please contact our hiring official with any referrals or questions.

CHOP Careers Contact

Talent Acquisition

2716 South Street, 6th Floor

Philadelphia, PA 19146",3.7,"CHOP
3.7","Philadelphia, PA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1855,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
394,Data Scientist,-1,"Work experience as a Python Developer
Expertise in at least one popular Python framework (like Django, Flask or Pyramid)
Knowledge of object-relational mapping (ORM)
Familiarity with front-end technologies (like JavaScript and HTML5)
Analyze Python code and convert same into business rule document.
Understanding of Actuarial computation & functions and convert same into business rule document.
Coordinate with internal teams to understand user requirements and provide technical solutions
Write effective, scalable code
Develop back-end components to improve responsiveness and overall performance
Integrate user-facing elements into applications
Test and debug programs
Improve functionality of existing systems
Implement security and data protection solutions
Assess and prioritize feature requests
Â
Â",-1,TransReach,"San Francisco, CA",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
395,Principal Data Scientist - Manufacturing Technology,$123k-$195k (Glassdoor Est.),"Climb to new heights on your journey when you start Defining Possible with Northrop Grumman. Enjoy a purposeful career in aeronautics that is crucial to the way we connect and protect our world across land, sea, and air. Bring your experience and take advantage of this opportunity to discover how you can start to push past possible and achieve your goals today. Enjoy a diverse, collaborative environment with professionals across the nation ready to help launch your career.

Our Aeronautics Systems sector is seeking a Principal Data Scientist to join our team of qualified, diverse individuals. This position will support our Advanced Manufacturing Technology & Innovation development team and will be located in Palmdale, CA.

Our organization is currently working to build a revolutionary kind of production factory, an IIoT Smart Factory, and we need your help to shape the foundation! As a member of the Advanced Manufacturing Technology & Innovation team, you will identify, develop and implement data analytics, and machine learning technologies for production within our Advanced Manufacturing Technology & Innovation organization. The role will define, develop, and design manufacturing concepts and processes for production applications of manufacturing technologies with a focus on digital manufacturing technologies and applications including, but not limited to, point of use work instructions, industrial internet of things (IIoT), and data analytics solutions for manufacturing processes.

The position requires a strong understanding of computer and database systems as well as data analytics workflows. You will need to be familiar with data ETL processes and standard machine learning techniques. The position requires strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations. Strong written and oral communication skills are required as the position involves extensive interfacing with internal and external customers, program offices, engineering disciplines, and industry suppliers. You must have a proven ability to drive business results with your data-based insights. The role will require the individual to be comfortable working with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams. The desired candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes.

Essential Job Functions:
Develop analytical models to support manufacturing operations
Perform in-depth data analysis and report findings
Build and support dashboards / visuals
Support ETL Pipelines as needed
Assess new technologies and software platforms to assist in development of IIoT capability
Support project management and planning as required
Communicate advanced concepts and information in an understandable manner for audiences of varying levels of competency. Continuous interface with stakeholders and customers is required.
Support and enforce the Agile methodology and framework used by the project team
Keeps current on advances in the field of IIoT with demonstrating strategic big picture thinking.

Qualifications:

Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree in STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, Math) with 5 years' experience with information systems, data analytics and/or computer programming; OR Master's Degree in STEM with 3 years' experience with information systems, data analytics and/or computer programming; OR PhD STEM
Bachelor's Degree (non-STEM) with 7 years' of experience with information system, data analytics and/or computer programming; OR Master's Degree (non-STEM) with 5 years' experience with information systems, data analytics and/or computer programming; OR PhD (non-STEM) with 2 years' experience with information systems, data analytics and/or computer programming;
Experience with one or more: Python, R, C, C++, Java, JavaScript
Experience with querying databases and defining schemas (MS SQL)
Experience with high volume production ETL pipelines
Strong problem solving skills with an emphasis on production environments
Experience working with and creating data architectures
Experience manipulating data using pandas, NumPy, or similar
Experience building analytical models using scikit, SciPy, or similar
Experience with version control software such as Git
Experience with data visualization tools using Tableau or similar
Experience with Command Line / Terminal scripting
Ability to perform data analysis and report findings
Proven ability to learn and master new technologies and techniques
Extensive knowledge of MS Office Products
Self-starter who is able to work with minimal direction
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a DOD Secret or Top Secret Clearance as well as Program Special access within a reasonable period of time, as determined by the company to meet its business needs
Ability to travel 10-15% of the time
Preferred Qualifications:
STEM Degree (Science, Technical, Engineering, or Mathematical)
Experience in a fabrication and/or assembly manufacturing environment
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks
Experience using Kepware and/or Thingworx to develop IIoT technologies
Experience with Javascript, HTML / CSS to support IIoT dashboards and visuals
Experience with machine communication protocols such as MQTT, MTConnect, OPC
Experience with modern ETL / Big Data tools such as Kafka, Nifi, and Spark
Experience building system architectures using visual tools such as Visio
Experience working in an Agile environment
Experience in the development, capture, and/or execution of R&D technology initiatives and experience in Digital Manufacturing technology applications
Familiarity with DFARS-NIST-800-171 specification for cyber security
Current active Secret or Top Secret clearance preferred
Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www.northropgrumman.com/EEO. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.",3.9,"Northrop Grumman
3.9","Palmdale, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1939,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
396,Data Scientist,-1,"Trace Data is developing a ground breaking product to help companies monitor and secure their data. We're integrating the world of security, observability and connectivity. We're looking for people with a strong background or interest in building successful products and systems; you're comfortable in dealing with lots of moving pieces; you have exquisite attention to detail; and love learning new technologies and systems.

As our Data Scientist, you will:
Develop large scale machine learning algorithms that support monitoring, privacy and security capabilities.
Own the machine learning algorithms that power core features in the product such as the identification of sensitive data, automated data classification and anomaly detection using unsupervised and deep learning techniques ranging from computer vision algorithms for pattern recognition to variational auto-encoders to NLP.
Design, build, and launch efficient & reliable new data models, schemas and pipelines to enable analysis, modeling and machine learning.
Partner with product managers, designers, and engineers to prototype and productize data mining features.
Advise on best practices and statistical methods for measuring and evaluating experiments.
You may be fit for this role if you:
Have experience of building products from the ground up.
Have a Bachelor's/Master's degree or higher in a technical field such as Computer Science, Statistics, Economics, Operations Research, Math, Physics or Engineering.
Have a deep theoretical understanding of modern machine learning algorithms, statistical models or optimization.
Have experience with data tools such as Python, R, SAS, SQL, etc and strong skills in data analysis, data visualization and engineering.
Have the ability to own your modeling work from model development all the way to launching into production with minimal help from engineers.
Have experience with MapReduce, Spark, Hive, HBase, Google BigQuery, BigTable is a plus. Experience ML frameworks like Tensorflow, PyTorch, Spark MLlib, XGBoost, and Scikit-Learn is a plus.
You're a strong communicators; explaining complex technical concepts to product managers, data analysts, and other engineers shouldn't be a problem for you.
About Trace Data

Trace Data is an early stage startup founded in 2019 and headquartered in Oakland, California. We're backed by top tier investors including Accel and Kleiner Perkins.

We're a highly cross-functional organization and encourage as much collaboration as possible. We have a culture of transparency that we carry through to internal communication, ensuring everyone has the information they need to make great decisions. We value humility, respect and diversity. We look for people who are curious, want to grow and have impact every day.

Trace Data provides equal employment opportunities (EEO). All applicants are considered without regards to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, or sexual orientation.",1.0,"Trace Data
1.0","Oakland, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
397,Data Scientist,$86k-$138k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Data Scientist will derive, validate, and analyze large data sets, and develop novel predictive models using statistical techniques and machine learning, with a goal of deploying these to impact the delivery of patient care in real-time. The Data Scientist will frequently analyze problems without precedent and/or existing structure within UCSF Health, and address complex problems with an organization-wide scope. He or she will serve as a mentoring resource to advance understanding of data science within the health system. The Data Scientist will develop comprehensive expertise in the predictive modelling module of the Epic Electronic Health Record, and serve as a collaborator and reference for improvement activities involving predictive modelling, implemented in the Epic EHR and outside it. Competitive applicants for this position are data scientists or quantitative analysts who have experience in delivering actionable findings from large data sources. Candidates are ideally fluent in programming languages such as R, SQL, or Python, or other tools used for data manipulation and visualization and have a background in machine learning. Prior relevant work with clinical data, and/or the Epic electronic health record, is favorable but not required. Department Description UCSF Health Informatics provides clinical and informatics leadership to achieve the strategic priorities of UCSF Health, as enabled by technology. Health Informatics is a multidisciplinary team of clinicians and technology professionals that partners with clinical, business, and technology leaders throughout the organization, using information technology to improve the quality, safety, and value of care, and the patient and provider experience, for UCSF and its partner organizations. Required Qualifications Three years experience in positions of increasing responsibility, working with large data-sets and conducting statistical and quantitative modeling, melding analytics with strong programming, data mining, clustering and segmentation Bachelor's degree in health care information technology, computer science, or related area, or equivalent combination of experience / training Strong data and statistical programming skills. e.g. SQL, Python, R, Stata, SAS, SQL, Hadoop, Hive, and/or other large data systems Data scientist with in-depth knowledge and experience with machine learning and predictive analytics, proficiency in R or Python programming languages, or other tools used for data manipulation and visualization, and experience working with data warehouses. In-depth knowledge of all relevant clinical informatics software and systems, and of the highly-complex concepts, principles, policies, methodologies, techniques, best practices, regulations, and standards practices involved with patient care and electronic medical data management in the UC health care system Broadly encompassing and highly in-depth knowledge of machine learning, and deployment of predictive analytics in operational environments. Knowledge of controlled terminology, clinical workflows, user interface optimization, clinical decision support, rules development, data integration and mining, clinical ontologies and adoption of technology. (clinical domain knowledge is preferred but not required, and may be developed or expanded after hiring) Advanced organizational and project management skills, with the ability to lead a team, prioritize tasks, and see projects through from inception to completion on schedule Advanced interpersonal communications skills, to convey highly technical information and instructions to all levels of clinical users in a clear and concise manner, to provide technical support, and to develop and deliver training materials as needed Ability to apply advanced problem-resolution skills to highly complex issues, quickly diagnose problems, and develop, test, and implement appropriate and effective solutions in a timely manner Advanced analytical skills and expertise in documentation and reporting, with the ability to apply metrics, design and run queries, collect and analyze performance data, and produce sophisticated reports and analyses for management use Advanced ability to serve as a technical leader and information resource, and to work collaboratively with senior staff and management across departments, providing advice, counsel, and analysis on issues of policy, functionality, system efficiency, upgrades, business analytics, and industry advances and trends Strong interest in working with health care data and understanding the challenges that face complex health care delivery systems The flexibility to orient and work at all UCSF Health locations Preferred Qualifications Completion of one to two years of undergraduate or graduate level coursework in Statistics Master’s Degree or Doctorate in computer science or related area Background in STATA and/or SAS Prior experience with healthcare data, in particular Epic-derived healthcare data Epic Clarity certification About UCSF At UCSF Health, our mission of innovative patient care, advanced technology and pioneering research is redefining what’s possible for the patients we serve – a promise we share with the professionals who make up our team. Consistently ranked among the top 10 hospitals nationwide by U.S. News & World Report – UCSF Health is committed to providing the most rewarding work experience while delivering the best care available anywhere. In an environment that allows for continuous learning and opportunities for professional growth, UCSF Health offers the ideal atmosphere in which to best use your skills and talents. as seventh in the country – UCSF Health is committed to providing the most rewarding work experience while delivering the best care available anywhere. In an environment that allows for continuous learning and opportunities for professional growth, UCSF Health offers the ideal atmosphere in which to best use your skills and talents. Pride Values UCSF is a diverse community made of people with many skills and talents. We seek candidates whose work experience or community service has prepared them to contribute to our commitment to professionalism, respect, integrity, diversity and excellence – also known as our PRIDE values. In addition to our PRIDE values, UCSF is committed to equity – both in how we deliver care as well as our workforce. We are committed to building a broadly diverse community, nurturing a culture that is welcoming and supportive, and engaging diverse ideas for the provision of culturally competent education, discovery, and patient care. Additional information about UCSF is available at diversity.ucsf.edu Join us to find a rewarding career contributing to improving healthcare worldwide. Equal Employment Opportunity The University of California San Francisco is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran or disabled status, or genetic information. Organization Health Job Code and Payroll Title 006049 CLIN INFORMATICS SPEC 4 Employee Class Career Percentage 100% Location Parnassus Heights (SF) Shift Days Shift Length 8 Hours",4.2,"University of California San Francisco
4.2","San Francisco, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1864,College / University,-1,-1,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
398,"Environmental Scientist, Geologist, or Environmental Engineer - 4 to 6 Years Experience",$55k-$81k (Glassdoor Est.),"Work for an Industry Leader
Outstanding Opportunities
Challenging Projects
Dynamic Work Environment

Langan is an award-winning ENR Top 500 Design Firm that offers integrated engineering and environmental services for both public and private sector clients at sites located throughout the United States and abroad. Langan receives numerous recognitions for its technical expertise as well as its work environment, including “Best Places to Work” by NJBIZ, Zweig Group’s “Hot Firm” and ranked “Best Firm to Work For” in four categories, “Best Places to Work in Pennsylvania” by Best Companies Group and Pittsburgh Business Times “Best Places to Work in Western PA”, “Top Engineering Firm” by both San Francisco Business Times and Silicon Valley Business Journal. Visit our website for more information about our awards and recognitions.

Langan offers its employees opportunities that provide challenge and responsibility within an environment where they can grow and flourish! Join our team of industry leaders and make a difference on some of the most exciting and interesting projects in the field!

Langan has an opening for an Environmental Scientist, Geologist, or Environmental Engineer with 4 to 6 years of related environmental experience in our New Haven, CT office. As the successful candidate, you will be responsible for providing field services for construction and site remediation projects, including performing field tests and collecting field data, monitoring complex construction and remediation projects, compiling daily reports, and preparing written applications, reports, and other documentation for submittal to clients and regulatory agencies.

Job Requirements:
Bachelor's degree in Environmental Engineering, Environmental Science, or related field required, Master's degree preferred;
4 to 6 years of prior related environmental experience;
Knowledge of Connecticut environmental regulations required;
Field experience related to site investigations and remediation projects required;
Office experience related to scheduling, technical report writing and lab coordination;
Demonstrated ability to organize and implement field work, and to provide initial field training to new team members;
Strong attention to detail with excellent analytical, judgment and problem-solving capabilities;
Demonstrated ability to follow direction and work independently, as well as in a team environment;
Excellent verbal and written communication skills, as well as organization and multi-tasking skills;
Working knowledge of computers; AutoCAD, GIS modeling and mapping experience preferred;
Ability to work in the office and the field as necessary;
40-hour OSHA HAZWOPER certification and current OSHA 8-hour refresher required;
Possess a valid driver’s license in good standing and reliable transportation for remote job site locations; and
Availability to work Monday through Friday with occasional evenings and weekends.
We offer competitive compensation packages; full-time employment company paid medical, dental, and vision coverage; life insurance, short- and long-term disability insurance; 401(k)/Roth with company match; extensive training; buddy and mentoring programs; employee referral and professional license bonuses; educational reimbursement; and much more!

Equal Opportunity Employer",4.2,"Langan Engineering and Environmental Services
4.2","New Haven, CT",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1970,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
399,Data Scientist,-1,"Viola AI is looking for experts in data science and machine learning. Python, R, and bash scripting is sufficient but we like to see skills in leveraging adjacent warehouses to build data driven applications. In particular, MySQL, Redis, ElasticSearch et al. Knowledge of the AWS s3 and Hadoop ecosystem is a plus, too. Expert level knowledge of statistics, linear algebra, modern statistical learning with an understanding of when/how to invoke deep learning techniques vs. traditional methods is a must.

Location of role would be out of our HQ in downtown Boulder, Colorado.

Qualifications
Degree: M.S. or Ph.D.
Experience: New graduates to 20+ years of experience",-1,Viola AI,"Boulder, CO",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
